body
What I mean is that no one can decide that they aren't going to use energy even at sub 30 bbl there will always be some sort of demand. Therefore you can pay wages decent enough to attract workers. As for cucumbers I can generally albeit begrudgingly do without them. If others decide to do this then local cucumber farmers will not be able to afford to offer competitive wages.
Because it's obviously a hostile question. It wasn't I don't understand why increased accessibility would be bad thing. Why suggests they are baiting and concern trolling. It's also low effort.
Other commenters have already addressed your comment but here is some source material of what some of the issues are with it newscientist.com
Even if they didn't die directly as a result of Coronavirus symptoms the hospitals are still overwhelmed and as a result are unable to provide proper healthcare for other critical illnesses. Not sure what point you are trying to make though.
They sat on the contagion for a month. They should be paying everybody reparations.
Wtf is a trump Is that that guy still trying to be president No one cares what he says anymore.
They do because he's on the 100 dollar bill.
barrons.com mod bol social tw
A strict literalist huh You must be fun at parties.
You can't catch a heart disease. You can catch Covid. The threat levels are different because of the scale of transmission. This is common sense. The transmission can be exponential which makes it more dangerous. If you could catch heart disease it would be 1000 times scarier and we'd have quarentining for that too.
I believe the first article breaks down numbers. 10 12 base. The rest was transportation and other benefits Still more than minimum wage and a helluva lot more than zero which is the current state of millions
In the time of trouble all liberal pet projects get abandoned.
No I just can tell when I m speaking to someone who is also a medical professional or not and I find there s no need to argue when you re not. I m to tired to argue with that said as I ve said to others regardless I still wish you and your loved ones well. Take care
One president is an idiot. Two trump didn t fire this guy
Romney is the last of the old sane Republicans. All that are left are radicals or bootlickers. He s not perfect but he s a lot better than what we ve got now. I d take Romney over Trump all day and tomorrow. That said I d vote for Biden even if I think he s old and out of touch over both.
No one is making fun This isn't a playground. This is the big ole internet. This man isn't being taunted. His feelings aren't being hurt. Someone is pointing out the obvious. If you can't handle that little bit arguably negative info then maybe the free wheeling internet isn't for you. And hell yes it is self righteous to come along like a school tattle tale talmbout Guysth. Stawpit. That's not nice. You guysth are ebil. Please stop. It was a passing comment.
Can you imagine even just the polling if every person was able to mail in vote Obviously he opposes a mail in vote lol he's down 20 to my taco bell diarrhea
No serious corporations use Zoom. I worked for multiple start ups and corporations. Start ups use Zoom cause they are all liberals who think China no. 1 You know how vulnerable Zoom is Lol. China please.
Can't say I'm surprised. All militaries want people who just blindly follow commands than to do what they as individuals think is right. Sometimes it works sometimes it doesn't But that's the way they want to run their shit and until some drastic change happens it's going to be business as usual.
You think temper tantrums are admirable
I genuinely feel for you guys you are literally on the fount lines thanks for keeping this sub moderated
Whiny Moi I wasn t the one victim bragging about losing 3 million. I ve never come close to seeing a million dollars so if that means I m whiny because losing my job might mean losing everything then fuck you Senor Citizen. Hope you never have to break the rocks I have to earn a dime. Ya need to shut up and listen better I SAID I m shouting because you re not listening so good I expect the government to have a plan TO GET THE ECONOMY ROARING AGAIN Since they ve broken it not solve my problems. Self aggrandizing cunt.
Not a bad tactic on their part at this point.
The word cure' is nowhere in his remarks hitehouse.gov YOU need to stop being partisan and spreading misinformation.
Yee haw baby
many of the answers I read on that subreddit are well written and well intended. they help me be less angry.
gt Defendants knowingly disseminated false erroneous and incomplete information which was reasonably relied upon by the public and which had the effect of delaying and interfering with the implementation of effective mitigation and countermeasures against the virus the League said in the complaint. Defendants actions created an ongoing uncertainty amongst some members of the public as to the dangers of the virus and the rapidity with which the virus spreads.
Dolt 45 is a shitstain on the world. Fuck him and anyone that directly benefits from his freak show presidency along with the misguided bottom feeders that continue to deny the facts while devouring the red meat thrown to them by him and his enablers including FAUX News. There s absolutely no doubt in my mind he is the worst fucking president this country has ever seen. He is the antithesis of anything compassionate decent empathetic hopeful or moral. When this timeline ends and his fat fraudulent ass is gone we must do everything in our power to ensure this never happens again.
I think tax issue is mostly a messaging problem. People need to understand that with the right kind of legislation they would be money ahead even before they had a medical problem and waaay ahead when they did even after a tax hit. In any M4A bill there would have to be a provision requiring businesses that pay their employees the money that previously went to insurance companies. But mostly I think the problem is showing people clearly how they would benefit. The fact that there are so many still unconvinced shows they don t yet understand. I mean who argues for having less money
Also he is the chosen one by Jesus
The media isn't the one sure the Bernie is gonna lose the math is. Actual math not Bernie math.
What preparations could possibly be done The government can stockpile PPE and medical equipment. Other than that what would you have expected be done you list the conservative ones but I remember seeing articles on VOX on NYT on WAPO ALL downplaying the threat. FOX was in fact cautioning people about this in Feb the five Then suddenly in unisen the MSM all changed tune and SUDDENLY it was the biggest threat to humanity. Then they tried to spin it as if the MSM had been warning the Trump admin for months about this killer bug comming in from China. no they werent Trump banned the China travel and they jumped on him for it saying it would be ineffective and im pretty sure they slipped in something about him being racist anywhere they could. LOL what surveys are they then Bet they come from totes neutral unbiased places hey. Actually you got a link to these surveys Id like to check that out. He didnt try and extort Ukraine. The Ukrainian leader stated he didnt even know the aid was being held. He also stated he didnt feel threatened or pressured to provide anything in exchange for that aid money. So the guy being exorted didnt know about the aid... and the call did seem like pretty standard stuff when I read though it. From memory the word Biden' only appeared twice in that entire document. And his name wasnt near the paragraph about the favor' THAT bit was in regards to the DNC server which he believed was in the possession of crowdstrike which was the company responsible for the DNC hack investigation and who's founder had links to the Ukraine. In fact one of the co founders went on to found another internet security tech support company called Area 1 security' THAT company was hired late last year to investigate alleged hacking of Burisma Holdings The company Hunter Biden was involved in.
Of course he is
A rule backed by executive orders That's some mighty thin paper.
Breitbart isn't that much of a trustworthy news sources.
Yeah. That s a brilliant move WTF. Bathhouse Barry needs to F off.
She s deeply disappointed and praying for everyone.
Schumer is just appalling.
I feel that way sometimes too if I'm being honest. It's really hard to reconcile the reality that so many people support his actions. I actually think many of his scandals are vastly overblown but there's been a few where I just have trouble understanding how people can turn a blind eye. I think it all comes back to tribalism people see being a Trump supporter Republican Democrat as a large part of their identity. Any real criticism of Trump is a direct threat to how they see themselves so they ignore it. I see the same thing on the left with identity politics. There's some interesting social psych neuroscience research on the topic suggesting there are physiological reasons for this stuff I honestly don't know how we overcome innate tendencies.
Dude I'd vote for Sadam Hussein over this guy.
I giggled.
Well then you can t trust what they re saying can you
Rot in piss CNN and MSNBC.
You're talking about abortion Yes we do have that right. Most developed nations have that right. Not sure where you're going
Ridiculous.
Now Ayanna Pressley and Elizabeth Warren are demanding we track this by race so we can prove it's more dangerous to minorities.
Like there are regulations dude. You legally need to pass hunter safety to shoot animals at least where I live. You cannot purchase or possess a handgun with certain things on your background. You have to go through a background check to purchase a handgun with the exception of gun shows where I live. Etc. The idea that you can go to Walmart and walk out with an RPG and an M249 machine gun is a false narrative.
Republicans achieved their goal.
i have to say i laughed at the title of this article but honestly i agree wholeheartedly. this guy is a total douche.
What a fucking idiot this guy is.
We dont have think it HE SAID IT. You are stuck he is your guy. Lol. Deal with it.
Does Fauci really seem like he's getting the better half of the deal He's currently getting death threats.
Viva la r volution
Dude. no need. Let's call ourselves the Neo England. a lot of Pennsylvania will follow along... and we will leave the tucky part of the pennsyltucky to the south.
A lot of people don't want to learn anything. What they want is to hear their own echo. and remark about how smart it sounds
Yeah and that s for a legit farm doing everything by the book. I m sure a couple exist But reported and reality are often different. Foreign workers don t know the law. Many are taken advantage of.
As a pot head who gets to smoke all day while working remotely... Sucks to suck. Bootstrap and find a more in demand industry. No one owes you anything when public health is the concern.
He s a libertarian conservative so am I He said that himself.
actually lol'd well done.
Nope. He can't do that. He's running off at the mouth again. There are already mail in ballot only elections.
How so Are you saying it s difficult to get an ID Are you saying that minorities and historically disenfranchised people have a tough time getting IDs I m asking because this is the same bullshit argument that gets tossed around about people like me all the time. And I m sick of it. I ve lived in mostly Baltimore but also in Chicago and Philadelphia. Large areas of black people and you know what Every motherfucker I ve ever met has an ID. My Nana that s 85 years old has an ID and she still goes to vote. Voter suppression through the use of ID is such a ridiculous suggestion that it borders on racism to day that people like me aren t capable of obtaining one. You re fucking stupid to think otherwise or simply don t know many black people.
This is simply not true they do not pay as much in taxes as we do. Sure some with stolen socsec numbers do pay taxes but nobody in a cash economy pay income tax voluntarily. In Texas when you sell a car you have to go down to the DMV and do a title transfer before you give them the car. We used to just sign the title and we were done but Mexicans would buy the car and never transfer the title because they would have to pay taxes or they would drive it straight to Mexico sometimes taking toll roads and the owner of the car would have to pay all the tolls. We also have a lot of Mexicans here that run small businesses they have two prices the price for cash and the price for a receipt and sales tax. Everyone here takes the cash price because we know they just keep the taxes.
No but D woman bad
Gotcha. I thought you were taking issue with the post just because it wasn't OC.
Ok I am open to that both ideas change things up real good.
He has also declared The White House off limits to Carol Fuckin' Baskin.
It s not even enough for my rent. And I live in a studio apartment with 0 bedrooms and my kitchen is in my bedroom. 1 500 a month. I wipe my ass with 1 200
The very powerful and the very stupid have one thing in common. They don't change their views to fit the facts. They change the facts to fit their views. Which can be uncomfortable if you happen to be one of the facts that needs changing. The Doctor from Doctor Who
Yeah but civilians don't see or understand that..... Then they write articles like this and complain and get upset.
Ahh good ol late stages of capitalism. Glad I ve got mine and am working from home. Thanks Trump very cool
gt I was raised liberal and vote liberal. Yea but are you sure you are a liberal Being able to tolerate dissent isn't a very liberal thing to begin with.
If anyone if just now finding out I ve got news for them...
But we are socially distancing and huge amounts of people are still dying and hospitals are being overwhelmed. Things would 100x worse if we didn't isolate
He couldn t tell the truth of there was a gun to his head.
gt That definitely suggested that the feds are there to step in when any state requests and needs it because of an emergency situation. The new completely not changed based on recent politicians comments say that the feds are only there to help temporarily. No the new one does not say that the feds will help only temporarily but rather that the SNS can be used and probably will be during this pandemic as a short term buffer the keyword being buffer And don't you think this was somewhat self explanatory as the SNS is a STOCKPILE rather than a production facility
You claiming to lose 11lbs in 7 days on a diuretic diet doesn't help convince me he lost 15lbs in 3 days. Also in guessing ng you weighed a lot more than him at this time.
Sure they can.
Found it and tried to watch it. Thought it was depressing
also I thought it was Mike Pence...when did Kushner come into the picture
more than two Americans because the ventilator can be used on other patients as the cases are resolved.
Of course there are security measures but you've noted you don't know what happens to a ballot after it's in the mail so I see this is a pointless pursuit.
Has he not been out I've honestly been avoiding watching these for a while and just going back for recaps of it because I just get too angry at all the bullshit. I do know one of the people on his staff contracted coronavirus maybe it'll make the rounds in the white house now.
The suit isn't over Fox publishing accurate data though. In fact it has nothing to do with any data It's about this gt Defendants knowingly disseminated false erroneous and incomplete information which was reasonably relied upon by the public and which had the effect of delaying and interfering with the implementation of effective mitigation and countermeasures against the virus the League said in the complaint. Defendants actions created an ongoing uncertainty amongst some members of the public as to the dangers of the virus and the rapidity with which the virus spreads. There's evidence youtube.com v ifKbwDf51bA to work with here. I don't know if Fox forgot recordings of what they broadcast exist or what.
Try r politicalcompassmemes if you want to do that at a place that's not serious and mostly silly. But political viewpoints from all sides are represented there
Okay even if it was a good policy should tv anchors be making public policy Do you not realize the insanity of this You know what would be even crazier If a reality tv star became President
We are not at the point where that conversation needs to happen yet. The cases are still growing at an alarming rate. I agree that there is a time or place to have this conversation economy and everyone's jobs versus public health but we are not at that point until cases plateau and begin to fall. We are not at that point yet. Trump's reelection is depended on getting this right and taking it seriously.
Impeachment did not distract him from gutting pandemic response. Trump is shitty leader. So media stop making excuses for him
Why are you lying Feinstein does not have her money in a blind trust it is in her husband s name. Even her statement says it was her husband who sold them. sfchronicle.com Loeffler has a blind trust marketwatch.com That said I don t even like Loeffler as a politician but her money is in a blind trust unlike DF who has it with her husband.
What having a show on CNN
Question. When was the last time the US had 10million unemployed within a month
FWIW I've had pneumonia four times. Its the only time in my life that I've been laid out and been rendered truly helpless. That being said it also had periods of time during the 7 to 10 days of primary illness where I would feel fine relatively for hours at a time. Some days I would go to work only to end up under my desk at noon shivering like a dog shitting a bone. So I believe his description of what he could be going through. I've been there. I also believe that during periods of feeling better he might be able to broadcast. What I don't believe is that he could keep a regular schedule of any kind. So I don't think he's exaggerating the effects of this illness but he very well be exaggerating what HE is going through.
What do you mean They re listening to the KY governor in IN
Do you not know what voter suppression is
I can firmly say I represent most Sacramento residents by saying make us New Victoria
This guy is not anybody that we should be listening to At all
11 30 in DC
We should exempt MAGA rallies from stay at home orders too. In fact pack em all into large stadiums together.
Or that guy it outright killed
I m not calling it a cure but has def helped people there is not doubt about that and it s far from the suicide pill that the media is making it out to be and calling it dangerous
gt My biggest issue with your argument is just that you present R0 as the only metric that factors into how dangerous a disease is in your initial comment. Not true I didn't mention either metric directly because I presumed people would have a notion of how devastating Ebola is on the body. Then in my follow up and subsequent posts I discuss mortality rate much more because there's a stark difference between 1 4 and 50 gt total number of deaths Not a useful metric. I addressed this in subsequent replies. Mortality rate is the primary statistic for determining danger. If it's low we tend to not do much if it's high we do a lot more. This was why I said the following in my initial post gt We don't enact martial law for influenza. gt A lot more people wouldn't mind martial law if it were an Ebola outbreak. The implied difference there is mortality rates. I made a mistake in presuming people would understand the difference between Influenza and Ebola the deadliness of each is the obvious difference....well if common knowledge were as common as the name implies. gt relatively low death rate makes this disease even more deadly Facepalm https www.merriam webster.com dictionary deadly gt 1 likely to cause or capable of producing death How deadly a disease is isn't determined by how many people total die from it but the likelihood of dying if an individual gets it aka mortality rate. The cold isn't considered deadly because it doesn't kill people at a high rate. Usually influenza isn't deadly because it rarely kills the individual. Ebola is very deadly because it kills roughly half the people. You could say colloquially that the common cold CAN BE deadly but to say that the cold IS deadly is misleading because a vast majority of people who get it will survive.
The most likely outcome from all these new gun owners is going to be a new separate stream of utterly preventable deadly scenarios for first responders to risk their lives for and billions more piled onto the total cost of all this.
gt people will have to die before he takes action. They are dying. More will die. All because he won't take action. New York was is hit hard. It doesn't take a fucking rocket scientist to say send them support long ago. Once it is somewhat under control if someone else gets hit hard move the supplies there. Do not just hoard them like a mentally challenged dumbass saying well we will have to see. Need to be flexible. If NY needs them then maybe they will get it but you know Louisiana is going to get it bad soon. People are already dying. He knows that. He wants everyone to know he has the power and to suck his dick. He wants Democrats to praise him so he can get re elected. All of this is so he can get re elected. The amount of lives do not matter to him.
He already projected it when he suggested NY nurses were selling PPE out the back door. He'd already sold the stockpile out the back for a quick buck.
That baby was asking for it.
Okay you don't have to educate me on your practices and your opinions but I do still hope someone will.
so bernie has a chance
I'm with you on this. But I also think there is merit in looking at the worst possible outcome and making plans based on that. If we have too much capactity then that is wasteful but a good thing. Compared to having our civilian medics do effectively battlefield triage that is not a happy place to be in and takes a long time to get over if ever.
Does I may be religious differ substantially from I'm devoutly religious.
And lots of the deaths being attributed to the virus aren't Children have made up a small fraction of coronavirus cases worldwide. A letter published in the New England Journal of Medicine by Chinese researchers earlier this month reported the death of a 10 month old with COVID 19. The infant had a bowel blockage and organ failure and died four weeks after being hospitalized. foxnews.com That is just one case if you tested positive for Covid and die you died of Covid not your heart attack.
That cus in the 1700 hundreds it took 12 seconds to fire a shot not 12 shots a second. Why should we have more testing and training to drive a car than we do for firearms. Also what militia are you apart of You going to use that gun to fight the US army because they'll drop a bomb on your head. Edit 12 rounds a second is obviously hyperbole but figured I make that clear. AR 15 with bump stock clearly a much deadlier machine than a fucking musket.
But if a virus is still prominent in November turnout in non mail in states will be way down.
A lot of small businesses aren t going to make it through. Even with the loans knowing the way the Feds work there will be giant piles of paper work probably on actual paper that will need to be faxed like that s a thing anymore that if even a slight error is made will be rejected. My bigger worry is that this whole thing gives the Feds an outsized role in picking winners and losers. I m guessing that someone will be comparing lists of those seeking aid with those who have donated to Trump.
Let me start by saying you're gonna want to downvote this comment hell I want to downvote this comment. But I need to get how I feel out there. At this point I want Trump to win in 2020. Just let him have it let him do what the hell he wants. Let him bring us to ruin while his followers cheer and hope that England will take back over. At least that way we ensure that Trump's legacy is destroying the country and we get universal healthcare in the deal. Obviously I don't really want this and it'd never happen this way we'd end up part of Russia not England. But sitting here watching Trump do nothing while experts and news are accused of trying to create a panic the death toll rise while Trump continues to do nothing and his followers singing his praises in spite of the fact that he's done literally everything wrong is really defeating.
18 hr is higher than minimum wage in California. In a rural state with much lower standard of living that would be equivalent to 25 hr in California which is what an LVN Nurse might make That's pretty good money for no education required.
one question is she stupid or what
very underrated joke
Pay more you'll get workers.
They don t know how to handle it because in the first time in their whole lives someone is telling them no and not letting them do whatever they want. They don t know how to handle someone like Trump so they throw fits and try to disrupt everything he does even if it hurts Americans in the process.
You know he is. Saw that coming a mile away.
vicnews.com Golly it s like you don t know what the fuck you re talking about lol
And take the lying corrupt right wing media apparatus with it
Umm no that s how you pass on corona. You know it s possible to pass on the virus without symptoms right
If we do it will be with major fuckery.
LOL if going that route let's protest Pelosi and Schiff wasting oxygen others so desperately need...
gt he'll literally be trump without the dumb tweets and maralago trips Pro tip If you want anyone to take your opinions seriously don't say phenomenally stupid shit like this.
Hi My name's Roy Moore. R u a teenager Asking for a friend.
I gave up long ago. Totally worthless waste of time.
Wow. You didn't address the meat of my argument whatsoever. You're focused on but people might be sick What about the majority that are not sick Based on your logic we should never have the first amendment again. Throw it away. It's outdated. We don't need the freedom to assemble. We don't need the freedom of religion. After all you're still allowed to believe whatever you want s Let me repost the actual point of my post. gt I don't KNOW I have COVID 19. You don't KNOW if you have COVID 19. The vast majority of the population does not have COVID 19. Only some people have COVID 19. gt Yet you believe the government should be able to force all of these individuals into their homes under penalty of law violating the 1st Amendment on the chance they DO have COVID 19 and they accidentally pass it onto someone who may be more suspecible than they. And while we're at it what about those WHO HAVE ALREADY RECOVERED Whhhhyyyy are they still being subjected to restrictions on their freedom
Like I said tons of women kill their children because they don't want them. I'm not talking about abortion I mean they smother their kids with pillows drown them strangle them and shoot them. That is not their right to do. That's murder. You might be comfortable dehumanizing a child because it's not out of a woman's womb yet but that's unscientific and plainly wrong.
Then they deserve their pay cut. When it happens be sure to congratulate them on their poverty. Send them champagne make sure they celebrate that shit.
I have friends who need this to work to keep food on their table. Every day they decry that the site is broken and they cant even finish the application. Thays terrifying. Fuck these people.
Hello Fellow Charlotte resident here Charlotte is a huge banking city and thankfully from the few people I've communicated with a lot of us are working from home unless it's essential to be in the office say server work or something I'm not surprised that the top employers are considered essential. I know Mecklenburg county Charlotte is in will probably stay the most affected in our state just due to being a dense city but I have been mostly proud at how our senators and governor has been handling the situation. We're working on renovating a portion of our University's dorms into a field hospital since it's located pretty close to one of our main hospitals And a ton in the community have reached out to try and help fill in the cracks to source protective gear for our nurses. It's a shame that we the states are having to depend more on our own people than our unified government and I fear this will further divide our country and create a greater distrust in our Federation. But I'm proud to see how many individuals are offering their services and facilities to save lives. Never forget the power of our government comes from us and us alone. It's our responsibility to take care of each other and it's our responsibility to elect those who have our best interests at heart to help lead and guide us. Ask yourself who you think these people should be. Remember this time when November rolls around. I know no system or person is perfect. And we can't be 100 prepared for everything. But we can accept where we are learn from our situations and mistakes and apply our lessons to become stronger and greater than before. We're not defined by our difficulties. We're defined by how we respond to them. Do what you can to support your fellow man. And don't forget these times when we vote. Sorry man it's pretty late I'm tired but I just needed to get that off my chest
You're confusing two separate shipments. Trump stole an order that Baker made through BJs because the states were told they were on their own for supplies. This happened in mid March. Governor Baker then contacted Jonathan Kraft and one thing led to another and the second shipment of masks were brought to Massachusetts directly on the Patriots private plane which arrived yesterday evening. Mind you all of this was a very well kept secret and didn't break locally until yesterday morning. Also 300 000 masks were sent to NYCand RI also received N95 masks to.
Look at me... I'm the Pirate now
By that fact no one in USA is leading and all hope is lost.
Barely.
Vote Bernie if you want trump another 400 000 years
So youre claiming he is using a sauna and not drinking water amp x200B Because thats how you lose that much water weight in such a short period.
A couple of days ago I saw an episode on the Netflix series dirty money about him and today I am reading about him talking about coronavirus from White House He is really here to get us killed
I even pointed out that it's not all conservatives I differentiated for a reason. Some do for a matter of fact however because conservatism exists on a spectrum. You decided to ignore that truth in order to play the victim. gt This is what happens when you have education without the ability to think for yourself My critical thinking skills tell me that people using only insults and no arguments aren't in the position to talk about education. Unfortunately we're in this echochamber where I don't have to expect more than that.
Imo the real start of the end was when we let McConnell get away with not holding a hearing for a SCOTUS seat.
Spoken like a truly well adjusted and mature person.
Do better.
I imagine Thai Johnny Depp exists in the same universe as Canadian Antonio Banderas. Or Mexican Robocop.
Another poor victim of reeducation.
Slavery isn t mentioned anywhere in the Constitution.
Epics got nothing on gothic Victorian
The fix is in.
I think it's a bit early to draw any conclusions but it seems diabetes heart disease on lung disease results in a much much higher rate of infected who end up in ICU. 78 of the ICU patients in their study had at least of of those pre existing conditions cdc.gov It's a small study though and we're early on so the data could change. It's interesting to note that it was almost evenly split between the three conditions you'd expect it to hit those with lung disease at a considerably higher rate. Still a lot to learn.
Several thousand deaths There s already several thousand deaths with all these lockdowns. Change out the thousands for millions and it ll be more accurate.
I don t think those two are at odds. Personal safety is a right and the constitution prohibits government from interfering with that right. As for war rifles I can think of no reason why a soldier should have more killing power than a civilian.
Since when have we had completely free markets anyway There are plenty of countries the US has order not only our companies to refrain from selling to but other countries as well. That s the point of sanctions. China used to be on that list.
Yeah nah this is definitely physically possible. Had salmonella and I lost 20 pounds in 5 days. 15 in 3 days really isn t that implausible especially for somebody of moderate to heavy BW.
If global trade and economies fall apart far more people will die of malnutrition and health complications related to being unable to afford or provide themselves with food and shelter. You need money to survive in the world we currently have.
Nice flair. Delenda est is a passive active paraphrastic in Latin btw.
I'm not a Captain. From my ignorant pov at the very least set up tents and isolate as much as possible until they identified who had symptoms or gotten enough tests have a skeleton crew stay on the ship I'd think it's big enough to have some tents on the landing strip maybe isolate part of the skeleton crew up there too. The captain obviously had a plan he just didn't get the ok from the Secretary to fulfil it.
He s definitely in the running. I d say he has some competition for worst human being from the millions who voted for him and would do so again.
Yeah...but hockey players get up after they get hit.
Normally when we get to the new year I can t believe it s been a year I had just gotten used to writing the old one on checks. But if I woke up tomorrow and you told me it was early to mid 2021 I would totally believe you. 2020 can eat a bag.
Liberals bathe in shit then have the audacity to ask for free healthcare Get away from me shithead
Honest question what would be the impact to the economy long term if we all said fuck it and went about everything normally I m not going to do so as I m not willing to lose friends and family needlessly. I just imagine we ll bounce back faster if we take the short hit rather that the apocalypse with millions dying resulting in a long term collapse.
I did not go to the hospital and almost died. It is brutal and strange.
Hi christianooo Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission reddit.com has been removed for the following reason s Your headline must be comprised only of the exact copied and pasted headline of the article with few exceptions see our rule here. reddit.com wiki do not create your own title We recommend not using the Reddit suggest a title' as it may not give the exact title of the article. The ALL CAPS and Breaking' rule is applied even when the actual title of the article is in all caps or contains the word Breaking' This rule may be applied to other single word declarative and or sensational expressions such as EXCLUSIVE or HOT click here for more details r politics wiki index wiki do not create your own title If you have any additional questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u christianooo amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com context 10000
Although not CCP Coronavirus Disease 2. 0 they did a serosurvey in Saudi Arabia for MERS. In a group of 10 000 they found 15 people with the antibody for MERS which they extrapolated to estimate that approximately 45 000 people in Saudi Arabia alone had contracted MERS but through testing they previously had confirmed MERS cases was under 2 500 globally. pubmed.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov
Fucking degeneracy they want to normalize that shit. They don't actually have principles they just want control and they do that by wearing away at societies moral fabric.
I'm not completely sure about that. I don't think PMCs have big flashy offices but I might be wrong.
Sorry... but you've pissed off the Canadians. It's going to be forced labour and American beer for the detainees. Sorry.
Them's some pricey blueberries.
Someone also said it'll go down to 0 miraculously.
Acting as if every single person in the state is complicit or a write off by association. If you truly don t give a rip about the fate of 5M people let alone the rest of the country I ve got nothing else to say to you than that I hope life treats you better than you deserve.
No he has it backwards senate picks vp since the vp is president of the senate and the house picks the president but if I remember right there only 1 vote per state
Presidents cannot cancel elections.
The only thing wrong about the vacation home is how out of touch he was when he said like many Vermont people I own three homes.
Nancy Pelosi in approximately a week.
She encourages people to gather in masses so the pandemic can come to America in order for her coup part2 to begin.
That source includes non illegal immigrants as part of it s data. It even says the legal children are a significant part of the costs. What i d like to see is some sort of evidence that shows this is a cost effective strategy.
No. The president has no ability to cancel an election. The Constitution has explicit dates for when terms end and when they begin. He is automatically not president if he isn't reelected.
You dont have a god emperor altough Sander's supporters behave like groupies at time but you have a cult Diversity. I admit some Trump supporters are also overdoing it.
I can hear Bernie Sanders Good. There are too many kinds of deoderant
Seemed to me to be a question. Should she have made a hand gesture of a question mark at the end
I was totally done with this administration after I saw Christie s Daily Show interview.
As a physician 1 Dr. Oz is not credible. He sells unsubstantiated products on his show to make money. 2 hydroxychloroquine is not a benign drug. Please don t take it if you don t need it. Don t play with things you don t know. Please.
She won't be 35 by the inauguration
I think my post may have been misconstrued or at worst I replied to the wrong comment. My take was simply that Kushner made an error in what he said and it seemed as if the replying comments were saying that the administration was going to have to cover for him again My comment was just to point out how he got his position. Not to wish him death
Stop.
If we had a public option or Medicare for those who want it it would also help. The pandemic response isn t a failure in our healthcare system it s a failure in our pandemic response.
what's the benefit of such a narrative are you saying that there's a conspiracy theory of hospitals and patients faking the dangers of such a virus disease O.o
She was speaking about Chinatown in San Francisco almost two weeks before the first reported case in SF. I agree her statement was a mistake but does that mean she s no longer credible to weigh in on the messaging we need moving forward She has a moral obligation to speak up and protect people. She spoke in February trying to protect Asian Americans. And now she s trying to protect the rest of the country. Folks on Reddit may be better informed but plenty of people get their news from print and TV and they still need to be reached.
Does government have the right to suspend stupidity for the lives of others
Narrator they can
Government created socilaist problem with the state enacting policies that control the production and distribution of new and existing jobs
Australian here don't you guys have postal votes We do here and in the local council we had phone in votes to because of the coronavirus. Seems to work everyone gets a chance to vote. We also are starting to have extended polling where you can vote weeks before by going into a voting centre for people who can't vote on the day its more convenient etc
I disagree with that priority list but to each their own
Also... Isn't it an anti viral So wouldn't it if anything help to reduce symptoms which would in turn help you get through it I know there is an immunization to give immunity but without immunity you're still susceptible to the virus and you still have to make it through the virus or am I misinformed
Sounds like it
All of those countries are seizing masks in one way or another...what dud Reddit not tell you that 3M is an American company that decided to play games with American lives though. They fucked around and found out.
The staff exist lol. Wtf They are living breathing people with a skill set. You have a valid point with the servicing I would assume the bankruptcy creditors would maintain the asset though. Some suppliers may be affected so what Why would there be less planes This entire discussion is about allowing the airlines to go bust. My premise is we allow them to.
Completely forgot to mention Jan 14. WHO announces no evidence of human to human transmission. Your whole post is null and void.
lol Your president was the very first western leader to take action when he banned travel from China in January. Your side reacted by calling him racist. As recently as mid March top democrats were telling people to Go to Chinatown LOL
When did trump order people to stay in our homes
Three babies in a trench coat situation.
wow so no postal votes That means a whole chunk of the population is excluded that's amazing.
What's the point of having a country if we want to let everyone in and we're not even sovereign under the worldwide super government UN
One is a literal God and should be worshiped as such the other is a retard who bangs pornstars raw.
My question wasn't about Trump it was about your views on what the governments purpose is. Here's the preamble of the US Constitution gt We the People of the United States in Order to form a more perfect Union establish Justice insure domestic Tranquility provide for the common defense promote the general Welfare and secure the Blessings of Liberty to ourselves and our Posterity do ordain and establish this Constitution for the United States of America. I'm looking specifically at this part gt insure domestic Tranquility A lack of insurance during a pandemic doesn't give me a sense of calm. amp x200B edit can't type today
Good
Comparing Trudeau to a donkey is an insult... to the donkey
Duterte was a dictator long before COVID
I like Paul McCartney.
Ok got it thanks
It is misleading to say his children are not vaccinated. There is a definite point to be made about this transcript' where he states spreading out the vaccines and insinuating that there is some link between autism and vaccines which there is not.
Honestly...I m really busy right now. So...I mma leave you with this. reddit.com
Honest question. Are you on the spectrum
He is angry at NY because of all the crimes he did there they are investigating him so he is punishiing them.
gt But again eventually you'll realize you have to leave your house eventually and in fact you will get sick again. But again where do I need to go You're not answering my question. I'll wait until the virus has infected so many people it dies off or until there's a vaccine.
gt Sweden is about to get hit. Still too early man you could be right....but you could be wrong and lots of people here are going to be enraged that we killed the economy for an insignificant difference in medial outcomes
Oh come on it's been 3 years I'm sure Trump is a billionaire now after all the donations they get
Disgusting How DARE THEY
Ok... so what are you doing about the crevasse
Why should he be ashamed What did he do wrong
I swear if fucking illegal aliens get money but dependent elderly dont get money I'm gonna be real fucking pissed.
So she s saying tax payers are allowed to break the law
Medicaid was not part of the opt out service and every version of UBI is and always has been an alternative to cash and cash like assistance programs. Why To get rid of the means testing that causes poverty traps and welfare stigma. Yangs UBI will not hurt people in poverty they're receive on average 229 more than traditional welfare programs they'll be free from the humiliating welfare stigma and they won't have to jump through hoops to get it lines wait times
Happy cake day
Trump would have sacrificed them all to keep the numbers down. Him and the elites don't care about the service men women and they never have. All they see is profits.
And we're blowing up the global economy for models that haven't shown any predictive accuracy. Madness.
You guys heard me wrong he whined.
This guy looks like Mr. Crocker from The Fairly OddParents without the glasses
As someone from Spokane can confirm.
They re taking this a little too far.
well duh. if it wasnt tradition itd be hard to be president of usa knowing youd be held accountable for any war crimes.
What if he just takes notes from the Trump playbook declares his firing as fake news and just goes on about his day
We report you decide LOL.
Ah yes the same women who said Hitler did nothing wrong. Good choice If Hitler just wanted to make Germany great and have things run well OK fine Edit The video twitter.com
Jesus that thread is depressing...
Take the pandemic seriously. Trump is with daily public briefings. Have experts tell us what we should be doing to slow the spread of the virus. Trump is with Drs. Fauci and Birx. Protect the nation. He did by closing down travel between Asia and the EU weeks ago. Work on keeping businesses and people paid. He did by signing the CARES act. Enable faster production of equipment. Trump is by working alongside private businesses. Cut red tape allowing a vaccine to get to market faster. Trump is by allowing the FDA is produce a vaccine within one year or so. In the meantime allow for clinical trials to move forward faster than normal. Trump is by having big pharmaceutical companies test a combination of an anti malaria drug a Z Pack and Zinc. Sorry Bernie. But big pharma is going to save us all. You're welcome.
This was the plan all along. Wave your hands rip the table cloth then ruin grandma s heirloom china.
It's not Trump. I feel like I'm fighting a 1 man war against this foolish notion. Trump is the martyr. The GOP want you to place all the blame on him his narcissism protects his self esteem anyway. Blame those around him. Blame the large corporations that backed Trump. Blame the GOP Do not blame the martyr separate from the herd.
Add to that if other countries decide not to send necessary products to the States especially if other countries band together against the US. We'll see who blinks first.
JFC Reddit This guy was a native born Louisiana Army General who volunteered to step into one of the worst domestic emergency situations we've seen in years Katrina ravaged Gulf Coast and did more in 10 days than most of us will accomplish in a lifetime after FEMA completely screwed the pooch. You hear right person at the right time but it's rarely been more true. That military relief effort saved thousands of lives and one of the finest examples of peacetime military civilian cooperation efforts. He's absolutely right and it's vital now more than ever the US Mil is the only organization in the Country who can make happen what needs to happen over the next 30 days.
Opinions are fine but what does this accomplish right now People who hate Trump Kushner laugh people who don t get pissy. It s the same 50 50 spread either way.
How are they wrong
We are living in a real life episode of 24 and the clock never ends.
This is a highly inaccurate Fake News job
Yes my point was that he has impeachment on the brain even though he should be dealing with the coronavirus outbreak
gt That's certainly some words you just typed alright If you really want to know why democrats Hate voter ID that was the explanation of why
A lot of red hats in rural middle states will benefit badly from this decision. They don t know who their enemy really is.
See I d be fine with an ID if it is free and easy to get. Anything less than that seems like restricting and hindering a people s rights.
Thank you for doing the bare minimum of your required job
Hypertension is included here. That's gotta cover almost half the population of adults.
Not one. Just like the people who attended lynchings and protested when black children had the audacity to go to school. I never liked him. I never voted for him. Make notes of their names and put them on your computers. They are traitors and should never be allowed to forget their crimes and supporting Trump now is a crime. Being complicit in the destruction of a country to own the libs is a hateful despicable act that's made even worse by their constant displays of patriotism.
Hospitalization rate in Italy is around 40 in Italy and that is to say if they aren't hospitalized they'll die. In the US it's lower about 10 15 but same deal. They're not hospitalized sitting a bed drinking soup they've got oxygen or a ventilator so they don't die.
He put travel restrictions on china and surrounding areas in January. I'll let you figure out what Congress and the media were doing then. Hint. They may have been calling him xenophobic and were more preoccupied with trying to impeach him. Ventilators will be rolled out as needed. It's absolutely insane one city would think they are entitled to 2 3 of the ENTIRE Federal stockpile. Limited resources need to be spread around. But the hubris of Coumo and NYC shouldn't surprise anyone. The only reason we have the most OFFICIAL cases is because we've done the most testing. This is impacting everyone around the world and If you believe the numbers coming out of china are accurate and actually lower than ours then I have a ship to sell you.
gt Ok I hear you. which it did. I can sympathise with that. I have always been right wing but more of a right of centre liberal verging on libertarian which is about as right wing as it gets in the Netherlands. I was quite pro choice for most of my adult life. It was only when I started questioning the narrative I've been told my entire life that I started to become more right wing. I noticed that the people I have always had political discussions with my friends and family were suddenly not as open to different ideas as I thought. The first discussion I had about abortion with my brother turned into a fight because he just said I was a brainwashed wannabe Christian. Every discussion I've had about abortion since with the people around me with my roommates my friends family and even my own mother made me realise that their point of view is inherently irrational. Especially the anger they show when I question their logic not their morality mind you did change the way I look at politics. But for Candace Owens it just happened to fast for me to be believable. That is why I said she might have been faking it at first but sincerely believes it now. I know that a lot of things I believe now would have sounded ridiculous to me a couple of years ago. gt And you say what you believe. I agree with you on that. I've been through a very similar process myself. After you realise they are lying to you about one thing then it doesn't take much to question everything else. There are people that did a complete 180 on politics with whom I do not doubt for a second that they are sincere like Thomas Sowel. That man used to be a commie degenerate when he was my age but you have to be a fool to think he is just pandering. What bothers me about Candace Owens is that they tried to make it as a left wing political activist before she went too far and just switched sides. To a lesser extent I feel the same way about Dave Rubin. He tried to make it as a leftist media personality at TYT and when that didn't work out he suddenly became a right wing figure. But because Dave Rubin isn't nearly as intelligent as the people he somehow managed to surround himself with it is just much more obvious that he is in it for the money. gt Candace may have open enough mind. This could very well be true. I have no hard evidence for my allegation I just don't think it holds up to the sniff test. The JRE episode with her made me even more suspicious of her. She is obviously a very intelligent lady. There is no way she actually believed what she said. But for all I know she could have just felt like admitting that she doesn't know enough about it to form a strong opinion wasn't an option due to her ego. gt Now I think she is a fraud. I sincerely hope you're right. She has become a prominent voice on the right and I guess if she is able to open the eyes of young African American voters it really doesn't matter whether she truly believes what she is saying or if she is just in it to make a buck. I also want to express again that it is likely she does truly believe what she is saying now even if it didn't start out that way. The vitriol and hatred the left has shown here these couple of years will turn even the most leftist degenerate into a God fearing American patriot. gt My appeal to at your core. Amen to that. I have been a complete degenerate for a large part of my life. I even disliked Trump for a good while. But the Kavanaugh debacle has shown me that the left is not even remotely willing to work with the right. They would happily destroy your life and everything you care about as long as it grants them a political win. Pelosi literally tried to keep the American people hostage for her leftist agenda not even two weeks ago. So if she keeps sticking it to the left I won't mind Candace Owens being a loudmouth but if she turns out to be a fraud I want everybody to know that I called it.
No. We are still here and we will overcome.
Get that China Derangement Syndrome checked out
I is a personal pronoun used as a subject. Shouldn t be used as an object. Sorry to be a grammar Nazi your point is noted and very funny. Oh and if you were actually showing how the media is always wrong and using this as an example it went right over my head and you are a comedic genius.
They read anti american history textbooks in grade schools for years they watch movies and TV series portraying homosexuals as heroes and christians as evil They go to college and hear professors and neo communist student groups they watch the mainstream news and a young mind just assumes most of these give correct information.
gt we need a street fighter No we really don't We need somebody to be professional while nobody else is.
Why aren t actual members of the so called opposition party demanding Trump s resignation Are they still too busy raising money off of his gaffes
Or maybe his spray tan is lead base or has pcp or some shit in it some how. Like he just stops putting it on a day and comes down off it looks around and just goes what the fuck dude
Wah wah wah reee reee REEEEEEE UNACCEPTABLE REEEEE
gt Trump is a poor persons idea of how a rich person should act. Trump is a stupid man's idea of a smart man.
The article for this post was form Dallas News regarding deportation of illegal immigrants... Why do you keep on bringing up of Fox News when that was neither the source of the article or referenced by me while making a point. Since you disagree tell me why open borders in a global pandemic makes sense
Catholic hypocrites have an opinion. Majority of Americans continue to not care.
Dragons breath youtu.be
Oh fuck.
Don t feel bad for them. They re being willfully ignorant.
gt Could be if hospitals literally run out of beds to treat one I wonder if this is just considered a narrative... hospitals running out of beds and bodies piling up. Perhaps the lung fluid itself is a narrative...
The files are in the computer
If you want to wear a mask wear one.
If Americans still votes for Trump in next election.... I don't know what to say.
What has he embellished He says he has a fever chills and has a hard time sleeping. He says it doesn t feel good. I just don t see it.
Welcome We're not hateful unlike the crazies who send the mods hate mail.
I think you may have mistaken me for someone who is fun
Tune in next Friday night same time same channel for... the pardon of Roger Stone
This is so disturbing. It appears Trump is outbidding states not distributing the necessary supplies needed and NOW he is confiscating supplies bought by states and redistributing some of them Where in the fuck did all of the 300 masks go Gov Baker was expecting
I remember my first beer. Donald is on a mission to be the Oracle of this country and quite honestly I think he's succeeding. Every time the Oracle speaks America listens Obama maybe said something every three weeks worth listening to Bush every six weeks Clinton every nine weeks H.W every 12 weeks Reagan every 15 weeks etc. At this rate in 2024 whoever the next one is will be in our rooms with us talking into our headphones that we can no longer take off because our nervous systems are fused with computers like we're Doctor Octopus.
I had to show ID a couple of weeks ago when I bought some cough medicine along with my other groceries but for voting that s rayyyycist.
Why would the democrats need to hold anyone accountable The country isn't just run by two parties you have a judicial system in place too. You know those guys whose job it is to hold accusers and accused accountable Why not let them deal with it Separation of powers and all The woman can file a case submit a sworn statement and move this thing away from social media to where it belongs a court.
I guarantee he has little to no idea what she s talking about because he can t get past her accent plus he lacks adequate background knowledge
What is the government supposed to do then
Oh right because journalists went to medical school and know what s up... I trust Faucci.
Omg fuck off. This is a global Pandemic. You can't expect people to just follow guidelines there are way too many idiots who would royally screw us by going everywhere they pleased. This is a fucking crisis. Man up and follow the rules so we can all just get this over with and we can get back to our lives.
Maybe they should have worked on becoming legal.
Why did the Qatar group save him
The embodiment of our Core Values. Thank you Sir... Shipmate.
Congress the Democrats very own Wet Market. A place to go go to get all their appetites and fantasies sated. Rich living in a profligate high tax State and wanting more taxpayer subsidy of your lifestyle Send your Congressperson to the wet market for a SALT cap repeal. Want to dress up and go to the Kennedy Center for cocktails and to see Hamilton Send your Congressperson to the wet market. Want to curry favor with union workers or the far left environmentalists or any other faction so they keep you in office Go to the wet market. The fact that Congress is buying contaminated bat meat that is driving up debt and destroying the economy is irrelevant.
gt I know I don t do a complete inventory at the start of every shift. I just assume that if someone took something they d note it... especially if they took almost the entire stock. Worked in a few places like this outgoing shift is supposed to restock and incoming shift is supposed to double check. But when something comes up short in the middle of the shift guess who's fault it is yup the incoming shift for not ensuring it was stocked. This admin had 3 years to double check the stock of supplies. Yeah the previous ones were supposed to restock it but they didn't Yeah you can yell at them but it was shorted on this admin's watch. They should've done their due diligence and checked the supply. It's on them now.
I ve always thought it bizarre that the GOP is without art or culture these data. If the GOP was an ancient civilization they would leave nothing on cave walls. Nothing to remember them by if they were a stand alone culture.
I'm glad to see that you think that one individual should have so much power.
Enjoy living in your echo chamber
Sorry to hear that hopefully she is doing well.
The bullet is the size of a meteor. It s gonna hit.
gt I am hoping McConnell is not forced to give in to her demands for vote by mail. That will benefit the dems a lot. Why s that Can t Republicans also use mail in votes
Yep it is. It's like a different world.
Everything
I didnt say she was good at being corrupt.
So now you argument is that he just happened to have a temporary hold of water in his system right before it started. Bloat. Hey tell me does Cuomo cock taste good to you guys Since you're willing to just make up as much background information as possible to make his story work.
I just want to make my own choices. I want to be able to go to the gym or go out to eat with friends. Now obviously those gyms and restaurants shouldn t make anyone work who doesn t want to take the risk. This is all just a fucked up situation.
Yeah Trump totally shouldn't have not told people to drink fish tank cleaner.
I've seen that slogan on clothing. I don't care do you But it was bout putting children in cages.
Weijia Jiang for CBS
This article cherry picks one piece of data from the analysis and then writes an article based upon that single piece of data which isn't entirely accurate. The analysis can be found here https public cdn.sermo com covid19 c8 be4e 4edbd4 dbd4ba4ac5a3b3d9a479f99cc5 wave i sermo covid 19 global analysis final.pdf A couple things of note on page 3 they state that their point values are 6 with a 94 confidence level. Page 25 is the section Of the medications you have personally prescribed or have seen used please indicate which ones are most effective. The top 4 answers for the entire sample are 1. Hydroxychloroquine or chloroquine 37 2. Azithromyacin or other anti biotics 32 3. Nothing 32 4. Analgesics 31 Doctors were allowed to pick more than one option and since they are all within the margin of error this is not some glowing endorsement of hydroxychloroquine over everything else. Clinical trials are needed to determine its effectiveness. Anecdotes are a good start to see which things we should check out but our health policy should be informed by tested and reviewed science.
Yeah I was talking about smaller medium sized cities like the one I live in not NYC.
Holy shit please. That would be amazing. Or hell even an auto filter that just hides all comments from people under 18. Adult mode or something.
yummy commie boot you eat
He runs a multi million dollar startup from his basement that makes soy based health drinks named after animals.
Every death is on donald trumps hands
Easy Rogan.
Not the crispest cards in the deck.
The fact that anyone at all approves is astounding
Showing off fake power Check
Notice how your quote and the original one posted here which I said was in accurate are not the same. So try again.
Im interested in why you think she is dangerous Is trying to drag your asses into the 20th century where the rest of the developed world exists with socialized education and healthcare scary to you. Great that is exactly where trump wants you to be. Ignorant stupid and sick and blaming everyone else fir your terrible choices.
We are not having real elections in November especially if another wave of coronavirus hits. We d best accept that and prepare accordingly. Of course millions of people in this country and others have risked their lives to exercise the franchise. If the virus makes a comeback in the Fall it may be our turn to make that sacrifice if we wish to prevent even worse things in the future.
Are you into empiricism and or scientism The evidence for God is varied and people accept some things and not others. If you d like logic alone then check out the many proofs for God s existence. If you re interesting in the world going wonky for no other reason then see miracles. If you re fine with people s experiences then check out their many testimonies similar to witness testimony in court Et al. I have to sleep but that should answer your question. I asked about empiricism and scientism because they preclude the supernatural. You re not going to find evidence of spiritual things if you start off with there are no spiritual things
I don't know about that he basically abandoned Michigan.
Doctor Fauci was educated by Jesuits.
Most of the world uses Voter ID except for us and a handful of privileged countries. There are so many states now where an illegal immigrant could vote online and have no problems doing so.
I'm not your pal guy.
Yeah I've read the transcripts multiple times. So yeah he didn't say it was a wonder drug. He said that is has promise. The media decided to report what the media decided to report. Thanks for your concern.
This account is blatantly a Chinese shill
As long as you're a democracy this is you. And by this I mean babysnatching spacenazis who pirate medical supplies
Wouldn't that be like MREs or similar I don't think those require much in the way of special storage.
Be careful what you wish for.
Ironic as hell. Have you fact checked any of trumps statements from the past 4 years
I haven t seen a quote but it seems like he s framing is as somehow covid19 related. Personally I don t trust Barr as far as I could throw him so I don t care in the slightest what his reasoning is.
I don't think he would but I still wouldn't take the chance. I would never trust any government enough to just toss basic human rights out the window.
It will be a bit too late at that point. That assumes we have an election in November.
While Republicans just told us nothing and dumped their stocks for cash right Too bad Democrats politicized corona and the Republicans used it to make money off the stock market. There I finished your sentence
I m so glad you would choose fascism and full on trumpism for the sake of preserving your fragile sense of entitlement and privilege. Most of us don t have the luxury. A trump reelection would doom us all
TBF Melanie has been practicing social distancing for years. tenor.com
You know it s a slow news day when... Much ado about nothing.
Perhaps but a conversation could have some the trick.
Yup... good call. Thx
Not saying being one of these tomb guards is harder than being a doctor right now but do you have any idea the requirements to do this job
Nah man. At least democrats care about their constituents and not making money.
rofl
gt That s why people who violate shelter in place orders are either fined or arrested as they fucking should be. What about those who have recovered from the virus already They can't carry the disease they can't pass it on they are perfectly safe. Why can't a group of 100 people who have recovered get together for a big celebration BBQ Now you're being the tyrant.
And that is the same attitude much of America had in 2016. Now who is sticking his or her head in the sand
Not to mention Vindman who was following orders.
Blah blah blah
Someone in a coma would habe been a better leader.
Haha I never said it couldn't be worse than 80k I only said to use it as a point of comparison. 150k vs 80k is the comparison I made. amp x200B You just made something up and said that was my argument. amp x200B A tip If you improve your reading comprehension it will help yourself and anyone that depends on you in the future.
That is BS she can't look giddy doing anything. I think she hasn't been able to smile 3 plastic surgeries ago
Yes
Press harder
You consent to the risk of killing other people That usually isn t how consent works unless you re rich and famous and grabbing people by the pussy
Ah yes you must ve been the headshot victim. A gunshot wound to the brain is the literal only way I can see someone looking around at the last four years and saying this is fine.
I don't think any Canadian 3M plants can make masks. I read that earlier today. Otherwise they'd be making masks.
This is such a naive statement WOW. There are tens of millions of Americans to the left of the Democratic Party. We would vote for anyone with a chance at the nomination that s a real progressive. Y all think we just disappeared when the dems went right
William Barr specifically.
Because I know history and how socialism communism takes hold. I also know that seizing unconstitutional power meaning powers not enumerated to the federal government in Article I is a means to that end. And let s face it if Obama was the one doing this the majority of this sub would be marching in the streets.
you know the dnc apologized to bernie after their emails were released where they were shown to not be partial to the process and were gunning for hillary right did you see the nevada caucus where they changed the rules to disenfranchise bernie literally holding kangaroo court style votes losing the votes and changing the rules anyways irregardless of what happened voters lost in the dem primary in 2016 the dnc failed us and cheated bernie supporters
Because the companies bought the products. The FEMA has arranged for the products to be shipped in via plane to get them here quicker.
Its come to the point that whoever is in office will completely divide the country. Very much an us and them mentality
You did n't even read it. Trump doesnt own golf cart suppliers no one is claiming that. Trump owns Trump National Golf Club which at which they will be spending almost 100 000 this summer on golf cart rentals. I love your quick knee jerk reaction to anything like this. Sweep it under the rug
Drink gas
Oh my God.
Would love to see how this clown claims to have prepared the country for this. By wasting everyone s time with allegations everyone knew were false
Thanks for letting me know that you are unable of contributing meaningfully to this conversation and are instead attacking spelling errors. Also thanks for further confirming that leftists know next to nothing about the beliefs held by conservatives.
Trump could speak to China directly if he needed to. No middleman needed.
This is Econ. 101. Humans need to be alive and feel safe shopping spending investing first. This will make the economy recover.
NYC is hell because they refused to shut down mass transit and require masks in public.
They are so biased that it's comical. You'd get more intellectual discussion from a Jersey Shore episode.
how does bernie pay his major plans berniesanders.com I added the bold becasue Bernie has many people assuming these funding sources will go away gt 47 trillion total gt Current federal state and local government spending over the next ten years is projected to total about 30 trillion. gt The revenue options Bernie has proposed total 17. 5 Trillion gt 30 trillion 17. 5 trillion 47. 5 Trillion total The source he lists National Health Expenditure Projections 2018 2027 says The 30 Trillion is Medicare 10. 6 Trillion No change to FICA means still deficit spending 3. 7 Trillion is funded by the Medicare Tax. 7 Trillion is Income Tax and Medicare Beneficiary Premiums Payments Medicaid 7. 7 Trillion current Out of pocket payments 4. 8 Trillion The Out of Pocket Expenses means that the money you pay for a Co Pay or Prescription will still be paid in to the Medicare for All Funding System 6. 8 Trillion is uncertain funding including other private revenues are 2 Trillion of this Not Federal Spending this is in Charity Funding provide philanthropically. So even though everyone now has Healthcare will these Charities Donate to the hospital or the government still. Can Hospitals accept donations or does it all go to Medicare for central distributions the money people current donate to places like the Shriners Hospital or St Jude workers' compensation insurance premiums Not Federal Spending State general assistance funding Not Federal Spending other state and local programs and school health. Not Federal Spending Indian Health Service maternal and child health vocational rehabilitation other federal programs Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration It appears left out of that was Children's Health Insurance Program Titles XIX and XXI Department of Defense and Department of Veterans' Affairs. The 17. 5 Trillion is then 7. 5 percent income based premium paid by employers 5. 2 Trillion New Corp Taxes on Previous Nontaxable Expenses 3. 0 Trillion Enacting corporate tax reform 1. 0 Trillion Establish a Wealth Tax 500 Billion Enacting the For the 99. 8 Act 336Billion 4 percent income based premium paid by households 4. 0 Trillion Make the Personal Income Tax More Progressive 1. 1 Trillion Taxing capital gains at the same rates as income from wages 2. 5 Trillion
Isn't there like.. something else he should be focused on right now
This is why we aren t exploring space already...
I mean at the end of the article it lumps obama AND trump together. Obama failed to replenish the stockpile before leaving office. Trump never addressed the stockpile issue until Covid was on the US door step. I'm not sure what this was trying to prove. Because what it SAYS is obama messed up for handling about a dozen incidents that warranted the resources and never replenishing despite advice and outcry. Then trump did nothing about it until it was too late. I'll let history dictate HOW he handles covid19. But this is a weak argument for Trump gt Obama
This is just misinformation. The article itself says It is still too early to be certain of the numbers but it is clear that asymptomatic infection is contributing significantly to the spread of SARS CoV2. The sample sizes are small and there was no follow up to determine if they ever did get symptoms. While there probably are asymptomatic cases the headline is misrepresenting the facts presented in the article.
Can someone tell me what environmental racism is supposed to mean A fellow student was making a documentary about it last fall and they asked me to write a score for it. I was astounded when I heard those two words put together.
Hello sigseved thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news We are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. Thank you for your understanding. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u sigseved amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. npr.org context 10000
I m not racist you fool. First off you have no fucking clue what I said while obama was in office. Trump has also play nearly 3x as much golf as obama did in his entire 8 years.
Yeah he's a republican
It s probably the Chinese government who hired these people to do this. The Chinese government is really beginning to get on my nerves. I would totally not put it past them to do this
I feel like this is a distraction and honestly... I don't even care. I'm not going to read any of the articles the headline had all the information I need. I am not surprised. How about a megathread about the President trying to steal medical supplies from other countries and ordering businesses not to send equipment to any other countries but us. Does that not prove that we are screwed and don't have what we need to ride out this storm I'm sorry the whistleblower got fired but... It's too late for that. We're gonna die.
Politicians big broadcasters and govt workers aren t loosing anything that s who rush is referring to. And yea no one should celebrate but Nancy looks giddy when proposing things that would crush us.
US also funds reddit. Russia funds reddit. UK funds reddit. Yes
Bryan stelter was the hentai guy right
Where exactly would they be a nightmare Subways operate just fine here in Atlanta.
I want to know who owns stock of the companies buying the supplies. Bets on Kushner for sure.
gt REEEEEEEEEEEEE
Cmon man that's not nice. What did the bag of rocks ever do to deserve being compared to AOC
Genuinely interested do you have a source I could read
Depressingly yes I do.
Yes
It's called an after action review. It's so this dont happen again if we ever get through this. See you on the other side...
He's likely playing small target. People will vote for Not Trump as long as NotTrump doesn't say something stupid
The guy is trying to keep his marriage alive... give him a break.
Aircraft carriers have multiple Video Teleconfrencing systems both from unclassed all the way to top secret video conferencing systems. Again the issue isnt that the CO was being ignored its hillarious that people actually think that the Navy would ignore one of its 11 capital ships but that there were issues in conveying messaging.
Very accurate. BTW fuck China
None of those masks were for nurses or respiratory therapists Just doctors
If you think we haven't been living under a totalitarian government for years than you're mistaken. They don't care about people or their rights
So the actual stockpile and the disposition policy hasn't changed just the PR notice on a website. I think it's a good idea to remind states that the feds simply can't bail them all out of their shortfalls. Hurricanes floods etc are generally isolated so the feds can really focus resources with little regard to other needs. That creates a false expectation that the feds can do so even in a situation like a pandemic. I really worry what happens when everyone looks to the feds to somehow provide life support to a 22T yr economy and all the unemployment funds are gone. But I guess the printing press just goes brrrrrr' and no one cares. But I know I know orange man bad so he isn't allowed to say no to anyone ever. I get it.
The only pulp supplier for that mask due to how it s produced is.....Canada
Resisting isn t something any of us are eager to be doing. But we can question things and that doesn t hurt you. Our livelihoods are being destroyed we ve got a bunch of elected people telling us what we can and cannot do while our lives are being destroyed while we understand better than you give us credit for that the sickness kills. Quit nagging us to listen we do and we have problems with what we are constantly hearing. That s why we discuss it.
Kushner is a fuckin tool
You re one of those people that thinks when Trump has an idea it automatically becomes reality. Trump tweeted that we should detain all Chinese immigrants. So that s definitely going to happen. As soon as he tweeted it ICE started rounding them up. The president isn t an all powerful dictator forcing his will onto the population. I wonder if this guy understands that the places he gets information from carefully manage that info to suit their goals.
gt Wait... isn t calling it the Spanish Flu racist I can t keep up with these rules guys. I could tell you why it's called the spanish flu but nah you're too racist and try to be all woke without actually caring. Anyway if you really want to know 1 minute google search and will shut you up sand brain.
850 million detained by ICE Wow. That s 298 million MORE than the combined population of Mexico and all of South America... Please stop trying to spread ridiculous misinformation. Luckily your numbers are so absurd that nobody with a shred of common sense would believe any of it.
This is just about money. I don't care what you fucking people think. This is playing off the fears and insecurities of people thinking their neighbors will Rob them. I don't care about your second amendment rights. This is exploitation and someone is going to die because of the paranoia
I keep explaining this to my Marxist friend who is super opposed to Duterte and what is going on over in Palestine... I always say if the Philippines had the 2A he would never consider this. P
You're telling me there wouldn't be ways for those counting the votes to manipulate the votes at all if done via online I find that very hard to believe.
They re still there. They always were there. They stayed.
Don t get me wrong I think covid 19 is horrible but I wonder if gutting the middle class was the right solution. These checks feel more like hush money.
There s literally no point switching back to plastic bags you think if someone had virus on their reusable bags that they don t have virus on their clothes
Really Far as I am aware all of the things I mentioned existed long before Socialism was first codified. Most of them maybe all of them were created inside Capitalist societies.
Still please think do you need a disabled person as your wife or not. You deserve a better future mate
How braindead are you that you think what happens in one country can't won't happen in another. I also mentioned Reginald Denny but liberals don't like looking at truth do they.
of course doing it during an emergency so he can have a stooge when he gets investigated for the corona disaster
Yeah Democrats seem smug in their belief that this will be a we told you so moment and are getting their allies in the media to play that tune as much as possible. But there is a good chance this will backfire on them and enough Americans will see through it and realize their hard bend toward progressivism has caused nothing but wreckage in its wake. Especially when we look at the hardest hit areas of the country and realize they are all run by self described Progressive Democrats.
Thank you for saying that. It makes me so happy.
Blessed be the fruit.
Just proving you are the better person.
Ironic given the way he you know looks
No. I used your comment history. Please. Tell us all how you're a historian.
Did he mean they were for his family and the White House
AL loves Trump. I hope they remember then when they go to vote.
After the next election it won't matter what Trump does or says anymore because he'll instantly become a lame duck and for a guy who's always campaigning for himself as a brand that's deflating. What will be interesting after the GOP steals this election through social engineering to influence center left versus left in fighting and deeply instilling voter apathy against the Democratic Party is how society reacts when Trump nominates himself President until death. That'll really throw the all this is normal crowd into an anarchic tailspin.
The Constitution is the bedrock and this is just a blip. If the Americans learn from all of it...
Also a great idea Sanders proposes a monthly payment Kennedy an immediate one time payment by the looks of it.
Imagine that Democrats have no problem bringing people into this country to do hard manual labor for low wages because the Democrats profit off and benefit from them. Hmmm seems like I've heard this story before...
gt I have no idea what to do about it. Once my parents pass I will have to seriously consider leaving this country. This is a question I've struggled with when do you decide that it's time to leave your country It's a question I never ever thought I would have to consider.
In all fairness Killmeade said it was being prescribed the first time he described it. Fauci just heard it wrong. He used the word clarify simply out of respect for Fauci. he was being diplomatic with that.
Didn t say it was peer reviewed out of a list of drugs it was chosen as the leading drug with 37 of doctors choosing it which I assume is the majority bc it won I feel of trump didn t mention this people would be shitting on it as hard
Someone was breastfed too long.
Yup vote for blue no matter your integrity their republican values... or if they raped someone It s the woman s fault for looking that way right Some people value INTEGRITY over an obviously flawed candidate. This is why Clinton lost and is why the DNC screwed up again for 2020. They basically handed it to trump already.
Data evidently varies because the infection rate I saw was 3 with incubation of 3 to 5 days. symptoms presenting in up to 15 days That's still terrible but goes to show we re not getting the most accurate data. Given that exposure on or shortly after Feb 24th puts patients on track to present just before things started getting very bad in mid march in NYC.
1. 16 year olds legally cannot work full time. If you wanna be the one to trade child labor laws for voting then go for it. 2. gt Young people tend to be more in touch with issues like mental health. Are 16 year olds more in touch with these issues than the rest of Americans Young people are but not 16 year olds. That s just not true 3. gt 16 year olds don't have all of the responsibilities of adults. Full stop. Giving then the right to vote to get them more engaged for what reason exactly To vote in a system that won t directly affect them until the future
I don't think they're sending their best when they're sending their ventilators. Some of them are broken some have dry rot I'm sure some of them are good but they're definitely not sending their best folks.
I just realized that every American with an actual job has worked harder than the President these last 3 years.
Keep preaching. Maybe you'll eventually convince more people that Trump needs to go. And his whole crew of loyal cronies.
gt For God's sake it's a part of our cultural heritage. bahahahahaha lead shooter go pew pew pew sick heritage bro
The number is available hospital beds which we have run out of.
I anxiously await our new maple overlords.
By the way there is such thing as a benevolent dictatorship. Learned that in high school poli sci.
China isn t willing to part with whatever they need currently. The scenario you re describing is already happening without us having withheld anything first.
Sunday is going to be fun
Eh not like they mean much to them anymore. They have done fuck all the ensure they are legitimate.
Why can't people like this just stop being their asshole selves Put it off for a while. Gezus scum like this shouldn't be on TV or radio or wherever. Speaking of which how sad is it the CNN has Acosta as their WH reporter They should be embarrassed. He asks the same damn questions trying to goad Trump.
Guilty
gt If it were me I'd freeze mortgage and rent payments subsidize insurance costs give the business loans and sure up unemployment to ensure people can still afford the essentials and states can cover the sudden influx of claims. This 100 I think the current stimulus package was largely motivated by the current administration trying to remain in the public's good will because they dropped the ball by downplaying the problem and taking action way too late.
They can t read.
Globalization isnt going anywhere we're all jsut going to stay inside for a few months and I'm not sure what any of this has to do with feminism Also Hollywood isnt going anywhere at all and while I agree Holywood actors get paid way too much for their efforts the entertainment industry is a pretty much essential to America as a core to our cultural identity that is not a bad thing but the excessive money and corruption is.
Those are some very bold statements. Yes primaries do bring out the name callers and such but this last one was like a hundred times worse IMHO.
That's some trip bro Lsd shrooms peyote Let us in on your secret.
No not really American sucks anyway best thing for it would be to collapse and let the oppressed peoples of the world take back what s theirs.
Woah there I'm not trying to attack you. Just conversation. I omitted alcohol because I lump it under drugs' I think of alcohol as not dissimilar to some categories of drugs just more socially acceptable due to it historically being safer to drink than water. This isn't the normal' view of it I know hence my feeling the need to explain. Drugs as I'm sure you're aware can be addictive. It is often not as simple as choosing to take it or not many addictions started through poorly perscribed painkiller regiments. More to the point if quitting addiction was as simple as powering through it with your will then we wouldn't have a drug addiction problem in this country right Responding to your medical illness view what do you say to someone who cannot afford their medication It can result in a cyclical problem no medication makes a higher paying better insured job difficult or impossible to acquire and yet without that better insurance they won't be able to afford the medication. Some state run low income health programs can help but that's dependent on the medication and the state.
I too would like a source because holy shit
It s Dabo man. Edit but OP made up the title.
It's not really protectionism the international produce markets aren't exactly free market. Victor D. Hansen talks to this where family farms were turned into corporate illegal immigrant plantations over a generation due to other countries rigging their agricultural output. Effectively the U.S allowed unfair market practices abroad to kill the traditional farm in the United States.
They are brown
It s why my state extended the stay at home order. They cited this sort of data. Makes you wonder how long and for what else they ve been using it.
Putting other lives in danger and intentionally spreading a disease is indeed illegal ya dumb fuck.
This is a very good point. He is a terrible horrible mess of a person. The journalists that are sent to question him all know it and they refuse to do their jobs properly most of the time either because of fear or because they know their place.
Being a shitty person is believe it or not not illegal.
I ll bet 1 all the hotel rooms will be destroyed and everything not bolted down will be gone
So that's why liberal leaders are raising fees on getting drivers licenses and IDs. To propogate the BS you're talking about create a self fulfilling prophecy of voter supression Why not make a fund for free voter IDs for the poor I'll donate enough to pay for 10 people to get free IDs. Hell raise my taxes so everyone can get a free voter ID. Why the hell not. I'll pay extra taxes for that gladly.
gt Or I just have too much faith in the American voter THEY ELECTED TRUMP FFS
The Dems never let a good crisis go to waste.
Reusable bags are disease vectors. Single use bags are more sanitary. Liberals are realizing their great plans sometimes come with unintended consequences.
People in this sub attack me every time I point this out because this sub is an anti republican circle jerk and nobody does any research but believe it or not but Mitt Romney wanted a single payer system and was stopped by the democrats in his state and had to settle for an ACA like system... similar to how democrats and republicans BOTH blocked Obama. amp x200B Romney wouldn't have been so bad and thought we should be tough on Russia when Obama was saying they weren't a threat.
I need some mango juice after reading all this shit
Yeah make it about the Wuhan virus. The Republicans can point out that when Trump wanted to close borders to keep us safe you called hmit a racist move. The Republicans can point out that they worked to give the American people help and it wa Pelosi and Schumer who blocked it for their own personal and partisan benefits. The Republicans can point out that when this virus was starting the Democrats were wasting everyone's time with a false impeachment. Then the Republicans can point out in every campaign ad across the nation that the Democrats had the audacity to blame Trump. I would suggest that the Democrats focus on their accomplishments...but I honestly can't think of any. They wasted the last 3 years attacking Trump and doing nothing else
Did Trump resolve the issue Or did he do the same thing Obama did about the issue which is to not do anything
He probably thinks dictator has a nice ring to it.
How to know the reporter was female without even checking.
The only right answer is to add a bunch more relevant names to that list write all of the above and circle that motherfucker with big looping spirals.
I'm a programmer. I get made fun of constantly because my code never has typos but I can't send a message to save my life. My brain is just wired oddly or something. But this is mostly my phone and me being lazy about autocorrect
You and I have very different definitions of fun
Based on the actions of the Republican Party over the last 20 years what makes you think they re interested in a fair fight
Whenever I hear asktrumpsupporters I get an image of people on keyboards wearing a monacle and MAGA hat attempting to sound smart but doing nothing but spinning more than Anakin in The Phantom Menace.
I would love nothing more than to calmly have a debate with anyone who would love to hear why I may hold the views that I do. Its a shame that some people would rather hate than listen understand and try to persuade me why their point of view is correct.
That's a good one. I would say it is not a basic human right. But it does create a harm on another person. I think it is correctly considered a civil issue and not a criminal one.
True this is a real reporting problem. One does not have the comorbidity information together with the daily COVID 19 death data.
Ain't it kind of obvious
The problem is it's not going to be over for a long time. Old ways of thinking aren't going to work anymore. Abigail Shrier whom I typically love wrote a tone deaf tweet about how this is going to bring about socialism because people will get used to being lazy and getting paid to do nothing. She misses the fact that many unemployed folks would be more than happy to swallow their pride and apply at Starbucks except they're closed. If every out of work hairdresser bartender and Uber driver went and applied for the jobs at Wegman's and Stop and Shop there wouldn't be enough jobs. The next wave of layoffs is already happening local newspapers are cutting staff as are tech companies. For the left they may now see looting. In the face of genuinely scarce resources maybe they'll take a second look at who's getting funds. If you're frantically checking your mailbox for your stimulus check and bemoaning that the Unemployment Office has a frozen website just maybe you'll take a second look at your neighbors who are filling their shopping carts courtesy of SNAP. And G d help them when their nana is refused a ventilator in favor of an illegal.
What uh...what the fuck do you think you're doing here
What the fuck is going on with m country. We're so embarrassing.
He s been doing his own research. He s a lot smarter about it now. Yes these are actual quotes from Jared.
The limit of how much they can make from guest rooms and golf courses does not imply that they cannot make more off being less than full but also bringing in revenue from the other sources I mentioned.
Canadians are getting that amount starting in less than 3 days.
I'm thinking more like an S SWOB.
And in America we mark everything down to Wuhan flu so our state city hospital gets more resources. Funny how that works.
God don't remind me that there's a gap. If we're lucky enough to have Biden win we'll still have to deal with his ass in the White House for a couple more months. If he hasn't already he'll pardon everyone because fuck it. Then maybe he'll run away to Russia. Hah. Could you imagine I want his ass in jail but that would still be kinda hilarious.. oh yah.. I'm sure he's innocent. Lol
Unfortunatly if you did post this to that sub it would probably get downvoted to oblivion rather quickly.
Their probably blaming the rotted masks on Obama as we speak.
Big words for a bitch.
I want to start a website that compares Jared to the penguin from Gotham. I will pay for it domain and hosting. Anyone have website experience
Y'all stay safe up there in that wild ass cold as fuck city. Sending love from SF. Going to come visit once this is all over and have some pizza casserole.
I've found the most homophobic and racist people are the twats at Top Minds judging by their wailing at this sub's mere existence.
Joe Biden s policies are indistinguishable from his socialist opponents. Yes he is.
Energy isn't discretionary. Locally grown cucumbers are.
I'm kind of confused what does this have to do with conservatives specifically
Trump is purely transactional. He controls something that states want so he wants something in return.
Right now people who disagree with them only lose their jobs. The way this sort of thing usually proceeds next step will be those who disagree disappear at night. When things get to north korea levels leaders usually pull a pistol right then and there and take care of the disagreements right then..
The commie party just racked up a 15 trillion dollar bill lawyers all over the world are going to want a piece of. Trust me. The future is no longer theirs. The lawyers will do what they do best once this is over. And for once I hope they go hog fucking wild.
It's terrifying. I'm 2 months away from starting residency and not looking to having to be involved in those decisions. Not going to lie though my mid 60s parents were not taking this seriously until I drove 1100 miles home brought them a months worth of supplies from a low impacted region sat them down and went through the Italian triage protocol with them.
m.youtube.com v 2V3CfD8TPac
Trump forever a weak and fragile coward especially doing this in the middle of a pandemic.
gt I have no idea what to do about it. Once my parents pass I will have to seriously consider leaving this country. This is a question I've struggled with when do you decide that it's time to leave your country It's a question I never ever thought I would have to consider.
Again as I said I don't think anyone can answer your question. There isn't really an answer. It's not as though there is some magic number of deaths. Ultimately it boils down to risk tolerance and how we as a species evaluate and understand risk. We are inured to the dangers of the flu it's been around forever. We have a deep understanding of the seasonal flu we can model it we can accurately estimate its impact we have tools to fight it vaccines and anti virals and we have medical resources to deal with it. We actually do a lot to stop people from dying from the flu. With a novel virus we face the unknown. Our ability to assess risk is limited by the small amount of information we have. Some countries are taking chances others are not and ultimately it boils down to the decisions that state leaders are making based on the information that they have. No matter how this shakes out the future will be filled with people pretending they have a crystal ball and people who claim to know what was down the path not taken. I really believe that there is a false dichotomy taking place. As though a choice is being made between fighting the virus and saving the economy. But IMHO that is a nonsensical. If the virus unchecked were to tear through this country and actually end up killing millions of people do we really think that at the height of it people are going to be what...getting on the subway and going to their crappy jobs All we can do is consistently re evaluate as we have been doing. If this starts to slow down soon then people can get back to work. The economy will recover. If this doesn't then it doesn't matter what did or didn't do. We would be fucked either way.
I'll believe him when he dies from it maybe.
gt The only difference between Donald Trump and Joe Exotic is a 400M inheritance. No way. Joe Exotic is a despicable human being who caged abused and neglected animals committed arson to hide evidence while murdering animals abused drugs used drugs to entrap young men underpaid or didn't pay vulnerable employees so they had no chance of leaving fed rotten meat to employess and customers bankrupted his own mother signed away the park to avoid lawsuits hired a hitman to kill baskins... But he still isn't as much of a piece of shit as Donald J Trump.
Yeah what's liberal to you Is it freeing baby rapists Mandatory abortions for all mothers in their 3rd trimesters Definitely legal man goat marriage right
Slayed with data.
Yes. I don't think Covid 19 should be one of those reasons. Now do you have the balls to answer the question or not
Yeah shortly after they took over the state party here I got out. I lean conservative but they're anything but. I'd probably argue we don't need government for as many things but we need it to be good at what it's there for this all government is bad especially if it's good for those people attitude is just horrifying.
It's okay you can say dumbass
Well if the the RP did this I'd start believing in miracles I'm in UK and our country's Gov is a shit show but at least they are actually trying.
You still have the right to vote regardless of income.
Why should we be exporting while we re still having a shortage
Sub conscious Of course but definitely an accident
Ot actually came out before your post. Which times specifically do you want to know when he had them Have you even tried to read his tweets
Cant the parties do whatever they want as far as the primaries go The dems can organize and pay for a mail in vote in each of the remaining states if they want right They could develop an app for primary voting right
What about Bernie supporters who simply think he s not a very good candidate. It s 2016 all over again and the GOP already has a fake little scandal to beat Biden over the head with until November. Sanders or not I think the Dems should reconsider their choice.
What are you basing that off of
Quick someone tell Susan Collins how much he learned his lesson from impeachment.
Yep. The one and only reason his hatred for Obama. It must really suck to be so miserable.
Stay tuned sellout
I hope everyone is filling out their census since it relates directly.
Yeah good point its really pissing me off I don t want trump in office and i cant vote because im 16
Come on. That's ridiculous. We're definitely not first class.
Politics and optics
Haha maybe
30 years on this earth in the state of illinois and for the first time in my life i can say im proud of my governor
Funny.
Because he isn t. Who the fuck is Jared Kushner Fuck you Kush.
Lab scene Present. You ve just joined a group of medical minds cast to undertake a very unique experiment. A ruthless reckless undertaking that hopes to derive a diagnosis from a simple question What happens when a man swaps his sympathy for self interest Focus your microscopes because tonight we take on the impossible task of finding foresight in a man who can t see passed himself. The in deterrable unrelenting quest of a demagogue convinced he can vaccinate truth and inoculate reason. Fasten you re masks and start forming your hypothesis because sadly these terrors can t be confined to...The Twilight Zone.
They believe it though. Legit in their brains they see things we don t. And they shut off when showing them data. So little use other than losing a few friends trying to convince them otherwise. Just listening to a podcast on communism and socialism. Socialists can emotionally allow contradictory opinions by others around norms. Communists on the other hand seeks immediately to squash dissent from communists government ideals. Not sure thats why libs commonly get infuriated but maybe this is partially why. They are being brainwashed by communist ideology. No se.
This aint it
RNC Platform 2020 gt I dunno whatever makes the libs mad
You realize that killing between 5 and 10 percent of the population tends to be bad for the economy right And further that this is the most out of touch argument ever. Fuck millions of dead mAh economy
Bleed them dry.
He's an American. It's nice that party has one.
What about Beto s Bandmate Where does he fit in to this wild ride
FFS.
We don t need a professional we need a street fighter. The question isn t professional.
That's slanderous. He's an upstanding Congressman Who watches snuff porn while wearing nipple clamps and self asphixiation.
Actually that's not how water weight works. The amount of water in your body depends on how much salt and electrolytes you eat because they're intertwined in how they function. If you don't eat salt your body stops storing so much water.
China lying about spread caused more global damage than any other single lie in history.
Quite correct. He IS both. A wannabe despot AND he should ve been prepared for this virus rather than calling it a hoax and downplaying it for weeks. And yes the government has a responsibility to keep its citizens safe and restrict contact in order to flatten the curve. See That wasn t so hard.
Has anyone compared the numbers with adjusted inflation I wonder if this is hitting as hard as it did then Also I ve been reading a lot about the 1918 influenza pandemic and it s pretty crazy how similar these viruses are. video about it. youtu.be
There's genuine concern that overprescription off label could hurt the supply of the drug and impede the ability of patients currently on hydroxychloroquine for FDA approved uses to get access to the drug. The published reports to date are a small sample size and don't show a particularly strong effect for use against these infections. If hydroxychloroquine has any effect at all it's not like it's death vs cured. It's more likely just that you clear the virus a couple days faster. I think it's reasonable to say that the immediate and wide implementation of this drug for treating coronavirus infections is a little irresponsible in this context.
Abso fukin lootly.
Those that would give up someone elses life for their own liberty or safety is a fucking twat.
I know more than a few veterans who think that.
Broke a tooth from shivering Wow. You That doesn't sound fake and implausible at all.
Citation needed
Jesus the have the MeFlu movement now.
How is this letter helping anybody during all this
Thank you for the great tips.
Another acting position I m sure.
In the context of me refuting your assertion that the American citizens voted him in No it doesn t matter in this specific context.
If we're both talking about the 2014 2016 ebola outbreak it killed 11 000 people world wide in roughly 21 months. Right now corona virus stands at 59 000 killed world wide in roughly 4 months. If we're talking swine flu that was about 12 000 in about a year in the US Corona virus has already killed 7 000 in 3 months and is projected to kill between 100 000 240 000 minimum with a maximum death count conservatively placed at 2. 2 million people in the US alone in the 18 24 month run.
The end is nigh
The entire administration is acting interim at this point
Most chinese in Chinatown are Americans whose families have been in the US a long time. Most trace their history back to the Chinese laborers who built California's railways. They came before the communist takeover of China and most despise the commies for what they did. That is to say there are more people who've traveled from France in Chinatown than China. Chinese tourists are more likely at fisherman's Wharf or the golden gate Bridge. Chinese Americans were as susceptible to this disease as any other American and not uniquely likely to be infected More shocking is Pelosi insisting it was okay to continue traveling to China. This is what you should focus on. Let's not throw our fellow Americans under the bus
Yep. Think about how much shit has happened in these 4 years. If he gets 4 more Oh god it makes me shudder the damage he could do now that he doesn't have to care about reelection.
This is how they want you to feel. They have won.
If you re being claimed as a dependent which seems to be a lot of college students you re suppose to be having 50 of your financial needs taken care of by whoever is claiming you. Which would in theory means you don t needed it as much since you have someone helping you out financially. But it s not always the case. Tho this does cause issues for people who graduated and or changed situations recently and that s unfair. I also really do think dependents of any age should qualify people for the 500 dollar stimulus. The person claiming should get help for providing for that person.
Romney this is an abuse of power but not an obstruction of oversight powers
I think Trump is up there for one of the worst political leaders to ever exist on this planet.
Help me understand please....if you lose your job you can apply for a marketplace plan right It s allowed because of a life event if out of open enrollment I know it won t be the same plan as what you had but it s probably fairly comparable to Medicare coverage. I haven t had employer coverage in eons so I don t know the current rules.
Apparently it's masks Here's a question. If we have a mask shortage in the USA why should US companies ship masks to Canada Who needs them more
Thank you she is. Supposedly she will be getting out of the hospital tomorrow.
SJW stupidity knows no bounds
gt The only savior is the summer theory if that is even true. We've had a few straight days of 90 95 degree weather this past week down in south Florida arguably our epicenter' and confirmed infection counts are still rising....
That s mighty Christian of you
Wait who s the troll I m the troll but also fell for it I m simultaneously weak and powerful Weird...
Organize a huge protest on the streets. Go cause a ruckus until your senator fucking listens to you.
I m kind of old guard I think coming around on a decade or so of reddit addiction... and 35 years of being a bad spellerer.
In context I think he is referring to our republican institutions which every citizen should love.
What's bad is reddit will give them a 3 day ban if anything since they're saying that to a conservative sub. The liberal fucks in charge would permaban any of us saying that to the pieces of shit in one of the liberal subs.
Trying to bury acts of corruption like this is typical. Just waiting for him to pardon Manafort over Easter. He'll probably try to pardon Epstein too.
There is no stockpile. We all know Trump is a braggart. IF we had a stockpile Trump would unzip his pants and expose his' stockpile to the rest of the world. We also know there's not a stockpile because he's fucking stealing world supplies making threats blocking boats to Cuba. Why Because he's going to build a stockpile then tell everyone it's been there this whole time he was simply protecting America's resources. BUT he can't do that because he would be admitting the Obama administration planned well into the future against a pandemic and Trump shut it down. So we come full circle. There is no stockpile. Trump is creating multiple realites and outcomes.
I rather doubt it if you're accusing me of being a communist. Seizing a business working against a nation in a time of crisis is war Socialism. Designed to be temporary because it's inefficient but sometimes necessary as it is in the case of 3M literally selling Americans out. Socialism including war socialism always hurts underlying economic structures which is why you really don't want to invoke it unless it's absolutely necessary and you don't want to continue it one second past the need for it.
And I definitely hope this doesn't affect her and she can get what she needs as needed.
Justice Democrats. Young Turks are attempting a coup within the dem party and she s one of a few people they ve installed to match towards their goals
Yes. Yes he is.
gt free college healthcare housing 20 minimum wage how are any of these things unreasonable Alot of countries do them. The states spends more than like the next 5 countries put together on defense why not use some of that money to have healthy smart people
Just this morning new york governor said I don't like to see it as commandeering more like borrowing and I just thought this is how it always begins...
To the Chinese If you tell the penalty for treason is...
This. The awful joke aside what he's actually saying is so alarmingly stupid.
If everyone had one we would have a bunch of morons with guns. Watch U.S news. We regularly have insane mass shootings because of a deluge of guns and a toxic culture to go with them.
It's rather conspiratorial I'll admit but if you think about it it's not impossible. They support the Syrian regime who uses chemical warfare. They have complete disdain for western countries. It's certainly up their alley
You come to their level with financing options.
This is awesome. I honestly don't quite understand one part and it seems you might get the nuances. How will Bidens place differ significantly from Germany Do you know of a country that it would be comparable to that I could check out
one joke stonetoss.com
Its actually impossible to do unless you are dehydrating yourself. amp x200B 3500 calories is one pound. A man his size most likely burns 3000 calories a day. amp x200B Even if he ate literally nothing a pound a day would be all he would lose. amp x200B He would have to stop drinking fluids and work on dehydrating himself to reach 10 pounds of water loss as well. Highly unlikely.
240 000
Going by what Stormy said all of him is soft.
You are Could've fooled me. Example Democrats introduce coronavirus bill giving relief to illegal aliens If that's what people in this sub are prioritizing right now I'm not really sure what else to say.
Polls don t give the probability of winning so this comment tells me that you don t understand the difference between a poll and a model. Polls actually tightened in the last few days of the election and the national popular vote matches the polling average. But if we re talking about models... 538 s model gave trump a 30 chance of winning. That s not the same as 50 50 but it s not a sure thing either Put it another way 30 is greater probability than the chance of getting shot playing Russian roulette with an 8 shot revolver with bullets in 2 barrels. Polls and models also predicted Democrats winning the house and they did.
I dunno. I can only guess he was avoiding getting in deeper shit than he already knew was coming Seems like he was willing to take the shit to try and save people. That s why his crew backed him and chanted his name as he had to go. Fucking sad. All I know is we are working from home and she gives us updates every day about her daughter and takes calls with her even when we re at work and we witness it on video chat and she sobs scared for her kid and we hear her talking on speaker and it s heartbreaking. There s always more to the news than they tell you. It s all shitty if you ask me.
Congrats Jared You've officially overtaken that Subway guy as the most reviled Jared anywhere.
That's only 75 of the way through the job. He'll get started on doing some presidenting soon.
Slavery used to be legal. So was imprisoning the Japanese in WWII. Didn't make the actions morale right or constitutional. Neither are Stay at Home orders and suspending the 1st 2nd 4th or 5th Amendments. I'm so shocked that the states say they have the authority to do what they are doing. And even if a court said it was okay then... well remember slavery.
From others at work government agencies are no longer using zoom at least the agencies we are working with over security concerns.
gt Judges and law enforcement are corrupt as well.
This is so terrible. Would totally prefer a president with dementia than this clown.
Increased wages production cost would lead to higher prices on goods services. I think consumers overall would like to have things cheaper
It s truly amazingly the way he can deftly and consistently alienate allies and embolden other authoritarians. I d say he we re trying to do so if he weren t so incompetent.
And how many of these professors are conservative
I don't think anyone can answer that. But this just cannot be compared to the flu. That is over the course of 6 months and it is a estimate. You can't really compare that to laboratory confirmed cases. Regardless people started dying from corona when The beginning of March Last week we were at 400 deaths day. Now we're at 1000 deaths day. In 7 days the death rate has more than doubled. If the rate holds steady and doesn't grow any more over the same course of time coronavirus will kill 180k. Now maybe the virus will slow down or stop spreading or we will have a cure before then but left unchecked I don't think anyone can look at what is happening and say this is acting like a standard flu.
Begin active measures against the Republican Party. Using your creativity divide them by starting infighting from their party leaders to their actual voters. And vote Blue
You're very much misrepresenting the point of the article. It's not saying Asians shouldn't be good Americans it's saying that being a good American whatever that is defined as shouldn't be a prerequisite for being respected and treated fairly.
You had 3 million dollars to lose Let me rephrase my prior statement Count your blessings and STFU.
It s hard to hear what you re saying. Maybe if you take trumps dick out of your mouth we could understand better. All I hear is this gaggy more daddy noise coming from your cum dumpster.
Do you think the economy will recover after a few months of shelter in place laws Honest question because I think this recession will bounce back quicker than others due to the unique nature of why people are losing jobs. But I m no expert in economics and perhaps I m misunderstanding the long term impact even after establishments open their doors again.
Trump needs to be removed NOW. As an American I am feverishly furious that trump ump did this. GIVE Canada their masks NOW We have to do better.
What thread was that I couldn't find it.....
I m not defending the plastic bag ban. I don t think it s crazy to say that some laws make sense during normal times and don t make sense during pandemic times. This is like writing an article that says stupid libs think we should be able to go outside but now they think we should stay inside. Which one is it
I know just wanted you to see the report so that you could chime in.
As typical it only matters when it's not their party doing it.
Since the Intelligence Community and National Security Council was heavy in trying to warn Trump about the virus when it was ransacking China I'm keenly interested if there was another whistle blower.
Hi thill28 Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u thill28 amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
Isn't this what Republicans wanted States rights and freedom to screw yourselves without any govt assistance
Jiu Jitsu also levels the playing field and it can t be used against you. I m a 165lb purple belt who isn t afraid of anyone not 100 lbs heavier.
One of the biggest problems is the coupling of the more expansive insurance with basic services. Doctors are often negotiated down to 50 of their original charge on visits however their costs are still static so they boost the price in order to be negotiated down to what they would normally need to charge. I think the integration of insurance into every single facet of healthcare is a bigger problem and I think it will only be exacerbated by giving government control of Healthcare.
waiiiit... you think he was in Pakistan the WHOLE TIME HAHAHAHAHAHAHHA
Change My Mind The coronavirus was created by the NRA who knew an incompetent Trump would absolutely bungle the government response leading to mass hysteria and an inevitable surge in gun sales
Lmao
What will CNN do without their reporters
what op is asking is to let only stupid people and for billion dollar corporations to invest into stupid americans to turn them into software engineers and doctors you can see from this in which category he applies to
the fuck are you saying How is this any different than Boston LA CHicago Dallas Houston Miami Seattle Denver do I need to list more American cities Yes you're correct New York City will suffer more than other places as a result of its population density. What difference does that make in terms of how the virus spreads Why the fuck would it matter if you live in a small town in another part of the country You're not less likely to become infected you're able to actually participate the in the solution even easier. What secret vaccinations exist in these small rural towns in the US that no one else in the world seems to know about edit and NYC and its metro area has the largest hospital system in the country with thousands of nurses doctors and paramedics and still can't handle the load. How do you think a smaller town with less would be able to handle this or withstand it
No accident
he's gonna vote for biden in the primary like a good boy and let trump have 4 more years like everyone else in this stupid worthless 3rd world country.
No it doesn't It looks like it's the best option currently available but that DOES NOT mean it's a real treatment. It looks like it's more effective than no treatment at all but if that's the qualification that's not encouraging.
He has never not made sense. We ve fucking needed him since 2016.
gt He didn t expose crap. China and Iran know now that a entire US Aircraft carrier is out of action thinks to this virus. He's responsible for that. gt He cared about his crew. Having spent years in the Chiefs mess I know for sure he earned the respect of his sailors. It's good to care for you crew but it's more important to care about everyone in the military and the US population. That's a responsibility that comes with senior command. China or Iran might take a chance attacking US navy ships now thinking that they'll be to weak to defend themselves. Worse he didn't have to do it. There's no evidence that the situation on the ship was being ignored and if it was the proper response would have been flying to Washington get a meeting with the highest ranking person he could get access to and resigning if they failed to help his ship. Instead he emailed a bunch of people hoping they'd leak it to the press.
What really got me though was the without the ability to think for yourself line. That one was just hilarious but I couldn't come up with an answer right away that wasn't disrespectful. Conservatism is literally the idea to let everything like it always was not questioning not changing anything. People like you are hitting the breaks on human progress since forever. The conservative movement is full of religious traditional superstitious reactionary and otherwise dogmatic thinking people that just hold the believe to not stray from the track that was there already. From the creationist to the evangelicals to otherwise moderate Christians to the folks that interpret the constution like others the quoran. You're the opposite of people who would think for yourself. Allthough when I read your response I think of a contrarian anyways you're probably not even a real conservative but fell for the very recent they come for the white man propaganda. Some 0 01 of the population want their dicks chopped off because they feel like living in the wrong body and somehow you think that's YOUR biggest fucking problem.
Fox news should be shit down
Welcome. As long as you are respectful the vast majority of those here will do likewise. Stay awhile you might find our positions to be more rational than many would have you believe.
This is a very misguided statement. If you are underwater on a house you are worse off by far compared to someone that does not own a house.
Of course and there is authority for the President to do much more. brennancenter.org
CCP has entered the chat.
pretty much he expected to be able to block judicial nominations if Trump lost. The plan was to start impeachment against clinton immediately while continuing to hold seats open. Impeachment most likely was going to be used by McConnell to justify holding SCOTUS seats open under a potential Clinton presidency
Honestly this is only the latest in a line of insults. For me his point of no return was when he took a PR victory lap for the Soleimani strike that led to the deaths of dozens of Canadian residents.
What he says is obvious but why won t anyone else say it. This is why we voted for him and why we re happy we did
I don t get why anyone would stay friends with people like that. maybe more people would reconsider what they align themselves with if people they like tell them it s not cool and they don t wanna be around it.
Biden isn't in power he has no authority. Focus on the person actually harming America and the world.
I completely support the Idaho law. I don't want to be misconstrued as being in support of a dumbass policy to allow trans women to compete against women because I'm absolutely not but you're wrong. HRT does reduce muscle mass. You're absolutely right when you say that further studies are shut down The only conclusive research done on HRT and muscle mass is one that has been done on non athletes which shows that muscle mass reduces. Athletes behave differently because of factors like muscle memory where their testosterone levels can be low during testing but their muscles can recover strength after training even at abnormally lower testosterone levels. Additionally the amount of testosterone is not the only factor at play in athletics biological men and women have varying quantities of muscle fiber types fast twitch slow twitch lung capacity which increases aerobic capacity Q angle which can affect injury while running. There are numerous biological differences whose affect hasn't been studied enough for athletes and with a proper control group. You can refer to pdfs.semanticscholar.org pdfs.semanticscholar.org or several other papers which discuss most of what I've mentioned. The Devries paper is particularly interesting because it's specifically a review of all the research that has been done and points out the fallacies in that research. Again I'm not saying I support their policies I'm saying that theres hasn't been enough research done on if trans athletes compete at an advantage or not so the leftist claim that There is no advantage is completely wrong because the burden of proof is on them to substantiate a claim which they do on insufficient research.
Which doesn t mean his opinion is worth a hill of beans. I m certainly not advocating for Trump or Kushner but sharing a comedian s thoughts on the handling of a pandemic is joke in and of itself.
Which gay subreddit got upset and linked this We will discuss with you but keep it civil.
gt That s what happens when things are uncertain and the government is doing nothing to assuage fears. It's stupid waste of money in a pandemic because the viral threat is not fucking afraid of folks who own guns.
Squishy.. and you have to place them on the T for him. He doesn't like to bend over.
Just like the Mueller report in the witch hunting business business is booming.
Are you doctor You sound like a doctor s.
All of those things are virtually excluded in all gun legislation put forward currently.
Philippines good try. youtube.com v X9mxpkPEy0Y
Go ahead and pull those numbers up for me would you
Jesus.
How am I being willfully ignorant I m pointing out another use of the term. I am aware of the celebratory nature of it. I am making sure others are aware that it can also mean praise allah in a hard time as a means of encouragement.
And in amazon. Which during this crisis I have seen their delivery vans swarming the city. She knew exactly where to reinvest. Her election is coming soon though
Idk. I'm not an expert. I'm just some idiot on Reddit lucky enough to have worked hard for the things in my life. I'm not saying others don't work hard. But maybe those who are uninsured shouldn't have taken that risk in being uninsured. Why does the government have to solve everybody's problems It's not supposed to.
The craziest part of this is that he wrote that statement what a joke.
Because progressives in red states like myself understand that sometimes you can't get exactly what you want in a candidate but if you fail to vote for the better option you end up with some rabid alt right fanatic. We don't have the luxury of ideological purity tests.
Why is he at White House briefings talking to reporters if he has no position
gt you're now willing to support 250 year old outdated ideas. TIL. liberty is outdated
Lol you're so cute when you get all self righteous. I hope that your high horse helps you sleep at night when the court is stacked with conservatives for generations as the rights of women and minorities are stripped away by another four more years of Trump and the remaining democratic norms are completely destroyed by this administration that has shown it cares nothing for the rule of law. It must be nice to be in a position where you can live with that but unfortunately not everyone is so privileged and some of us have to play cards with the hands that we have.
I want you to imagine you re a guard here. You get the news that a category 5 hurricane is headed straight toward you. This category 5 is going to cause the largest blackout in northeast history and millions of people will evacuate while thousands will die. You are given the completely legal option to leave the tomb unguarded and evacuate for your own safety. How do you respond These soldiers responded with This is what we all volunteer to do. For us we don t really think anything of it it s what we do. earethemighty.com
None of this is free its untruthful to call it free and does a disservice to what he is trying to do. His plan for most of the middle class will end up costing them less including small business owners. berniesanders.com
Got to throw in unrelated items to stir the pot.
I honestly have no idea about the Trump Administration's messaging at this point it can vary within the same press conference.Yesterday was What if we did nothing Today I think we wound up at We'll find out
BIGOT
Obama even told him to call it tRumpcare if that's what it took to keep people insured. Buffoon couldn't even make do with that.
Less traffic would be nice if we had anywhere we could go
Google Trump's response to the Coronavirus pandemic in America or just look at the front page of this Sub. What's your alternative at this point Waiting until November when a million Americans are already dead
This should be front page news on every Florida newspaper. Please tell a reporter.
Just the opposite.
Of course the titles always come with the modifier acting.
It depends on if the businesses will be able to get the loan and again if the loan ends up being forgivable. But when the paid sick leave bill was signed the only way to cover it was by a tax credit for payroll taxes which would not have covered the paid sick leave especially for health care businesses. Now if you use the payroll protection program you don't get the tax credit for payroll taxes. It's been a mess of trying to figure out what will work. And then you have separate States announcing mandatory sick leave without any rate increases or tax credits as well.
Foreign workers ain t illegals. The program is set up to help farmers. But farmers not using the program and instead using illegal labour. They should be SHUT DOWN
So it is said so it shall be. Free Florida and send them out to sea
probably I've only found about it recently.
First and most importantly I'm not just suggesting we just give this money to the government to keep I'd be wanting voting for it to go to support systems for all the people being hurt by the best treatment we've got available right now. Because that's what this is. What you describe as poison is more like chemotherapy. Yes it's bad for me. But it's not as bad as killing 2 3 of people on the planet. That's looking to be a high end realistic estimate of mortality from this thing if we don't slow it down to keep medical facilities from overflowing. Aside from the obvious dead people that would have a huge long term impact on the economy. By slowing the spread below what our medical system can support and isolating vulnerable populations we can cut that number down to between 1 2 of infected which hopefully will be a relatively small percentage of the population. So yeah. I'm willing to keep paying the doctor for my chemo.
Trumps trying to figure out how to send him to a Turkish Embassy overseas.
oll.libertyfund.org oll.libertyfund.org edit the quote is from when we werent even the USA yet. So no it wasnt abut giving the government power it was more of a tactic to get the colonies to fight more.
What makes you say America is the most developed nation on earth
Holy shit even more proof The good people over at SlopMinds can t even think. Keep it coming boys
The existing version of the Constitution is the original Constitution It is a living document designed purposefully and specifically to be amended and just because some content is older than other content does not make it inherently better or more important Also I don't know any person who wants illegal immigrants to be able to vote I challenge you to present any example of that. And finally poll taxes are definitively unconstitutional as are educational requirements. Nothing in the Constitution specifically protects gun license fees. If you're going to make the Constitutionality Argument it's not going to work for the point you're trying to make.
You really want to see who has the most sex criminals per party Stop being a bullshitter. Be an American again support a legitimate leader.
If someone is dying in front of you trying an experiment with a drug is probably not going to make things much worse.
And only the DNC and all the major media outlets hawking his camapign. ISTR one D.J trump doing pretty well with the same strategy.
In the very middle of the country ok ar ms al are all coming up on tornado season. It s also been predicted to expect more than average rainfall and flooding in some cases. Can you imagine your house has been blown away hurricanes or tornados or burns down California fire season up to bat soon and then having to cluster in shelters when we aren t supposed to even have gathering of 10 or more. This shit needs to be up next. Make a fuss demand that disaster preparedness needs to ramp up bigly. Either we use our voices or say our last thoughts and prayers because no one is coming to save us.
Agreed bashing Fauci is definitely not my intent.
You seem to want a message targeted specifically at the black community. I don't disagree that more needs to be done for minority communities in this country. Part of that begins by giving people power to unionize and express their power for a more democratic workplace. The beginning of that movement starts with healthcare that is not tied to your job so that if you are laid off or fired for trying to organize you and your family won't be bankrupted if one of you gets sick. So what is it that you want to hear from Senator Sanders The message that working people should have healthcare is insufficient. You as a black voter must have more. What is it
With this logic applied to a household budget you could make the argument that buying a new car in 2018 is the reason a family cannot afford fancy diapers for their newborn in 2020.
Touch
Maybe he should spend less time being a witch if he's so afraid of being hunted.
The Durham investigation is just a repeat of Barr s PROMIS investigation. And it s not hard to see why when you learn the identity of the real Russian bot operator and reconcile the two situations together. threadreaderapp.com
there are at least two americas one for people with seemingly endless access to probably russian money and the rest of us who have no power to interfere
Fuck America Canadians first. Make our own nurses and doctors serve in Detroit instead of having Canada help us. Before you downvote me you probably didn t read the article or in general but the article mentions that.
100 he had no idea. Her story is obviously bullshit but it s perfect plausible deniability to cover for murder.
pretty sure fighters lose more in 2 days leading up to a fight. and anyone who has had a fever and woken up with their bed outlined in sweat knows this can happen.
Palestine is also pretty ethnically homogeneous with between 98 and 87 Palestinian Arab depending on region. This has also changed over time as Israel has annexed more territory from them. Generally I'm not a big fan of ethnic homogenaity anywhere but as far as I'm aware Palestine isn't passing laws repressing ethnic minorities but if you would like to present evidence on that I'd be happy to concede that point. Is your whole argument that Palestine is bad too so everything Israel does is ok Because that is a god awful argument. I can criticise Israel AND Palestine. Or were you hoping that calling me an idiot would make you seem more rational
No it's not. Yours is just concern trolling.
Layabouts I swear to christ none of this has anything to do with wall street. This is about restaurants and local businesses that may or may not re open after all this is over. You are about as conservative as a wet dish rag.
Show how much money they use by using our public schools food stamps and other free government programs
As long as Republicans continue to slice n' dice funds or outright 86 it our officials won't have anyone to listen to But with this administration I'ld put my money on it that that's the goal.
We won't downvote you unlike a moderate to conservative opinion in r politics. Welcome
It's not empty. There are a countless amount of soldiers who were never identified lost at war and it's for them
You should look up what the CAA is and who are members. You might learn something.
No it doesn't 3M would just move production to Canada lol. This hurts Americans since you guys clearly need it more.
I always find it ironic that a man who doesn t drink alcohol sells vodka.
America First you fucking American companies. You have to be told really
The war wasn't lost by Germany at Stalingrad that is a pretense to say that the entire wars success was depending upon an offensive victory. If not for lend lease the soviets themselves would not have had the ability to counter punch into Eastern Europe and invade Germany. The allies primarily US led bombing of Germany and opening additional fronts in North Africa Italy and eventually France in 1944 drained Germany resources that would have been used to secure the Soviet advance. The US made its primary goal in 42 43 to defeat the Luftwaffe and if they did not Germany would have had more air assets that would been redirected East. Fighting would have been much more tougher heading toward Germany when Germany could secure its own air space which they struggled to do when the US and Britain started taking control of the skies. The hunting of u boats and intervention on North Africa helped keep British and allied access to middle eastern oil and out of Nazi hands. Remove those variables and if the Germans have the Mediterranean and North Africa they would have had fuel to counter punch a Soviet advance and keep their tanks and b109s fed. The invasion of Italy wasted Nazi divisions to recapture the territory and secure their south. And yes D Day and the Battle of the Bulge despite happening 2. 5 and 3 years respectively after the stall of the German advance in Stalingrad wasted German resources as well particularly since Hitler had sent Rommel to the west and some of his best remaining panzer divisions in the Bulge. In other words the Soviet's would have have killed as many Nazis if the Nazis could have balanced out their air and land forces on the eastern front. The Nazis may not have been able to conquer the USSR after Stalingrad but the same would have held true for the Soviets in reverse when invading German territory without US help. The war easily could have been a draw if the US stayed out of the European theater both military and financially. Meanwhile during the Nazi Soviet pact the Soviets were sending fuel and food to Germany while Germany overran Western Europe and started bombing Britain. It may be foolish to say the US won the war but it's also foolish to say the USSR did as well particularly when there was an entirely separate front in the Pacific that was led entirely by the US and the USSR did jack crap in.
Just because they have similar skill levels doesn t make them equally as important jobs you idiot and btw why are you even on this subreddit by looking at your post history and comment history you aren t even conservative
If Obama didn't do it then why didn't Trump
True but this POTUS likes doing things bigly. First POTUS impeached three times in a year Just imagine and then runs for re election after John Roberts does the three monkey trick and hides from the facts three times Would be amazing Might unfortunately get him re elected because well people can be that Sorry I believe our citizens are smarter than that.
I'm curious as to why you're saying that. Do you think the New York Times has been downplaying the seriousness of the virus
We have to draw the line. You know I was once a hardcore Democrat lol. Not even kidding. Even watched Chris Matthews and Maddow. Maddow was my favorite. Then I saw Bernie get cheated 4 years ago and I m like why Then I just put 2 and 2 together and figured it out. They re on the side of their donors. This is what Carter was talking about. There is no democracy here. The oligarchs own this place. It s time for that to end.
Agreed. But let's not forget that Trump lost the popular vote by multiple millions of votes.
Ok
It's a duty of the citizenry to overthrow their government if it's a tyranny. According to the declaration of independence some French revolutionaries Locke and the mandate of heaven anyway.
Honestly all mainstream media sources love to spin the stories. All of them are unreliable including Fox. It's best to get your news directly from the raw sources like watching the white house press briefing livestreams on the coronavirus.
True Trump fans over at thedonald.win don't make threats against him either. They just express mild disappointment over his actions. thedonald.win params Fauci amp sort new thedonald.win params Fauci amp sort new
No. I already voted for Bernie in my primary. If he doesn't get the nomination then I don't vote. Joe has to earn my vote. Sorry not sorry.
Great Britain uses miles too.
BeBester BeBestial
interesting the Trump Kushner administration managed to screw up the relationships with Canada as well European relations went down the toilet years ago
That s the real truth why this government dose not want to give out their stock pile It s gone bad and they don t want us to know. So long they have neglected or medical readiness O it can never happen to us well here we are
gt I m an essential worker and I can t stay home asshat. The fuck you can't Nobody is forcing you to leave your home. Even if they were nobody's forcing you to not wear protective gear maintain social outdistancing wash your hands and not touch your face. You have the power to prevent yourself getting infected. gt Also what the fuck are you going to do if you leave your house Whatever the fuck I want. That's what freedom is. gt Go to work at a nonessential job Maybe. My job is pretty essential to me. It pays my bills. I prefer to not lose my house and car. I certainly prefer to be able to feed my children. nice of you and the government to decide that losing my livelihood and ability to provide for my family is nonessential
22 year old unemployed basement dweller Get a job And I m way over 30... but thanks. I try to feel young.
Based off her social media history she hates Trump so what does she have to gain by accusing Biden
nature.com The amount of CCP bashing here is off the charts and it is kinda ridiculous. Just because a country china has a certain degree of incompetency and baseline suppression of freedom of speech it doesn't mean they have evil intent. Just a reminder guys. Just because the Chinese media accuses us doesn't mean we have to accuse them back. Just because the democrats accuse trump of doing a bad job does not mean he is doing a good job. As a MD PhD practicing physician in a big city at the front lines all my physician colleagues at front lines are scared shitless. They don't have enough ppe masks No one in the covid 19 physician group 24k members on Facebook is blaming china in any way. It doesn't have to be politicized. Let the physicians and scientists handle this and don't bring out pitchforks unless credible scientists physicians say so. I. E. If fauci came out and said it was china's fault.
More of us are changing that then you think. If your family doesn t think so tell them that any commander who looks after their people should be fired just blindly follow orders or you re a horrible service member. See what their reaction is cause trump is a draft dodging coward who isn t fit to lick that Captains boots clean.
Your information is incorrect this is on par Ebola. When there was a woman who had ebola during Obama's Presidency they made her self quarantine in a tent for week remember that Now 266 000 Americans have tested positive for COVID 19. And it is estimated that hundreds of thousands of Americans alone will die from this. Millions across the world will die from this. The entire world is self quarantine not just the United States. So that conspiracy is debunked as well. Here's a map that is updated a couple times a day. You should check it out for a few days until you finally grasp the severity of the situation the entire world is in. Every country has this. Every Island. Every state province of the world. gisanddata.maps.arcgis.com bda7594740fd40299423467b48e9ecf6 gisanddata.maps.arcgis.com bda7594740fd40299423467b48e9ecf6 Please continue to self isolate. Doctors and nurses are dying for you to enjoy casually tapping your fingers on the internet.
Be civil even in disagreement.
the first 5 letters killed it...no way would trumpo allow something with Obama's name save the country or even help...that s how petty the president is.
Yeah I always use this as an example of Romney s foresight. At the time I wasn t laughing either. The Russia during Romney s presidential campaign is the same as today. It s just as dangerous and just as conniving. Romney is also a man of principles. I hope he gets the opportunity to turn the Republican Party around. Hopefully the Republican Party gets the wind knocked out of them during the presidential election coming up and lose their majority in the senate. This will create the right environment for Romney to begin reforming the party a bit as the party will be looking to appeal to more voters again. At the moment he is on the fringe of the party but he was once their forerunner. He can be that type of person again. Romney as the leader of the party is one that wouldn t be too bad imo. He has the stomach for it and he is a leader.
They don t belong here. We owe them nothing. Illegal immigrant are terrible people and their sins are unforgivable
Elect a clown expect a circus. Sadly fully 1 3 of the voting public are still cheering this particular clown on.
Pretty sure they have a little guard house box thing to the side of the tomb that they will use during possibly dangerous weather conditions like lighting storms or during natural disasters.
Are you saying trump would make that move if given a chance then
That's just what happens when you read a translation of a translation of a translation etc of serveral books all mashed into one book from 2000 years ago. It means everything and nothing all at the same time
They still have certain rates working 20 hour shifts back to back without breaks for weeks or months and have those same idiot kids running on 3 hours of sleep a night operating heavy machinery in some cases. In some ways it's really amazing more people don't die on a regular basis working there.
Imagine living in a good country where healthcare was free and governments gave a shit about the people rather than their wallets
You are right but you will be downvoted in this sub.
Not if I work from home.
If only the person running against her wasn t in charge of the election itself as Secretary of State and refused thousands of voter registrations of African Americans.
Ugh freedom. What a bore
Has me revolted
As a foreigner or shocks me these events surprise my American friends.
Oh there are tons of liberals in nyc saying we should ban all cars.
Really No Really If only Romney meant that it s really serious now. He s like a parent who doesn t want to discipline a kid. I m going to count to three and you better 1 2 3 I really mean it 5 6 7 you re gonna be in big trouble 8 9 10 What utter bullshit that a Republican senator who bailed on responsibility during impeachment is going to protect taxpayers checks and balances and Senate integrity.
Hmm it seems like there's a few sides to this argument npr.org
You mean the big tourist spots The ones that offer things like shipping and passenger ports world famous museums landmarks restaurants plays parks sports cultural centers etc
A federal election is a federal issue. A state election is a state issue. Simple yes
Math checks out.
The Catholic hospital in my area was the one who didn't leave people to die for lack of funds. Just sayin.
I gotta wonder how many are false positives and how many more are going untested
Don't bother. You are absolutely right. But this subreddit is full of delusional morons who have absolutely no clue what they are talking about. Two years ago there was a post here that said something along the lines of Donald Trump said XXX he deserves to be impeached 97 upvotes here with over 10 000 posts. Only problem It was a quote from Obama. That post got purged by the admins quickly because you couldn't even find it if you had the link to the post.
What rights have we given up The right to get middle class fancy at Applebee's with our science denying family The rights of the Walmart rich to fill their homes with shit they don't need because they can barely afford real necessities The right to assemble in church and practice your religion because this is not considered an essential tax paying business
Idiot son of a convicted felon slumlord.
Let s just have people drop dead at work instead.
Who is the reporter
Yes This is humans natural response to a viral pandemic. That s how this all works.
to help companies afford to pay more workers they decided to mandate minimum wage for all employees in the country. This will free up revenue for companies to hire more staff and lay less people off
Message to any person in Michigan Do my idea
Good.
we're about 20 news cycles from finding out that Obama left them a high quality stockpile and that over the last 3 years his admin has been slowly selling it off to China for profits favors.
Have you even given a thought to when if these restrictions will be removed There is a reason why so many pieces of dystopian fiction start off with a plague or some other even that allows the government to enact sweeping restrictions on civil and human rights and then just refuse to remove them.
Amen
Bruh what I just watched Fauci on fox n friends basically rip them apart for suggesting it could help
Is there a law I m really curious about this
Where the fuck is our stuff asshole
Welcome libbie
Atlantic City was doomed when other states legalized gaming. Wouldn t a good businessman have seen that coming Also asserting that I m obsessed with the president because he ran in part on his business acumen and I looked up said business acumen shows exactly how you process information
This goes to the historical archives looool
What's the point of saying this
They are down right gleeful people are dying all in the name of power. Just yesterday someone went back through my Reddit post history just to rub my face in something I said 2 1 2 weeks ago regarding the corona virus. It was pathetic. The person was so happy to point out that I was wrong and he's right I was wrong about the virus getting out of control the way it has.
They couldn t even proofread the updated text I can imagine Trump dictating those words 100
Abraham Lincoln has entered the chat
This is why I'm asking for sources. The democrats are so obsessed with Russia that it has gotten silly. I dont directly see anything wrong with him being friendly with North Korea if it could potentially lead to changes for them in the future. China has kept them on a short leash ever since the USSR fell apart.
nancy pelosi called it a hoax and downplayed it until march sanfrancisco.cbslocal.com bill de blasio also called it a hoax and downplayed it until march nytimes.com so did amdrew cuaomo while democrats were downplaying it and calling it a hoax trump was assembling a coronavirus task force and shutting down travel from china pjmedia.com funny and it's not Trump's responsibility to deal with it. dealing with the problem is something that local governments are supposed to do. it's not Trump's job. it's your governor and mayor's job.. Congress job its not the president's job.. and yet he STILL did more than any democratt stop watching propaganda disguised as news. CNN is not news. MSNBC is not news. The Washington Post is not news. The Huffington Post a New York times are not news. They are far left propaganda. Read real newss
Yeah and I'd like for the daily briefing to be brief and not some sort of mini rally for Trump to refill his narcissistic supply. At times it looks like he is pausing for applause breaks.
LOL I'm not the kid who started the argument based on complaints of lack of reading comprehension when you couldn't even comprehend the language I used and completely misconstrued it either on a goofy accident or totally on purpose just to mouth off to some nobody on the internet or so you can feel good arguing semantics. And you expect me to read another wall of nonsense Ok. People aren't generally annoyed with my posts just fragile boys like you. P You can argue semantics all you want. Compare or equate I don't actually care how much you can work to prove I was insinuating you were equating. If you agreed that the only comparison can be made in it's symptoms you could just say that. But instead you're being a giant goblin about it and you tripped flat on your face the moment you started it. Hope your day gets better and you pull the dildo out of your ass.
There is no false dichotomy this time. Maybe previously you were right but now anyone who thinks like that is being dangerously naive.
Luke him In elections
Do some research. The original interpretation of the bible was referring to men having sex with young boys aka pedophilia.
Capitalism is perfect as it is for people with intent and drive. Weak people get weeded out. It s a perfect system.
As to babies they did say the ship is not setup to accept cases for OB nursery and or birthing. But I m sure the ER is hit with plenty of injuries. Maybe not so many car accidents these day but there are probably a lot of people trying to do home projects that don t know what they are doing and have injured themselves.
That is a labor free market
gt Trump is far too incompetent to do the things people accuse him of Libs Owned
America where we are capitalist until we go full communist.
well that's a bit of a moot point. Almost everyone would have been a Nazi back in Nazi Germany. The only people in Nazi Germany that weren't Nazis were the Jews. If we're talking prior to the rise of the Nazi party then I'd say leftists would be part of the Communist party ironically the communists were FAR more aggressive than the Nazis which is part of the reason why the SA was formed in the first place It's not exactly a better scenario for them considering the communists arguably contributed to the rise in Nazi popularity due to the communists being the violent extremists which made the Nazi party look less extreme and more orderly in comparison I'm not saying the Nazis are close to the ideas of modern Conservatism but I am saying that pretty much everyone was a Nazi in Germany so there's no reason to believe that any 1 person alive today wouldn't be a Nazi if he she were born in Nazi Germany.
Ugh. People saying this shit is entrapment because the FBI stepped in and pretended to be the people who were going to give him the shit he needed to carry out his plan. They re saying he wouldn t have been able to secure what he needed to do it without the FBI providing the stuff and shit... what if he did find a way I m happy the FBI ended up being the ones he went out to meet because if it hadn t been them then what People on Reddit never cease to amaze me.
Try down the stairs more room for error.
What the hell does that question even mean That you read 3 different lines saw that I said the virus was serious and used a canned response orldometers.info orldometers.info In the US you have 7000 deaths already and only getting faster it's even exponential In Spain we've been on a nationwide lockdown for almost 20 days and we haven't hit the maximum of deaths per day yet we have over 10000 deaths. Thankfully your state governors are being intelligent and human enough to take measures because then you would know where the deaths are. Millions of them. See how well it worked for Boris Johnson when he proudly stated he wasn't going to do jack shit about COVID and how fast he had to backtrack. The irony is that the virus is going to hit the US hard but much softer than if those measures weren't taken in the first place. And you'll complain about them even though they saved the lives of many of your citizens.
You're aunt may enjoy r leopardsatemyface
I bought my guns to protect my family from a zombie horde. Little did I know little Amy learned to use a stripper clip to protect our precious toilet paper supply. Well anyway I'm heading back out to the wire. If we don't get overrun tonight I'll check in at dawn.
Imagine if exacerbating the virus was intentional to avoid the blowback of John Bolton s book in May We will exceed 100 000 deaths before the book is released which is exactly the kind of headline he would hope to drown out whatever Bolton s book reveals.
Car accidents do not increase exponentially. Your comparisons do not mean much because they are not infectious diseases sans the flu which had a vaccine and still kills 37k Americans per year.
Can we officially call this a clusterfuck yet
The last report I read has the US at at least 25 of the confirmed positive cases on the entire planet. Regardless of what MSM reports that seems to indicate to me higher levels of testing in the US. What frustrates me the most is the lack of useful data months into this mess. China certainly hasn't helped.
Same here But I haven t tried Chrome I used Firefox so maybe that will help. I appreciate the response. The whole thing has been so frustrating but I m happy you were able to get it sorted.
If the store is open you should be able to purchase what you want from the store.
How about no.
Thomas Hobbes felt that humans were inherently evil and our lives would be nasty brutish and short my comment was more on the dramatic side hehe
Yeah I know how lucky I am even just to have the kind of mentality that enjoys saving money but stops short of being downright miserly.
Fredo does look a bit thinner. Everything else sounds like bs.
Orwell ain t have Wayback machine
I grew up there and couldn t jump through the appropriate hoops to get anything other than a hunting rifle or shotgun. Neither of which had a capacity gt 5 rounds. Moved to oregon and I essentially got a holster and a CCW in my welcome pack.
Aren t those what root cellars are
I would agree except for the fact that he could've done it immediately after the impeachment vote was over with but he instead randomly decides to do this now.
COVID doesn't give a fuck about your jackass politics and it doesn't give a fuck what Mango Mussolini says. COVID is coming for Trumps's base you know the fat ignorant assholes of rural America.
I disagree that is was fundamentally trong. Inverted bond yield is proof plenty thought it was weak. For me it's junk debt. Lots of Americans underwater on their vehicles and credit cards. Fed pumping cash every quarter.
You sound like you got hit a lot as a kid
By this argument the press should be shutdown too. They aren t essential by any stretch of the imagination. Literally provide nothing but opinionated views of the facts
Get those facts outta here
Gym Jordan
guarding it from what exactly im not following. sorry not trying to be rude here. just genuinely confused
I mean does it fucken matter What is this game Atleast Im not as bad as him Well were in a fucken bad spot right now. We reached three thousand Americans dead. Stop with this bullshit It is a Fact that Trump underestimated virus when he demolish the Task Force and stated that it was contained a few months ago. Stop with this shit think for yourself
gt Ironically leftists like this one would have probably been fanatical nazis Sure at least we don't worship a dictator wanna be and praise him like a god emperor like we are in some type of cult. Oh wait.
It s not about money vs lives. I ve heard that trope repeated so much and it s honestly disappointing how many people lack a basic understanding of how the world functions. The economy has a direct impact on people s lives and a recession depression causes thousands of additional deaths through a variety of factors i.e deaths of despair people unwilling to seek medical help due to financial concerns and increased criminality out of financial desperation. We won t know when we cross the line because it takes a while for these factors to kick in but at some point the economic destruction caused by our preventative measures could very well lead to the deaths of more people than the virus.
What I have noticed is that the US number of deaths has been doubling every three days consistently for at least a couple weeks now. Hit 1000 on mar 26 2000 on mar 29 4000 on Apr 1. That seems to be what most countries do until they hit hospital capacities. Then it doubles almost every 2 days. If we keep doubling on the threes we will be at 100 000 before the end of April. If that s the peak it will be another 100 000 more as the virus peters out. We have had more time to plan than other countries so hopefully we don t run into capacity problems.
I was an instructor at prototype after i did my time on the ship. everyone now and then you would get CO candidates coming through. While on the ship your final qualification board for reactor operator is with the captain. sounds like you are very familiar with it as well. ex nuke
Then let's have them all resign deal Let's put Schumer Schiff and McDonnell on that list while we are at it.
Basically nothing the SLOB said bothers them in any way. It s the fed stockpile they can do what they want with it.
10 different vaccines that have a promising result in laboratories are set up for testing worldwide right now. Red tape is slashed everywhere. Doesn't change the fact that testing and production will take another 10 months minimum.
Of course he does
Journalists aren't generally medical experts you fucking loons.
It's Chris Cuomo exaggerating Always
There are tons of people with covid doing interviews on TV. Are they all lying Chris is 200 pounds of mostly muscle. It s not hard to imagine how he might lose 15 pounds. I m a skinny guy and I lost 20 pounds in a week when I had mono. None of these occurrences are far fetched. Especially for a virus that is killing thousands of people.
did I balme Obama
Yet the rudest people I've met have not been middle age white women. Usually they are very nice.
March 24 President Trump announced the Army Corps of Engineers amp the National Guard are constructing four hospitals and four medical centers in New York. March 24 President Trump approved a major disaster declaration for the state of Iowa related to the coronavirus outbreak. March 24 Vice President Pence Confirmed FEMA sent New York 2 000 ventilators. Announced individuals who have recently been in New York should self quarantine for 14 days. March 24 Dr. Deborah Birx announced the U.S has conducted more coronavirus tests in the last week than South Korea has over the prior eight weeks. March 24 The U.S Army issued orders for three army hospitals to deploy their health care professionals to New York and Washington state at the direction of Secretary of the Army Ryan McCarthy. March 25 President Trump approved major disaster declarations related to the coronavirus outbreak for Texas Florida North Carolina March 25 President Trump amp Vice President Pence held a conference call with 140 non profit organization leaders including The Salvation Army amp The Red Cross to discuss coronavirus response efforts. March 25 President Trump signed a bill reauthorizing The Older Americans Act which supports senior citizens by providing meals transportation and other crucial services. March 25 Vice President Pence Held a conference call with equipment manufacturers to discuss on going coronavirus response efforts. Announced 432 000 Americans have been tested for coronavirus and received results. Confirmed 4 000 ventilators were delivered to New York. March 25 Vice President Pence held discussions with multiple governors including the Governor of Indiana amp the Governor of Michigan March 26 President Trump approved major disaster declarations related to the coronavirus outbreak for Illinois New Jersey Maryland Missouri March 26 President Trump announced the USNS Comfort will depart for NYC on Saturday to assist in the coronavirus response 3 weeks ahead of schedule March 26 President Trump participated in a video conference with the leaders of the G20 to discuss the global coronavirus response amp the need for countries to share information and data on the spread of the virus. March 26 President Trump held a phone call with Chinese President Xi Jinping to discuss the coronavirus. March 26 Vice President Pence announced 552 000 Americans have been tested for coronavirus and received their results. March 26 Dr. Fauci announced the Federal Government is working with companies to speed up production of potential coronavirus vaccines while those drugs are still in the trial phase. March 27 President Trump signed The Coronavirus Aid Relief and Economic Security CARES Act into law. March 27 President Trump signed a Defense Production Act memorandum ordering General Motors GM to accept perform and prioritize federal contractors for ventilators. March 27 President Trump signed an executive order allowing the military to activate members of the Selected Reserve and Ready Reserve to active duty to assist with the Federal response to the coronavirus. March 27 President Trump approved major disaster declarations related to the coronavirus outbreak for South Carolina Puerto Rico March 27 President Trump appointed Office of Trade and Manufacturing policy director Peter Navarro to serve as the Defense Production Act Policy Coordinator. March 27 President Trump announced that 100 000 ventilators are projected to be manufactured in the next 100 days three times the amount typically manufactured in one year. March 27 President Trump announced that Boeing offered the use of three Dreamlifter cargo air crafts to transport medical supplies across the country. March 27 Partnering with FEMA the CDC and the Coronavirus Task Force Apple released a coronavirus app which allows users to screen for their symptoms. March 27 President Trump spoke with British Prime Minister Boris Johnson about the global coronavirus response and committed to helping provide ventilators to the U.K where possible. March 27 Vice President Pence announced that 685 000 Americans have been tested for coronavirus and received their test results. March 27 Emory University began enrolling participants for a phase one clinical trial sponsored by the NIH's National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases NIAID of a new potential coronavirus vaccine. March 27 FEMA Administrator Pete Gaynor spoke to the director of each of the state's emergency operations about the state led federally supported coronavirus response effort. March 27 The USNS Mercy arrived in the port of Los Angelse to help relieve the strain on hospital facilities in Southern California. March 28 President Trump visited Norfolk VA to send off the USNS Comfort to New York City where it will help relieve the strain on local hospitals. March 28 President Trump approved major disaster declarations related to the coronavirus outbreak for Guam Michigan Massachusetts Kentucky Colorado March 28 President Trump spoke with New York Governor Andrew Cuomo and Florida Governor Ron DeSantis regarding the coronavirus response effort. March 28 The CDC issued new guidance for residents of New York New Jersey and Connecticut to avoid non essential domestic travel for 14 days to StopTheSpread of the coronavirus within the U.S
I didn't lecture you about anything. A shit stain's a shit stain no matter what country it's stinking up. That's all I said. M8.
It's not illegal to be sick and it's not illegal to unintentionally get someone else sick. If you're going around coughing on old people in wheelchairs with an O2 bottle that's a bit different.
Its good. I feel like here is the last bastion on reddit.
Paywall for me
Maybe you and daddy can cum up with unique mushroom recipes.
I mean... Those were two extremely important states that popped in my mind. He's won all over the country not just the south. He won Florida too which is a state we might win... Especially after they've fucked up so much there. Wonder if covid 19 hit the villages.. But I understand. Biden's not my first choice but godammit I wanna win
These articles are so dramatic and stilted I wish they would just report on what what said and let us decide if and how awful it was.
This would explain why half of Newfounland Meme Island has names that look like they were created by high schoolers. Dildo lol
The majority of people dying in Michigan are black. Trump wants them to die because they don t vote for him.
His actions saved lives. That was his duty. To protect us from all threats foreign or domestic. Instead of being fired he should be given a medal and promoted. This country is ass backwards and it baffles me.
That book isn't selling. Bolton's book was blood money from the start.
Too bad we don't like have a transcript. Why the hell is the house allowed to hide such documents from the public
But I do agree Kyle Allen sucks. Easily the worst Allen qb in the nfl.
If you travel anywhere you cant have it with you. Even to a shooting range. It's not about using it in the vehicle. I can actually be arrested for making a stop on the way to the range to use a bathroom or stop for coffee becuase NJ law considers it a deviation.
The UN is a joke
If you're required to have an ID then at that point it makes sense for it to be free taken from taxes. Otherwise you're just introducing numerous extra steps and difficulty to purchase it from the govt.
Yeah i was joking
Havent you seen the trumpy bear commercials that unironically come with an american flag blanket for you to wrap yourself in
Tylenol suppositories help him on camera. The hallucination is that America actually believes his bullshit.
Franklin was a slaver that's indisputable. And it's not presentism if you're following such a man's advice in lockstep you're now willing to support 250 year old outdated ideas.
memes got our president elected they are not just memes.
I actually think they rated this one fairly. It provides excellent ammo against lefties and TDS sufferers who make the hoax claim because it literally spells out what was actually said and they can't bring themselves to shit on the source.
No matter how shitty he will always rate his performance 10 out of 10
The German one wasn't cancelled it had already left the US.
It s not about complacency. You can only shout at brick walls so long. Go around them and get to the good shit on the other side.
My friend drinks them because he loves the taste of beer but doesn't love the way he acts if he drinks beers with normal alcohol content.
But...but but...he got the military ammunition. Just didn t have time for medical needs. Figure don t need medical needs if you just kill everyone instead
Owning the libs
I haven t looked into the numbers enough to comment on that I was just baffled by how misleading the headline was and how it explained how misleading it was in sentence 1.
Let China pay them Corona relief...they are the originators of it. They also buy off the Democrats. They own a huge portion of NY and also own 80 percent of Hollywood. A few illegal immigrants isn't going to break them. These puppets need to be voted the hell out of office. They're supposed to be looking out for their American constituents...not refugee ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS. They are only playing to their voter base. There aren't enough legal voters that are brainwashed or stupid enough to win the election and they know it.
Which in turn will soon make this the american flu yea
gt Yeah most Americans aren t that smart I m sorry. This has been something I've struggled with through this whole thing so far. At what point do we decide we can't cater the country to the dumb ones I don't like the precedent that it sets. We don't like when we set laws for minute groups races sexual orientation etc. so why is this any different
9million people out of a job and you think they'll vote for you to take 8 years to tear up the healthcare industry People right now just want their jobs back and not to be sick. They don't want an imaginary revolution
They can re open the country 100 for all I care I still aint going out and about until this blows over. I can lay low for 6 months no problem.
Kinda puts into perspective how 1 of the world sees the apocalypse as a less than ideal vacation vs. How 99 of the world sees the apocalypse as death hunger famine disease and general suffering.
Right I mean Comic Sans Really
I love that trump cuts Medicare and Medicaid and food stamps. They cheer as he actively steals money from them.
Even if you asked nicely for them to make more it's kinda hard to do that when you just dicked over the only country that supplies the raw materials needed to make the N95 masks and a multitude of other medical PPE. Also 3M came out and said that these actions will likely result in less PPE getting into the hands of American medical personnel. We live in a globalized world with a global supply chain. This will only have negative consequences for the US.
No genius. I said that because you like to mention in your comments that you're a historian without a shed of sanctimony I'm sure. Also genius I used the phrase I think which clearly indicates that it is my opinion and I didn't even suggest that there was any objective analysis involved. It is purely subjective and entirely conjecture. It's an admission of my bias. Something not all of us are able or willing to do. Finally genius you think you're the first self professed intellectual that's come here with comments dripping with condescension pretending to be even keeled and offering objective reasoning for your concussions Well you're not. We get one like you a couple times a month or so trying so hard to pretend to be neutral but having his liberal sensibilities betray the facade. You're really not that different than the other liberal trolls that constantly pester us.
I literally addressed everything stfu with this weak as shit.
This is the correct constitutional answer. The federal government is not allowed to do these things per the constitution but the States and the people are to specifically remain with these rights under the 10th Amendment in times of crisis. This is why the balance of power even at state level between legislative judicial and executive branches but state level actions are more accessible to the local population to change than the federal government which is supposed to be far more limited in its powers mostly to guarantee that states do not exercise powers that are not reserved for them and to ensure states keep the basics functioning as defined by The Declaration of Independence and the Constitution.
Oh... I see where you're coming from. Jolly good
Takes one to know one.
Well it's convenient and makes money.
All bit players on the impeachment hoax along with Eric Ciaramella. Their wrong doing pales in comparison to the outright illegal unconstitutional and treasonous actions by Pelosi Schiff Nadler and Schumer. When Barr finally gets to the bottom of this cess pool we re all going to see a new side of Comey Brennan and Clapper too.
A lot of people are right now. But the people in charge are also letting a lot of convicted criminals out of jail ignoring some lower level crimes and forcing people not to work. And it's starting to warm up outside. Summer is gonna be a shitshow if people aren't allowed to work again by then.
I hear you it's scary but she'll probably get it eventually and recover just fine too.
Yeah it's kind of insane that I a Canadian actually know the name of a freshman US congressperson and the only reason I know it is that Republicans have made her much more famous than she would be otherwise. And I don't want to even think about the fact that I know who the fucking American education secretary is if all things. Shit I don't even know who my own Education Minister is.
I grew up in a working class northern town. I feel like I m pretty good at judging the political mood of the people but if you told me 2 years ago that town would vote Conservative in the next election I d have laughed in your face. But that s what they did. That s how hated Corbyn and his gang of toxic radicals is.
What a petty little fuck.
Eh Malia Obama got into Harvard. I'm not saying she didn't have good stats but if you're saying her name didn't help her by a significant margin you'd be lying. The US elite operates like an aristocracy and always has.
You idiots voted for this government
How many times do the voters have to reject Bernie Sanders Is two times enough If he s still alive and kickin in 2024 doubtful will the voters need to reject him a third time before progressives learn their lesson The fact is that Democrats don t even want Sanders as evidence by 2016 and 2020 primaries. The idea that non Democrats secretly want someone farther left rather than a centrist moderate is batshit insane. It s left is right up is down day is night kind of shit. Maybe the reason people are rolling their eyes so much is because you re saying some ridiculous stuff.
Just because a small fraction of students take calculus and have done so for decades that doesn't speak to the larger degradation of standards which is well documented. Your argument has no merit.
So glad common sense was followed You should be.
gt if you ignore a bully he will just go away. Not only is it terrible fucking politics in an election year but it's just shamefully weak.
They believe that this pandemic could get so bad that it leads to looting rioting Mad Max type shit. They want the guns to protect themselves from that not to shoot a virus.
Where are all the people who are angry with Hunter
Maybe look into why the FDA was created in the first place and is needed
The issues with China masks is they are mostly defective or ineffective.
About half the people who want to believe it s true will believe it... It s an easy thing to achieve with the MSM in your corner the narrative spinning can get very creative
Hello motorsportnut thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u motorsportnut amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. cbc.ca context 10000
Hotels are empty...
Not just for President. For Senators House Representatives Governors Sec. of States Attorneys General State Senators State House Reps School Boards Mayors City Councils Sheriff even Dog Catcher. Get people to pay way more attention when it's not just the presidential election. Primaries have a huge impact off years have a huge impact local elections have a huge impact. No one President can do it all they need support from officials at all levels.
I dunno man with how bad Trump is bungling this China could ve given him a year s advance notice and he d still fuck it up.
But I'm humbler than you stop being nasty with those gotcha posts.
Is it because Obama won't take Biden's calls and is STILL not endorsing him
You can find them on FB.
Nice to see everyone who saw Crowder this morning just go down the list.
Honestly the way this guy looks is fucking creepy. Like his eyes are soulless. I m not religious I just mean he has empty affectless eyes like a goddamn serial killer. And yeah he plucks his eyebrows.
I think we shouldn't Boil em mash em stick em in the trash.
Sarcasm Gosh what a helpful and benevolent person. Full of courtesy and charm. So glad we ve got somebody like him looking out for all our interests. We are all safe with him at the helm.
The irony is that the media is already starting to fret at the possibility that Trump will look like a hero if in the end the number of deaths will be below these inflated projections. There are already some signs of buyer s remorse over hyping the worst case scenarios.
Don t get the virus Be breast. I mean best.
gt The flu will kill 1 20 of the people that Covid did That s a small percentage but a lot of people The 2017 2018 flu season cdc.gov killed 61000 people in America alone and globally can kill as many as 650 000 cdc.gov every year and that's even with a vaccine. If there was no vaccine for the regular flu it's possibly just as deadly as coronavirus. Maybe. It still has a long way orldometers.info to go to match the regular flu.
So you can't
China has contained COVID Narrator they hadn t.
I ve never really browsed that sub until this week. Conservatives love to have someone to blame. It seems to be their raison d etre.
For fucks sake 1984 was not an instruction manual
Well liberals believe racism towards white isn t real but then again they actually thought Hillary could be president
The funny thing is I would fucking love to cheer for Donnie as he ushers in M4A and a few other choice things. He just doesn't want my praise since I am not a multi millionaire.
Why do we pay federal taxes then
youtu.be
How does this have down votes. It's a very real problem that people who medically need the medications being talked about are having trouble accessing the supply. We have real world cases where factually proven need is being superseded by early stage possible outcomes. This is exactly why it's dangerous to get on tv and throw out medical ideas off the cuff.
This is turning into the stupidest No U pissing contest. Fucking Gavin Newsom is being more civil to the president than schmucky Chuckie
Corporations should be beholden to the state when national security and public health are at risk.
I feel like the second Trump tries to do a draft to bolster military forces in preparation to fight Canada he's going to be dealing with more protests than enlisted instead.
I imagine trump is desperate to redirect away from his epic negligence surrounding the coronavirus response negligence that would be criminal in the private sector.
I believe the only way he could is by declaring martial law.
What on Gods green Earth does Canada plan on doing in retaliation Has to be something passive aggressive at best.
So is it the boss Who s trying to keep his business running in the wrong or the minority
They will be called robots pretty soon.
gt Can we trust the government as it exists today not to abuse this power No So you are saying that we can't trust Trump
Why is this walking Maybaline advertisement still making news She's a blithering idiot People care more about FACTS than they do about what's right. ROFLMAO Gawd she's a twit
It confuses me. Why do banks and law offices need to be downtown People can take a bus to you or whatever. Downtowns should be local shops restaurants bars etc. Stuff that encourages you to walk around amp browse. Businesses that will invest in the community amp local downtown events that contribute to the culture of the town.
gt This has also changed over time as Israel has annexed more territory from them. Israel can't annex its own territory. It already owns it. The Palestinians have never had a state. They've been offered one many times and have always refused.
For all of Trump's faults he does possess some kind of feral populist instincts. It wouldn't shock me if he did it.
Two thumbs up love it...
I will literally never bend the knee
Pelosi is the worst thing on earth
Diabetes heart conditions kidney disease smoking and obesity are all pre existing conditions. Sounds like over half of Americans.
This is bad. Really really bad.
Nobody knew viruses were so complicated
Trumpvilles come with free bedbugs for midnight snacking.
They chose this for themselves with their vote. Choices have consequences.
Arnold as Governor created this mobile clinics as well and Jerry Brown got rid of it.
Or more succinctly he is attempting to make decisions based on our best interests but the media is only interested in their best interests.
Tends to happen when we vote in republicans to fix the mess of democrats then they block all the good policy s from passing causing a depression. Oh well.
Follow us we won t achieve anything but we ll promise you the world
The s is obvious on this one. Sorry you missed it.
How do we know he's got they Wuhan flu Because he said so. That's not really enough for me anymore.
I can't bring myself to click on that link... I know I'll probably lose sleep over it
No this man is the savior of New Orleans. Great man.
And now further down the thread you admit that you were lying. Good lord... Don t be shocked when Biden loses.
Gee has he ever used that term towards a male Yeah thought not... That's just his misogynist dog whistle manifesting.
i just can't imagine things being like they were 3 weeks ago. at least not for a very long time. my job is still good so far and I'm just spending as little as i possibly can
The stories of seeing his father at the foot of his bed and then Andrew Cuomo in ballet attire twirling around with a wand was bizarre.
I get it but the point of the article was that they cut one directly related to the other. Wasn t it
gt and am pretty sure I'm not a wingnut. Can't be a wingnut if you're aware that you're a wingnut.
Called the electoral college racist guess we should ditch state voting and count millions of ballots by hand and see which mob gets to rule. God Bless the Mob Rule of America.
It's a bit of dark humor and that's the joke it's literally not productive. Any time there's a tragedy conservatives are ideologically loath to deal with Thoughts and prayers is their go to response. Seeing as this disaster was brought on by a failure of conservative leadership which could have been avoided and or minimized it's a pertinent if somewhat callous reaction. But humor is a coping method so you can't really fault someone for using it to try and keep calm in these trying times.
Sure no one wants to get any corona virus but we've all had multiple corona viruses in our lives. You'll get it eventually as will I and we'll both likely be just fine and a good chance neither of us will have symptoms.
We have a clown with dementia.
Of course the smart guy gets downvoted in the conservative sub lmfao
right. 5 other people prior to you let me know of the implications.
Fair enough
It s going to take at least 6 months for a vaccine to be authorized. I m all for rapid deployment and everything but articles like this really mislead the sheepeople that don t read past headlines.
I know this would never happen but just once I would love to see someone interrupt trumps bullshit talk hour to tell him something like Shut the fuck up you lying cheating lazy sack of shit If I see this on the news I ll know we ll be ok.
What do you need a gun for in this moment You can t shoot the virus and if things fall apart to the extent that people are using their guns to rob or kill or whatever well that s a world I really don t want to live in.
This is true but if I have the choice of then I will hold my nose give the DNC the finger and vote for Biden
reddit.com
But what about when the chain of command takes their fcking time as usual during a crisis like this Are we supposed to except a top leader such as Crozier simply stand by while his sailors lives are put in jeopardy when we re not even at war I believe most moral military leaders would ve done what Crozier did and fall on the sword. As the top commenter pointed out if we make it a habit of using fear tactics for going outside the chain when lives are at stake it will make junior officers more afraid of doing the right thing which in turn creates more havoc and chaos. And in the end it s the enlisted whom will suffer the most. Speaking as a prior enlisted Airman who s served on both amphibious assault platforms and carriers.
I am worried about the people dying and the global ramifications of everything going on. Nation's fighting nation's instead of trying to keep the world's people alive If we hold life saving products from Canada think of all the important Canada can keep from us imagine how many people will die because of retaliation of corrupt leaders. Our lives mean nothing to those currently in power. It's like a poorly written GoT fanfic. It's season 8 out here.
Stop saying he has alzheimers. Reagan avoided impeachment and prison because of Alzheimer's Donald Trump is of sound mind and perfectly lucid. He can rightfully be sent to prison.
As someone who hasn't really been affected by quarantine what essential rights has the government taken away in these times Looking for a genuine answer.
I think Hillary started around this point as well the difference was she didn't tell him.
He's literally not even brave enough to deliver his own catchphrase.
This is intended to draw media attention toward a Democrat response. Then the White House says Democrats are attacking the President because he s doing so good at the pandemic. We might keep it under 200 000 dead
The way I see it Skilled educated Americans want job security safety benefits and an upward career path farm work can't compete with the other options that offer these things just by paying a little more than average. Less skilled educated migrants coming from nothing are willing to settle for much less and can't compete for the jobs Americans can. I don't think it's a too good or lazy issue you could probably get younger people to work these jobs while they go to school if they weren't so rural you just can't expect someone with a degree or cert. to settle for a deadend job.
I would think this will escalate more and more. Mainly because a lot of people have more time to spend on Reddit.
It's a feature not a bug
I thought they just recvieced a stay at home order today
I don't blame the voters as much as the systems the voters must navigate to vote. Simply things like having to be signed up for jury duty gets some people to avoid registering.
Well I'll admit when I'm wrong. My last visit did not impress me and that is what led me to consider it a shit hole. If you like it then good on you. I could never live there.
You can't be serious. The order that you cited was given today. There was no order of exclusive production prior to today. If you're referring to the March 18th order the directive was never officially given to 3M and therefore no laws or regulations were broken. gt On March 18 Trump formally invoked the law with an executive order prioritizing and allocating health and medical resources to respond to the spread of Covid 19. But four days later on March 22 Trump said action under the law wasn t needed because tremendous numbers of companies including 3M Co. and General Electric Co. had stepped forward voluntarily to make needed equipment. fortune.com
Lol sure it is. Because that's how Schiff rolls. s
With that logic celebrating 4th of july is a sin to bc its american pride
Oh no I m agreeing. My dad s a MASSIVE Trump supporter and a Boomer peak boomer unfortunately and it is interesting his supporters that believe his bs from the start are most likely to get themselves killed bc of it and are at higher risk than gen x and younger. Taking themselves out of the voting pool. Though I love my dad and wish he wouldn t take these stupid risks.
Sucks.
yea this wasnt brigaded
user reports 1 Racism Socialist is a race now Who knew
Well explain specifically how it s out of context. Go on I ll wait lol
Unreal. We need to be saved youtube.com v 3neDhaJTgU
Why do so many of you keep venturing into r politics You know this is what you're gonna get. I stopped going there years ago. I don't need the aggravation of the juvenile dime story political theory crowd who all think a zinger with a few f bombs and a downvote is the pinnacle of political discourse rather than the dregs. I'd rather hang out here where people are civil.
Because when you're a Republican they just totally let you break the law with zero consequences.
Do you think joe Biden is a better candidate based on his policy and record
gt See gt That wasn t so hard. You ignored the entire question which is pretty easy. gt he should ve been prepared for this virus rather than calling it a hoax and downplaying it for weeks. I agree except for the hoax thing but the thing is nearly everybody was doing the same thing. There were no Democrats calling for the huge things we've done or taking it as seriously as it needed to be during the same period. I've seen a few who took it more seriously than Trump but not nearly as seriously as we needed it to be early enough.
This guy is like a stupid 8 ball.
Welp I tried. I legit wasn't trying to be snarky or anything. But I have zero recollection of the NY Times ever downplaying the virus.
gt December 10 2019 This article is way out of date not to mention that Gabbard suspended her campaign.
Can you give me examples of people actively exposing themselves to it
The problem is the doom and gloom models haven't been an accurate predictor. What's more the current models are biased with NY and NJ data which is not what the rest of the country is experiencing. There has to be a balance between the true risk and the costs we're imposing.
If anyone from NY is reading this... WHAT THE HELL ARE YOU ALL DOING Are you that desperate against Trump that you rather see these imbeciles make a total joke of what s left of our government When I see Libs Dems saying anyone but Trump That right there shows you that people are too unhinged and selectively outraged to cast a competent vote. They really don t care who else is POTUS. Liberal judgement has gone right down the crapper.
I really don't care. Do U
amp x200B youtube.com v rX7wtNOkuHo youtube.com v rX7wtNOkuHo
No actually. Most fevers stay and hold until the infection is gone. Your body doesn't just take a break while the infection is present. Only a select few diseases have intermittent fever like malaria for example
It's definitely convinced my anti gun wife. I want to wait until the crisis is over so I can start taking classes first.
Trump and his party are evil. The US is evil. We're the baddies.
Because dear leader said it was a game changer.
As an atheist and not exactly well read in any of the myriad of religions what good arguments are there for churches being essential I saw the poster who said their church is doing web broadcasts of their services this sounds like a wonderful solution to the current health risks.
Oh Brother... keep displaying your willful ignorance. You have no idea how pathetically stupid you look.
Hello billthomson thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u billthomson amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. thestar.com context 10000
A necessary evil in a globalist world.
r coronavirus r china flu r COVID19 and coronavirus state subs. They were talking about it 2 3 months ago.
You stole my post word for word. Great job
Ah yes the illegal aliens I see with wads of 100s clearly getting paid under the table are DEFINITELY 100 paying taxes on that income. Totally all of them.
Oh great. Trumps gonna end his presidency by leaving America in a war with canada
More evidence that no matter what Dem primary candidate you support that you need to vote down ticket this election. This is not the time for a protest vote.
It's not more painful it is a better delivery mechanism and faster to manufacture
Why not there's a TV president
Giving tax breaks to elite lefties on the coast. That ll help us average Americans.
You came in out of nowhere with a completely unrelated post Then said I m trying to blame trump Okay.
Seriously his mouth looks like a decrepit asshole and watching him speak legit makes me queasy because of it. Plus his voice is horrible and his idiotic speech makes my brain hurt.
This account is obviously a Chinese Russian shill account. Over two years old with no comments or posts aside from the past week Would venture to guess it's being used within series of accounts to upvote foreign agenda based posts while hitting the requisite account lifetime to bypass any built in Reddit mechanisms to prevent influence campaigns and now is being unleashed to post their propaganda. Seriously guys I'm not a fan of Kushner or Trump but I hope everyone does a bit of due diligence and sees this shit for what it is.
Forcing me to what
What rights is this dude speaking od
Ha You got that right.
I'm almost done with it. Every time we said Slippery slope they called us bigots and we shut up. Now we have men wrestling women. I'm all for fair rights but to say everything this administration has done is the end of the world is exhausting.
I mean the kid tried to take on Bernie s biggest political stance in 1 minute....I can find a lot wrong with it but it definitely wouldn t be 1 minute. Just that alone would give people the impression he s just a stupid kid screaming into the void never mind it being a tiktok.
Trump steaks were sold in an electronics store that also failed.
Hahahahaha. Sure it is. Hence the pandering and the calls for more than just equality. And not being satisfied with acquiring rights. Instead now you have to be happy with idiots wearing S amp M gear in public. And bring your kids to watch that too
Disagree heavily on that one. People only think change is possible if it happens immediately. You want a single election to fix all of our problems and you re right that is impossible. But you re sounding like you think it s cool to not vote because it doesn t matter anyway
Grandpa is losing his shit again
And after that the bloodletting and leeches
Have people ever cared so much about a freshman representative before Genuinely curious because I m 20 and don t know if someone in their first term has ever gotten this much press before. Seems like the only reason she keeps blabbing is because everyone keeps giving her attention. She s got enough name recognition now that she ll have an easy time winning re election unless she does something truly horrific to piss off her constituency.
This is it right here. They know if more people are allowed to vote they'll lose. That's what it means to be conservative. You conserve as much wealth and power for the wealthy elite as you can all while pretending that it actually effects you in some positive way you can't quite explain. Cuz Trump just makes you feel good.
gt Why are we still calling these asshats journalists Let's call them what they really are propagandists. You guys literally watch FOX news all day. Oh my god the irony...
There are three Crypts. One each for WW I WW II and the Korean War. There used to be one for the Vietnam War but that Unknown was identified. That empty crypt now has these words inscribed on it. Honoring and Keeping Faith with America's Missing Servicemen 1958 1975. arlingtoncemetery.mil
We need some poor kid...who grew up homeless and raised up and became a millionaire to be president.
Will the force of free market backed by decent people force some positive change into china Let's see.
No I know what you were saying. And I wasn t directing the comment at you. I was saying at this point that s just an excuse for people never having the courage to think or speak for themselves. I can see it too but the only way I can see it is rich people thinking they need tax cuts at least those people are having their fortunes eaten away by the economic freeze we re having that would ve been at least partially avoidable with decent leadership and people having the same selfishness hatred and bigotry that he does. Everybody has the temptation to only pay attention to stuff that validates their own beliefs it doesn t take much personal effort to challenge them. I remember that I was in the fourth grade when Kerry ran against Bush. My parents were right leaning at the time have since come around thankfully. Very around they re planning on voting for Bernie in our state s primary although we re pretty late so it seems like it might be a moot point by then The fourth grade at my elementary school had a mock election I ended up with a group representing California. We discussed the issues at a fourth grade level and thought Kerry made more sense because he hadn t just gotten us into a war and would help people who needed it instead of people who didn t. If a fourth grader can think outside of what they hear at home so can a full grown adult who watches too much Fox News. I think it s time for to make people feel responsible for the effects their actions have on our country. It s not a game anymore at this point roughly the same number of Americans have died from COVID 19 as died in 9 11 and the Iraq War combined.
use the available metrics in other countries on what constitutes moderate there and report back. That s what liberal would mean here.
So even Sanders isn't progressive enough now AOC Omar etc. also voted for them.
I mean isn't it their job to walk 24 7 though Like I thought they never stop
We took in thousands of Americans during 9 11. You repay us by taking everything for yourselves when we are dying too. This self over community mentality has escalated into pure stupidity. People are absolutely furious up here. Doug Ford the Conservative premier of Ontario is disappointed in Trump. I don t think you realize how big a story it is in Canada and how severe the repercussions will be.
Not to diminish the seriousness of this clusterfuck of a situation but are his eyebrows plucked and arched
There's certainly a willful ignorance at play in many of the people I've personally encountered who parrot his shit anytime logic common sense or empathy come up in conversation.
Wtf is a trump Is that that guy still trying to be president No one cares what he says anymore.
Because Trump said it was looking very promising with nothing to actually back that up with and his supporters took him at his word despite him being a factually proven liar.
Because we all know that there is no chance that a celebrity can become a good president right cough Ronald Reagan cough
Man if average joes have to video conference why don t they
Reddit really needs to find a way to set an 18 age limit. Way too many kids on this site.
Cry more about downvoted loser.
Like you guys started listening to celebrities so much that you elected one in our country we keep our celebrities in place and respect then for only what they deserve.
gt How dumb do they think people are Progressive responding to misleading clickbait downright dishonest titles Pretty dumb. It works essentially every day on r politics.
This boy retarded. So many assumptions made to fit your preexisting biases you ve constructed. You don t evaluate information you search out info that conforms to your narrative and ignore anything that doesn t. Orange man bad reeeeeee He ruined the world even though nothing significant has changed in the last few years. It s Trumps fault that China lied and suppressed information. I m only mad at Trump though Italy fucked up royally and I could care less because I didn t care to begin with. I m just virtue signaling so the people who share my beliefs think I m a good person. I hope you learn to evaluate information on your own soon. Good luck dude. PS I m an atheist fuck boy so much for bible thumping. That s how I know you re only searching for information that confirms what you already believe. You could probably use religion though you re so hateful. Sorry for whatever trauma in your life causes you to feel that way.
Left people like me get it as well. Anyone who dared to voice their own opinions that are anything but 100 what they agree with. These people represent the entire left no more than the tiki torch boys represent the entire right.
I would never support anything that I would consider to be in breach of basic human rights.
OAN. Saved you a click
Hahahaha no they aren t. People get upset if there isn t a gay person on every show. That s much much more than 4 100 roles.
While we haven t won a war since WW2 I d still advise you to be cautious. America has been losing wars since WW2 because we abandoned the idea of taking territory as victory and instead we ve been waging war based on killing as many combatants as humanly possible to force a surrender. This has been because we ve been fighting guerrilla forces that whole time. A full international war would play into our hands a little too well but every other country in the world would fuck us.
DC metro has no plans to shut down. Social distancing only applies to some people I guess.
So how long we thinkin until he kicks Fauci out We re so fucked
the youtube comments Wow He is so relateable
They just say shit they think sounds good.
We already knew this was gonna happen. The good thing is the majority of the US knows exactly when and where this shit started so any attempt to muddy the waters exposes that person as liar and manipulator. The only people that believe otherwise are the blue haired retards on Reddit or FB. Don't let this small vocal extremist group on Reddit gas you up let them expose themselves.
Whatever. I'm not. People shouldn't read things and think it's the truth just because someone said so. There's nothing factually wrong in the article. They are relaying statements from that group which is expected. It would be very helpful for the reader to know what the group is.
If you think they give Biden even remotely the same kind of scrutiny you're not paying attention. And if you think it's really 8000 lies you live in a bubble.
I prefer dangerous freedom to peaceful slavery. True liberty is dangerous sometimes. We don't throw out the Constitution because something scary is happening. So long as the most suspecible populations are staying isolated the majority of the population is mitigating risk let the morons gather. I don't know why this is hard concept You don't lose your right to freedom of speech because some people use it spread hate You don't lose your right to keep and bear arms just because an evil man shoots up a school You don't lose your right to a freedom of self incrimination and a fair trial just because a real criminal might get away with a crime Rights are too important to allow the government to suspend them. If they can do that it means you don't actually have those rights
I have always admired these men women. They stay out there in all conditions
its 15 soon itll be 0
You got a little scared and instantly was willing to toss basic human rights out the window and I am the idiot
Possibly. Although moving corporate headquarters is beyond expensive. The idea that we should allow companies to exploit our immigration system because they might leave is stupid.
I feel bad for people like this. Can we all have a little humility and realize we might be wrong about a few things
Link
So he can sit on his ass for 10 months like Obama did during the H1N1 virus
We suck and it seems we can't fix this..... under the Constitution. What to do... Make the terms for Senators one term only. Reduce the power of the position that Mitch McConnell now holds.
Yes. Yes it is.
Two people took it. One person died but yes it s still an outlier.
Get yeeted Bernie
Oh yes. Absolutely. Why else lie What can you do with a stockpile of medical equipment Give it to folks who can use it OR close the Pandemic office and sell everything to other countries and line the President's pockets with the money. California received broken ventilators. Pretty sure they came from some other country's stockpile. Obama would not have broken ventilators in our country's emergency stockpile.
Why do I keep arguing with ransoms in Facebook about Trump I know it's pointless I'm just so fed up of lies and misinformation I have to take it out somewhere.
Still nah. Russia created Trump.
It's not the goal but it will be the result.
Impeachment is just another name for a trial. He went to court but was acquitted. Not guilty.
Socialism is anything the government does that I don't like Republicans
Because Trump said it. What Trump says becomes what Fox News and Republicans say.
Nice
Like I said to the other peeps here 15lbs for a dude Cuomo's size is literally doable in a single day. From here awawisconsin.com gt Water weight is the most easily lost and quickest to replace. You can lose up to 10 of your weight in 24 hours and have no harmful affects on your athletic performance
He has to keep up his fake news quota. This is CNN after all.
I don't know what it is like in those areas but where I am in Pennsylvania you cannot get tested unless you are describing similar symptoms over the phone let alone being in direct contact with someone. My sister in law and her husband are slowly recovering from testing positive and they tried to get tested 3 times telling their doctor the symptoms and on the 4th day he finally gave them the go ahead. Just questioning it because of my experiences around here I guess cause it sounds odd where they want people with symptoms to stay at home and only get tested IF they show symptoms.
Who are you moving on to
This but literally unironically.
gt Atkinson's firing is part of a larger shakeup in the intelligence community. Joseph Maguire the former acting Director of National Intelligence was also removed and replaced by a Trump loyalist Richard Grenell. Trump has nominated Texas Rep. John Ratcliffe to the permanent position but the Senate has yet to move on his nomination.
Water weight is a thing. This is easily doable when you are sick. Sweating plus lack of hydration eating. He is not saying he has lost body fat.
Most of those guns will wind up in drawers and closets and forgotten. But they're like radioactive waste just sitting there waiting to be stolen and used in the commission of crimes.
This article doesn t seem to focus on China though I guess I wasn t specific enough. I asked because even though I disagree with the PRIOR travel bans I personally agree with travel restrictions during an outbreak. I THOUGHT most people with the exception of wingnuts or reactionary people agree with making sure Covid isn t spread about. That said NOTHING shocks me and I wouldn t doubt if some people DID have a knee jerk thats racist response but I d like to see it.
2020 write your preferred pronoun inside the box
Yeah but what about The Bachelors ratings
Honestly if you told me that during a pandemic in 2020 that American people were panic buying toilet paper rather than food and water I d say that President Trump was exactly what they fucking deserved.
You speak of individuals then go on an incoherent screed lumping everyone into some vast right wing conspiracy. The fact is people use the other' as an excuse to to horrible things regardless of their political philosophy. The French and Russian revolutions modern states in the middle east and China just to name a few radically left wing governments that killed thousands and into the tens of millions.
But do they have the authority to supersede the bill of rights If you think so what higher authority then the Constitution gives them that power
It's fucking depressing how good of a grip the top 1 of the top 1 has on our balls. It's mental. Especially with social media in the mix. Pure cancer. Even reddit I feel like half the fucking replies are astroturfed. To be honest I didn't see a way out for people out of this prison. But this could be the catalyst. Everything seems to be suggesting that US will get fucked so I'm hoping it will be proper so people start not protesting but rioting. One can hope. Those fucking people have addresses
I can t explain laws any simpler. Look into the second amendment and tell me how come everyone is not able to own a firearm. How different states are able to have different LAWS outlining what is legal and illegal. Then tell me about your rights and how it supersedes those state laws. You guys can t be this dumb
What a fucking embarrassment they both are.
It's also projection because Trump wants to delay the November election to remain in power longer.
Besides calling him an idiot you were pretty civil that was a good try
The death rate is not the concern here. It's the overwhelmed hospitals that we're trying to prevent. If the hospitals are full of old people with this disease then there is no room for anybody else with a health problem like a broken bone or somebody that needs an appendectomy or any emergency health problem which leads to more people that will die because of this.
Today I feel the emotion of hate
Invade me Trudeau kun
I think he caught the COVID
To think there might be a library named after the most stupid and petty man some day whose lack of action amp intelligence brought a country to its knees.
They re really pushing that drug. I wonder how much they re invested in the company since they re not doctors and have stated lives dont matter and stocks do. FoxNews is fucking criminal with the horseshit they sling as news. The only thing dumber than the shit they say is the folks that believe it.
Well with BS degree in women studies I'm not surprised shes stupid.
Short sighted of you.
When state local tribal and territorial responders request federal assistance to support their response efforts the stockpile ensures that the right medicines and supplies get to those who need them most during an emergency literally from the stockpile's website. Doesn't seem to hard to understand
Lol I love this
Also it seems to that there are two sides to this coronavirus issue. A liberal side and a conservative side. One side is advocating for scientists and experts taking charge and leading the way. Which has been working I live in WA state and we are doing much better than NYC because we had early action and a lot of the tech companies told all their employees to work from home early on like in the beginning of March Early February. That had the effect of shutting down the Seattle economy since so many jobs are reliant on other tech workers who are now working from home. This helped mitigate the spread of the virus in the area. Also the universities were developing their own tests but were shut down by the CDC since they weren t directed by the CDC. The other side is advocating to still go to church and was calling for re opening of the economy last week. Which side do you think is correct with how their response is Not trying to be a douchebag liberal talking down on republicans just look at the facts without bias and decide for yourself who is right.
Source or I don't believe you. I don't play golf on principle played 9 holes once and 18 holes once to try it out I'm convinced this activity was clearly made by for and only with regard to alcoholics as only an alcoholic could sanely give a fuck enough about the landscaping to plan a golf course so they could spend time drinkenly trudging through the landscaping and then drunkenly swinging an anti landscaping tool at a ball until it falls in a hole drunkenly however I refuse to believe anyone in their right mind would disturb that grass with anything other than shoes and golf clubs pre edit I reread my comment and figured out my own dilemma. He doesn't drink. Someone get that man a glass of Scotch. At LEAST A Macallan Estate however Taliskr 18 year would also be acceptable in these uncertain times...
You're an antivaxxer aren't you
I just don't get how people can still vote for this moron. I feel bad for the few intelligent Americans who have to deal with him and his cult following.
We must protect our commander and chief at all costs.
Don t look it s a power grab and monetization of the debt. Move along. Nothing to see. Cash your check.
I would rarely post on this sub. Just here to listen and understand. 2016 opened my eyes because I was sure I was right. The more exposure I have to conservative views has generally reinforced my beliefs BUT I get it. I understand now why the other half has their beliefs. I understand more why Trump won and has a devout following. There are some views I will always disagree with but doesn t mean the person expressing them are wrong bad
Bullshit. The numbers are fake. NY is counting anyone who thinks they might have coronavirus as a proven case. They're counting anyone who dies and happens to have contracted it as a coronavirus death. I don't care if I'm the last one standing up and screaming this this is FAKE
I am okay with temporary restraints during a crisis and reasonable measures where they make sense. I guess you aren't okay with those above mentioned acts being labeled and punished as crimes.
What about the brain dead
Don't worry it will take a lot more than Trump to make us turn our back on our neighbours.
Thanks friend. Same to you. Stay safe.
Why the fuck do you keep posting this depressing shit We know shit is going south stop being a prick.
Thats the point. It even has its own wikipedia entry. en.m.wikipedia.org
Maybe but we aren't being offered that choice. Keeping Trump doesn't make the virus and the recession go away.
All the ones that wont have enough money to reopen
a good man
When Newt Gingrich decided it was better to play partisan politics than help the country
You said he s transparently an idiot which is why I assumed incorrectly it seems that you were calling him an idiot. I will say this. For somebody who sounds like an idiot his actions in this pandemic seem to point to the opposite at least in my opinion. He is doing a good job of consulting with deferring to experts and has endorsed a data based approach. These are typically characteristics I would expect to see from a good leader. I would agree this delegation signals at least some degree of intelligence at least higher than what you give him credit for. An idiot feels that they know everything whereas an intelligent person knows that they cannot possibly know everything.
College towns don't tend do be as conservative even in the south
What the issue
I m ok with that. Gun licenses free but of course guns themselves still cost money
England seems to be going down the 1 path that brought us here.
If there were no guards then there would be people trashing vandalising the place.
The public option won't lead to Germany's healthcare system for a myriad of reasons. Its not even worth debating because it's so far from reality. M4A is a completely packaged and though out bill ready for immediate implementation. There are several versions of the bill and M4A wouldn't require other bills for it to be effective. That isn't the case with the public option which does not include cost saving measures at all other than some vague notion of market forces that any economist would tell is bullshit in the healthcare industry.
He's not a pathological liar and he has the experience of assisting in the reversal of a recession while Trump's policies are in the process of causing one.
My man...we need y all. Let s ignore Trump and help each other
100
What about Vox WaPo and NYT you lefty tard. Keep your fantasy in mommy's basement.
On March 14 2020 John Bolton described the changes made to the team as streamlining. He tweeted Claims that streamlining NSC structures impaired our nation's bio defense are false. Global health remained a top NSC priority and its expert team was critical to effectively handling the 2018 19 Africa Ebola crisis. The angry Left just can't stop attacking even in a crisis. here John Bolton
Make America Great Britain again
Employment is expected to be 30 Yes. They should go home.
I always hear about these approval ratings but who are the people voting. I don't know where to vote for this. I will make it my mission to vote my approval rating every fucking chance I can. I'll show these people under water
Yes if you went out of your way you could in a Sauna But you dont sweat while running a Fever. you sweat when it breaks and the weight lost is instantly regained after they begin drinking again.
Real talk here. The only way I see our country moving to be an actual first world country again is if this coronavirus has ridiculous death tolls and a ton of lasting job loss. If this tapers off without that then I think people will ignore everything Trump messed up and we will keep on riding the capitalism train until it happens again...and again...and again. If death and economic destruction sweep this country I could see us finally getting universal healthcare actual social safety nets etc. Thoughts
Yes you're correct. I'm staying home to be safe but the government shouldn't be able to force me to do so.
What exactly do they intend on using these ventilators for then Are they just going to hoard them and do nothing with them
Take out all the foreign workers and the system collapses For example I m from the UK with a masters and I beat out 10 Americans to get my government job. If we had capable people they would get the work
Funny. I guess grifters don't like people in their business. Who woulda thought
and what do you thnk of this article....zero evidence correct amp x200B nytimes.com nytimes.com
We're still in the thick of this and the democrats priorities are political committees to attack Trump and attempt to influence the election. How about you wait and see how this shakes out vs spending millions of taxpayers dollars on helping people impacted by the virus It's fucking ridiculous. Watch them try and ramp this up in record speed so they can start the attack train going ASAP. And then watch the MSM dutifully dedicate all of their coverage to this latest impending shitshow. In a time where we should all be spending 100 of our resources clawing our way back from this and helping each other watching this latest House debacle unfold is absolutely nauseating.
Point not made.
They were wrong with H1N1 and SARS but no one remembers and here we are.
What's this guy's fucking job again
So if someone murders someone now they can get away with it by simply blaming trump for it. Amazing
so is Pride a new protected class of the secular religion where blasphemy against it an offence
Who ever said Trump was good at running a business Running a country is not the same as running a business but they do have some overlap. Like making sure the national stockpile is stocked enough to handle a pandemic.
Totally. It's the president's who want to fix things that get shot like Lincoln and JFK. The dumbasses who want to fuck shit up the gun owning wingnuts are ok with them. Pre edit ofc not all gun owners are wing nuts. I've got a couple and am pretty sure I'm not a wingnut.
dailymail.co.uk
What makes you disagree with the assertion that the administration is taking a data driven approach
Odd downvote brigade going on in here.
Want paying too much attention and neglected to label the LD 50 rates properly. Therein both are investigated for Covid 19 uses.. Specifically the LD50 rates i mentioned before for Chloroquine is something like 330mg kg while the oral LD50 of hydroxychloroquine is 1240 mg kg.. which is neither here nor there as both are in the same class of drugs and one is derived from the other. Neither has any real data behind them on how effective they are against Covid 19.
Guys. Trudeau said CANADA ISN T DOING ANYTHING. We took it up the ass with this one boys Daddy Trudy thinks if Canada does nothing that Trump is going to say just kidding. There s a reason Dougie in Ontario said he won t rely on prime ministers or presidents in ANY country anymore. Let s hope when he said Ontario will ramp up production of masks he was actually serious...
Those are very well rehearsed talking points from a lifetime in politics. Yet there still appears to me some stumbling and fumbling that early stages of dementia and years of substance abuse might help explain.
So you posted because you think bad of aoc She is one of the few real ppl in charge.
Thought we had that defense law in place. Suspend exports.
Just super impose some bars over it.
all other
It's amazing how dumb someone has to be to believe that requiring an ID to vote is form of suppression.
I'm not advocating you go about your day as normal I'm referring to data that shows most people recover including most 80 year olds from this virus. Your reaction to my post was borne from your personal fear not the content of my comment.
Thats a spicy meat a ball
Anything different than what's happening now is definitely a fundamental change.
If there's no time to institute a universal vote by mail that would be the right move. Holding the primary election with in person voting would be utterly irresponsible.
Hell I live in BRAZIL and that shit's illegal here.
Nobody said anything about essential. I obviously believe essential workers should keep working because they re... essential. The lack of that clarification implies non essential workers would keep working despite the dangers for their own benefit this is what I have a problem with. I thought this was obvious but apparently not so I apologize for being unclear.
I was surprised they didn t test him sooner I thought it was a mandatory test if they showed all the symptoms
Fund training to our citizens We have the best higher education in the world. Best programming schools in the world. American software developers are hired by silicon valley companies. This sounds like a fevered rant. Cancel high work Visa s If man 1 is capable of doing a better job than man 2 at a job then shouldn t he get it according to the rules of the free market Being a worse worker than someone isn t a good enough excuse to oust someone better than you from the country.
Boohoo someone made mean mean on reddit. Quit being a little bitch. You're acting like a liberal
Yup. We could do it tomorrow and come the last day of his term he leaves.
Don't use open arms to welcome the Canadian takeover. Use your walking legs go to your voting station and vote for the guy who wants the US to become a developed country similar to Canada.
Hopefully
Well welcome Feel free to look around this sub some more if you want to. Most of us on here are nice and won t denounce you immediately if you have a point that differs slightly from what is usually on here.
Is that a gotcha OBVIOUSLY
They are just gonna say it will spur a growth in illegal votes. They didnt need any evidence to pull that card before mail in so I dont expect the burden of proof will be required for the alternate timeline they live in.
It is. It tried to infect him but then realized its mistake and left.
I could feel a piece of Fauci's soul die when they mentioned Dr. Oz
0 chance Biden will do that. He will probably say we need to move forward just like Obama did. I put it at 50 50 that he pardons Trump and company for everything in an attempt at unity.
I completely agree with you. I started off around 160 and I probably lost about 15 lbs total most of it in one week or so. from other people I talk to it really spikes your blood sugar so you're burning off a ton of calories while you have no appetite. It's also pretty hard to stay hydrated. I did test positive for coronavirus so I definitely had it I don't just think I had consistent symptoms. I'm not saying he's not lying one way or the other but I am telling people that they should take these symptoms seriously because they really can kill you. It's pretty scary to wake up in the middle of the night not able to breathe.
Because no one has the spine in washington to stick it to the feds...that or the feds are conveniently on their side
Because of the edit on your original comment I wasn't downvoting you until I read this dumbass comment. Now I am downvoting you.
He bangs the same chicks donnie does.
I don t believe shit he says youtu.be
That's the joke
Gotta take Oregon too please since we're between you and California.
this
If the media actually treated him fairly he'd be just as popular.
Where are you getting that Schenck absolutely did rule that you can t incite panic falsely and if it results in harm you are responsible. There was a later ruling that limited it somewhat but it still stands to this day. You are just blatantly ignorant of the facts.
Respect always.
Okay...at the same time you are in a crowded city. The nation is huge and the answer for NYC isn't necessarily the answer for a smaller town in an area without much Coronavirus.
Why was this deleted Its relevant.
Love my paper ballots here in Canada it's the only way to go.
Dude 1 200 isn't even enough for fucking Mississippians.
The Chinese are a threat we need to Aid the Taiwanese and Hong Kong citizens immediately we must act according to a rubic where any measure that harms China in any way with as little damage to us must be taken.
Sadly I think you're right. Fuck. What the hell happened
Just look up the lyrics to Imagine.
Will how else would Donnie get the sanctions lifted for his pitcher
Hmm I bet 3M knows a lot about the history of PPE orders by the government for the national stockpile over the years. I wonder how many orders per year there were while Trump's been in office versus say Obama's administration You don't think this is why Trump is mad
Did you point this out to them
Only one of those a certainties. Who are you to make that decision for someone else
Agree. Just as bad as news about the Kardashians or celebrity gossip. Not the kind of stuff we should be spending mental energy on particularly in the middle of this crisis. Just don't watch CNN if you don't like it. Done.
Hey if Trump is going to stand up there and say the state's need to solve their own problems then yeah I agree its going to move towards that. I just gotta get out of Ohio. People act like we are a swing state but I feel it's more red than ever around me.
Chris Cuomo was not saying what you are. He was talking about his bad symptoms. Is he feeling 80 well during the day and having the horrifying symptoms that you did at night Very possibly. But hes not a saying I feel good during the day and I feel horrible at night so I'm ok doing these shows He is only playing up his bad symptoms. Based on his track record he is wanting to display the warrior vibe and it's not brave to podcast when you feel mostly well.
I ll agree with all of that wholeheartedly. I personally just don t wAnt to see how faithful pence is to his beliefs. Like would he turn the USA into a theocracy faithful.
Godspeed. They ban quickly over there.
I don't think Trump knows anything about the internet outside of Twitter.
Nasty stop making me look bad
He didn t say that it treats coronavirus he said that it cures it. This doesn t need to be a partisan issue. Please stop spreading misinformation.
Or when the Senate refuses to vote on legislation aka their job. Or when they decided that confirming a supreme court justice during the last year of a presidency would be against the spirit of democracy. Or when...
I mean any rational person would ve taken the time to google it. It s likely she did it to murder her husband
We are no longer free.
What do they mean even Is she exempt from acting as a spokesperson
Not much.
Eric Ciaramella and Shawn Misko worked together to plot impeaching the President before there were formal house impeachment proceedings.
Abort em all and let god sort it out.
The criminally derelict Republicans refused to remove Trump from office when he was impeached why would anyone think they'd remove him from office by invoking the 25th Amendment. America is stuck with Trump until January 20 2021 at the very earliest.
I wonder how many more are lined up behind it with similar issues.
It s not that it s wrong at all imo. It is better than before when having a pre existing condition meant no insurance. Problem is they still take advantage of it because they make their costs they can decide you were breathing okay based on your MRI and that the ventilator they gave you was unnecessary so now that s not covered and you re in the hole personally for 50k. The public option being proposed as well just won t happen they want to do the ACA version again and that s already failed. It also leaves 3 of the population uninsured and you d be hard pressed to qualify for that option 400 below poverty or some bullshit We also have no idea how comprehensive that public option would be. They ll watch your returns like a hawk and if you make even a penny over and you re on it they ll charge you everything back similar to the subsidies today. It s not that it s not better than before it s just still garbage compared to those comprehensive options. How you scale them I don t know but it s ridiculous we are the only country that can t do it with the wealth that we have amassed. This underfunded thing just isn t true.
Life isn t personhood. Bacteria are alive as are intestinal worms. They don t supersede or equal the host.
It is very worrisome imo. Coronavirus has really opened many people s eyes to how deep shit really is. They control WHO CDC who really knows. They have Chinese scientists academia media etc. that have ties back to their mainland and are serving the communist party. They take advantage of our education by sending citizens to America to get an education and coming back to serve the party s needs. They have scientists who are also serving the communist party s wants using our research and data for their government. Not to mention all of our virtual data they are stealing very easily might I add. We are practically giving it away to them. Meanwhile the news is shouting that you are a racist for calling a virus that came from china the Chinese virus. Depsite China also letting this virus even arise by not having regulations on wet markets along with a culture that promotes non scientific medicine that uses these wet markets.
Now he has the perfect resume for a candidacy. Soon the question will be what did you do to resist Trump for all elected positions. Much like this google.com q what did you do in the war dady poster amp oq what did you do in the war dady poster amp aqs chrome.. 69i57. 11076j0j7 amp client ms android att us revc amp sourceid chrome mobile amp ie UTF 8 imgrc ptUbMoG5g sM propaganda poster. And getting fired in retaliation will be good evidence of resistance.
I piss people off a lot. Oh well. I try and discuss issues with fact based responses. I find my PM's interesting.
The phrasing is funny. Every single voter has a voter id That s like saying every single driver has a license to drive Yah. Because you need one. Can t drive without a license can t vote without an Id. I think the questions is How many people have voter id s How many people voted I bet you there is a lot of people who didn t on both fronts.
He wasn t even our collective choice. He lost the popular vote.
So you are asking if illegals are essential then. No they are not. 10 million people are jobless that would occupy those jobs. Illegal aliens should not be in the country. They are not essential.
In my state Washington only 1 of deaths have been people below the age of 40 and 93 of deaths are people of 60. This virus while quite dangerous for the elderly and those with pre existing conditions is simply not killing hardly any young or middle aged healthy people.
Do you even read the article bid Trump administration which is currently in its third year ignored alarms raised by various government agencies early on that the U.S was not prepared for a pandemic'
lets storm washington DC. why not.. what have we to really lose by walking up to the fuckers and dragging them out to the people to answer for this shit.
How is Trump allowed to get away with such a blatant act of nepotism This is unbelievable. In a time of a pandemic to put a family member in charge with no experience or medical qualifications is utterly reprehensible.
Doctor corroboration is needed. To be clear nobody should follow the medical advice from some jack ass on a far right site.
It implied there was a problem and he was supposed to personally do something about it Of course he couldn't handle it since his usual in two weeks with the hope that some sucker would do the work to get in his good graces doesn't work for it.
Mmmm.... who feels that basement brigade
It s newsworthy that you need a pandemic to teach people that reusable bags are a health hazard all the time... Who thought it was a good idea to expose baggers to germs and bacterias because someone who wanted to save the planet didn t care to properly wash their reusable bags
They did more than sit on it. They directly lied about it and continue to do so.
suppress the vote the coronavirus will keep the dems in and GOP will win s
Hope you re doing better
Gun shops are making a fortune off hillbilly cowards in Alabama.
Perfect time to do it during a pandemic
Hunger games reference Drink
That s fucked up thinking yo. Just let them die I guess
The problem is that they consistently overestimate the impacts and our policy reactions are based on these overestimations. The media also doesn t ever disclaim these models as such presenting them as forecasts.
Y'know I liked Trump. Was all for him. I liked America First and telling it like it is. After seeing how hes handling the Pandemic I'm so done. He has ruined America beyond repair and I feel utterly ridiculous for ever supporting this clown. I think I'll always like the republican ideals over the Democrats but no matter what I will vote blue Have to put party aside and get him out
Charge t with treason
Who is cause I can't see them
Fuck it I'll ask. Where does all this money come from
I mean you probably should have been rioting in the streets 2 years ago. Not a perfect solution sure but big issues call for big responses.
Fredo is a drama queen.
I m not a subscriber literally just read a few headline. Go look through the last month or so. Middle of February through end of March
Go Bernie. Bernie for President.
Coronavirus prompts Vermont to order Costco Target to stop sale of nonessential items The Satate is making the decision not Vermont.
He learned his lesson for sure Senator Collins. Cull the dissenters.
Trump fired the people running pandemic breakouts and didn't take into consideration the immense fallout that happened as a result of him and most of the US not taking this seriously until so many Americans had already been exposed. I know this is a biased sub but these are facts. I await the hate from people who are so biased they can't fault a president even after the most obvious fuck ups.
I m saying people took fish tank cleaner thinking it was the same stuff so are you suggesting people won t
It was quite a ride. My thumb doubled in size randomly. Sarcoidosis doesn't have a specific symptom so it requires a differential diagnosis where they have to prove it to not be anything else. Lots of imaging and blood tests later they did an excision and determined it wasn't cancer. I was referred to a rheumatologist to prescribed Prednisone and an antibiotic and vitamin D. My thumb returned to original size about a month after the Prednisone. They removed a lot during the excision so we thought it had receded before but it kept getting smaller after the treatment stopped. Interestingly immune suppressants such as Prednisone and Chloroquine are often prescribed with an antibiotic to prevent pneumonia.
Maybe he could borrow Ted Kennedy s neck brace
I don't even make that much lol
Trump promised to reduce the debt by eliminating waste and redundancy in federal spending. Instead his debt reduction plan would add 5. 3 trillion. That's ironic given that he was one of the four presidents who donated his salary. thebalance.com
At what point is the US functionally a failed state The government is corrupt and incompetent. The legislative branch is ineffectual. Human rights are being violated daily religious extremism is rampant Judges and law enforcement officials are retaliated against and millions don't have access to health care. These are not things you should be able to say about a first world nation. In fact I would say that they prove the US is not a first world nation.
gt I hate Trump but those masks expired in 2010. So they were presumably purchased under Bush then budget to rotate the stock fell victim to the tea party.
I'm sorry but that's straight up scary.
WUFLU
What and here I thought Gweneth was a primary investigator with a lab at NIAID or at least a grant recipient at an academic institution. Doesn t she have a doctorate in shoving shit up your vag
Wow only 2 months later great job Joe.
I needed to read something this wholesome today. Thanks a bunch.
It's part of his band isn't it Just when your get your brain wrapped around the latest feat of brazen self serving rat fuckerey the guy somehow finds a way to outdo himself.
THE ORIGINAL POST WAS ABOUT EMPLOYMENT TAX. STOP GASLIGHTING.
It doesn't say that It says that relativism ie. the Left's worldview fails to disclose the full truth about God and about us because it ignores the principles that enable us to flourish.
I never said there would be no deaths but there very likely would not be hundreds of thousands or a crippled healthcare system.
Sure. It s our job to call out that bullshit
gt At what point is the US functionally a failed state When the Supreme Court gave the election to George W. Bush in 2000.
Sounds like Fredo has been self medicating on fish tank cleaner.
Calling it now Romney will be the only Republican who speaks out against this blatant and petty revenge.
How am I a shill I don't think you know what that word means.
I think we should.
I want republicans to turn on him. We never believed his lies but they did. They stuffed his ass up on the pedestal and they are the ones who need to tear him off it.
Any way you spell it it ain't dem o cra cy
Schiff always on the spot. Guy knows how to play...
I'm getting responses I can't see.
Weirdly he was withholding from Michigan which he probably desperately needs. I think to some degree his personal animus and need for adulation far outstrips his actual strategic thinking. Florida likes him and slobs his balls so they get stuff. He also happens to need it politically Michigan has a govenor who's a nasty woman so they don't get stuff even though he needs it politically almost as much as FL.
They just don't want women to have rights.
We are witnessing the country break down before our eyes. I wonder if this is what the Russians felt before the collapse of the USSR.
Exactly. Tan suit and fancy mustard says hello.
How are people supposed to protect themselves against produce that has been coughed on
Martiall law doesn't suspend the Constitution.
Hyper American vocabulary Yes. The constitution. Just stopping unnecessary social interaction I work as a police dispatcher. 10 million people have filed for unemployment in the last 2 weeks. The world economy is at a stand still. The US is incurring more massive debt on the back of absolutely nothing bad debt that nobody will want to buy. We are running headlong into massive inflation. Inmates are being released from Jail. Jails are no longer accepting booking for anything other than the most heinous felonies. The world is shut down. I wish it was as simple as just stopping unnecessary social interaction
Tear it all down Yeah I guess that's the opinion you form when your only image of the situation is from the most loud fanatical Democrats this country has ever seen after losing an election to someone they really don't like as a person. Things really aren't bad they just desperately want everyone to think they are.
Southwest Idaho. We ll secede into Oregon then join them there...
I ll donate to that.
3 6 feeds in fox news are critics of other network's coverage. If this guy plays golf this weekend while Im stuck at home then juxtaposition is orange
Husband wife trades have to be reported because they are considered the same economic unit. If her husband did anything it doesn't absolve her of anything.
Fucking Sudafed caused the worst president of all time God damn it we should ve known
I'd give you a coin but I can't afford it.
I eagerly await hastily scratched together justification for this behavior.
Just remember folks it'll be gone by the start of April.
Maybe focusing on peach mints was a bit top of mind the past 3 years.
Technically he has a JD MBA from NYU and a BA in government from Harvard..... So while I don't like the guy...he is qualified.
You lost at Trudeau threatens
He looks like an average guy
When someone has you knelt down in front of a ditch 2 months from now I hope they put the quotes around rights.
True Any rent in hoods far from Manhattan is more than that. I live in Queens. It s higher than that
People are dying the curves we are talking about have a x and y axis. This guy confuses model with model and takes time out from the death toll to crack a joke about not knowing about death toll projections to knowing about models bodies which he emulated 2 seconds with the wave of his hands. Emperor's new cure.
I love all the news you guys post here that is satire but may as well be real.
Yet for some reason it s not ok to discuss Biden s mental decline
So you agree our system is currently broken I m glad we agree on something... If that is not the case then please enlighten me. Explain to me how our system is supposed to work for the people.
Then you tell him to go fuck himself and don't buy them. Leave him to sit on a ton of product and eat the losses. Supply and demand works both ways. But you don't arrest a man and confiscate his investments and property for being a greedy dick. Being a greedy dick isn't a crime.
Doctors and Nurses galore also.
No thanks I don't want freedom s
Don't invite them here if they do come it won't be for civilized conversation.
This a funny comment considering the majority of cases are in blue states.
Learn some biology and fetal development as well as how many many abortions take place after 8 12 weeks. Clump of cells
I dont have an impact on whether someone kills themself or not. Obviously I dont want it it to happen but suicide is not a logical remedy to anything. Maybe instead of blaming the crash for suicides you should blame the people for being suicidal in the first place. Its not hard to see the good in life and realize you have much more to life for instead of throwing it all away due to you losing your fucking job.
Malfeasance No way. I could never see that happening in this admin.
Are you suggesting there's only two genders Bigot.
We are talking about making it so everyone can vote.
Lol imagine think about Dems caring about anything other than power. How are those utopian Dem cities going
Do you want prions Because this is how you get prions
Motives unknown.
LOL... don't plagiarize... the Trump fantasy porn sites need to protect their revenue stream. If you just give away all the climax lines how will they sell subscriptions
They'll just raise taxes on small business owners to replenish those funds
So some basic napkin math coming at you According to Gallup the worldwide median per capita income is 2 920. 10 of this is 292 person. 292 person 7 Billion people 2. 04 Trillion dollars. Would this happen every year Is it a one time thing Most counties just spent gobs of money fighting this on their own. Fuck off UN.
gt stripper clip why I can t think of anything that takes them that would be among my ideal choices for that scenario.
Good point. Why have businessmen make decisions when we have DJs
Straight up nepotism this shows how screwed US democracy has become. How the heck does a man become senior advisor to the president with no credentials besides being his son in law Why aren t more people up in arms about this This would be unacceptable in any other advanced democracy.
They don't really have control of large portions of their country.
Yet here you are defending the US who is seizing desperately needed medical supplies from its most faithful allies.
I'm female.
I wish trump would do an executive order for a purge. The movie purge that is.
Yes I agree.
I think what it meant was that the Federal Government has no right to lock down the streets like the State Governors do. If you'll notice so far the President hasn't done that and is letting the states handle their own business. That's actually very refreshing.
Its very difficult to post on reddit since it's so left leaning....well not difficult but the downvotes for expressing an opinion and most times truth and facts are amusing to recieve
And it s really good beer too.
Thats an interesting point have u seen any proof that there truly was a raise in food born illnesses while the plastic ban was in place
I don't know anything about this Matt Walsh person. Has he been complaining incessantly over the last four years about the Democratic parties demonstrating that they have ZERO concern for the rule of law due process honesty ethics individual rights or the welfare of the country as a whole From my standpoint Covid 19 is just the cheery on top of a 4 year long shit cake baked up by the Democratic party. Sure they are not responsible for Covid 19 but they and their propaganda partners seem to have been doing everything in their power to both worsen the impact of the pandemic and leverage it in the most cynical callous and partisan ways imaginable to strive for their parties power or their own personal power. I guess if he had twooted about the Democrats being lying thieving scheming scum bags I could get on board with that. But just a generic they Doesn't really make sense to me. Just sounds like childish anarchism. WTF is your solution Matt Walsh
gt I just think we need Americans to take up jobs and stop complaining about foreigners coming to take our jobs. yeah but until this point immigrants would fill in this employment void. gt stop complaining about foreigners coming to take our jobs. yeah that's never going to happen I feel
Donald Trump should've seen the future and announced himself as temporary dictator Roman Repiblic style to combat the china virus in January. Lol We acted in a reasonable time. Shutting down nation is insanely costly and acting unnecessarily is devastating experienced now by millions out of work. Is it perfect No but that is quite impossible. I'm pretty happy with the president's work on this so far. Also the reporter is a rotten man.
Don't worry he won't be doing anything until the election anyway. Forget impeachment it will all be over soon.
Very nice.
You either be quiet and watch soldiers die or you speak up and flush your career.
91 of abortions happen before 13 weeks babies only become sentient after like 24 weeks.
Lawn Darts 2020 everybody get in their plastic bubble. First one to get their bubble popped loses and possibly gets the virus. Fun for the whole family
I would disagree. The mission has changed. The US military is more about asymmetrical warfare now. You still need the old school MAD crap but the focus is more on other things now. They have to balance the two. The problem is one makes corporations billions and the other costs money and lives.
Right wing conservative How are you now Feel any better Anyone want join lawsuit
I am aware of my ideology and what conservatism is. I am also aware that nationalizing industry is not a conservative ideal.
Into democrats Want probe description Senators change. Stockpile.
And is Obama cruel No if you're a black Democrat you can literally run concentration camps on the southern border' and still be considered a good president.. God if Obama was a woman she'd be able to kill half the people at random and these radical leftists would still defend him.
Source
Liberals love to shit all over the rest of the nation outside of liberal megacities calling it flyover country bereft of any culture education arts or sophistication. Sorry but I'm not going to shed a tear over their struggling with those virus while us deplorables in flyover country are seeing few problems or deaths.
You keep bringing up laziness no one said Amricans are lazy in fact we have the most hard working people for the lowest of wages. People in most countries don't even start a job until they're in their late teens. 12k for 4 months is 3k a month. Yes might be before taxes but that is still mroe than double above minimum wage. I understand not wanting to settle but beggars can't be choosers.
I did it when I lived in Arkansas. Is that close enough for your gatekeeping accusation Besides I m not saying biking to work is a great option for most people. But it s not that preposterous to some.
User claims elsewhere on reddit to be in his 30's
I don't think a lot of that is true but at least he wouldn't have let people die for his own ego. I'm sorry your preferred candidate didn't win mine didn't either. Such is life but now it's time to move on.
How is the right to defend one's life and property not universal
I'm guessing they choose not to remember who started the American and later UN intervention in Somalia.
I know what communism is. I ve read the gulag archipelago enough to know it s evils.
Fuck you trump
I prefer the good ol fashioned have a rich dad and pretend you worked for it method
Joe Biden's dementia would keep him from so much as answering a single sentence.
Jesus fuck look at this fanfiction writing going on now. Like legit this is hilarious the level of additional information you're pulling out of your ass to try and make his lie work And no that would cause more damage as it's now prolonged dehydration. Also fyi dude was not vomitting wasn't shitting his guts out and wasn't visibly sweating. He legit continued to live stream and host interviews during this time
Peer reviewed Link
Yes
In fact you elect them into the highest office
Can you imagine what kind of a clusterfuck we d be in if this hit while Rauner were still governor
gt That party needs to be thoroughly punished this fall They needed to be thoroughly punished after Kavanaugh but ended up sweeping the house. So forgive me if I hold my breath.
Ah but you see conservatives are simply xenophobic so the discussion is only about racism. Also we should totally give all our ventilators and UBI to anyone who comes into the country and pay for all of Mexico and South America's medical needs by deleting the military. There's totally enough money for that and it WILL NOT create a labor surplus bigots.
Not just support him. Refuse to do your job and break the law for him
Americans who haven't provided their direct deposit information to the IRS will likely face a longer wait with paper checks slated to start being issued the week of May 4 according to the memo. The paper checks will be issued at a rate of about 5 million per week which means it could take up to 20 weeks to get all the checks out. That timeline would delay some checks until the week of Aug. 17.
I can t fucking believe this is real life. When the fuck is this shit show of a reality tv going to end. I m more mad at the absolute fucktards who not only agree with trump and his stupid fucking policies but PRAISE them.
gt You want a single election to fix all of our problems and you re right that is impossible. This is well said and a vital point to be recognize. Our current garbage fire of a governmental system didn't happen overnight it's been slowly eroded through gerrymandered local elections that allowed them to control state governments then states have undermined elections through restricting the vote then with Congress in their control we've seen what they're capable of. But none of this happened overnight
This sub seems to have quite a crush on AOC.
gt they'll just politely correct you That's good. But there ARE trans people who get VERY offended at misgendering.
Not sure why you're saying it's impossible. My walking weight is 170 and I've dropped to to 155 several times within few days when I've gotten really ill from stomach flu. Barely ate and all I could eat was porridge while downing Gatorade and sleeping. For someone that's 230 that's really nothing.
Is has tremendous tremendous promise substantially different from has promise
Also another term I've heard when people go to nursing homes and senior centers to act as such is Granny Farming
the Odyssey stars Odysseus whose name is similar to the title. he is different from Oedipus who unlike Odysseus killed his father. but ivanka hasn't reread that one in a long time.
Not before December 10 last year when this article came out We've gone back in time
Oh we have football. We just don't waste time with a fourth down...
Except major reactions started during impeachment while the Democrats were still playing around. You can't say you don't want to play the blame game and then place blame based on myths you believe.
Please thats not Jared's it's Donald's
My favorite part was how nasty his tone was when he said it
Where are the bathrooms Break rooms Any sick days Protective equipment McDonald's pays less but if you hurt your back you have a recourse and a clean place to take a shit if need be. Farmers are use to employing slaves for this work.
Oh it is very sweet to use their own logic against them
He s a retard
Exceptionally so. Also Happy Cake Day.
the other half is selling the fetuses. Literally evil.
I m sure the person I m responding to doesn t care. But for anyone who cares for truth. The nothing will fundamentally change quote was from him speaking to a group of wealthy people telling them that due to income inequality they will have to pay more in taxes. But that they can afford it for them they have enough to give more so nothing will fundamentally change.
That s pretty much exactly what everyone on here is saying.
I would normally say the latter but for all his faults Romney seems to follow his heart due to his religious beliefs. I don t agree with his religious beliefs but I respect them.
QAnon for liberals my guy.
Seems like that's always been the case. At least for the past 20 years
Wealth is all relative. How many of us rage about inequality yet can t look a homeless person in the eye
Nah... He's just a time tested liar. He knows what he's doing he just doesn't care
gt The White House instead rejected the prospect of allowing new sign ups across the 38 Affordable Care Act marketplaces it controls a decision that shocked the health care industry triggered widespread criticism and prompted a scramble within the administration to find a new way to care for the growing population left exposed to the pandemic. gt You have a perfectly good answer in front of you and instead you re going to make another one up said one Republican close to the administration. It s purely ideological. gt That declaration surprised even some officials in the Health and Human Services Department who believed the concept was still under consideration. And amid a crush of criticism from Democrats led by 2020 front runner Joe Biden it worried officials who viewed the verdict as an unforced error in the middle of a historic pandemic. gt It s a bad decision optics wise one administration official said in the immediate aftermath. It politicizes people s access to health services during a serious national health emergency. gt Health insurers that would be on the hook for covering the new population including the Blue Cross Blue Shield Association had also thrown their vocal support behind the idea. gt A Special Enrollment Period would offer much needed coverage to millions of Americans and mitigate the potential impact on providers and hospitals which will be forced to rely on emergency funding the Association of Community Health Plans wrote in a March letter to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Administrator Seema Verma. gt The move made sense to many in both the industry and Trump s own administration because Americans who lose their health insurance as a result of losing their job are already eligible to sign up for Obamacare outside of the traditional month long enrollment period. With the coronavirus pandemic straining hospitals and the administration s projections growing increasingly dire health officials began signaling to insurers that it was preparing to give the broader pool of uninsured Americans a fresh shot at getting coverage three people with knowledge of the discussions said. gt If Trump had chosen instead to reopen the HealthCare.gov website as 11 largely blue states that control their own markets have already done people without insurance could buy more comprehensive policies that not only would cover coronavirus but any follow up treatment mental health care and future check ups. gt The White House decision also caught the hospital industry off guard frustrating executives who spent the past week awaiting guidance for how strained front line facilities could access the new funding.
Easy If you backdate the negative adjustment it was always empty
Yes lets blame people for their mental conditions that are sometimes out of their control...
It was just a joke to highlight how far fetched they had become lol
The press release by SECNAV says that COMPACFLT 4 Star read the letter prior to being released. He asked essentially the highest person in his direct chain of command and was ignored. So he leaked it
A really smart person would be like they ask for 30k we are gonna aim for 35k because we know there will be unforeseen circumstances with this disease.' It really says nothing but it also doesn't assume anything.
No animosity towards you Mr. Windu just take care of yourself and ready yourself for a total lack of emergency services.
Ahem. foreignpolicy.com
Lol what Did you even pay attention to any of the impeachment proceedings
Remember when journalism was about not trying to stir an agenda and report the news as necessarily fit Pepperidge Farm remembers...
I've been hoping for a long time that she runs for President. I hope even more that's what she's gearing up for. If not I still have hope that Trump will identify as a female on his last day in office just to see the leftist heads explode since according to their own rhetoric he would take the title of first female president.
Arrr
A lot of people call it Wuhan Flu... are you new to Conservative or just trolling P Where did it start from sciencedaily.com I mean science seems to be onboard with it's origins... and how it has a genome sequencing 99 identical to a pangolin. eforum.org Once again Science seems to be very close to 100 on these topics. Or wait are you having problems with things being named other things also Is it COVID 19 or the novel SARS CoV 2 or maybe the Wuhan coronavirus... npr.org NPR even called it Wuhan Coronavirus and then changed the name of the title back in February to help confused idiots like you out I'm guessing. How about ASFV Do you know what that is Google that... How about MERS CoV Or maybe Mers Coronavirus Do you know what that is by chance How about SARS Cov or SARS Cov1 I wonder if you know what other names are for those Are you really trying to beat around the bush and come up with the concept that now... just now... you want it to be called something else because of no real outside influence like the news telling you it's racist and that it should be called this other name... even though you know there are names for other Coronavirus' historically But this is... this is where you draw the line eh
Meanwhile McConnell We're not passing any new legislation let's all just wait and see what happens now that we got our trillion dollar corporate slush fund.
Lol i see this shit all the time. People whining that no one wants to do this or that. No once wages become competitive again and the owners realize you can t pay people minimum wages to slave away in a field surprise Americans will pour in. In Phoenix for example a guy I know owns a construction company and has paid Mexicans for 10 years to do 75 of his work for pay that no American will do. Well it s gotten harder for him recently and he complains about Americans not wanting to work all the time until you realize he wants to pay people 10 12 dollars an hour. Most America will not work construction in Phoenix for less than 18 22 depending on what they do because otherwise fuck just work somewhere with no responsibility and get paid 12 16. This Americans don t want to do this or that while importing cheap labor is what is driving down wages.
I like how one leftist person says this and how everyone then went on to make sweeping and stupid statements about everyone on the left. Maybe they re average people with different values that genuinely want what s best but don t share your idea of what that is of perhaps they have an idea that despite their intentions would backfire. Perhaps we all have such ideas and perhaps you ll find that some of their ideas are actually better than yours. And perhaps it s not really in anyone s interest to point to the most extreme examples of the other side paint the entire side out to be just like that one example and then make absolutely no effort to try to understand their point of view or ideas and instead dismiss them outright as idiots out to destroy the country. This guy is an idiot sure. But how can you read something like this disdain it for what it is and then turn around and basically pull the same stupid shit. Get it together.
Which is already happening from what I gather...
But you commented in response to Civil societies don t need weapons of war inside their borders. I m a progressive who thinks that we have the ability to make smarter regulations. It feels like making any attempt to rework gun regulations that isn t straight up cutting regulations is painted as trying to take our guns.
You mean Republicans don t drink fish tank cleaner just because the President mentioned a chemical it contains in it What s next this woman is indicted for murdering her husband
Remove him Get real. I'd settle for Pence reducing the frequency with which he pays homage to President Trump.
This is the 3 5th different time this related topic was upvoted today. The posters are just farming gold and votes. There are problems with the admin. But this is just 4 3 topic. You will see 4 4 topic tomorrow 5 different times.
This is the stupidest thing I've ever read. And this sub posts everything Donald Trump says. Liberals dont want to take your guns and the fact that you think so is so short sighted a worse fear mongering than anything. It's used for the NRA to increase gun sales. I have a conceal carry permit. All my guns are locked. I'm the only one that knows the combination. I've been hunting since I was 4 fucking years old. I support the democrats because society moving forward is good for everyone. Instead you get fearful bigoted hateful people like yourself. Most who proclaim to be devout Christians.
Reminiscent of the ISS Indianapolis
It's fine if usa didnt spend so much on military each year. But somehow that is fine
Needs updating
There used to be but Republicans drowned it in the bathtub.
Pneumonia only develops when things get bad. It starts with inflammation and if he had pneumonia he would be coughing.
What did trump miss an opportunity to lay up a bigger grift for the billionaires
if you just throw the medicines out there without proper testing it will no doubt kill many more people than it could potentially save. So that defeats the purpose. You grossly underestimate how complicated and involved the process of perfected a vaccine is.
yeah I seem to have missed the part where Mike Pence was replaced by Kushner...
To be fair the argument against the existence of climate change is wildly ridiculous at this point. It's like arguing against the fact that the sky is blue. I think most people just ignore anti climate change arguments for the same reason people ignore flat Earthers and other crackpot conspiracy theories. It's not worth the intellectual engagement when someone is denying reality. The only real argument you can make on climate change is what the end result of everything will be and nobody knows the answer to that. But directly influencing the chemical make up of the atmosphere is going to cause change period. There's no arguing that.
OrAnGe MaN bAd Very fresh take
Bernie sucks and lost accordingly Bend the knee
I like it but if Hawaii ever gets free of the US I can t see them ever willingly coming back.
This is actually false Illegal immigrants pay a ton in taxes while not getting access to medicare and social security They contribute literally billions of unclaimed tax dollars itep.org We should be on the side of facts
Maybe if we get a large enough group together...
Why is this relevant Do you have actual definitive proof Maybe you can find what the dems and millions of dollars spent on an investigation but couldnt....I ll wait.
I actually have had a job since I was 16 as my parents wouldn t let me have a car without one. And do you even understand what journalism school entails Mostly I just learn how to do audio video copy editing interviewing. I ve never done anything political in my work as a student simply because there isn t anyone political to interview in my college town. Try again on an insult
The United States is supposed to pay WHO 50 million USD this year. China is supposed to pay almost 30 million making them the second largest contributor. WHO cannot survive without either the US or China but since they chose to support China during this time the US needs to pull its funding.
Apparently this is easier than just saying I misspoke They also changed a few other things regarding the stockpile definition. Are they aware of the fact that 10 seconds after he said it there were a million tweets with links to the website so everyone could see his fuckup Are they aware of the fact that they are living in 2020 and when you try to alter something to cover your ass it's not gonna work because half the country has already seen it They are behaving like they think it's the same as shredding a document at 3am in a secret office somewhere. That should take care of it. They'll never know
Can confirm. The number of Democratic Party voter ID cards I ve seen in the last 3 weeks because they haven t updated their driver s license to their current address and we need supplemental documentation is really through the roof. The sad thing is almost none of them care about securing or cleaning their guns. I ll just take the gun and some bullets. No I don t need a cleaning kit a lockbox to keep my kids out or any kind of range time or training I m genuinely looking forward to explaining the return policy on guns and ammo in two months. No you cannot return it but I ll buy it back as a used weapon. No refunds on ammo. The used market will be flooded with cheap unfired home defense shotguns entry level AR s and Brazilian 9mm s by the 4th of July.
It also makes the dubious and unsubstantiated assumption that 50 75 of illegal aliens have stolen SS numbers and pay income tax.
I actually consider myself pretty liberal but losing what little faith I had left in humanity. Politics in the US are so polarized now it seems like there s no going back. People are living in two different realities based on the things they want to believe and it seems like the actual real world gets lost in the confusion. Truth doesn t really matter as long as it fits your viewpoint.
The USA did the same to Germany yesterday
Buddhism has the concept of four genders and had been around for over two thousand years which I suppose many transgenderism a conservative idea there
I was really bummed about not getting into the Army for Medical reasons but whenever I hear stories like this I realize I dodged a bullet. Now I m interviewing at a police job that pays 4 times what I would have made in the military.
I think minimum wage should be set at the state or county level and should be somehow tied to standard of living. What do I know I am no expert but I think part of the reason the minimum wage hasn't moved is because it's such an irrational concept. Same minimum wage for NYC as rural Montana That just doesn't make sense.
Surprise surprise. I sure hope the people behind these predictions enjoyed all the hysteria charts like those caused and are still causing.
Tucker is really doing good work.
I'm sorry your race card was denied do you have another form of argument
Please don't try to imply a sociopathic disregard for human life. It's a very condescending way of shutting down dissent. Every death is obviously a tragedy. But why does the media use the words death toll for coronavirus and not for other fatal phenomena That word choice is part of a narrative. Yes the media any kind of media has a story that it wishes to tell. Sometimes that story is we need safer roads Sometimes that story is we all need to be under house arrest
Kavanaugh supporters now dont care that accusations are old and without proof. They also now dont care about due process granted neither kavanaugh or Biden are or were on trial but yea the left and the right are both full of the exact same kind of partisan jackasses.
Projections for complex phenomena are useless.
Because they never made the recommendation and this is a separate department with a separate budget.
Not surprised from people that hate who you are and not your ideas.
He s carrying out petty grievances as Americans lie stacked in refrigerated trucks in a largely preventable pandemic.
By not politically agreeing with people like you on the left I ve got hate mail assuming my sex and gender. As if anyone gets to pick. Racism and sexism as used as casual cudgels by your ideological brethren. It s absurd you don t see it.
gt the next election Oh you sweet sweet child
Plus claiming 9 exemptions so they withhold nothing
Tell me again how that's working out for Spain Right. pops collar Now stop stepping on my dick
Fuck Breitbart. No click. Down vote.
God forbid politicians in the same party actually work together.
Exactly. We need to hold everyone accountable if we need to get better and stronger. Every person who's lied and cheated needs to be held accountable if we care about our country. Especially people who lie through their teeth like Trump. All Democrats and Republican politicians need to be held accountable and need to answer the people. Right now first amendment seems to be dying in favor of the second.
Obviously there are times where governments are justified in restricting basic human rights. Immigration control also restricts freedom of movement but most conservatives agree that s an appropriate application of government power. So the concept that a government cannot restrict any right at any time is absolutely false. This discussion is more about finding where the line should be.
not at this rate. Maybe never again if the Republicans get their way
Not to mention corona is devastating Russia. They re not releasing actual numbers but inside sources are saying that it s pandemonium.
Haters will tell them to stay at home
Appreciate that friend. Keep your border closed until it's safe. I was in the middle of planning two short trips over the border this summer because I haven't had the chance to visit Canada since I was a kid. The bigger trip was to Toronto to watch the Blue Jays play a home game over the 4th of July because what's more American than that My dad and I are planning on checking out as many ball parks as possible as neither of us are huge fans but we love the sport and it's nostalgic bonding. I need you guys to keep your borders safe for as long as necessary to keep Canadians safe. I need you to that because I am doing everything I can to keep my parents safe so when it is safe we can make that trip. It was devastating to get my new passport back with an issue date of 3 13 20. It was like a slap in the face that I'm just stuck here with the world burning.
let them eat hamberders we have the best hamberders not cake some wa.. hamberders. I remember Ivanka when I took her out on a date the best date she didn't eat cake she only wanted a hamberders.. s Some crazy verbal diarrhea like that... SMH honestly the state of things
Held accountable for being accused of something I accuse you of raping me. You need to be held accountable. The point here is the media and other mouthpieces for the left scream that we need to believe all women in these cases. Where are they now that one of their own is being accused Listen I'm not saying I believe this woman any more than I did Blasey Ford. Biden the same as Kavanaugh the same as any of us is innocent until proven guilty. The outrage here is that this is blatent hypocrisy by the media.
Why are you on here
Hi michkennedy Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u michkennedy amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
Higher. First election was a fluke we hope.
Guess I m just making up for all the chest beating Americans on r news stories about the UK hurr durr look at all the stupid Brits killing and harming each other with acid and suicide attacks
i think that all media should be allowed to publish accurate data. i don t even need a verdict from a judge if they did they did. i know fox news has done ungodly amounts of questionable shit.
gt San Fran in a few years if they don t get their act straight. San Fran is filled with tech workers who can work from home and has some of the lowest transmission rates in the country because they were one of the firsts on lockdown. SF is gonna be fine.
gt If enough people get the survivable with treatment version What makes you think that to survive you would need hospitalization. People get sick everyday from various ailments and need zero hospitalization
Or they need guns to take yours
Requiring an ID can.
Nancy could easily ask the House to vote for her for President.... I honestly don't see that happening.
Yikes.
I didn't see anyone mocking him for it My girlfriend has Lupus and takes it every day so about 2 weeks before the president said it the internet started talking about studies of chloroquine and then hydroxychloroquine I was telling my gf to be glad she's on it because it seems like a good contender. But she has to get labs done every 3 months and an eye exam every year because the side effects are irriversable blindness and organ damage failure. We picked up her refill the day after his announcement and the pharmacist said ah finally a legitimate case and said he'd been fielding calls all day from doctors of important people' trying to get them to write a script for their secretaries just in case' while we hadn't even had one case in the county yet. While I had been following the developments and hoping it would work it's a serious drug with deadly side effects and I think the effeciacy should have been tested for Covid before announcing to the world that it was the wonder drug. It would have also been nice if he had contacted producers before to make sure there would be enough. If my gf had refilled one day later she would have been fucked. Time will tell if she can fill her script this next month.
Your math is fking despicable. Reread the last line where I compared 10 20 mil homeless to 10 20 mill dead. That s 1 for 1. How bout u talk about deaths not being so bad after your wife mom brother dies
Fuck this kid.
They basically need to settle for the truth now. politics.theonion.com
You think that s an accurate representation of the American people Keep downvoting boys. I know different opinions hurt your feelings.
Probably a bad idea because then no one word work and we would run out of tax dollars to distribute real quick.
I mean the strict adherence to a set of rules not the leaning. Sorry.
What are his credentials exactly
What the fuck Things don't make sense at all anymore.
From the article gt The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation announced fdic.gov late Friday the closing of the First State Bank based in Barboursville West Virginia. According to the FDIC announcement The First State Bank has experienced longstanding capital and asset quality issues operating with financial difficulties since 2015. Bank has been having issues since 2015. Good riddance.
But politics is a mixture of opinion and news. That's a daft idea.
Dude praegeru is not a conspiracy theory organization. And if you can point me to an example otherwise I'd be happy to see it.
Exactly Why should he spend any political capital helping some people who will continue to vote for him regardless of how much he ignores them or fucks them over Better to be fucked over by GodKing Trump than helped by a librul
Why do they need to sacrifice Some jobs are still active some aren't When we go to war we don't expect congressmen to go fight on the front lines why is it suddenly different here do you really expect them to just stop getting paid because other people aren't getting paid now And no Congress did not give itself a raise with the relief bill this isn't that hard to fact check.
Everybody's got problems bud You were the one talking about a plan pardon me a f king plan that the government needs to do during this pandemic. I don't get how you're the one turning this around on me since you seemed more concerned about the TWO TRILLION DOLLARS since you like capslock. I said we would rebound because I've actually lived through rebounding quite a few times. It's called empathy because like you I went from having this all setup and then it all vanished in the space of a week for me and had to start over. I know it's difficult for you to understand this since you're looking to the government for a fucking plan to solve YOUR problems... but sure turn it around on me even though we've been in the same boat. Whiny bitch.
Pretty typical of the Democrats I see in the wild. They are truly hateful bigots.
you are a cunt
Please note that Sweden has a population of 10 million and is still quite homogeneous. Not exactly a good comparative.
I feel bad for Osteen. I hear he needs a 4th private jet. His stupid flock want him to have it too.
Social distancing and cancellations should have taken place sooner. Compared to South Korea who stemmed the virus in nearly 2 months. Likely this would ve happened but it s also likely that people would understand. There s no way for us to know for sure but sooner action would have helped the almost million infected.
This was an F5 Friday It's been a while didn't even recognize it.
Who are you
Happy wife happy life extends to the color of the bed sheets and car not putting your kids lives in danger. I say that as a happy wife. What a pair of idiots her for believing that crap and him for allowing it to be inflicted on their defenseless children.
en.m.wikipedia.org Wtf lol. You guys just making shit up Losing 10 of the water in your body cause severe mental deterioration losing 15 20 will fucking kill you.
The driving principle of trade is that exchange of goods and services is not zero sum. Both the US and Canada should benefit from trading what with each other what they have in abundance for what they do not if one has the infrastructure for harvesting raw materials and the other has the infrastructure for producing finished goods then they both benefit by trading raw materials for finished goods. No one will benefit from isolationism. We need to work towards a cooperative and mutually benefical relationship. If that means ceasing trade to demonstrate that it is mutually destructive that is fine but ultimate goal should be maintaining and improving the US Canadian relationship.
Rat faced fink.
I agree
First off I hope you re well. He s not actually socialist though there would still be plenty of capitalism taking place. What kind of small business do you own Wouldn t it help your business to not be paying part of your employees insurance premiums Or if you can t currently afford to offer insurance to them wouldn t you prefer having employees that do have insurance I m pretty certain that Bernie s plans would definitely help the middle class.
What
That slimy whore knows every way to make money from the deaths of her constituents. Can't you Georgians die faster so this parasitic hog can feast on your families
Not until National Voter ID is implemented. As is done in countries as rich and advanced as India.
Compared to Trump have you been paying attention His stupidity and ego have been killing people for three plus years and now it s going to be not just people you don t give a shit about.
Didn't they vote for Trump
It s also shortsighted and unethical if true. They just keep crying wolf and their credibility is declining.
It's Alabama they'll blame Obama and vote for trump again.
Is she the anti bullying chairwoman of this task force I swear when she reads the room she comes in with the absolute worst response to the situation.
And I'm OK with this except for the fact that they now act like they didn't do this. And the media being the scum they are focus solely on Trump yet completely ignore what Pelosi and even Dr. Fauci said early on. Nothing about the media is fare. They are dirtbags
gt well we have more people in total so having more people die in total is ok and expected. But it would be expected. Why are you arguing it wouldn't be This has to rank in the top 10 dumbest conversations I've had to have on Reddit.
r lostredditors
Do you realize how many carriers we have What is Iran s strike capability since you re an expert Could they have reached a ship near Guam Unless the ship was put into a Rivercity condition as soon as the first case was found out about the crew had already told there families the outbreak was on the ship which got posted to Facebook for the world to see. Yes leaking information is a serious issue... but a Captain of an Aircraft Carrier knows what he s doing and would use proper discretion on openly discussing it. Conservatives used to be pro military. Lord forbid one pushes back on DJT.
You more whats crazy. The first comment articulates something i understand and could agree with. But that totally different from what Kushner said on Thursday. Like a random reddit comment is more refined then your speech to the american people during a historic crisis.
It's good to see the confidence places in Joe when people are already making excuses for him losing. He never had a shot against Joe Trump.
If I'm not sick or I'm taking steps to keep from spreading it to them I'm not endangering anyone. gt You don t have that right. Period. I have the right to free association and travel. Period.
Just train them yeah that s gonna work. You can t just take people who have never done manual labor in their lives and just train them to build a bridge roadways or major infrastructure projects. Those large scale projects done by people during the Great Depression and after world wars had experience going manual labor. They worked with their hands they had factory experience they were farmers laborers. They weren t the 25 year old barista that makes expensive coffee. Being a laborer is a skill not just one can pick it up go do electric work plumbing construction operate heavy machinery etc.
There had to be a better looking hooker in Slovenia.
lmao the hate florida gets...a beautiful state struggling with the onslaught of snowbirds and methgators
The data is also heavily cherry picked and the author lied when he said he picked the top 10. In the actual top 10 in the source data it s 5 10. Also the data was as of 3 23
I really truly hope such a win will have coat tails that sweep Pelosi out of her Speakership along with Adam Schitt Gerry Nadless and Maxine Waters from their committee chairs
Hah
gt gotta love the brigading going on. There's been a TON of that lately. It's amazing...if you check the comment histories of 90 of the fear mongers in here lately they never showed up on this sub until the Wu Tang Flu started. I can't help but feel we're being manipulated in an extremely dark manner.
Seriously feels like I'm in some kind of bizarro world. You have Republicans literally guilty of insider trading but Pelosi should be removed WTF
Would you personally be willing to die a horrific painful death testing a random drug if there was a very very slim chance that it might save other people in the future Throwing shit at the wall has a very real human cost. Even medicines that get all the way to human trials in a normal drug testing climate sometimes end up with side effects such as organ failure or death. It s important to act quickly to combat Covid19 but we can t let the cure literally be worse than the disease.
Like Whac A Mole
California does have mail in ballots. Been here two years and I have no clue where to vote in person.
Much much worse. The earlier you have the shut down the shorter it will be because you could manage the virus in a way where the health care system can cope. The virus is insanely infectious if you do nothing eventually people will be dying on the streets. Then people will be forced to stay at home anyway because well they don't want to die. There's already 280k infected so the cat is largely already out of the bag but if the US doesn't take real action soon it would be much much worst.
South Pole research station worker. I d also accept ISS astronaut.
Well you will have to wait a while. We have closed our borders.
Yet my water in Tucson here in a literal desert is cheap clean and abundant. Conservation efforts may start getting more strict but I don t see a war happening when we can just build desalination plants. Right now if I want to have a lush green lawn I can which is dumb. Just FYI almost nobody in southern Arizona has a lawn but some do. I hear it s a big problem in Vegas though.
Fuckin hell get this jabroni out of here
I understand and I m not saying you have to go out and do the same thing I m doing. I consent to the risk. No one who doesn t consent should do what I m doing.
Yeah they can still carry it it doesn t just make you immune so that s where you are wrong relapses and others occur and you can carry not just by your body but your things
Is it depressing though
Remember not even all of us.
They're just the worst. Always like Wah wah my constituents are dying They've got blood coming out of wherever.
Consider yourself lucky.
Nothing YOU say is credible
Yea and the senate and president is just gonna do w e Dems want right
HURRR DUH DURRRRR. that's all I got out of that tweet she made.
All these articles make me wonder if WWIII is still a possibility.
gt but another part feels maybe it best to let everyone except the elderly out and let us either a develop antibodies for it or b die I guess In my opinion if YOU are worried about getting sick or spreading it YOU should be the one to take responsibility for YOURself and stay home. Are you immunocompromised kinda like my mom or old or severely asthmatic and don't want to risk getting it You stay home. Order your groceries online find someone you trust to be clean go get them for you go get them yourself while wearing a mask homemade or otherwise It's not much different than what you're already doing. Let the rest of us who are healthy or apparently so go about our lives and run our businesses. It's not essential until it's your place that goes under. That's kinda my two cents on it. Before you jump all over me my state has yet to put a stay at home order I've been working from home and I've not been going out except for groceries to see my non elderly parents and walking around the neighborhood and I'm not the only one doing that
While obviously more urgently dire things are going on right now there is not a lot we can do about that but stay home. These cases have been going since well before the pandemic started and girls are waiting for rulings to give them back their records that were shattered by biological boys. Reading and caring about other things right now is not bad. We are stuck inside we can't consume only covid related media or we will go insane.
I miss Jarts. Stand in a circle throw one straight up and last guy who doesn't move wins. Or goes to the hospital.
why does that change any of the extremely irresponsible things he has done he promised to build a wall and make mexico pay for it for truth s sake.
Do people realize that this is happening to everyone in the world Mayors from small towns in southern Europe have said on camera that they were waiting shipments only to find out that the US came forward and redirected them.
Trump should be Saul Goodman s dad in Better Call Saul
Or... could it be that he wants Americans back to work because Americans like earning a living and keeping their homes and businesses Maybe Not much good being alive if you lose everything and can t take care of your family.
We don't really have any choice now do we. It's Biden or trump
it is a bouillon cube. we'll need an atom smasher before this can continue.
Anti intellectualism and the rejection of science as the source of truth.
You can't answer a direct question You fascists never can answer a direct question about their political leanings. Yours was obviously rhetorical so I ignored it. I guess mine was too.
Bc it was not a real question
Wtf is Trump even doing... why Just why People are dying and he s having a full on feet stomping face scrunched crying toddler tantrum saying no You can t have thyat Thyats mines Someone please explain this absurdity to me.
Trump fired the Inspector General for Intelligence Services today. This is the guy that told Congress about the whistleblower which led to Trump s impeachment. Trump expects professional civil servants to serve him and rather than to do their job and serve the public.
Sounds like bullshit
And the New York Times reported this They're infiltrated as hell
Nah they re all in their bunkers
You can't because it's not true
Yes but mine was spelled corretly for my meaning despite it not being a word.
Hello Reddit guard thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Reddit guard amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. amp.theguardian.com context 10000
Neat sarcasm I truly laughed out loud. This is way to accurate of what the cult sounds like. Good one.
Why happened to the narrative from the left that these corporations are indebted to the country they reside and therefore the infrastructure they utilize You didn t build that Obama 2012
And I can tell when I'm talking to people who have no idea what they're talking about and can't source anything. Don't let the door hit you on the way out thanks.
I'm pretty sure I got covid19 a few months ago. For me it was fucked up digestive issues for three weeks. Literally everything went through me and it made me exhausted. Next my lower back felt beyond sore. I lift and know what a sore back feels like. This was at another level however. Other than that it feels like a combo of a bad flu and cold. I took a hot bath twice a day because the shivering was actually pretty awful. I'm no fan of Cuomo but he very well may have went through what he is saying. Edit my fiance got it after I had already had it for a week. For her the worst part was her breathing. She felt crackling in her lungs and had a wicked dry cough. Shes tougher than me as far as sickness goes and it knocked her on her ass as well.
I fucking hate NYC. It's not my cup of tea at all. But I appreciate your humility. Thank you Rare sight nowadays.
Hard to vote in an election that is canceled because someone let a virus get out of hand.
He has stepped in everything gradually. First a suggestion then to part of the state then to the rest of the state. He hasn't stopped yet. If he continues his pattern then this will become mandatory some time in the future. Due to his pattern I asked a legitimate question. I did not discuss resistance. There is nothing wrong with asking if it would be legal.
Capitalism is libertarianism for companies. They can do whatever they want and the government won t do a thing.
This is the response upworthy.com
Trump has a death wish Cananda will send one mountie and america will shut down
I meant Franklin as an individual had money power respect and was able to chase all his interests he only turned onto abolitionism after he had milked being a slaver to become one of the most successful persons of his time it's like Bill Gates' vanity projects later in life after becoming the richest person in the world being cutthroat piece of shit.
When the truth offends we lie and lie until we can no longer remember it is even there but it is still there. Every lie we tell incurs a debt to the truth. Sooner or later that debt is paid.
Only I can fix it That one statement alone should set off alarm bells about this narcissistic moron This dumb idiot and his equally dumb family members are leading the U. S down a path to disaster. When a nation is confronted with the possible imminent death of a quarter of a million of its citizens but its vindictive leader is obsessed with extracting revenge on a civil servant the intelligence inspector general for following the rules and doing his job then that nation is facing a Hitler like threat to its freedoms. As a leader Donald Trump is incapable of leading a troop of girl guides on a cookie drive around your local neighboured but he has been thrust into the role of leading the nation through its worst crisis since 1861. His incompetence and ineptness has become immediately obvious. He is reduced to making ridiculous claims rewriting history contradicting his own recorded statements and blaming everyone else for his own inabilities and shortcomings The time has come to examine if it is possible for the country to survive this catastrophe with this clown at the helm. One month ago fifteen deaths was to become zero in a couple of days now its in excess of seven thousand How many more have to die on Trump s self adoration altar before even his most ardent supporters finally realize he is nothing but a flim flan man
Gotta fire him while everyone's distracted by how bad he's handling a pandemic
Stop trying to normalize the worst president in the fucking history of our nation. He started by openly making disgusting remarks calling minorities criminals and joking around about grabbing her by the pussy But fine freedom of speech even if it is fucked. He proceeded to drain the swamp by instilling the most corruption we have ever fucking seen in our nation's history. He literally said I could stand in the middle of Fifth Avenue and shoot somebody okay and I wouldn't lose any voters okay And you know what he's 100 right. He has proven that he can absolutely shit on whoever or whatever he wants and he'll be backed no matter what. He went through years of incompetency but it was still fine by a lot of people. And now when a legitimate crisis hits he absolutely shits the bed. He spent the time we could have been proactively preparing for it by undercutting its severity and calling it a fucking hoax. Once he realized it wasn't he tried to cover up the numbers literally insisting that a cruise ship doesn't dock because he liked the numbers. He proceeded to finally accept it was a legitimate problem when it was far too late and then lied and patted himself on the back for acting as quickly as possible. Once he realized that wasn't favorable he started blatantly lying about opening up by easter once again undercutting the severity of all of this then worked on a stimulus bill that he himself isn't abiding by. And we are overreacting for thinking he's a fucking shit stain of a president that's quickly fucking over this country It doesn't take anyone of even average intelligence to realize what a fucking moron and danger he is to democracy let alone a political scientist. Clearly you aren't even the former if you think any of this is an overreaction.
I disagree with Trump on this. I d like to see online voting and voting by mail become the norm. It s 2020. It seems faintly ridiculous that in the richest country in the world you have to go to an elementary school and stand in line for two hours to vote. The notion that it can t be done seems like a defeatist attitude.
Buckle up buttercup
I get downvoted here for anything that's not blindly toting the party line. Same as when I post on r politics and don't fall in line there. It's annoying but whatever. Not much room in the middle these days everything has to be with us or against us.
So the exact study you are talking about from Princeton has not been reviewed let alone repeated. Yet you want to base our public health policy on that study alone They used a machine to aerosolize the particles containing the virus. That is not the same process as an infected person talking or even coughing. It's literally a machine designed to be as efficient as possible at aerosolizing particles. It's not a human respiratory tract. This is like saying that because a drug works on rats it would work on humans. As for my previous point the environment they used was totally different than real life conditions. They sprayed the virus containing aerosol into a Goldberg drum which is a sealed environment with no air flow. As I pointed out literally any building with any ventilation will disperse the particles. In the study they used an environment where the virus could not be dispersed. You see the problem there Just because something occurs in a lab doesn't make it likely or even possible under real world conditions. Maybe you have another study you want to cite Your flawed study in case anyone wants to check my work medrxiv.org medrxiv.org
Shhhhhh play along. These people hate it when you don't know who they are. She was never enough to be a has been.
They can t even accept that Trump didn t fire the pandemic team. reddit.com context 1
gt How old are you Legit how old are you 35. Trump voter. Actual conservative which means I'm more interested in peoples flourishing than the stock market. gt Do you have any comprehension of the way the fucking economy works Yeah. A bunch of layabouts trade fake paper in New York City and cry when the Big Line Go Down. Do we have a single less farm land tree oil barrel manufacturing plant or any other ACTUAL thing than we did before Or is it that a bunch of meaningless financial vehicles run by computers had a glitch gt This is Tyrone can t get a job or feed his family so he spirals into depression and blows his fucking brain out. America routinely pays people not to grow food. Have them grow that food and spend the money on giving it to tyrone. gt Martha goes hungry so she can feed her kids. Again creating excess food in the UNITED STATES is a hilariously non existent problem. gt Jane and John lose their fucking house. Put a moratorium on mortgages. Catch me crying if the bank has a quarter in the red. gt That s what this means you bon apatite idiot. Sounds like you didnt think it through you Line worshipping tard.
What a corrupt POS
I once went from 153lbs to 140lbs in 48 hours it was to make weight for wrestling. No food maybe a few ice cubes and a lot of running. It's possible. I fainted and couldn't even wrestle anyways because I was too weak. So it's possible.
Congress and Presidents have amended it at will meaning it has expanded in its scope and definition. Also meaning that they can seize a private business for just about any reason. Would you be okay if a democrat president seized oil companies under the threat of climate change
Ask white drivers who get pulled out of their cars in South Africa. Or hell just ask Reginald Denny here in the states.
Hi Pineapple Jews Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u Pineapple Jews amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
What the fuck does that even mean
Leave it to Trump to try and score points with his dimwit base during a global pandemic.
And you better not be wearing a tie.
Yep that's a Trump letter.
I understood that the Tzar didn t really want the job. He just wanted to live with no demands and spend time with his family. He made so many poor decisions that showed he was out of touch with his people.
The failures in his life started when his dad failed to pull out
Agreed with most of this yeah. The articles posted come from a variety of sources running the gamut from credible and well reasoned to American Thinker which often hosts absolute crackpots.
What the article doesn't state that there is a significant bureaucratic process to get on the ship and that there are 49 other ailments that can disqualify you from getting on board as well. It also jumps to the fake models conclusion as though there aren't hospitals begging for more room for COVID patients and the reports from doctors and nurses about there just being too many people.
At the rate this is going northern states are gonna have to put troops at the border with orders to shoot out the tires of any car with Florida or Georgia plates.
It's almost like running for President is about building the biggest coalition possible or something
An otherwise impossible alliance of money men and rubes.
How many thousands of lives did it cost
Panic accusations. Ridiculous bullshit the Globalists are stirring up.
Our Stockpile Kushner's Trump's Putin's and MBS's personal stockpile.
here is the newest article about this drug...shows promise and more hard core studies needed....unfortunately is the nyt so might be behind a paywall sometimes it opens under incognito or i just save it to pocket and read it from there. I would say read the article and better idea of what s going on with this drug... amp x200B nytimes.com nytimes.com
Cleaning up behind these liars must require it s own governmental department
No it's not for the virus. It's to prop up a John Wick hero fantasy of shooting another person in an act of deterrence or defending our country from King George's tyranny or something.
Those are the most heavily populated areas... by proportion it isn t as bad.
Everyone saying that state governments and it's the states not the feds doing this can't enforce quarantine needs to take a look at the 10th amendment. Also legal precedent states have done this before in previous epidemics especially the Spanish Flu. After the epidemic was over life went back to normal. We didn't turn into a dictatorship.
But I also feel like our reaction is being manipulated. This thing has a small death rate and primarily kills a certain type of person. But on Reddit and in the media you have people making it seem like any healthy 25 year that gets it will be hospitalized or killed. The people most at risk should minimize their risk but you can t expect a country to tiptoe around these people for months on end.
I was unaware there was a wrong kind of baptism. That's what I get for being raised as a heathen Catholic.
Exactly lead by example.
Without an autocracy how can we protect inept aristocrats from the consequences of their actions
I don t think anyone is profiting off of this
And each county runs their election process. One can be paper ballot and another electronic voting machines. The state sets foundation rules.
With what end goal
All I m saying is he speaks to one audience just like Trump does. He s not changing minds. I don t like Trump either but this just feels counterproductive right now. Meyers is a well informed dude and he could use his position for the greater good today.
8 years ago I was 22. I was a conservative in a liberal hipster city at a liberal university and a lot of black friends remember Republicans are racist. so I didn t talk much politics period even though I didn t agree with Obama.
Don't worry they'll trickle down
Yeah lemme just bike 18 miles to work every day lmao
Republican controlled congress blocked Obamas attempts to restock in 2011. Citing fiscal responsibility. Funny how those same Confressmen and SenAtors are quite when Trump blew the deficit from 550B to 1. 2 trillion whils the economy was strong. Furthermore Trump has been President for 3. 5 years. He fully owns this.
LMAO the US can't even 1 create enough doctors to fulfill demand nor 2 convince the doctors that do graduate here to work where it's needed. I would love to see what US healthcare would look like without foreign workers.
gt The idea that jobs is some finite resource I never made this claim nor would I make such a claim. gt Illegal worker may be the cheapest but automation could be the next cheapest. Then so be it Americans can run and maintain the machines and everybody wins. Regardless it's not anyone's place to allow illegals to effect market prices whether they think it is good or bad for the economy. The law is the law.
Twisting reality there huh Having fun with that I'm not making anything up. I'm making observations. Pretty sad you can't tell. But you've lived in fantasy land for a while huh
In a fair world the TR and her battle group are steaming towards Washington after vaporizing Fox News HQ other carrier captains are telling the President they re helpless due to their defective digital catapults and these twats are just now realizing that all their bullshit counts for zilch. It s be a really great movie.
most likely these people will be staying at home though. but not all of course
He should call Xi first
Shapiro a libertarian My sides
They hate everything.
There are counties in the US that are releasing inmates and police departments in hard hit cities are literally telling the public they cant reapond to break ins theft etc. Even LA has them open and there are thousands of first time buyers.
Either way nothing will happen to this woman sadly.
i mean a Republican president usually means a depression judging by history over the past 100 years...
I'm sorry if I'm not getting this right but I was under the impression that the USNS Comfort was for non coronavirus related incidents businessinsider.com businessinsider.com This was the news I've seen about it recently where it's always mentioning non COVID 19 patients... I've always felt it was just another place to help displace non COVID 19 people so they don't take up extra beds in hospitals.
Yeah that s exactly what I was telling my family today. If this doesn t do it nothing will.
This is why libertarians are a laughing stock. You care about means more than ends and if some govt intervention brings ends more optimally you cry about muh rights You're the Vincents of Pulp Fiction. I respect you I don't like people barking orders at me You're crybabies over the means and in that sense you're worse than mainstream lefties. You can't even comprehend the fact that one person has very little control of total quarantine enforcement and thus a person thinks that nothing depends on me That's why this needs to be enforced. But oh well good luck paying for all the increased health and econ costs at least nobody took your precious rights to go outside for two months. Your rights end where other people's rights start.
Alberta is truly the Texas of Canada
The US government currently projects a minimum of 100 000 and that's WITH all the current shutdowns in place. Tens of thousands will probably be reached a week from now.
I d rather have dangerous freedom than peaceful slavery. Thomas Jefferson.
He should be charged with genocide when this is all over.
We need to get the guy who married the president's crush out of office He is a piece of shit and isn't qualified for anything.
The loss of centuries of stable public servants operating experience the halls of the government offices will take decades to recover from. Hell the DOE alone has lost centuries of actual work experience on the countries nuclear arsenal. But hey I guess Grover Norquist can drown it in a bathtub. Hope somebody drops a toaster in tub while he's in there.
We're cool if you're cool. But keep in mind that this is a place for conservative discussion. You can ask about conservative views and engage in that type of discussion but you will most likely get a ban for arguing liberal positions we'd be overrun if the mods allowed liberals to argue in here
What was that movie with Charlie Sheen... And the men jumping out of the helicopters onto high school football fields Think trumps gonna let ppl drop in
I'm simply stating the fact that I have less basic freedoms and restrictions on my fundamental human rights as the OP questioned.
Great stuff but I m assuming it ll still take at minimum another year to see a vaccine right This sucks
I want a place where both sides can openly share views and have discussions and debates without it resulting in arguments insults ignoring evidence we don't like banning or criticizing someone simply for expressing a dissenting opinion or having to write a small report with every post including citations. As it is now we're so divided it seems we either push people out of a sub until one side dominates it to the point it becomes repulsive for others to go to or we run away and create our own safe place that becomes the same thing with an opposing dynamic. That seems like it might be too much to hope for right now but this polarization is tearing us apart and only having communities that support or attack our pre existing ideas is only going to make that worse.
Brain Kemp who literally stole the Georgia election to get himself the governor position Yeah BIG fuck you to that asshole.
gt We took in thousands of Americans during 9 11. You repay us by taking everything for yourselves when we are dying too. This self over community mentality has escalated into pure stupidity. EVERYTHING What That being said the biggest community is the United States with our 50 states and 3 times the number of cases per capita than Candada. So maybe this self ie country over people not in our country is what the American people as a whole demand of their politicians. Are you new to politics or something And what the hell does 9 11 have to do with anything I'm telling you that Canada would do the same damn thing if they were in our situation. Not only that but if the situation in the United States doesn't get resolved soon Canada is going to be in deep shit. Canadians should put Canada first but that doesn't change the fact that Canada's economy is highly dependent on the U.S Trump is not only putting priority on saving American lives but also on saving our economy. gt People are absolutely furious up here. Doug Ford the Conservative premier of Ontario is disappointed in Trump. I don t think you realize how big a story it is in Canada and how severe the repercussions will be. I don't think you understand the serious repercussions in Canada if the U.S doesn't resolve this pandemic with Trumps presidency intact. If you want Biden as president and think he can offer Canada anything better when the rebuilding process begins you are a damn fool. The U.S isn't going to let Canada go without needed supplies we have a much bigger problem right now than Canada does. 3M is not the only producer of face masks stop acting like the fucking sky is falling.
Hard as in right now or two weeks from now
I live in Iceland and we can always get tested. It's a good thing because it takes up to a week for symptoms to show or you can be entirely asymptomatic. Means we can quarantine ourselves if we test positive not spreading the disease. It's proven to be a very effective strategy to contain the disease.
Seriously... thanks for reminding us we are fucked. We all totally asked for it and deserve it s
I d say right around 2017 when half the active voting base voted for a Reality TV trust fund dipshit.
Jesus fucking Christ He's pissing off the Canadians. We are so screwed.
You're fooling yourself. We're living in a dictatorship. A self perpetuating autocracy in which the working classes...
From a slight germophobe....I hated the reusables. It's gross and washing them after each use waste of water forgetting them annoying Then I had to buy small plastic trash bags for my small trash barrels anyways when I used to just reuse the plastics from the grocery....I know I know but the environment
I can't imagine how dirty it would feel to idolize someone like him. Just knowing he's president of the country I live in makes me want to take a shower and scrub my skin until it damn near comes off. Of all the people to idolize... this guy. It's revolting.
Plot twist both are rapists.
Right He and Biden are twinsies
This sub keeps getting funnier
Tater s been TOLD for nearly two weeks it took a state medical official pressuring him hard to get him to finally establish it.
Theres the crazy 5G radiation people and then the microchip vaccine people. I'm not even getting into the Q people because I have nothing for that beyond just confusion and pity
Unfortunately that's been the rallying cry of the idiots in charge.
Did she say anything about letting us eat cake I've been eating cake. Happy birthday to me...
Think Bridgewater will be the starter next year or will the Panthers draft a qb
If I wasn t unemployed at the moment I would give you some gold this comment is equally disgusting as it is true
Isn t it normal to prioritize your nation in the middle of a pandemic Aren t those made in the states
There is a long list of things I could be carrying that has the potential to kill people. What's your point You're saying that every time I go out with the potential to unintentionally cause the death of someone else I am infringing on everyone else's rights Also show me in the constitution where it says right to not get infected by virus while in public or something similar.
Yea we would ve definitely hear about that shit by now
Okay THAT smell I know.
They'd do whatever they are doing now. The government if we wanted could better target support towards those who actually need it instead of just giving everybody free money. I'd rather those people who are quarantined that way to be able to get more support if it means the rest of us can get back to work. I'd say at this point they've already got their plan in place for whatever they're doing. Things would basically stay the way they are for them until they're read to go back to work.
It s pretty ironic that whenever I have a conservative view on ANY OTHER sub they always reply with the same generic How does it feel to be brainwashed when in reality they re the ones believing everything mainstream media says without research and I had to look into everything before coming up with a view.
Hmmm...eyes are beginning to open
feminine penis...
Thank you Silence...noone really
Red states Or very rich donors cnn.com
My dream is that the Republican party dies the DNC becomes the conservative party in America and we get an actual progressive party.
Trump didnt call it a hoax. Nice shit post. Trump was talking about the virus in the SOTU
Right I promise not to put up a fight if Canada comes knocking
Dr. Fauci said there was a not very robust study that some chinese doctors said they feel that it helps but no convincing results on it yet. youtube link youtu.be edit this is actually Dr. Faucis follow up to Dr. Oz
Fuck yes. Violently overthrowing the ruling class in favor of socialist values successfully Again FUCK YES
Or drugs.. can't forget about drugs.
This has turned into quite the rat race youtube.com v 3neDhaJTgU
I will never understand why people don't realize this. Head Up Butt Syndrome
The reporter did a good job of pushing back
All those NRA 2'nd Amendment types talk big shit about freedom but when it comes down it they're going to fall on the side of authoritarianism. They lust for the collapse of society so they can take over their neighborhood and become a micro warlord in the wasteland of what used to be a great country.
Welcome to the Sub
How that's just crazy talk. s
There are medical research labs across every country on the planet focused on one topic at the moment. It is a truly global effort with open sharing of information. Which was how the cocktail of drugs came to light in the first place. Yes things need to be sped up. But they also need to be tested. The time frame can... and has been sped up by a magnitude not due to Trump going on TV but by pooling of vast medical resources and information sharing. It's awesome helpful medications are being found. Trump has no value in the equation except in wanting credit.
but lower labor costs usually sometimes leads to cheaper goods services which is something that consumers like
A government should exist to help its citizens achieve a better life for themselves.
Perfect time for another trade war. Jesus fuck me
I hate so much that my brother is living there. I hate I can't help him from where I am.
I m in
Won't it just be in medical textbooks.
You gotta be tough to get old.
We hold that truth to be self evident.
Because I d rather put people ahead of profits Because like Theodore Roosevelt Metternich and Bismarck I believe that rank unfettered capitalism is as evil as soviet communism You say coward I say pragmatic. Conservatism and laissez faire aren t synonymous and Conservatism and Libertarianism are mutually exclusive.
That's cute. The man that has repeatedly shown he has nothing but disdain for the law as it applies to him is suddenly going to be forced into obeying it in November What rock have you been hiding under for the last three years He could lose 538 to nothing and would still ignore the results.
How about Say what you mean carefully are someone may correct you.
Who is this and why do we care what she thinks She make a sex tape or something
Even the experts are saying the evidence is not overwhelmingly why are so many people on this thread making this drug sound like an already established fool proof cure thedailybeast.com
1. It s not meant to affect your point. 2. The stay at home order and the forceful closing of business is the very cause of the rise in unemployment. 3. I don t think you know what I m referring to because your response doesn t make sense in context. 4. Again this doesn t make sense. If we are trying to quarantine people then jail is a pretty good place to quarantine them. 5. Loss of liberty is ignorant reduction of how people are affected by the overblown response to this virus. Lives are being ruined and to ignore that is to not take this situation seriously.
Sounds like this corporate person' should get drafted' with the Defense Production Act.
In many ways I think it's the opposite. Yang is saying the way to stop racism is to approach people as part of their community and not as a separate entity. It's like the story of Daryl Davis who befriends KKK members and causes them to realize their hatred is misguided. Yang is asking for a similar approach of instead of being defensive to be a member of the community and show people that being human is universal.
Thanks for the story man good read.
Then... why would you suggest I hang myself
Wow what a nasty piece of shit. Who says things like that to people
Can you read It literally says pelosi bought stocks in amazon knowing the majority of retail stores would close down. If that s not insider trading I dunno what is.
Babylon Bee. It's a satire site like The Onion.
What did you think of Cuomos press conference.. It honestly looked like Sesame Street explaining a pandemic to kids to me. And I was horrified by the fact that many people would still not get it after that.
Kushner's actually Jewish but the rest applies fine.
Keep that assassination talk in your s hole country. FFS
One can hope but probably not gonna happen since China s has too many village clucks who can t stop eating bats. Come on. My grandaunt in Korea died due to these fucks.
It s actually not I hate having correct everyone but this ABSOLUTELY can happen with sustained fevers. Critical care specialist here.
Your article makes ZERO mention of K10 being used for N95 masks nor the supply going to 3M the subject of all this outrage. Nor does your article mention the creation of N95 masks only medical gear. gt K10S pulp is made from western red cedar that produces a soft fibre that makes it suitable for the final products made from it. You literally used a local news article against the manufacturing breakdown that has the manufacturing parts in it. In China a country of 200 Million masks only 600 000 are N95 npr.org The production of sophisticated facemasks like the N95 model requires nonwoven polypropylene a special fabric that is in short supply. voanews.com Zero mention of natural fibers. I think you're doing the exact same thing you're accusing me of and ignoring supporting evidence that was lain out for you in detail.
Gov. Edwards has done a fine job. Its too bad the population here are just a bunch of idiots.
Enlighten us
I just had a look at wikipedia and it says the US has postal voting is this for a different thing Or do some things not have postal voting thanks genuinely curious en.wikipedia.org voting United States en.wikipedia.org United States
Watching CNN
It should be centrally controlled. Sorry to say. Would need to be built at the federal level by a large and reputable contractor like Accenture or Infosys. Centralization this is how large systems work. If this is left to state governments to create their own low quality disparate systems expect crap to come out of it. My own state they pay their tech workers 25 40 less than market rate. The only people working for them are crap. I never once applied for a government tech job. Government tech is all subpar. Only the worst go work for government. If states do it their code should absolutely be reviewed by an independent party or certified by the federal government.
My wife out of work and my whole company is on 30 reduced pay
I watched yesterday when his brother governor Andrew had him on during his daily press conference. Funny how Chris was quick thinking enough in his condition to wear that t shirt that read I can't work. But he is working. He does look fine. After his controversial fitness center confrontation that was on social media a few months back I doubt he's learned much and I wouldn't put this past him. Either he or Don Lemon just HAD to get COVID. CNN needs viewers even it's their usual five viewers. That basement he's been relegated to in his home looks absolutely massive. And then you can go on your bro's presser first thing in the morning You'll live Chris. You'll pull through this imaginary illness. Jussie Smollett is rooting for you.
Hahahaaaaaaaa Quite unexpected. Thanks for making me laugh
Justice For what
Troll or a complete moron gullible beyond belief Probably both.
Oh god I hope people aren't still taking communion by drinking from the same cup. That shit should have stopped with the HIV outbreak and cant continue during a pandemic
On some subreddits he will be praised.
Yes that is how the line of succession works
I love how cnn and msnbc are called fake news when stories like this can be found in every conservative outlet
I was mad until reading the article.. there will be Nuremberg type trials for sure.
Thinking more like he s a cuckold.
This is very useful thanks 100x
As someone from a county that is beating the odds I think you are incorrect. Lock down is what is working.
Weird that you chose to only name one... How about the others
gt the American Soldiers who gave all so that we can be here in some semblance of peace Yeah we were SO threatened by Vietnam and Korea. What sacrifice they saved us
Loeffler Inhofe Feinstein and Burr should all resign
I think it s likely he didn t know she had spiked his soda. All we have his her word for it. Women frequently get away with these sorts of murders and with the political cover the story put up it s unlikely she ever be charged.
then wouldn't it just be easier to start the spread in NY rather in one's own country's economic hub O.o I feel like your devil's advocate arguments theories doesn't really hold water btw Shanghai has been hit but it doesn't seem as bad relatively speaking asia.nikkei.com
Respect for the military and their sacrifices should be universal but sadly it is not.
gt I plainly stated that Trump wasn't responsible for the state of stockpile resources which is why he should have followed the established pandemic plan from the start to flatten the curve and reduce need so the resources weren'timmediately depleted. Pretty simple to understand in my opinion. You haven't provided any information outlining the standard plan. gt The delay occurred because people failed to act in a timely manner. Looking at Trump here. You keep making claims that doesn't make them true. gt Right but the point of the mobilization act is for it to only be states and the fed. I already stated that the states merely need to inform the government of how much it needs and where when to send it. The government by way of it being the sole purchaser can then streamline the distribution of supplies based upon states orders. Simple logistics. I spent my entire career in logistics. I'm not sure why you think a free for all bidding war between over 50 competing interests with no obligation by private companies to sell to any of them is somehow more efficient than a centralized distribution plan. Not to mention the uncoordinated supply chain that results from such a system. Makes zero sense to me. Frankly you're the one that sounds clueless. Of course because you have no clue what you are talking about. gt Trump literally said he didn't need to nationalize businesses when in fact he did. I'm following it pretty closely. He didn't have to. That's the point. You are following your own delusions and claiming that Trump was wrong not to follow them. Oh I forgot you are an expert in logistics during pandemics. LOL.
Barr and Durham are zeroing in on the genesis of the intelligence that started the whole investigation. It wasn't SIGINT it was HUMINT. That makes CIA the prime suspect.
Well who are they supposed to take care of
Lots of Republicans think like Bernie. Mitt Romney was saying everyone should be getting 2000.
Awesome I'll be sure to tell her. Thanks for the conversion
Why don't you just go ahead and wish death on us all and say what you really think
Can I offer you a nice egg in this trying time media.giphy.com
Even if you say Homosexuality is a sin it isn't homophobia. Because according to The Bible homosexuality IS a sin. Look...me I really don't care what your orientation is. But the Bible says that it's a sin. It would be a lie for any Christian to say that the Bible doesn't say that it's a sin. But mostly this is just some satire from the Bee. And now people in here all wantin to brawl over it.
No we need new slaves. Slavery kept wages down and that was good Really the answer is to bring back slavery for real pay them nothing own them outright make them sleep in the mud and be beaten to death or worked to death. That will keep our food cheap.
Who likes this guy Do you Republicans like him Is he your people
Oh yeah Salon is the bastion of Real News Y'all scream and whine so much about deplatforming until it happens to you.
Whether I agree with them or not with them regarding their social political positions I will give credit where credit is due. Good on them.
One of the biggest turnoffs for me about democrats in general is how they always push criminals to the front of the line ahead of law abiding productive citizens.
Do not post calls for violence.
He used unsecure email servers to send information related to military conduct and concerns. Not only that and the Navy WAS already doing something about it. They were working on offloading the crew and arranging accommodations.
Seriously I didn't realize how bad it was until I accidently watched FOX entertainment a few times due to Reddit links. FOX features Dr Oz meanwhile CNN and MSNBC feature actual virology experts from the WHO CDC and medical universities.
Nope they'll spin it as a win along with the media and most voters will eat that shit up. Then they'll use the bailout number to make the bad faith argument that we already spent x billion on healthcare what more do you want to shutdown future healthcare discussions. Never underestimate how far Vote blue no matter who and Vote R no matter who logic will allow politicians to repeatedly fuck us with 0 consequences.
I say again. How can a person be this dumb. Like something had to have happened to her when she was little.
No. All elections are a state issue.
I don t normally scroll poster history but buddy you need to maybe go outside and log off for a while.
Wow. I literally came to this sub to try and see things from the other point of view from my own and this is what I find Just wow.
And how exactly would that be implemented Does the goverment pay or does the government itself administer vaccines and or treatment If the government is paying 1 pharmaceutical companies will gouge the price to hell and back 2 treatment would include ventilators care etc. and hospitals will gouge that to hell and back and 3 due to points 1 and 2 price of this bill massively increase to a point that it will not be feasible and would have been economically more feasible to just pay individuals more. So why not just give the people the money necessary directly Because a vaccine would be too far away and cost is uncertain meaning there would be no price tag on the bill which makes the whole thing a non starter. Since this would be corona specific people would have to turn in claims to say that they were billed for how much and for what and the government simply does not have the logistical and manpower capacity to handle any of that. The same thing applies to a scenario in which the government administers treatment. Government does not have the facilities to research or produce the vaccines nor does it have the manpower to properly administer treatment. Now does this add to the argument that a government run healthcare would be useful Of course But we don't have that. We would have to create that from scratch which would take YEARS to build up and even then might not be able to handle a NATIONWIDE PANDEMIC response. No one has anyone by the balls. No one can do anything other than handle a stimulus bill to help those in need RIGHT NOW. Change takes time no matter how much it's needed and it is VERY needed This is not the time because we have none.
The Navy didn't fire him. The acting Secretary of the Navy did. There were several admirals in between the Capt and the acting Sec Nav. I do not believe we have heard from them and even Fox New's pet general remarked that was beyond stupid to bypass them in this decision and would be devastating for morale.
This is completely stupid. The government absolutely has the right to tell people to stay at home to stop a highly contagious virus I'm sick of people acting like they're victims of some sort of government persecution because they were told to stay home. You want to see government persecution look at China. I'm sick of the complainers. and its mostly conservatives honestly.
Scrolling way too far and not seeing a single mention of her name. Weijia Jiang. CBS. twitter.com This is why journalism is important people. Subscribe to her. Subscribe to your local paper.
thanks updated
Nope. Longer durations of dehydration are more damaging
But that would be admitting something Obama did was good. The fucker rolled back a school lunch program for kids that Michelle did on her birthday. How fucking childish is that. Higher standards for school lunches. Your kids eat healthier food at school. Gone.
Well played.
At no point in time has anyone including trump ever called it a hoax and you damn well know it. The fact that you actually try and suggest that he did completely destroys your whole let s just have a friendly argument charade.
To be fair the decision makers get updated data and models every day so they shouldn't be using week old graphs. But if the models are always 4 10x wrong then they're worthless whatever day they're made regardless.
Imagine piling on some racial strife on top of a pandemic. Go back to mixing drinks
Okay Google how do I delete someone else's Reddit comment
gt The Administration also requested that 3M cease exporting respirators that we currently manufacture in the United States to the Canadian and Latin American markets. There are however significant humanitarian implications of ceasing respirator supplies to healthcare workers in Canada and Latin America where we are a critical supplier of respirators. gt In addition ceasing all export of respirators produced in the United States would likely cause other countries to retaliate and do the same as some have already done. If that were to occur the net number of respirators being made available to the United States would actually decrease. That is the opposite of what we and the Administration on behalf of the American people both seek.
Other countries are closing thier borders to people from the United States including Mexico and countries in Africa because we are viral factory and it is out of control. We are the coronavirus threat. Us.
As if they ll care about that
If you get The Rona please inform us on how that goes. You seem so confident it only makes sense that you trust it enough to take it or give it to your family.
Unsurprisingly you don't know how to read because exactly what I said was no college educated whites which the dump truck won 64 to 24
Some of us don't need a nanny state to keep us alive. Any action that suspends liberty is beyond the purview of government.
No. No he isn't This thread is completely brigaded.
gt economic stimulation this is what I'm most interested in a global pandemic. who cares about saving american lives when you can stimulate the economy
rapid fire
Any hot new topic is going to be abused because too many people flock to it. It's not poor machine learning's fault that everyone and their grandma wants to use deep learning on big data.
I actually just watched fury road and the big fat war lord reminded me of Trump. Hm.
Well you just convinced me I need another gun now. Thanks.
They did warn us. We just didn't do anything until March. That's our fault really.
The CDC doesn't operate on how you feel.
Holy crap
I think that we should all stop assuming that Susan Collins feels the slightest shred of remorse about anything she's done.
Golf games never tied up the House and the Senate never required weeks and months of Administration time. Golf games never damaged this countries reputation overseas or national confidence. We would be in far better shape had Nancy and Chuck played more golf and less politics.
it's not racist either way. Leftists are stupid.
It doesn t but yet it s doing it
Maybe if we hadn't continually cut funding for public schools over the last 40 years things would be different
We should bring back public blood eagles. That would str8n these fuckers out pretty quick.
Dan I've Had Tighter Schneider
This isn't from the Babylon Bee is it smh
A lot of our current issues in the US may soon end up solving themselves.
Average temp is hotter in Little Rock than Houston for the month of July. So yes it s an apt comparison since you were commenting about the heat. But I m also confused why you re telling me about people living far away. I already said it s not a viable option for most people. But there are people who live within 10 miles of their work and it s a viable option for some. I live about 7 miles away and really love biking if I don t have errands to do after work.
Thank you for speaking on the importance of this issue. I myself have had a 20 year old friend of mine with no pre existing conditions require hospitalization due to the virus. It is clearly different than the normal flu. Best wishes to your brother and his wife.
I think at this point that's even mean to Cobra Commander. At least he was defeated after every episode
You can't shoot a virus
It is though. As we have proved beyond a doubt it's physically impossible to do unless one was cutting weight in a sauna. It's not about the weight it's about the fucking blatant lie. This guys claiming he lost 7 8 of the water in his body over a prolonged period. 15 20 water loss over this same period would kill you. At a 7 8 loss over a prolonged period would lead to extreme thirst and mental deterioration. Second he was able to move he would slam water back uncontrollable until his weight returned. What he said is a complete fabrication.
I'm not sure what their guns will do against the invasion of Covid 19...
That s a good angle this story should roll with. Amid pandemic crisis under cover of distracted media trump continues his purge and pays attention to protecting his 1 client himself.
Russia and North korea...
No against corrupt shitty politicians
How dare you It is also a movie. youtu.be
The lazy comment I've been making was in reference to your original post where you referred to a work ethic drought. People want to work and have meaning in their lives. I agree beggars can't be choosers but in the richest country in the world why are people willing to work any job begging at all The minimum wage hasn't risen since 2009 even these recent coronavirus packages have sparked controversy because they will provide people with more than minimum wage its not a useful benchmark but definitely a failure of government to not attempt to raise it inline with inflation.
Fellow Illinoisian here can concur I'm surprisingly happy with the job Pritzker is doing. Thought he was gonna be another shady billionaire governor but he's actually done a great job at keeping his campaign promises.
I agree. Not irrelevant.
We ve been recoiling in horror for 3 years straight no need to wait.
Revolution
As a mental patient I can assure you everyone I've met while committed was at least trying to better themselves. Some may have had mental development illness and or brain damage but damn if they at least had the knowledge of knowing something was wrong with them. Once upon a time I thought demons were infecting my body and pigs were trying eat my soul but this shit is fucking nuts.
Sounds like mossad money laundering
But the moderates he s talking about are not necessarily moderates on the economic question so much as the social question.
I really respect your optimism You get a 1 from me bud
What s your source there boss
Thank you for your reply. I was referring to Oz which was not at all clear in my comment. I'd never heard of Drew but then I ditched cable TV 13 years ago. It is tragic that lay people have no comprehension of the difference between specialists which contrast is magnified by every year since medical school. I am a retired orthodontist but I would never comment on any dental treatment other than orthodontics at this point. I have not kept up with the profession. Thank you for going to work every day. Be safe. Cheers
Journalists keep asking him questions. Stupid journalists
sorta its been red here for a long while but its VERY close ballotpedia.org scott barely won same for desantis. ballotpedia.org it just happens to be that the blue is fairly tightly packed in an otherwise red state.
that s not true in any way. so. because each random virus has DNA that s completely unique and identifiable it means that it s the same as killing a fetus
Haha all good.
Indy needs to bring his bullwhip to Washington.
That's a good one. Maybe people will finally wisen up.
gt Every single word of that sentence is true Except they didn't smuggle them there was no indication they would be taken and especially no indication they would be sent to Florida if taken. So no not every single word was true
Do you really think an increase of 2. 5 would have a major impact on demand Oil and corn prices already cause more volatility in food prices yet I do not see consumer demand being as volatile. Most consumers would not notice. Any job taken by an illegal is a lost American job.
People during 2016 I m voting for Trump cause I don t like Hillary. Besides what s the worst that can happen 3 1 2 years later this is where we are at over a dislike. Not saying she was great but the fact there are no republicans contending Trump shows how the republican party are a bunch of no talent ass clowns
how bout them emails still looking for those.
I d assume the reason the flu isn t being treated the same as coronavirus is because we have a vaccine ready for whichever strain of the flu is most dangerous during the flu season. If we had no flu vaccines I m fairly confident that we would descend into this madness every year. Let s just hope we get a covid vaccine fast to get our life back to normal as soon as possible and potentially save thousands of those that are seriously at risk of dying from it and the hundreds who may be unlucky enough to die of it even when they are healthy.
They have. You may remember there was a big thing about it. They had a trial and everything. Republicans made it clear they don't care and will continue to support him.
In the article it said he would be announcing his vetting committee in mid april so it looks like he will be shrinking the list significantly.
Amen to that.
I m sure she has lots of experience with social diseases.
3 weeks late and a dollars short. Thats about par for the course these days
I respect Kissinger but have to disagree with him here. I don t understand how he doesn t even mention the elephant in the room which is China s cover up of this and the WHO and UN s complicity in it. How is more globalism the answer
gt admission required to count In the factual world you need to be admitted. In times when facts are irrelevant to pushing an agenda....who knows how they may have skewed the definition.
As I keep saying that those people do know how many die from this or that but this is happening concurrently which means everything that normally kills people is ALSO happening alongside this. Technically speaking our economy is still doing very well because our GDP to Debt ratio was at 107 before all of this took place so we were doing better than we should have been doing and now we're dropping down to 91 As an example during the big crisis in the 70s where people were lining up for food and gasoline our GDP to Debt Ratio was ranging from 31 to 40 Most economists were also predicting that between 2020 and 2021 that there would be another recession and our economy would have tanked out during this time and most likely the same amount of people losing their jobs would still be losing them. In the same light when we have a recession very few people seem to care about jobs being saved and what not much in the same light that you've said people don't acknowledge deaths by alcohol etc. amp x200B The media is still overhyping a lot of this and yes I realize people are losing their jobs and people are declaring bankruptcies and I am empathetic to that and not denying it's existence but during a typical recession the same thing would be happening anyways.
You mean the idiocy that has been going on since BEFORE be took office
22 years of Navy here. So yes I know the logistics. I ve voted Red my entire adult life and Navy Career. I can see a cult when I see one.
Kushner
Viruses dont cause you to burn extra fat the virus didnt eat 10lbs of body tissue in 3 days. amp x200B gt Critical care respiratory therapist here. Highly doubt it.
I understand that but still that means that only roughly 30k people in all of italy have even been hospitalized because of this. Compare that to a population of almost 60 million.and out of that 30k hospitalized only have of them didnt make it.
Wha5 exactly is badass about this Other than it s incredibly boring
The safety and well being of the entire community or your rights Hmm.... What would Locke and Mill think about this
Yeah but isn t that the antithesis of conservatism A private company being mandated by the federal government on how they conduct business especially when it effects their bottom line.
It's not that infectious. Look at any of the current numbers coming from scientists Medical colleges not governments. Do you know how many people have skin cancer Martial Law is illegal but the void due to their unconstitutionality laws that they have passed have very strict guidelines on when Martial Law can be implemented and a virus is not on the list. So maybe go do some research on any of this.
You really don't understand the concept of rights or the constitution do you. gt That said go ahead and go go outside. WTF does that have to do with anything Going outside doesn't spread a virus. Are you saying that you think people should literally be locked inside their houses by papa government because they were allowed to vote a few times
The DOJ has requested Congress allow any chief judge of a district court to pause court proceedings whenever the district court is fully or partially closed by virtue of any natural disaster civil disobedience or other emergency situation according to draft language obtained by Politico. Sounds pretty straightforward...
I knew it literally anyone who has a functioning brain.
To me Crozier is a hero. A true Officer who lived up to the values and type of leadership we all talk about but rarely see. True Chivalry. The likes of him and LTC Vindman. Thank God we have some officers stepping up to the plate.
This is so cringe
And who's going to enforce that Do you really think the US military or secret service is going to drag Trump from the white house Do you really think the current makeup of the supreme court would go against him
gt Sacrifice your grandma to the line All those leftist politicians saying that oh right
For fuck's sake... Without the nucleus of the family there is no society.
But it's a national emergency He's a wartime president didn't ya hear If you're not with us you're against us. Or something.
The governor issued a stay at home order effective tomorrow evening. With all the exceptions given it really doesn't amount to much.
I didn't know the Clinton's moved to China. But seriously this needs to be investigated and China needs to held responsible
don t live in stares
And then the guy who showed up wasn't the same guy from the interview but they decided to give him a shot anyway. Yep. Been there. Happens all the time.
It doesn't matter who did what to whom first. Trump could've just ignored it and acted like an adult.
Me Remember kids the only people who get rich from Socialism are the Socialist Politicians.
Not OP but in ontario canada yes and quite high. Domestic violence robberies theft and burglary. Every other type of crime is down. was on the news the other day. most canadians myself included are normally anti gun but seeing these massive line ups of 300 people into costco the half empty shelves....Yeah if I could I would buy a rifle for myself too. Just in case.
He and his team study the news and politics constantly. I think it s okay for them to have opinions. What do you think writers do all day Lol
Ghost pepper oil ink
my birthday is also in June but pride month doesn t affect it the least I don t participate in it but if they want to celebrate it fine with me.
user reports 1 You guys are all fucktards
Someone seriously needs to ask Biden if he intents to pursue legal action against the outgoing Admin should he be elected. After voting for Obama in 08' I was furious over the whole we need to look forward spheal that gave the whole Bush Admin a get out of jail free card. People want their pound of flesh and even moreso they want accountability in government. Unfortunately these are probably lofty expectations because of the whole big club ain't in it thing. Biden will likely follow the same path because rocking the boat would make things uncomfortable for him with the Big Banks the Big Pharmas the Big Ags the Big Techs and every other rotten Mr. Big that asks him to jump and he's all too happy to ask how high.
I hate being not so young in this hellscape. Young at heart though. After 2008 2009 I was kind of hoping that was the roughest patch. But a lot of us are in the same boat all we can do is is try to hang on I'm really just hoping not to lose any relatives and friends and make it through the next few months. Good luck to us all in the times ahead.
My guy India is literally revoking citizenship from a large amount of poor minorities who have no way to prove their citizenship because they live on 1. 25 a day. That is the voter suppression he is talking about. If you don t understand the irony of the picture you posted then I don t know what to say man. Plus in America it isn t free to go get an ID to vote. If the government gave everyone a free ID employees weren t reprimanded by there employer for leaving work mid day to go to the dmv and made Election Day a holiday then I d be all about it. But you guys don t want that the president literally said yesterday that if more people vote republicans will never win.
Trump is a f king toddler.
If he just wanted to make Germany great. But he wanted to kill millions of innocent people because of an insane evil ideology. That is where she was getting at when people were trying to throw nationalism in her face to compare nationalism to the nazism. Pretty much saying it wasn't nationalism that made Hitler and the nazi party what they became. It went well beyond nationalism and that was her point. Listen to the whole speech for context. She was in no way shape or form defending Hitler obviously. I'm shocked I need to explain that to you. Listen to the whole speech for context.
Then Fauci comes on Fox News and ruins that argument lol
Sure people can. Is there actual evidence
gt from me as the crow flies such a Canadian phrase
The US hasn't had participatory democracy for a while we have corporate lobbyists and corporate backed politicians in the Republican Lite Dem Party or Radical Christian Business Party the Republicans. Both of them are corporate backed parties and have the only two candidates who can win an election.
Leaving the house when you don't have to could be intentionally getting someone sick. It's incredibly contagious and if you're out and about because fuck the government you are an asshole.
I m sure there are ways of jumping the line and being a priority for testing. Examples I can think of off the top of my head are nurses caregivers police and the extremely wealthy said as a joke but all the NBA players jumped the line and got tested.
Pollsters account for this and have done that since cell phones were mainstream. Pollsters are very good at what they do and the best rated ones are usually within their margin of error for their polls.
No doubt they need punished for unleashing this bio weapon on the world.
Have there been any repercussion for the lies of the Bush administration which led to the illegal invasion of Iraq and the death of hundreds of thousands innocent Iraqi civilians Why would there be any for the Trump administration then
Wow the website for the cemetery. Insightful
Im more humble then you could ever understand
Not from the grave they won t.
I just want him to let the DOJ have a whack at Trump. You know they have dirt on him. He doesn't have to push anything.. you know they hate him. That's all Biden's gotta do. Let em rip. I'm cautiously optimistic but I also share your fear. We need to save democracy this year but for our long term health we need to prosecute or this shit will happen again.
And Bernie will give it to Biden or whoever gets nominated at the convention.
Thank I hate it. But this is a highly plausible outcome.
Well that covers Trump and Pence I guess...
Why did you deplete the stockpile of facemasks on not restock them
Strictly speaking the government has the power to jail everyone without recourse using public safety as the justification per Article I Section 9 Clause 2 of the Constitution.
They believe that this pandemic could get so bad that it leads to looting rioting Mad Max type shit. They want the guns to protect themselves from that not to shoot a virus.
I m not saying it s a cure but it s def helped and it s not complete bullshit like the media said the second trump uttered the syllables chloroquine he also never said it was a cure just that it might be helpful the media spun it into something else entirely as usual Sry to hear about you patient my wife is a nurse and I know that shit is hard thank you for what you re doing we re all in this together we can t forget that
If Trump simply acted a leader during this crisis he would have won reelection easily. Dumb ass.
The fact that he says nothing will fundamentally change IS the problem. Taxing them more is great. But the level of wealth of those at the top is unsustainable by any reasonable metric economically ecologically or morally. If he is not willing to change the lifestyles of those at the top why would I believe he will ever change the Ives of those at the bottom
I'd like to see a count of how many of these people were exercising pre coronavirus.
Jared is not running the task force is it so hard for you to see that maybe in this time of need that all people including he may just be helping because he wants too oh ya he works for free. Be nice to others
Makes you think whether they would really have your back in case of war...
The problem is we don't have a system in place to readily remove a failed president let alone any other position of any power in this government and murder is sort of frowned upon. Our government is build as a good faith institution. It assumes the people elected and hired are competent and ethical and there are no automatic or legal pathways to counter abuse of this good faith. It needs to be remarkably easy to remove a politician not incredibly hard to near impossible. Trump is INSANE but there has been no political nor amazingly lawful action taken against him. He is not losing his job despite a criminal history and ongoing criminal cases against him. He is not losing his job despite a history of unethical behavior and active unethical behavior. His is not losing his job despite being entirely incompetent unprofessional and is causing direct harm to the public by willful ignorance or willful evil. He is not losing his job despite abusing good position for monetary gains favors and leveraging his status to receive them. He is not losing his job despite lying quite literally thousands of times to everyone about literally everything. If he's talking he's lying. It's not really Trump though. It's the entire Republican party. Trump was their golden ticket. They want him to stay. He is the useful idiot. He is their tool to bypass the executive branch and attack the courts. He is their key to turn a 3 branch government into 1 and by one I mean a singular Republican entity acting more as a mob as an oligarchy. Trump is the key that allows this and maintains this. Their at Willy Wonka's chocolate factory reeking havok and they fucking LOVE that golden ticket. Even though this is one giant con one giant sham you see no law agencies of any sort doing anything. No police no lawyers no FBI no class action suits not a damn thing. Even the impeachment was a pile of shit and repeats to show that this whole thing demands good faith because there's nothing in place to protect the people or the institution.
He's not he's just in a Mormon heavy district effectively guaranteeing him a seat until he finally becomes to old. He's for all intents and purposes untouchable as Trump can't just sic the entire republican conservative base on him like anyone else.
I m white and comfortable I d rather forget about politics like I did under Obama. Kthxbye
How many of you freaks flunked grade school
I am absolutely determined not to contract and die of Covid 19 so I can vote against this motherfucker.
Lol. Honestly I m sure stelter is a freak too you were probably right either way.
Bette can call AOC if she needs the garbage disposal explained to her. Oh you celebs what on earth would you do without your third world country domestics that you abuse and refuse to give a dollar more an hour to.
Jared Kushner looks like Voldemort.
Do you need help comprehending those charts Because the only part of that analysis where income level was indicated validated my statement not yours. It showed that low income Americans made up a majority of all nonvoters but barely a quarter of voters. If you re going to talk down to someone know your shit.
100 that's guaranteed.
Filed that under talking out their ass You can literally go to their testimonials page and look. No one's defending Zoom here but what a strange thing for you to say. Someone let Delta know they aren't a serious company folks better CC Centrify and Box while you're at it
Later in the interview he said the list would have around 5 7 women.
gt Each movement precise and expertly timed. Oh yes it's VERY complicated....if you're retarded. gt and must adhere to a strict honor code until the day they die Wrong. Oh they MUST adhere or......
Honestly people. Shut it the fuck down. This is grotesque
Biden will be fucking worse than Trump. Mark my fucking words. Biden will bring the end of the Democratic Party.
People of influence and power are getting tested with no symptoms to ensure they aren't spread the bug among the elites. Which is why we hear of Senators and CEOs testing positive yet really don't have any symptoms.
Do you believe people should ever go bankrupt
Fucking shameful that America has fallen so far.
Yes but there is also a formula and process to making it. I have no idea how public that is or if it's a trade secret. I'm somewhat analogous to someone saying that microchips are made of silica sand and everybody has lots of that. That's certainly true but it's a huge step going from a raw material to a manufactured good. You still need the equipment and know how to do it and even with these in hand the ramp up time for production may be too lengthy to make it practical. Taking a few months to get a plant up and running just to make test batches of K10S like material isn't really feasible in the current climate.
Orange bag of dicks lied people die.
His bosses compromised readiness by not adequately responding to the outbreak.
Alternatively he wants blue states to have a higher rate of mortality.
Mate it s not just 70 people who get ill. A 38 year old fitness trainer healthy as an of. Until he wasn t npr.org A 16 year old girl in France dead euronews.com 13 year old kid in the UK gone thesun.co.uk 21 year old woman in the UK snuffed out nypost.com 12 year old girl from Belgium gone thenews.com.pk This was after one google search. Death death and death. And the ones who survive go through hell. Possibly with permanent health issues.
The ID in India is free easy to apply for and used for basically everything one might require an ID for. While many states have hardship waivers to reduce the cost of obtaining a state issued ID in many cases the application for a cost waiver is difficult and time consuming.
But PLEASE let the retaliation be toward TRUMP and his constituents not the American people
Also all Reality TV. That's where our nutjob president hails from.
We already know he's guilty. He was impeached once and no one did anything. Don't you Americans have a 2nd amendment for this exact reason Quit letting a tyrant run your country into the core of the earth
What difference would it make No one in power will do anything and the citizen won't do anything.
You just have to go through the links in the article. gt But Israel orldometers.info which had its first confirmed COVID 19 case en.wikipedia.org around the same time as Iceland did gt gt gt gt The first case of the 2019 20 coronavirus pandemic en.wikipedia.org E2 80 9320 coronavirus pandemic in Israel en.wikipedia.org was confirmed on 21 February 2020. From THIS covid.is link it looks like Iceland started minor testing in early February but really ramped up testing around March 15 when deCODE genetics stepped in. From THIS statista.com link it looks like Iceland was doing some testing from February 1 27 and then only had it's first confirmed case on February 28.
I wonder how the Republican's would be reacting if Hillary Clinton put her daughter's real estate investment husband in charge of this pandemic response
Putting Collins in the senate is like throwing away a number one draft pick to let your quarterback and running back play musical chairs. Fuck no. This is our chance to bring an extremely powerful family into the fold in our state. Her family modernized the stock exchange. When the feds go digital and have a secondary reserve it would be vital to have kelly in place to get the new digital federal reserve put in Atlanta. Doug can keep his ass in congress where I need him. Ga is red because we have a deep bench. Bringing in loeffler deepens that bench even more. I could careless about Doug s career aspirations. Every house member wants to be a senator. Too bad.
Perfect time for a pandemic. And those that do survive will go bankrupt as well. Add mass health related bankruptcies to an already crashing economy with 30 unemployment and you have a recipe for disaster.
Trumps ignorant son in law has been running everything. He's an Israeli asset.
Slip... you re not that clever to catch me in a slip... I know what I said. It was intended. I m proud of my service and that Captain.
I think they ve been pretty effective in getting FOIA requests.
A non citizen working with an ITIN can achieve the requirements to receive Social Security payouts.
I'm merely saying it's an issue of magnitude not of expert nuanced opinion. It's a brute force thing. Not finesse.
Ha. Haha. HAHAHAHSHAHHAHSASSSSSAAAAAA
there's literally nothing in this article other than we don't like jared kushner not a single thing
Remember when journalists had a steady paycheck from newspapers and were accountable to editors and fact checkers Before news became cheap to produce and clicks became the journalists currency. I remember.
Where does it cost money for a voter registration card I've never seen it.
He s really worried that kushner is gonna get caught with his hand in the cookie jar isn t he
Politifact rates it as half True politifact.com This was their summary Earnings for the bottom 10 seem to be rising faster but not by much and there are different ways to crunch the data. The measure he used also undercounts the earnings of the top 10 State level hikes in the minimum wage might have affected the earnings trends. So even if overstated the trend was in the right direction and all signs were still pointing towards progress.
This is merely a vindictive retaliatory tactic to distract from the pathetic failure of a response to the pandemic.
Nothing will happen. Nothing ever happens.
They all needs to be locked the hell up
What one the symptoms described by users on r covid19postive is extremely lucid dreams. Even those with mild symptoms. That might be what he means by hallucinations. Last time I had the flu I had the craziest fever visions.
I think I saw one of their shows was titled Outnumbered
Democrat policies. Just you watch...
How do 47 approve FML
We will defeat this invisible enemy by... praying.
This right here.
Trump is going to do it as long as people allow him to do it. It's the people who still approve of him that are the problem.
4 years too late
Please remember to be civil Rule 1
It's worse because they believe they are in the right.
Came here to say exactly this. NOT a coincidence just standard Republican Evil
They're difficult to compare since the Great Depression was almost entirely an economic crisis instead of our current combination of public health crisis and the added economic standstill. It's like 1918 and the 1930s blended together into an awful train wreck. There's no reliable data to quote or cite because something of this scale and extent has never happened before. There was never a time period in history where large portions of the entire world's economy were forced to a standstill during a pandemic which is highly transmissible and has now been carried to even the most remote corners of the world via air travel crippling healthcare systems. To be honest I don't even want to know the final numbers it's hard enough to come to terms with all of this as it is.
I bet they kept up articles about Christians holding services though.
She needs to be gone.. like now.
Hey I was wrong. No need for hostilty.
This just drips with teenage angst. It's just noise.
Cool
But because DR OZ says the CHINESE say it works you want to believe it Over proven testing methods that have cured treated tons of other deadly viruses Yeah let s go with DR OZ AND CHINESE PROPAGANDA. Trump is a draft dodging coward
Monkeys usually choose feces. So feces.
Kinda feels like a crappy facebook meme.
They are so tolerant though. Remember they are the adults in the room. What a crock.
Your type does better off in Staten Island
Her rhetoric is pro single payer because it s politically expedient. I m sure she believes in liberal policy positions but she is a prototypical neoliberal POS.
I know COVID 19 was a cisgendered white man It s time to pay it s fair share
gt she told me to just do what I wanted gt And we're fine as a marriage I really don't want to antagonize but that doesn't sound like you changed her mind by presenting her with facts and explaining that she fell for falsehoods on the internet
Just think who they'll vote for next time Even worse is possible
Your entire response is nuh uhh no way. So I think we're pretty much done here. gt Of course because you have no clue what you are talking about. I spent over a decade managing large scale logistics operations. I feel comfortable with my knowledge of how to streamline distribution. gt You haven't provided any information outlining the standard plan. The Bush administration wrote the standard plan. I have a copy of it. I've read it. Obama tweaked it and updated it. gt He didn't have to. That's the point. You are following your own delusions and claiming that Trump was wrong not to follow them. Oh I forgot you are an expert in logistics during pandemics. LOL. I'm not. Didn't claim to be. Spent over 10 years doing it and cannot claim to be an expert. Just speaking to my experience. While I am not an expert I'm not exactly a novice either. Are you an expert in logistics I'm willing to be wrong here. I know that military logistics is a different animal than what I did in the private sector. I'm not sure what delusions I'm following either but ok. Honestly this isn't going anywhere and frankly I am partially to blame. I'll continue this if we can have a conversation but if we're just going to launch salvos at each other's credibility then I have better things to do.
I can't freaking wait. I've been waiting to add an AR and a new Mossberg to my collection for a while. Maybe a 308 or something... Yeah. It's going to be a good 4th of July.
Aren t we too late to vote at this point
I think Wisconsin the UP and Minnesota could fit in in Canada. We love hockey and beer and curling. I know Wisconsin politics are pretty terrible but we're gerrymandered all to hell. The state actually leans a bit blue overall.
Hello there Great reference
Wow this mountain of a woman is that freaking young
It seems inconceivable to me that 47 approve. That is still way way too high
Lots of things are used as a pretext for a bunch of morons to do idiot things. Doesn't mean we throw out the baby with the bath water.
It's strange how all these witch hunts keep finding actual witches.
Friendly reminder that Cheeto Benito lost the popular vote. The majority of Americans do not support him and did not vote for him.
Yeah they are and you have no social safety net. Try your luck with unemployment and maybe remember this next time you vote
The wall of denial weakens with each new day of hundreds of deaths.
Welcome. This is one of the only subreddits you can disagree and not have people write profanity or be downvoted for disagreements. The people are usually quite lovely in my experience. I don t like that dumb bitch Nancy Pelosi though.
I don t think you know what that word means.
I don't know how much of it is clinging to a dream and how much is pure spite at this point but either way it's a powerful motivator.
What s it like being a useful idiot Kushner Just said he s got better numbers than the experts for ventilators in New York. What in the name of god s green butthole makes you think he s remotely qualified to make that call
True. This is the same guy that said that when Obama left office the military had zero ammunition. For real. ashingtonpost.com
It's been 57 years.
Feels bizarre doesnt it
Sure. And if there really is no stockpile at all like trump claims then he should have re filled it immediately right But the premise is wrong and the stockpile was there when Obama left.
The dude is such a douche bag. Give it another year and either CNN or MSNBC will give him his own show.
The rot adds extra protection thumps noggin
So Bernie should vote for trump
Trudeau needs to fight fire with fire. Stop our trade of pulp that these masks use. Fuck Trump and his blowhard attitude.
And nobody who needs to hear those stories will pull their heads of their asses to listen.
Isn't everyone except dumbasses against that
The experts if they were smart would stop being experts on the virus. Things move so quickly that you can be proven an inept moron pushing an agenda in just a few weeks or a few days. They should move over to the global warming scam where they can do their experting and not be proven wrong for a decade.
Hopefully we call them allies when they vote the bloviating half wit and his con artist family out of the White House. The problem however are the army of enablers who remain behind.
I would argue the contrary the failure of impeachment as a mechanism means it doesn't make the slightest difference who we put in office. Because no President is going to relinquish their power and very soon an intensely evil mildly intelligent character will get into office. And that will be the end.
56 years ago. Can confirm was born in 1964.
Because our democracy is more hollow than a natty lite can after a frat party
Maybe they should eat less avocado toast. I ve been told multiple times that ll make me be able to afford a house.
You need to examine your facts yes there are some questions but nothing like you think you know. reuters.com
You've obviously never played hockey.
C'mon you can do better than that. Even Snopes can figure out snopes.com that Trump was referring to democrats politicizing another issue to throw mud. What's more the topic is Pelosi and your immediate whataboutism sounds like you have no response to her inaction let alone her encouraging people to congregate outside in big cities like San Francisco.
In this case it s both. Depends on the shipments. Some were confiscated by the Fed. Some are suspected to be confiscated by the state of New York. Right now it s shrodinger s cat
He's been bragging about his ratings he thinks any attention is good. He doesn't even realize local channels stopped broadcasting his sludge.
Carbon monoxide is a conspiracy thought up by the leftists s
Seriously I broke a sweat from that spice level.
No they are illegals. And illegals not getting care or aid should be a sharp lesson for them and their supporters. They should be turned away at hospitals.
Yes as they should. I'm not offended by it because it's the right thing to do in this situation. Every country is a potential source of infection to other countries just like every person is a potential source of infection to other people. That's the whole idea behind social distancing and bans on non essential travel. I guess if the United States is viral factory compared to other countries the attempted entrants are better off being turned away. Btw we have been going back and forth quite a bit but I have yet to receive a convincing argument from you on why immigration laws should not be enforced during a global pandemic.
You can't yell fire into a crowded building unless it is on fire... You can't fire your weapons negligently in a neighborhood. You can't have grills and fire pits on an apartment balcony. Your statistical chance of dying from most of those things is probably pretty low. But this is an emergency not based solely on the percentage of people dying but on the number of people becoming seriously ill and our healthcare systems' ability to take care of those people. You can't simply say well I am comfortable risking my life because you could be a walking death sentence to someone else. And at this point your numbers are incomplete and meaningless. We don't know how many people died prior to testing we don't accurately know the statistics from China and we ultimately don't know how this will all play out. What's the threshold for you How many people have to die or become horriblly sick before you think the states should do something Having people stay home in the short term allows us to get ahead of the disease and make preparations for future waves. The requirements would be upheld by the Court under the state's police powers and under time place and manner restrictions.
But you must admit that those sites are much farther left leaning and therefore you see the radicals much more often. I don t have to search for those people. It shows up in my feeds every day in these sites.
Do your own homework.
I guess fucking shit up is a family business
So he didn't give any other reason to fire this guy except the fact that he was not 100 completely loyal to the current President and not the interest in the United States of America and our country's fair and free elections. Got it....
So by violating basic human rights as defined by the UN and the Constitution... Edit is freedom of movement not as important as the other basic human rights or do we not care about any of them if we are facing a crisis
If this were Trump's fault it would be headline news in on every outlet.
Canada should take any action required to prevent the US from killing our citizens. If they go through with depriving us of resources we need to take measures to fill in the gap. Those measures will inevitably be harmful but that is not our fault. We cannot sit back and do nothing or this will keep happening. The US cannot back people into a corner and then complain when they fight back. We may be polite and compassionate but there are limits. We help those who help us.
Nah I imagine the reason you are getting downvoted is because your narrative is taken from the point of view of Trump and the pandemic unit. The root cause of that issue is what the CCP did and the Wuhan flu getting dropped on the world by the CCP after they tried to censor destroy evidence and cover up it's origins and they continue to do so. We still would have been caught with our pants down because of the actions of the CCP. Hindsight is 20 20 of course but you trying to lay the blame of this on Trump and him getting rid of the NSC pandemic unit is pretty cheap. The bigger picture should be what is looked at and not what narrative you can type out for a gotcha moment.
gt a waste of time Welcome to reddit. I'm not sure what you thought goes on here but I can assure you we're not a group with a specific task or duty. Some people like myself often talk about more abstract concepts such as why people have various opinions. If you think that's a waste of time you're very welcome to not participate. gt It's also pretty clear by now that it is worse than a regular flu. Did I say it wasn't Rhetorical. Answer No. If you had bothered to read the thread you'd even see where I typed gt If people only compare it to the flu yeah it's bad. If they compare it to various other things there's a wider perspective.
Uhm I only submitted once I have no idea what you're talking about. Maybe someone else submitted the same video
It makes me upset. It feels like ignorance has taken more lives than the actual virus.
Thread aont about texas though
How wrong you are...you worship at the feet if men like stalin Mao's pol pot and marx. You are blinded by an ideology that has killed more people then the nazis. So get off your self righteous high wire because you are the worst humanity has to offer.
5 second rule applies to bail outs too apparently.
Thank you for sharing that. I do love a good discussion and for the most part that is what it is. Was a great link that enjoyed.
If they expired in 2010 that would be my guess since Obama took office in 2009.
Unfortunately the private office I don't have didn't come with a shower I also don't have.
Oh no you see he said he wouldn't follow that part right after he signed it.
After the fact Wait three months and reconsider that statement.
Haha what a great Babylon bee arti....
It's pretty fucked up what happened with this but this guy is a fucking hero or the people. A national treasure. Fuck trump.
Well I m not interested in listening to someone from another country lecture me about how the U.S ought to be. I happen to like it here and we are a pretty great country.
Hey. Know what would fix this problem Guarantee everyone access to healthcare with medicare for all.
okay so let's test that. Pick a top topic from r politics which as we know is pretty much something like r progressive left and tell me what kind of comment you would write under that post that normally would get replies like How does it feel to be brainwashed Then I can try to explain what these people think about what they are saying to you. You need to know that there are stupid people on every side of the political spectrum that are not really good with underlying their opinions with arguments. Some topics I would gladly discuss are Trump has handled the coronavirus the way he handles everything Like a toddler reddit.com Jared Kushner Is Going to Get Us All Killed reddit.com It's a sh sandwich' Republicans rage as Florida becomes a nightmare for Trump reddit.com Poll Majority of Americans Now Disapprove of Trump's Coronavirus Response reddit.com The coronavirus shutdown is revealing America's troubling obsession with work If the US stayed completely shut down for two months the typical US worker would work about the same number of hours this year as a pre pandemic German worker reddit.com CNN Fauci says U.S should issue nationwide stay at home order reddit.com Coronavirus 74 journalism professors call Fox News coverage a danger to public health Viewers of Fox News including the president of the United States have been regularly subjected to misinformation relayed by the network' says letter reddit.com
It s a border that essentials flow in two directions. This is not the time for such a battle but it wouldn t only be Canada that suffered it Donald persisted.
Or you can just go full racist as fuck Texan gt We hold as undeniable truths that the governments of the various States and of the confederacy itself were established exclusively by the white race for themselves and their posterity that the African race had no agency in their establishment that they were rightfully held and regarded as an inferior and dependent race and in that condition only could their existence in this country be rendered beneficial or tolerable.
Reality is biased.
It's possible but unlikely the weight stuff. The fever for sure. Fever delirium stuff is real.
Either 3M is an American company who will put Americans first or they're not. If they're not then they should be prepared to have their factories seized to help Americans.
His whole claim to success is the stock market and unemployment and I guess keeping Mexicans out. Now that the economy is in the toilet I figured that would be the nail in the coffin for our big Orange friend. Somehow I think it won t actually change any minds though.
Congratulations you named a few crimes in your list there. And what are your rights worth Millions of people have fought and died to ensure you have them. Liberty is dangerous sometimes. Glad to see you're happy to turn in your guns during the next crime spree to help prevent violence.
She s just dumb as hell
Thanks for the info. I didn t know that N95 mask is same as surgical mask. Glad to be on reddit learning so much.
By all means eat your own kind.
I feel so represented.
TRUMP
Look it up pretty much every definition of ad hominem is attacking the person rather than the argument. Ad hominem literally means to the man in Latin.
Then let his post through Can't be accused of harassment for allowing someone post right
I found reddit in general leans to the far left....as do the majority of the media. As far as I can see Trump could cure cancer and the media will find a way to find fault in it. I truly do not understand how the media that is suppose to report news can continually promote political agendas. So much info was put out about what Obama has done but no real media coverage. Honestly from an outsider I'm from Canada I can't stand how hypocritical some of the far left are. Also I can't imagine what living in a country without universal health care would be like. That's my only real complaint about the United States. If they had health care like Canada does i'd move in a heart beat.
Dude hung dong on Air Force One
Banned from r Conservative can an Australian foreigner with an opinion on world politics post here instead
I accept that I m very nearly there myself.
i.imgur.com
Bullshit Biden even if he were ineffective would allow the progressives in the House to pass all the shit they've been unable to pass so far. There's nothing like Trump in the history in the US and people saying that they'd rather have him than Biden are either delusional or have a secret agenda of their own.
Or crazy idea we could give someone with any experience in a relevant field a chance.
Bingo. This my letter wins bullshit was obviously a fucking failed experiment. There's no mention of it in the constitution patriots. ow and then answer popular ends they are likely in the course of time and things to become potent engines by which cunning ambitious and unprincipled men will be enabled to subvert the power of the people and to usurp for themselves the reins of government destroying afterwards the very engines which have lifted them to unjust dominion. George Washington. Pretty straightforward.
In theory yes. It would be amazing if this stuff wouldn't be necessary. But it is because people are dipshits and don't take it seriously. I'm all for freedom. But when exercising your freedom actively endangers others I think it's necessary to force people to stay inside.
For the past decade the federal government has been nurturing a group of about 50 epidemiologists and math modelers at universities. The U.S government launched the effort when it became apparent that U.S expertise in disease modeling was outstripped by England s world class experts said Dylan George a former Obama administration official at the White House Office of Science and Technology Policy who was involved in that effort. Since January the CDC has been working with that larger group of modeling teams but it has been unclear especially in recent weeks how much the White House was listening to their data and projections. The handful of projections the task force has plucked from the group and used in White House discussions administration officials said are sometimes deployed with an audience of one in mind Trump. Officials have said the Imperial College s eye popping 2. 2 million death projection convinced Trump to stop dismissing the outbreak and take it more seriously. Similarly officials said the new projection of 100 000 to 240 000 deaths is what convinced Trump to extend restrictions for 30 days and abandon his push to reopen parts of the country by Easter which many health experts believe could have worsened the outbreak. But what remains unclear and alarming to many modelers is whether the White House is using their data to create a coordinated coherent long term strategy. Such a national strategy is critical because of the lag time in data that comes with outbreaks. Any numbers we see today confirmed cases hospitalizations and deaths lag two to three weeks behind how the virus is spreading. So decisions made by authorities based on that present day data are almost by definition reactive and potentially come too late. To get ahead of a virus like this one authorities must use projections of the future to act in the present. A White House official who spoke on the condition of anonymity because the official was not authorized to speak by name said the administration does have long term plans and has been addressing those concerns in the daily briefings. Repurposing a car plant to make ventilators is great but honestly I m not one to cast stones but it could have been done earlier said Shaman the Columbia University epidemiologist whose models have been reviewed by the White House. But Shaman doesn t think the White House s death projection is too low nor does he think it s too late to act decisively. I think we can come in under 100 000 deaths. I do he said. The jury is not yet in on this.
Joy is the literal embodiment of a Karen.
It s like people from Spokane Washington
Why Dr. Brix needs information from WHO US intelligence warned the US Govt for weeks about a possible outbreak. Why did the Govt not force China to allow our doctors to learn about the virus
It's the new Senate not the current one. This is why congress is sworn in 3 weeks before the president
Cmon China travel ban was political move more than a sanitary one.
You know those perceived special liberties only extend to brown people that belong to the liberal plantation right
Uh this is like HR 101. Always fire someone on a Friday.
The only fact that anyone can learn from reading that comment is that you have absolutely no clue what a virus is.
I thought they could under the notion that ots for the safety of the people didn't john adams famously suspend the first amendment for safety he was hated but he dien't do anything illegal
Ever heard of desalination aurecongroup.com aurecongroup.com
Why don t you just move there.
Here kitty kitty.
gt This article doesn't say anything about blaming Trump. Are you illiterate I was responding to a comment not the article. gt And you're deflecting what he said by lambasting the effectiveness of stockpiling goods. So you do know I was responding to him yet you bring up the article. gt If you support states' rights you should be irritated that the federal government has a stockpile that they are unwilling to send to the states where you know Americans live. LOL... what are you yammering on about That's not what is happening. gt It's ok to say something critical about an administration that you generally support. You should start by making sense fellow conservative.
The flu can be incredibly bad. The Spanish Flu a century ago was by total body count the deadliest pandemic in human history and it was especially lethal to young adults. It killed more soldiers than WW1 did.
From COVID 19 yes...
I prefer Cartoon News Network based on characters.
Of course two minutes later the orange skinned leader praised President Xi of China because well he's a traitor.
r dogelore and r okbuddyclanker are good
As soon as you knew he was the captain of a carrier you should ve known he was a pilot...
How do pill heads get opioids with without a prescription
We didn t just halve the fucking thing. We turned it from a possible 1 3 million deaths to 100 200 thousand deaths. Why the fuck aren t you reading about the actual disease in the first place Why are you this much of a dump shit Can you please go be a liberal so we don t have to deal with you over here
That doesn't make any damn sense. What the fuck
January 20 2021 god willing.
i actually cannot sit through this without getting incredibly pissed off. this man is a disgrace he is a fool a mad man and a sadist. we cannot afford to joke around any longer. we should never go back to normal because it was never equitable. this needs to end.
He does like Germany.
Wasn't the guy and his wife huge Trump supporters
He s obviously talking about the Bible...
It's legal. But not moral
Thank you
Have you looked at Trump
1000 this. I already voted for Bernie in Illinois.
gt Those children wouldn't be here without the illegal alien parents. That is a valid analysis. It even subtracts the estimated amount of taxes illegal aliens pay. It's incredibly exhaustive. True they wouldn t be here without their parents but the report is still false if it claims that fiscal burden is being caused by illegals when it s literally caused by citizens. Not to mention we have no data breaking down whether or not the children were born while the parents may have been here legally. Remember that a lot of illegal immigrants just end up staying once their status expires. Not everyone is sneaking across the boarder. The study also shoehorned everyone who s status is currently up in the air or who have been given exceptions. The authors seem to go out of their way to increase their numbers. gt Edit There's a very valid criticism of jus soli citizenship that was simply deemed valid by government apparatchiks not by any law or court decision despite the explicit discussions around the 14th amendment by those that wrote it. That s a different argument I honestly don t know enough to argue either way but what we re discussing is the ramifications of illegals. The way things are now those children are 100 legal and thus entitled to those benefits costs. I can understand disagreeing with it but that s our current reality.
No you re thinking of the life long democrat and business partner of George Soros whose father bought his ticket into Harvard who married his way into the white house and who had Chris Christie canned as revenge for his role in his father s prosecution. Jared Kushner makes Stephen Miller look like a Noble Prize winner.
No Pelosi came and fucked all the shit up
Yes because personally shaming Trump for a pandemic that has affected every country in the world is really a good use of taxpayer money. You all take this circle jerk of Trump hate a little too far sometimes... you sound like children and THIS is exactly why everything you said here is just a pipe dream. Because winning the election in a landslide isn't enough no... you want revenge and to publicly shame someone and waste money to do so. This is just pathetically sad at this point. Go out and do something instead of bitching from behind your keyboard about the people that are.
Clearly this was sarcasm. Had to gently hang up on conspiracy theorist friend today. She was convinced that Covid 19 is not real just a show and martial law is coming and they will take our guns. Trust me you can tell the difference.
It was fine to impeach him last time. Impeaching him now is just flat out wrong. The American public will see it as the Democrats playing politics when they should be saving lives. We want the public to think that of Trump not the Democrats. Oversight is fine.
Probably cheaper than the bail out the big companies just got.
Where is Ja
Trump Fuck yeah
And remember that he is eligible for a State Funeral with Full Military Honors.
gt Human life is valuable because of freedom You're not thinking for yourself. You're repeating phrases and not understanding what you're saying. Freedom to kill someone isn't the purpose of life. Obviously people will kill their children if it's illegal or not. That's why there are dumpster babies and smothered children and people who kill their kids randomly. That doesn't make it an ok thing to do. Human life is valuable because humans have potential to do amazing things like create and learn and explore. Every single human regardless of their origin has potential. When you murder someone you end their potential right then and there for selfish reasons. There's no right to murder despite many people wanting to kill others.
Joe Biden is going to get shredded by trump... terrible democratic candidate.
It s because people broke sports apart by gender when nobody knew about the difference between sex and gender. Then people started understanding and they haven t changed yet. Sports are separated because males are on average stronger than females so the sports need to be separated by sex not gender. It s ludicrous that it hasn t changed yet.
Your Mom is fine you're the one who is insane and not speaking from experience. Listen to your Mom she knows better than you do. NazisWereSocialists
Why do you think Dems have pushed the fascist and Nazi tags since Trump won Everybody agrees Nazis and fascists are bad so their supporters can be violent and otherwise treat any person who thinks differently as less than human. We know what happens when a group is seen as less than human. They literally took their playbook out of 1930's Germany.
Wow this sub is trash after all
Why didn t we hear more about the very real horror show flu pandemic of 2017 2018 During the 2017 2018 season the percentage of deaths attributed to pneumonia and influenza P amp I was at or above the epidemic threshold for 16 consecutive weeks. During the past five seasons the average number of weeks this indicator was above threshold was 11 range of 7 to 15 weeks Nationally mortality attributed to P amp I exceeded 10. 0 for four consecutive weeks peaking at 10. 8 during the week ending January 20 2018. cdc.gov
No
When does Liam Neeson come in and help us
Consider that Trump and his corrupt associates almost destroyed and hid the evidence of his Ukraine election rigging extortion and bribery scheme. This IG was the only one that did the right thing. And now a corrupt firing with an attempt to bury it under the news that Trump's incompetence just allowed twice as many deaths as 9 11 in just one week.
You go Glen Beck Not ever changing your mind is the hallmark of great thinkers or is it the hobgoblin of little minds I forget but whichever one means you're an idiot that's the one
Yeah that was my understanding too. We re on the same page. Given the fact that we both lost our jobs financial pragmatism says take the 2nd option in order to allow us a bit more time before we can t make rent and hope we don t get sick with anything other than COVID. Really sucks to have to stop seeing my therapist and psychiatrist at the time it might be most helpful.
A kidnapping is always bad. It s a terrible metaphor. It doesn t apply in the slightest. Someone who is sick is impossible to tell because of the nature of the virus. Someone who isn t sick has the possibility of still transferring the virus to others. That s how viruses virus hosts and immunity works. You want me to come close to your grandma now knowing these facts I tell you what go institute all those libertarian policies you want instituted and see how an individual reacts the second you come close to someone s loved one even though your claiming to not be sick. You d get a bullet in between your eyes if you came close to anyone I loved. Be a man and stop putting others in danger by spreading this bullshit.
OP s comment like smoldering fire. This comment like raging fire.
They are Combat Action Badges So that was the first clue it was BS. Second clue was the fact that IEDs are fucking fatal. If someone was such a glory hound they wanted awards and adulation they are going to do whatever it took to get home alive so they can tell people about all of their awards. Driving over IEDs is not really inline with those goals.
Lmao libertarians are getting wrecked. Take the L forever
gt Across the three surveys one thread remains Democrats are more concerned about getting the coronavirus than Republicans 97 to 80 while independents fall in between with 92 The concern levels in the newest poll represent a high for all three ideological groups. Only 3 of Democrats and 8 of independents are not concerned compared with 20 of Republicans. gt Differences by party are even starker when looking at those expressing a high level of concern. Among Democrats 61 say they are very concerned followed by independents at 53 and Republicans at 33
Dude heat shock proteins.
Minimum wage at a national level is foolish anyway and wages seem to be rising despite minimum wage being so low. Do minimum wage jobs even exist anymore
Now do Biden
Biden's basically already won the primary doesn't really matter all that much who an individual votes for at this point
During this difficult period many people do not want to risk driving to the stores or banks. I'll be more than happy to pick up your money from Chase on your behalf. Please send me your debit card at the following address Prince Hakim 1 King Jaffe Avenue Lagos 12345 Nigeria I will then sanitize your cash using the latest money laundering machine. After the money dries they will be sealed in food grade vacuum bag. A special bonded carrier will delivery the money to your home or office via contactless method. There is a modest 3 fee for this service. gratuity not included
I don t mean to be disrespectful to military but how is this any more heroic than the people working fast food right now It s not like those guys are volunteers they re getting paid and it s a very low risk job...
Being off by a factor of four isn't that bad. This virus spreads exponentially and they had limited data. Getting the predictions to within an order of magnitude would be extremely difficult in this situation and they managed to do it. Good on the CDC doctors
The landlord is still responsible for repairs. They won't have to pay a mortgage but their 2000 a month won't cover every persons repairs. Landlords are responsible for the safety and upkeep of their properties. Rent pays for that in part. Landlords don't collect rent just to pay their bills and make money they also have to keep their property livable.
Morons Are Governing America
The real shithole country was inside us all along.
TeamKentucky We love Andy this is the Governor I voted for
Really good question and well asked.
For me It does. I am somewhat of a free market fan who has a bit of a bad taste for these things. But as someone else mentioned food is national security. I sure as hell can get over it in this case.
Are they all made of pulp I ve seen n95 respirators with and without plastic and green respirators too. Are thesie all the same thing as surgical masks Sorry for my ignorance. Just want clarification from someone that knows.
the worst case scenario is not doing it. just think about it hospitals become overwhelmed with sick people. we also have other diseases which are getting worse and worse because hospitals are full with covid cases and can not address other cases accordingly. medical professionals are becoming more and more exhausted and depressed. this will become a problem in the near future and will also affect the economy for sure. we either have this inconvenience OR many dead people this inconvenience...
Biden is the architect of the Patriot Act. He was part of the Administration that oversaw the rise of PRISM. I'll not vote for one distopian leader over another.
You'd have to be an Anti American to read theblaze...
This is the greatest example of a straw man arguement. Of course she isn't okay with the Holocaust. Taking a quote out of context making it seem that she is fine with mass extermination of Jews as long as in is foreign is a straight up lie. Taking her out of context is completely unfair but typical.
Ok don't get mad at me but I don't see the issue here. We definitely need a review because the states and federal government alike were grossly underprepared for this. The CDC's testing mishap in February cost us tons of valuable time. There was a major lack of stockpiles on the state levels. All this needs to be looked at for sure I do get that Schiff is still the impeachment man and he was a complete partisan hack during the impeachment however I watched his interview on this review. He already said it should come after the election and at a time when nobody will think it's politically motivated Maybe he's not the man for the job idk but given that he's only talking about doing this after elections probably sometime a few months into next year I don't see any issue with that
Warren wanted a whole commission whose sole purpose was prosecuting Trump and his people.
His first name is doctor last name Phil.
Jared kushtard will be a TREMENDOUS inspector general
Blacklist this garbage. mediabiasfactcheck.com mediabiasfactcheck.com
And your own recording of the conversation.
Schumer is a joke and a piece of shit. He got called out on his lying bullshit by Trump and it was priceless there's no other way to describe it. It was just another reason I love Trump Everytime I see Schumer speak it reminds me of how bad Democrats are.
You're a bit off base here. At least from my experience. We have extremely capable unconventional forces trained and extensively experienced in needs of the modern battlefield. Infoops. Psyops. Insurgent and counter insurgent warfare. Training. Advisement. The problem isn't that the military isn't ready or capable it's more complex and dangerous than that. We have extensive political involvement directing our budget and rewriting our mission and goals constantly. We have key decision makers who are essentially politicians in uniform playing games of realpolitik and allowing or goals and directions to change every two years or faster. Our budget is massively bloated with mandatory purchases and contracts for things we dont want or need. We're incredibly capable. But we have rot and corruption down through us from on high downward.
E Verify is voluntary in most states.
But right now it s bat fucking
An officer who leaked information about a gap in readiness to the enemy might've been shot 80 years ago. Now they're celebrated. No wonder the military and the country are going down the tubes. China knows the future is theirs.
They re also a false solution to environmental concerns given the huge difference in CO2 production caused by cloth reusables and bag for life bags compared to single use carriers.
politico.com
It's also wrong people dying for the economy is not a thing it's with all that is Republicans completely fabricated nonsense. The economy dies with the people. Like there is some magic roadside stall that lets you trade human lives for stonk points. It's beyond madness.
I got someone in my PMs saying they are we No joke we I thanked them for we re s time. I think we missed the joke. We already forgot that We Are Legion.
Still though you're right. They were given a choice. But they stayed.
Straight up facts I'm here in FL and I've been hearing the same from farmers here and other states. The fact of the matter is that American's don't truly want to work those jobs but cry about it like they would.
Holy smokes. This was my first foray into assessing the logic of a racist and I ve learned a lot. Thank you I guess
Muslims also say Subhanallah during times of personal trial and struggle as a remembrance of purpose muslimmatters.org and a refuge in the beauty of creation. Literally from the exact article you linked. Are you being willfully ignorant
gt If ye love wealth better than liberty the tranquility of servitude better than the animating contest of freedom go home from us in peace. We ask not your counsels or arms. Crouch down and lick the hands which feed you. May your chains set lightly upon you and may posterity forget that ye were our countrymen. Samuel Adams
Do bed bugs carry Covid19
Well yeah the argument is is lowering temperature X degrees worth collapsing the economy for worse energy alternatives
Agreed. Flyover country is going to come out and support Trump. Even moderate Democrats are going to support him because Trump is the guy you want to rebuild the economy... not sleepy Joe.
My wife is a hospitalist she says HCQ is doing nothing except lowering her patient seizure thresholds. She is now currently dealing with a bunch of seizing covid19 patients who aren t getting any better.
Thank you I'll have to look more into this.
In other news bank robber hired to count money....
Treading closer to Hungary every day...
If they stayed for the first four years of Trump what's the chances they are leaving now
He has said that he resigned and he s not the pope. Pope Francis is the actual pope even if we disagree with him at times.
Running with Biden is like being asked if you'd like to get Covid 19 or Ebola.
The only things I'm seeing are that people are being turned away. It sounds like you don't have sources to back up your claim.
They want us to step over the line. I feel like the Dems want Trump to step over a line they can say SEE HE WANTS TO BE A DICTATOR I'm tired of it. The man ain't perfect no one in a black swan event would be. Jesus stop with the attacks and let's help people. Let's find ways to help each other.
Isn t going to work not now. Not ever
arlingtoncemetery.mil
New people should gun. Times like this really remind you why guns exist. If the economy goes to shit for 6 months and hungry criminals start raiding your neighborhood for the food in your freezer you're going to feel real stupid for not exercising your right to own a firearm. Maybe the bandits will take me down but I'll be able to live with myself knowing I tried. There is a reason that the 2nd amendment is literally the 2nd one. The 1st amendment gives us the right to our opinions and the 2nd one gives us the right to defend ourselves as long as defending those opinions on our own property. Theres a reason it's the 2nd one. It's pretty fucking important. It's also the reason other countries would have a hard time waging war with us on our soil. If they were able to get past our military you have hundreds of millions of armed citizens. Theyd have to take everyone of us out. Itd be real hard
Well we DID say they had to stop dumping their garbage in the ocean. Guess they just decided to send it to Europe...
gt Yes y all better vote blue no matter fucking who or y all are helping trump win. It s that simple. Give us a good candidate and I'll be more than happy to
Just look into it...
Your taking me way too serious.
gt If Washington spends another 13. 4 trillion paying businesses to stay closed while continuing to employ people who aren t working instead of asking the businesses what they need in order to reopen despite the coronavirus We ll have Venezuela conservative commentator Mark Levin said Thursday. Si es verdad.
Really My grandfather was removed from his parents and given to a white family as a child but he was full blood umpqua national. I have always been removed from that part of my heritage because my grandpa was taken away. I could get money monthly from the tribe but I don't take it because I feel like it would be wrong. But I am starting to learn about my heritage and culture which is amazing. And the tribe has been SO welcoming. They are actively seeking out people with blood ties even small ones and bringing them into the fold. I'm sorry you have not had the same experience. I know it is a hard thing for many as mixed white native children started out often as the product of rape or slavery forced marriage. Their full blooded children were often removed and out in group homes or given to white families like my papa and many were killed at the hands of these people. There is a LOT of historical trauma and that can make some members of tribes more unwelcoming to outsiders. Not saying it is right wrong just saying some of the things that likely contributed to their behaviors
The 5th amendment law.cornell.edu allows for depriving people of their life liberty or property if it is under the due process of law. The authority outlined in the federal register spells out their due process. gt nor be deprived of life liberty or property without due process of law
When they all get sick I guess it will everyone else s fault.
Not that would take Trump's check
Patience
Sure they can. Just watch.
nytimes.com
mobile.twitter.com ref src twsrc 5Etfw 7Ctwcamp 5Etweetembed 7Ctwterm 5E1178986524630802432 amp ref url https 3A 2F 2Fwww.bloomberg com 2Fnews 2Farticles 2F2019 10 01 2Ftrump congrats china while republicans criticize communist rule
Im with the cultural appropriation police a unit within the PC division. Are you from the south or some other culture that used ya'll on a regular basis prior to 2 years ago when it became trendy to use
Why would you say hold people accountable and then post a link that is factually incorrect Isnt that contributing to the problem
So you ride 14 miles a day on your bike You're far more fit than the average American then. Kudos. I'll enjoy my air conditioning while I drive twice that distance on my way to work. It's just not a viable option for the average Joe. Also need a source on your numbers. I'm finding them to be incorrect on www.worldclimate com found via Google search.
Just look at those soulless eyes. This guy has seen snuff films or made them.
I think it's a bit more profound considering New York is Trump's home as well.
Trump s down playing the virus Now he s over playing the virus Trump isn t listening to Fauci Now he s listening to Fauci These people will oppose anything Trump does the moment he does it and the estimate was 100 000 240 000. And if this really is a major major threat as we ve been told for weeks now of course you re going to make less conservative assumptions when you make projections so as not to underestimate the risk. Granted I don t believe using over estimates to scare people into complying but the Washington Post can t have it both ways.
Can someone please explain to me why conservatives are pushing so hard for this drug Do they all own shares in the manufacturer or something They have they all just suddenly decided this is a hill they're all going to die on. 37 of doctors feel it's a good drug cool that means 63 think it's bullshit. On literally anything else that wouldn't be a news story.
Big beautiful book titles. The biggest.
Would love a link. It's the first I've seen of it since seeing it live. This and the It's a great time quote bc we are borrowing at zero for infrastructure amidst all of this were the 2 most appalling comments made this evening. Sad to me that I sit jaw dropped wondering if enough see the same things and doubt it.
Donald Trump listens to only Donald Trump.
think Bob Marley I shot the chopper I shot the chopper down
So
Do you or do you not support free markets If you do then you should be outraged by trump telling a MNC where they can sell their product. If you don't then you're not really a conservative.
Geee. Big surprise.
I think I'm OOTL on this one lol
yep it's unprecedented and new territory a new period. imo we are in a greatest depression. no baselines no benchmarks no anecdotal anything.
it amazes me that they don't realize that if we cripple the economic centers of our country the red states are going to pay a price financially as well besides the effects of the coronavirus. The coastal States are the GDP powerhouses and most of the red states are welfare states in that they take more federal dollars than they pay into the pool and blue states tend to pay in more federal dollars than they get back. This is going to cause a cascade effect when those federal dollars aren't available because blue states are crippled.
gt That is a fucking stupid question considering that she recently worked hard to pass a bipartisan deal It's a stupid question for reasonable people. But the question wasn't contrived for reasonable people. It was published for the audience of Murdoch's New York Post which is a stupider meaner edition of Fox News. This is a talking point he wants the Post's audience to recite so it's not required to make sense it only has to reinforce the base's per existing biases and irritate reasonable people. You can bet the Post's audience will recite this nonsense with even more enthusiasm and conviction than if it were the truth.
Elections are managed by the states. Washington already votes entirely by mail. Trump has no say in the matter.
r onejoke
On what basis are they disagreeing
Half the country makes 30k. its not far fetched why there are people who are uninsured. you sound spoilt as hell
LOL... thanks Nazi Review.
What can we do sooner before more people die
This isn't frenworld. And this article makes fun of Pence as much as it makes fun of Pride month. In short people need to lighten up.
Dawg if you re comparing that orange cunt to MLK you gotta really do some thinking
I think it s by design. Throw out terrifying numbers and less people will be willing to break the stay at home orders.
Times might be a little tough for the short term but if this were the 60 s you might be humping around the jungle in Vietnam Nam getting shot at. Sitting home for awhile is better.
You say this as if there isn t enough money for everyone wtf
I like to call the President moron if we re calling spades spades and all that
Well unless your comment was a reply to a different comment that isn't loading for some reason it seems you just commented opinion piece on an article which is obviously an opinion piece. So the only reason I can think of that someone would comment that is to imply that there is something inherently wrong with opinion pieces.
Witch hunt It hasn t even started. LMAO. He s already planning some crooked shit.
Roxham Road was shut down 2 weeks ago which marks the first time Canada has denied asylum seekers since WWII
Come on just look at it it's beautiful. It's super good at living outside the body 25 of the people get it are only carriers incubates for almost 30 days it doesn't kill most immediately It demands heavy medical intervention to prevent the15 kill total can spread on the spittle of someone speaking loudly or singing.... As weapons go it's a pretty well designed weapon.
Nebraska is still doubling cases every 4 5 days. With 255 cases yesterday unless they take stronger measures that means they can expected to reach around 14 thousand cases by May 1. RemindMe eom
Agree 100 I served about as many years as the acting weenie secnav. Crozier knew what was going to happen to him. He did what he thought he was right anyway. They'll replace him with a yes man and we will continue to get weaker. At this point we have a bunch of empty suits appointed to command our armed forces. I emailed a friend that is still active today and lamented that I am actually embarrassed by our country. First time in my life. Hopefully Crozier is ambitious and we can elect him to go battle the dbags in dc.
90 of the resulting panic was because of the initial panic. Like a shit if they buy it all how will I get what I need This resulted in people who have no need to panic buy to panic buy.
and he still looks exactly the same.
Known colloquially as FTIYTTRYTTAYWBYTTBMY.
At least Pence has some governing experience. And from what I ve read he s been the go between for the governors and the White House.
It blows my mind that people are worried about this right now. Lol
they chose this let them die
I need to talk to my crack dealer then. See if he can get a state exemption. s
Nah everyone knows this is Trump and his lackeys and not the USA as a whole. When he gets voted out there will be a great purging and things will get back on the right track.
1st world is a term given to countries that sided with the Allies after WWII with 2nd world countries having sided with the Axis powers and 3rd world countries having not been involved at all
TLDR.
He circumvented the chain of command by circulating his letter publicly. Doesn't matter if he was in dire need. Even an E 1 knows to use the proper channels. The Navy made the right call.
Wow you came to all those conclusions based solely on my criticism of the way Trump speaks. That's impressive. It sounds like you've constructed an alternate reality for yourself that auto sorts and characterizes people based on whether they agree with you. But I don't know you and you clearly don't know a damned thing about me. None of that BS describes me except that I fancy myself an intellectual because I do which is why I went to grad school and why I'm working toward my PhD. I'm miles away from being an expert in anything but I'm aware of how intelligent people speak. I'm surrounded by them every day.
Reddit should be used just for memes now. This. I didn t come to Reddit originally as a news source. I came to Reddit for memes and quick tidbits.
Ok look he should have put a step to Fox News from spreading that narrative. He allowed them to tell their viewers that it was a hoax. That is a bullshit side step to claim that he did not use those exact words. He implied it and encouraged that disinformation. He could have saved lives if he had said it was not a hoax and people should take it seriously Time is of the essence people are dying because trump and fox downplayed the threat. It is an indisputable fact.
Do I need to post the collage of the MSM downplaying it for weeks Or point out the fact that while the virus became a pandemic Pelosi and the democrats had a single focus impeachment And that said impeachment is what distracted all but 14 Senators to attend a White House briefing about the virus
gt Alright man stay safe out there. I want you to remain safe and healthy. And I hope that when the nonsense is over you have a job to go back to.
Then I must have gotten mixed up my apologies.
What s Trudeau gonna do about it Cry
I get it. As long as they can be lifers we are screwed.
You have absolutely no idea how this virus spreads. It doesn't emit off of you like the smell that comes off of your disgusting body after 4 weeks of not showering. It's also not aerosolizing so it isn't spreading through your putrid breath. It's coming from droplets that are spread when you cough. Even if that wasn't the case don't fucking go outside if you are such a coward.
Pretty much everything about this administration is unacceptable
That was exactly what I said when the alert buzzed my phone. I m sitting on the couch decompressing watching me some Indiana Jones and BAM FOR FUCK S SAKE
Why is anybody repeating this nonsense They can't even be bothered to put in the actual facts. You know like the part where the only people cheating are Republicans npr.org
Probably unaware that pro life people adopt at a much higher rate than the general population. Believes the lie that pro life up until they're born
The incubation period is longer than two weeks. You are already absolutely wrong. You don't become contaminated just by touching something. That thing first has to be contaminated. You are obviously not very educated on this subject.
As his nose knocks over the microphone.
pjmedia.com
Voting is a necessary but insufficient part of what it takes to maintain a democracy. Voting by itself will not save you.
I ve never even heard of that domain but I assumed it was satire literally based on the post text. Is it not that obvious to some people
Yes. Sanders didn't need a new strategy. His plan all along was to either win the primary outright or push the eventually nominee left. It worked and now's the time to make sure that nominee actually wins and implements some of his goals. If your goal is just to help Trump win by spreading conspiracy theories about dementia pedophile sex rings in pizza restaurants or secret religious beliefs etc. then be my guest. But if you actually want some progressive change now's the time to stop playing into Trump's hands. nbcnews.com
Somebody stop me
gt complaining about the name of a virus See that s the thing... I m not complaining about the name. I know the name and so does everyone else and it s not what you re calling it and that s my complaint. I didn t say anything about coverups or evidence I only asked why you re calling something known worldwide by one name a totally different name. As far as you know I agree with whatever it is you re saying. So again why are you calling it Wuhan Flu when nobody else is calling it that It s confusing and therefore ineffective which is the point of a name so you must have a reason other than efficiency to call it that. What is it
The person I replied to is MIT educated with a PhD. They stayed for for 4 years of Trump. Highly unlikely they're leaving now.
One can hope the people take their country for their own.
People need to stop watching Fox news They re another pandemic that needs to get vaccinated.
I don t like mail in voting but that s because i got beef with the post office in my hometown.
There are no laws anymore.
I actually played in marching band with one of the guards for the tomb he was a really cool guy
You could write headlines for Fox
Property rights do not end just because someone has more of something someone else needs or wants. I don't get to seize your house because you have more rooms than you need and I want them. People like you think it's great when the government seizes other people's property. Just wait until it's yours. I thank you for your service but neither you or anyone else are above constitutional rights laws of possession or the law of supply and demand.
No Well that's news to me. metrotimes.com gt While COVID 19 can infect anyone regardless of race or class African Americans have historically been more likely to have higher rates of chronic medical conditions such as heart disease diabetes and cancer in the United States. We know that people with these underlying medical conditions are more likely to become severely ill from COVID 19. There is a correlation between being Black and your probability of being poor. There is a correlation and arguably a causational link between being poor and having chronic diseases. There is a clinical and etiological link between having a chronic disease and dying of COVID 19. AOC can say what she wants and you can disagree with that but let's not be fools to the facts.
Wouldn't shouting bomb on airplane be an indirect impact on others Shouting bomb creates a panic then others responding in panic create the unsafe situation. The people stampeding others are the ones directly impacting peoples rights. This example is admittedly more of a direct impact than people ignoring stay home orders. But I think it's important to show that a direct impact isn't necessary before we start discussing how direct the impact has to be.
Why you lose weight when your sick verywellhealth.com Again have you ever been sick It s not due to just sweating which yes is a symptom of coronavirus even if you think you don t sweat when having a fever not everyone has fevers 24 7 while sick with covid Many people are reporting vomiting diarrhea and loss of appetite. Dehydration is real risk especially if you can t keep everything down. Check out r COVID19positive Tons of examples of this. Or are they all lying there as well
So far everything I ve seen you comment on this post and I m about half way down is Murhur the government is evil and trying to take away my fuckin rights You were given tangible evidence not only tangible evidence but real world examples and you re just Nah sounds like big government doing big government things. You are everything wrong with the two party system of government. Unwilling unbending blind devotion to one cause even if that cause is wrong or you re ill informed. We ve already established you re a mental midget but are you a troll account To be continued.
Maybe all those lefty cities would have thought before passing hair brained legislations that just served to increase cost of living by passing onerous housing legislations. The Bay area Seattle LA NYC City governments raised the cost of living for their residents through this kind of tax the rich tax the owners schemes created huge deficits trying to fix boutique issues and created an untenable situation for most working people. Truth be told in these cities and many more 3000 payments is too little for the cost of living involved all the fault of politicians like these.
I read water polo is just hydrogenated air hockey.
I'll bring the chips and salsa.
He sent that to his admirals That is not an emotionally charged letter that is a holy shit I m out of options my people may die needlessly I m gonna burn my career but I m gonna get results. Don t think this Captain ever thought he was gonna get out of this with his command intact. I have chanced my rank more than once in an emotional moment to make sure my people were good to go.
Yes because chugging fish cleaner is toxic and the actual drug can be safely administered by doctors.
not the K10S pulp that is needed. only Canada makes that.
One of the side effects of HCQ is seizures its not anecdotal its proven. The issue at hand is that it is not helping covid pts in our area as advertised. So all these people with underlying seizure disorders are now being brought below their threshold after being dialed in with their anti epileptic medications for years. There really is nothing we can give to stop this virus right now. Remdesivir is clinical trial only and even those case reports are mixed. A vaccine appears our best shot.
I looked down the tube of an RPG that had been fired at us and it hit the chopper in front of us. Here's a view of rockets I have never seen passing underneath us 1 500 feet beneath us. And we've got the gunner doors on this thing and I'm saying to the general some four star en.wikipedia.org It wouldn't take much for them to adjust the aim and try to do a ring toss right through our open doors would it Anytime you want to cross over to the other side baby travel with me. I became very sick with dysentery our hotel was overrun with gangs I was rescued in the stairwell of a five star hotel in New Orleans by a young police officer. Brian Williams' fantasies
Maybe he'd only vote once at least.
He also promised us it would all be over by Easter and it looks like I m having to cancel my fishing trip.
Spanish flu killed 50 million
We had to. healthcare workers pharmacists grocery store clerks depend on public transportation. Supply of masks is zero here in stores. Supply cant keep up.
When he's actually awake.
25A is long overdue.
thenewamerican.com Oh yes it will
Holy shit you did not just use the potential for nuclear holocaust as a legitimate argument here. I know you're exaggerating but still that's just so far off. Overestimations of the impact of coronavirus are still estimations based on data and modeling. Your fun story about how we could all end up in a nuclear holocaust is based on nothing objective. WWII was not started because of the great depression. Obviously the economic situation of Germany post WWI contributed to the rise of Hitler and Nazi Germany but it is ridiculous of you to float that as a reasonable series of events that deserves to be considered as legitimate as scientifically based models of infection. Shelter in place will eventually end. The longer this goes on the more people will have had the virus and those people will have immunity. Eventually herd immunity will take hold and we won't be at severe risk. Coronavirus has been in the United States for roughly a month. Viral infections take almost a month for the immune system to fight off from beginning to end. We are still in the first wave of infections and you're already to kill science backed policy decisions because if we hurt the economy too much we could all die in a nuclear holocaust.
She always looks like she just got out of a wind tunnel.
Really Pretty pathetic of ya tbh.
I m 100 behind background checks and I m well aware they aren t just trying to take our guns away but they ll slide petty shit into the policies they support like banning accessories and parts. That doesn t sit well with me on principal. This isn t even a subject I care about when voting for a presidential candidate. My wife and I are both Democrats and I m slightly more socialist leaning than she is. That doesn t mean I ll automatically vote for any candidate that says they support healthcare for all childcare for all student loan forgiveness etc. blindly.
Sure it was just a wink and a nod then eh He did not correct his fox family when they called it a hoax. He doesn t get a pass in my book and so what. The issue is he failed to act because it was politically inexpedient and he is a moron.
There s not enough tests. Why would making them free increase testing when we can only test people with severe symptoms and people who have been in direct contact with positive cases.
They rigged the 2016 election from the outside with fear of criminal prosecution if caught. Now they have full control of the treasury courts DOJ military senate Supreme Court and more. If they're not careful he'll somehow end up with 200 of the vote.
We gave you Meghan Markle and we watch the Oak Island nonsense. What else do you want
Yea I don't know why I'm getting downvoted. Ive voted Republican since I was old enough to vote....fuck the downvoters
Let me go take a look at our Probe stockpile
So... is r conservative turning against Trump
You just aren t informed LeBron James
What about study results or actual data rather than opinions We just don't have the proper data for it. In the small study in NYC 3 people died before completing the drug course so they were not included. Similarly one who got better left before finishing so she was not included. We just don't know if it works still beyond what the President said it has promise.
10 million Americans filed for unemployment this week the rent crisis is about to start a catastrophic chain reaction of inability to pay Congress just passed a stimulus bill that will further widen the wealth gap the stock market has seen it s worst days IN THE HISTORY OF THE US and the entire world is about to enter a recession that if handled incorrectly will prove far more catastrophic than the 2008 recession. China is trying to use this to usurp our place as the leader of the world. Iran is war posturing.
This is my theory of why they are hiding the national stockpile. Jared was honest when he said it was theirs. Theirs to sell for profit to suppliers who then will resell at profit to the states and hospitals. I am sure that they know how much states are willing to spend as they are desperate and the prices go up based on the bidding wars by the states which the feds then outbid sell again later rinse repeat. This makes me sick. I hope i am wrong but someone needs to look into it.
gt and should be taken seriously Of course it should I don't see anyone saying otherwise. The argument here is whether or not guns should be used to enforce those best practices or not.
The same people advocating for these quarantines will be the same people in two years screaming that capitalism doesn t work because of the horrible economic depression we will still be in. And they won t see even the remotest connection between the two.
I'm not against more affordable healthcare nor is any conservative. I personally support safety nets. Where we differ is how we are supposed to pay for it. I don't support giving the government more money when they should already be able to balance the budget. I support a free market alternative that makes health care providers compete so that they're forced to lower costs. I want to see the costs to be transparent and known before someone steps into the medical room. I'm also fine with giving some form of free healthcare to people who unable to pay for it but it will be very stripped down and only contain the essentials. People who pay more should get more for what they pay for.
Either we vote or we're having an armed rebellion. What's the point of having 300 400 million guns in private ownership if we're afraid to use them literally the only time they matter
Take care of those who MAY become homeless first then help the others.
Canada supplied the US with the materials to make the masks.
They probably cant be recalled unless their district does so. They can be censured and removed from Speakerships and other leadership positions. They can be removed as chairs and they should lose these. All of them should lose all rank and be censured in public and on the record and one by one so that CSPAN can record each person's fall from grace as an object lesson for the coming generations.
So voter ID programs are correlated with making only 1. 25 a day Andy you want to emulate that
Great to have you
And the selected leader gets control in 2 more months after that
I didn't bend facts. I presented a series of facts that show a trend in the state that differs from the narrative being pushed. On paper Arkansas as a state is handling Covid dramatically better than the other states it's lumped in with. In fact statistically it's literally one of the better states overall.
The dingbats with or without guns like him. The rational people don't Since the rational people have something to live for.... no assassination attempts. Honestly the thing I am most surprised by is the lack of any publicized attempts on Obama's life. Because you know... black dude.
So any guesses what Kushner meant when he said the stockpile was ours Who's the we in that statement if it doesn't include the states of the United States of America
if that s what you guys call taking care of your own then you ve got some crossed wires in your brain. Trump is throwing shade at Canada who are supposed to be your allies.
The public option does not the World Health Organization's definition of universal Healthcare. The public option wouldn't stop medical bankruptcies. gt Universal health coverage UHC means that all people and communities can use the promotive preventive curative rehabilitative and palliative health services they need of sufficient quality to be effective while also ensuring that the use of these services does not expose the user to financial hardship. ho.int
brave pos t er.
I think it's inevitable a group of bigots won't treat everyone equally.
Our mail in voting can also be dropped into secure drop bins all over town. I ve never actually mailed in our mail in ballots.
What a brilliant summation of AMERICA circa April 2020.
He s doing it because nobody is paying attention right now and it s Friday night the news cycle moves so fast by the time it s Monday there ll be 3 new stupid things he s done by then
The mental gymnastics...
Bloomberg did not fail miserably as you've suggested. He filled his role. Bloomberg's intention was never to become president his role was to spend money and draw votes. He was never in the race and he knew it.
So the same people denying this is nearly as severe as it is are also arming themselves to protect from looters when the government collapses. Got it.
Bernie is right on a lot of things but not everything. And he is wrong about voting for Biden.
gt Jobs are available Americans don t want them. WRONG...if the pay is high enough people will work those jobs.
Are you talking about the vacation home that his wife inherited then sold and used the money that she made to buy a different home If so then yeah it could happen if they inherit another home. Edit if you want people taking you serious then check your info and your sources.
Hoping someone coughs on McConnell a lot. The turd would do us a real service by losing that fight
My biggest issue with your argument is just that you present R0 as the only metric that factors into how dangerous a disease is in your initial comment. One argument you could make which I ve seen from a couple different epidemiologists about the Novel Coronavirus is that because the current R0 is low enough combined with a currently unknown but presumably relatively low death rate makes this disease even more deadly as evidenced by the fact that this virus has a reported death toll very close to 60k worldwide 7k US with a death rate that just surpassed 1K per day and accelerating according to worldometers which aggregates local news reports of deaths whereas the total number of deaths for Ebola since inception is around 11k from multiple sources. Keep in mind this thing is not over and areas across the world are in varying stages of impact so true death rate AND R0 is likely to change over time.
Scary time to be an American living in the USA.
Any sources or are you a typical liberal who thinks if you feel some is true it must be true Your statement has been repeatedly debunked
Fever sweats replacement sauna Illness can also make it harder to keep food AND water down Jeez it's like you guys have never had a bad fever before...
gt It s not meant to affect your point. Then what's the point. gt The stay at home order and the forceful closing of business is the very cause of the rise in unemployment Why is this such a large issue in America as apposed to other developed nations gt I don t think you know what I m referring to because your response doesn t make sense in context. Use quotes gt Loss of liberty is ignorant reduction of how people are affected by the overblown response to this virus. Lives are being ruined and to ignore that is to not take this situation seriously Holy shit you're dumb this has the potential to be the most lethal virus of all time if left unchecked at 3 death rate
I mean the article is a right wing rag that is manipulating what Biden said. So yeah he's doing fine and the right is clearly terrified of him.
Imagine thinking that humans are rational and logical beings that would all voluntarily quarantine themselves in times of crisis without some temporary rejections of classical liberalism. It would be nice but it can't happen. You state that there is a good choice to be made here which implies that there are other options.... some people would make a bad decision in this instance. Temporary illiberalism is necessary during crisis because the average person cannot be trusted to not harm others during pandemics.
Trump is a little bitch.
You probably can't its very difficult. The trick is throwing yourself at the ground and missing.
I really like Bette Midler as an actress but she really does a bang up job making me dislike her as a person. Why can t they just shut up Be quiet or put out that feel good bullshit that wastes time but isn t negative.
gt So that conspiracy is debunked as well....until you finally grasp the severity of the situation the entire world is in What the fuck kind of drugs are you on That's so irrelevant it almost leaves me wondering if you meant to reply to someone else. So bizarre that I felt it also warranted a reply. In more detail gt Your information is incorrect this is on par Ebola. Ebola mortality rate is approximately 50 some sources state as high as 90 but 50 is the common figure Covid is somewhere in the range of 1 4 Ebola would be far worse if it's infected the same amount of people. Example If 100 people get covid 1 4 will die from it. If 100 people get Ebola 50 will die from it. These are not on par in the metric of mortality rate. You seem to be confusing total deaths for a meaningful statistic. Mortality rate is the primary meaningful statistic to determine prognosis danger levels. en.wikipedia.org The second statistic is R0 which is how communicable or contagious something is en.wikipedia.org There is a relatively close or on par R0 between Covid19 and Ebola in comparison to Measels or Chickenpox. However that comes with a disclaimer R0 is not a biological constant for a pathogen as it is also affected by other factors such as environmental conditions and the behaviour of the infected population. Furthermore R0 values are usually estimated from mathematical models and the estimated values are dependent on the model used and values of other parameters. gt they made her self quarantine in a tent for week I'm not sure you understand what self quarantine means. If someone makes them it is not self anything. I normally wouldn't do this but I think it's necessary here Don't ingest fish tank cleaner or any other chemicals you may scrounge from under your parent's kitchen sink. If you are concerned with Covid19 do not self medicate at all. If you think you may have Covid19 seek professional medical help and only take what they subscribe. Wait I'm not sure if that will confuse you....do you have a better understanding self now I just want to make sure you understand.
Yes it's not normal. It hasn't been normal since Obama left office. Trump supporters are trying to normalize this shit and it doesn't matter if they're your friend boss neighbor or family member just shut them down at every opportunity or this will become the new normal. Once that happens it's the light being extinguished as the door of democracy closes.
Careful. Might end up losing the liver weight too.
Phrasing
and cannabis is legal in one form or another in most states
It is entirely possible to distinguish the idea from the man. We can appreciate the ideals the founding father's had while saying They were wrong for having slaves
Zoom's Big Security Problems Summarized Forbes forbes.com 4bc8f3c94641 Zoom boss apologises for security issues and promises fixes bbc.com A Must For Millions Zoom Has A Dark Side And An FBI Warning npr.org And the list goes on.
Agree to disagree bud. Keep living in the past i ll focus on the present and future.
gt Poor Bernie. Great ideas and a wonderful soul. just always saying a bigger number than everyone else isn't a great idea
Both the old and the new description put a time limit on the usage of the SNS them being during emergencies and during public health emergencies respectively. Short term stopgap buffer qualifies the SNS's ability to handle an outflow without any replenishing inflow of medical resources. In other words If someone keeps removing products from the SNS the SNS's management will have to find a supplier who can replenish the SNS's stock soon or they'll run out of products.
You're preaching to the choir. Trump was right he could rape a baby to death on TV and his supporters would still vote for him if he promised to not do it again.
Reddit rats feed off of Karma it's like eating cardboard they are slowly starving to death that explains their tiny TDS infected brains.
gt Prove it. seriously Hahahaha. You haven't seen the many things about Wuhan and the Chinese government covering it up If you're not even going to grant common knowledge then I won't bother reading further.
As a pharmacist I'd much rather be doing what I am doing than endure what the Tomb Guard has to endure. Working healthcare is the easiest job in the world. You are literally always in a climate controlled environment you spend half of your time on a computer doing paperwork and there is ample access to seats. Hell I'm legally forbidden from working longer than 12 hour shifts without an 8 hour break in between. I also make stupid amounts of money. My shittiest day as a pharmacist is still leagues better than the kind of days I've had in some of my other jobs when I was a student. Imagine working a jackhammer and hammering in steaks with a sledgehammer in 90 degree heat for a summer. On top of that pharmacists don't unionize. Nurses do unionize and they have it easy. Nurses don't even do the traditionally shitty part of their job anymore. CNAs do that now. Any healthcare worker bemoaning the current crisis is just looking for attention.
It s insane watching people trying to call it false hope and give all these reasons why it shouldn t be used and that all the evidence is anecdotal and that we need more testing. It s all we have at this point and it s working like shut up and if you are that worried if you get corona you don t have to take it.
And they don't c2that the country they're defending is cartoonishly racist theguardian.com and is ethnically cleansing gatestoneinstitute.org their territory while bringing colonialism back intpolicydigest.org
Yes. Now add in bad hygiene and that's the best I can think of. It's that or the inside of a hockey goalie's glove he has been wearing for years and they are impossible to wash.
Turn off the TV. Put on some Bill Withers.
They ll learn when they get it. For Cuomo it s probably a combination of muscle atrophy from being unable to keep anything in his stomach and constant fever sweats. When I was I SERE school people lost a ton of weight in a less than a week and a half from little food and exercise in his case shiver sweating all day night
They'd have to amend the Constitution so yeah it's gonna happen
Schumer deserved every bit of this letter.
Only when your mom drives through.
If only we had a non partisan media watchdog to make sure this wouldn t be the case
The meme doesn t stipulate anything. It s a dumb blanket statement that isn t even true.
The UN is a joke
Florida right now has no idea how many people are out of work because they have no idea how many people just gave up on even trying to access their system that was designed not to work for as few people as possible and for as little time as possible. At the same time DeSantis' unwillingness to order stay at home orders while thousands of people we infected in a State with a decidedly older Demographic needs to be questioned because they knew the system would break horribly if they closed down businesses. Forget dying for the economy people are dying for Rick Scott Marco Rubio and Ron DeSantis and their State is not even under water yet.
You think he cares about the military Maybe the Military he handpicks.
Oh this of all things is unacceptable We ve accepted plenty of bullshit over the past three years despite how much we complain about it. I fear there s nothing we can do about it now unless we re willing to engage in both voting and direct action on levels not seen for decades. But I m not optimistic. This farce has been on display for all of us to see for a long time now but most of us myself included have forgotten how to respond in any way besides a shrug of the shoulders and an angry tweet. It s learned helplessness on a national scale.
If they are willing and able they shouldn't be forced from doing so.
This is incredibley uneducated. I don't know if you've set foot in a classroom recently but mordern schooling is harder and more competitive than it has ever been. This post is a disservice to how hard working some of the youth are.
Truthfully anyone having to wait 5 months for the relief checks is abysmal and a complete ball drop for the government. They should have set up a website that anyone that doesn t want a check can sign up for direct deposit on the website regardless of past tax returns.
5M yr as a NFL player equals 2. 5M after taxes and agent fees. Also they aren t going to be making that money for 30 years they re making it for 3 5years and then nothing depending on their education level. It s not as much money as it sounds.
The first coronavirus case in San Fransisco was almost 2 weeks after Pelosi suggested people get dim sum. I don't agree with her statement but I'm having trouble tying it to blood on her hands
Is IS really full of shit so I could see it.
You came in here looking for attention and you certainly got it
Answer his dad dissented against the Nazis and he himself deserted from the German Army. So...nope Also there has never been a nazi Pope.
I cant believe they made him respond to a TV doctor.
China did lie but we have know for a good while. Health experts have been warning about asymptomatic spread for months at this point. It s now new info. scientificamerican.com That link is to the first case of asymptomatic spread reported on January 31. Since then it s been a huge point of discussion. By the time I personally started reading up on the virus a lot asymptomatic spread was being highlighted as one of the biggest reasons that COVID was spreading. That was mid February.
Our prime minister mentioned that Canadian doctors in Detroit may have to return home if the US screws us over. Take care of your own first Two can play at that game.
gt Don't start your comment off with a loaded statement like that. What the hell are you even talking about Err what loaded statement How is it loaded What exactly is unclear to you I'm not really sure how I could have been any clearer. gt Making orders directly from suppliers. When states can't find the resources they need they can contact FEMA which will then use their resources to obtain supplies which can be sent directly to where it is needed from the manufacturers or suppliers. I agree with this. I'm wondering why this process was delayed for so long. gt No it doesn't make sense because it's not just states that are buying this equipment. You want the federal government to control the purchase and distribution of supplies you want everyone to compete with the Federal government and think that will somehow solve the problem. Each state has information that the federal government does not have. There are 50 states and 350 million people and you think the Federal government is going to do better It's not about the money it's about the people closest to the problem making decisions before it Feds step in. Those would be the states. If I want the federal government to control all purchasing then a priori I don't want competition. Yes the states have a better idea which is why they communicate their needs to the Fed and the Fed procures it. Simple. Having 50 states compete with each other the Fed and private international interests is unnecessarily complicated and doomed to fail. gt Done what Why haven't we done the thing you just elaborated.
Can Fauci be hired by media outlets without Trump s permission. He s not under contract or whatnot so if he does get laid off he can still provide info to the public
Infiltrated by regular Americans.
Anybody can be a bigot but racism comes from a place of power.
Sure its good money but there are real reasons that Americans don't take these jobs and it isn't because they are lazy. Employers took advantage of a system that allows them to exploit cheap immigrant temporary labor but it is extremely detrimental to all Americans because it keeps wages down. This problem is systemic across all outsourced work sure cheap labor makes products and services cheaper but it also cuts out the average worker and has led to a lot of jobs lost and absolutely ridiculous income inequality. People want to start families build up to something have a sense of security. Guessing here but 3 4 months of work for 9000 12000 before taxes doesn't go very far after expenses. These workers then have to jump to another seasonal job where maybe they make the same A nurse is a full time stable position with more benefits and still they are struggling just like so many other Americans.
It s strictly a Non Covid safety net.
They would get slept away by a tornado land on the ground then get up and march straight back to the tomb for the changing of the guard.
A while back Michael Savage wrote a book called Liberalism is a mental disorder. Well this pandemic has bared the face of the true insane sociopaths the American conservatives. They are insane evil completely devoid of empathy or humanity. All of them.
If people s minds haven t been changed at this point they aren t going to be. Pretty sad.
Thank you
Trump always acts like all the Nation's resources are his personal property and anyone should be damn thankful if he ever gives any out. Fuck everything about this guy and double fuck you to all his supporters
Lose your job now because of trumps incompetence get paid back in 5 months your landlord will understand.
I don't know that he's exaggerating. Some people are suggesting that he is. I'm saying that what he is describing are legitimate symptoms of pneumonia.
I believe him as much as I believe Jesse Smoolay and Brian rockets were flying everywhere Williams. He was probably never even tested.
I don't think you can definitively say that the economy just for one is a huge factor in people's lives and in their perception of the president and hes been gifted a rocketship for his entire tenure. Considering the economy his numbers are actually significantly more putrid than they are at baseline. Same of probably with people's attitude towards valuable family members dropping dead from a global pandemic So again I ask you what of his despicable lies and corruption actually hit people who might support him or just be tuning our at home When did people actually have to say wait me and everyone I know have lost their jobs... WTF happened Presidents get blamed for the economy even when they're competant and it's not their fault. It's not impossible you're right. Trump's supporters are much more like a cult than anything we've really seen. But I think you have to admit nothing he's done no matter how outrageous will test people in their own actual personal lives like this
How much of an asshole do you have to be to make Canada threaten you
Yep he didn't say shit about that boy who lost his parents in the Nashville tornado. He went on and on about how the boy flew in the air.
Not sorry for this dumb whore.
Molson and Coors merged back in 2005 so I think you'll be safe from an embargo.
This is just the beginning. By about August September we'll be seeing full dictatorial control including suspension of election firing any dissenters including Dr. Fauci pardons to all loyalists' military and right wing militias on the streets takeover of all the 2T relief' funds due to emergency' you name it. Ha ha... and nobody can protest. It's the most golden opportunity that Trump and his Republican cult could ever hope for.
Poor Mike I would recommend that he drown his sorrows in some Keebler Rainbow Chips Deluxe. Those things are great.
They're wrong so they must be conservatives
The actions of the president have been fine. Especially shutting down travel from China early. Deaths were unavoidable especially when you have retarded lefties like deblasio telling people to go to Chinese lunar festivals and parades a few weeks ago. His top health expert saying the same things. Nancy Pelosi saying go to china town etc etc. No one said anything about a pandemic not being bad. Your argument is bad. And you have no clue what you re talking about. Go away.
Kushner seen here at a recent Rose Garden press conference... vignette.wikia.nocookie.net
Dr.Oz is coming for his job
I thought it was Pence's job to run the response
Sales tax maybe That's not the bulk of taxes
Ben Shapiro He is not a libertarian.
bEst b uSinessmAn
2024 Make the rectangle the gender you prefer.
It s almost sad proves how much of an uphill battle the establishment is.
When you re rich you get the Plague Inc. expansion pack for free
Alabama just declared a state mandate declaring rules about quarantine except the thing is it's no different than what everyone has already been doing for 2 weeks
Youd think the source domain would make it plenty obvious but yeah unfortunately I know people who would do things similar to this because little inconveniences like almost dying to starvation homelessness and increasing debt wont get in the way of virtue signaling for internet points.
Hi mepper Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission reddit.com has been removed for the following reason s Off Topic reddit.com wiki the 2Fr. 2Fpolitics on topic statement All submissions to r politics need to be explicitly about current US politics If you have questions as to why your post has been removed please see here Why was my post removed as Off Topic reddit.com wiki why was my post removed as off topic. 3F If you have any additional questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u mepper amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com context 10000
trump is unfit for office He is only helping himself He is allowing Americans to die All he thinks about is how much money he is going to make...
Yeah OK. Go to China in mid Jan and tell me then if was a good idea you fucking idiot.
I'm finishing my Ph.D now but I have industry experience. gt If your gonna drop tech go balls deep. I have no need to go balls deep. I wanted to name the software that his models were most likely built in as a way to highlight his disconnect from the reality. His claims are laughable because it's obvious to anyone who has touched basic software that he has no idea what he's talking about. Of course Kushner himself is not downloading stat software. But the conclusions that he's making based on these models are horrific and a big part of his willingness to make these decisions is his general ignorance. He's claiming to have models which tell him that New York is lying about their ventilator needs. Well how did he reach those conclusions Let's see those models.
That would be a bad idea. YouTube has videos showing the guards not allowing disrespectful behavior there.
I think the biggest news here is that someone expected him to say something true.
Fairly normal to bury news by doing it on Friday. But yeah I get the reference
Yes.
The problem with AOC is some of the stuff she supports and advocates for are so ignorant that one has to question all of her decision making process. Everyone will make the occasional misstatements or support what people believe are unworkable policy. But the volume of just plain old dumb shit AOC spouts forces people to question her thought process and who is advising her. She is young vibrant a fairly good public speaker and evidently attractive to some of the public. But holy cow some of the stuff she says. That s why she draws so much of the criticism from people who oppose her political beliefs.
I think it would be hilarious if Dem states started state referendums on leaving the USA to join Canada. I can imagine plenty of states would be willing to jump ship after all Trump's shit.
Yes we need to get Trump re elected.
Get me Kevin Costner
Isn't that how you get mad cow disease
Fuck Jared Kushner and his whole polluted family
Let's not talk about how Germany did the exact same thing multiple times since the outbreak DEUTSCHE Welle...
BYAAAAAAAAAH
The devil fears her
He. Voted. By. Mail.
Who cares what you were under Obama Obama has not been fucking up the US for the last 3 years
that s not true fetuses don t even feel pain when you abort them unless they re really old. also bananas have dna. are you saying we shouldn t eat them in fact bananas have more dna than us. sooo
Lost the popular vote but has the continuing support of congress and his supporters who will probably vote him back in. I agree not all Americans support him but not nearly enough want him gone.
No they knew it was effective from the start. He literally ruined their plans by tweeting the drug names out to the public.
And asking for a significant amount of time. He thought hard about this one. He has only known the Navy his entire adult life. 28 years plus 4 in the academy is a lot to put on the line.
Okay how much does a human life cost
Anyone saying Biden is equivalent to Trump is lying or delusional. Period. Biden may not represent significant progress relative to Obama but he is a huge leap forward from Trump. Who the fuck wouldn't take a return to the Obama era over the shitshow we have now We have exactly.one chance to hold Trump and the GOP accountable. If Trump is reelected he will have escaped any and all legal and political consequences. He will be entirely unrestrained by concerns of reelection public opinion or criminal charges. He will be so much worse And if for some inexplicable reason you can't physically bring yourself to vote for Biden then you had goddamned well better get your ass to the polls and vote for every other Democrat otherwise you're not only helping reelect Trump you are also helping hand Congress over to people willing to bend to his every whim.
buttery
Since when is the USA a Democracy You are extremely uneducated. The USA is a Constitutional Republic. Only willfully ignorant low IQ mouth breathers think that the USA is a Democracy a Democracy is just another word for a group of bullies which is why you're against Gun Rights. You know that you're a bully and don't want people with much higher IQ's to be able to fight back. Pussy.
I suppose you could argue that it morally should not but legally it does. There are plenty of tools the president has to shore up power and lockdown the country during a crisis
I wish he would do this every night. For the next 5 years
I m not trying to be more effective. I m trying to balance the livelihood of millions of working people. You have your opinion and I have my opinion. I think our current response is going to end up worse than the actual virus. You have your differing opinion. Don t be rude
Everyone's saying it.
Doubling the size of the federal government is anything but trivial
What rights are you guys talking about Let me get this straight you don't think the virus is bad for you so you feel this way
At this point his ratings should be under the medium on a petri dish.
All those actions were taken after the virus spread became imminent he clearly told Americans there was nothing to worry about and that cases would go down soon because it was under control. The US got heads up from seeing how things were unfolding in China Korea Italy and Iran then things escalated in the US North America had more time than most of the regions in the world to prepare for this. There s a big difference between telling people they ll die or giving them hope vs saying cases would go to 0 and things were under control and April was approaching so it ll go away. He s the leader he s there to be pragmatic about things not lie just to make people feel good. Ultimately he s responsible for how a nation prepares and handles a crisis that affects a big part of the country.
Every mainstream outlet should send nothing but women of color to the WH press pool. All of them in attack mode. All of them looking as ethinc AF. Wait for him to say they are all nasty in turn. Document extensively.
A lot of businesses are paycheck to paycheck. Wonder what percentage are on the brink during good times
If they can t make money using it how will you
I love this picture....always makes me laugh but if Trump loses in 2020 this might be me.
GOP friendly site
Make the monsters fight each other instead of us
You think a medical office is going to give Trump a line of credit
Hello Exastiken thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Exastiken amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. latimes.com context 10000
Neil Young and Ronnie Van Zandt were pretty good friends.
It's for us. We know who you mean.
They can stay home but many of them live with young healthy working Americans that could go out and spread the virus to them if the economy is reopened. It's best to err on the side of caution here.
Of course China is simply reporting deaths directly by corona virus only in the hospital and patients with symptoms until April starting to report asymptomatic patients which is far from real number because it is a third world country just like India and Mexico with limited health budgets poor quality medical equipments highly corruption and only 5 people hold Bachelor's degree. US is reporting deaths with corona virus and counting patients whoever tested positive which results higher toll but lower fatality rate. So don t panicking about the number with completely different definitions and don t let the media spreads fears which are something much worse.
Because they trust each other. Get a few of them to attack their own so the trust fades it could turn into an all out brawl
Probably on purpose too since it was a massive money laundering operation for Russian oligarchs. The federal government knew too in 2015 his casino was hit with the largest money laundering fine in US history.
Geez. I guess that anchor desk wasn t cleaned properly between shows. Sucks.
gt There was only the use of PERSON not political affiliation. in response to a story about Gavin Newsom. Remind me what party he won election as The Democrats currently in office have been politicizing this from the beginning.
A Biden AOC ticket would be the most hilarious failure in the history of presidential elections
This hurts me at the core. I write excel so I understand your job. PM to programmer.
Do as I do not what Dr. Fauci says.
Joe Biden makes a damning case for that.
Including this one fivethirtyeight.com
Yep. And if there had been an established game plan for shutting down major crowd areas quarantining cruises and flights tracking down recent incoming and so on and it had been enacted back in January we might already be heading into an endgame on the out of control growth.
gt Our rating True We rate this claim TRUE because it is supported by our research. There is no indication that the Obama administration took significant steps to replenish the Strategic National Stockpile after it was depleted from repeated crises during Obama s tenure. Calls for action came from experts at the time concerned for the country s ability to respond to future serious pandemics. Such recommendations were for whatever reason not heeded. Naturally the Left will tell us to stop complaining about yesterday and that Trump is in charge now. These being the same people who spent 8 years obsessing over Dubya.
There probably have been but you'd never hear because no one cares about DJs lol. Maybe that's why they don't get the Ellis Island Medal of Honor award with Rosa Parks. Only murderers get that.
Like snorting cocaine
huh what sides are you talking about ffs this isn't about left vs right. People are dying and will continue to die. States are fighting over medical supplies there is a nation wide shortage of ventilators. I don't give a shit what top democrats are saying. I m criticizing trumps response to this pandemic which has been shit and still is shit. here have a look youtube.com v NezEbDx4B9A youtube.com v NezEbDx4B9A This is what I fail to understand here everybody goes insane if I criticize Trump. It's like I can't be a Conservative and disagree with what he does. It s really frightening what a cult he's become and a very dangerous mindset to believe everything he says especially when there is proof that he lies.
He ought to be putting a bill together along with other progressives in Congress just focus on workers. And force both Bidencrats and MAGAs in Congress to oppose it. And to be frank I am extremely disappointed with the progressives in Congress for not doing this.
Date on article gt December 10 2019
Trump literally has no ability to do anything to elections. The president doesn't oversee the election.
Nobody is shitting on retail workers. I worked retail for over a decade. So quit it with the bullshit.
I mean I m outraged but I don t think anything is going to happen because of this. He ll probably do something even more outrageous next week.
15 lbs would be 11 of his water weight. A level that causes severe mental deterioration. But miraculously he managed to live stream and host online interviews the entire time What a man I know how he lost the 15lbs severe Semen loss from all you morons deepthroating him constantly in our sub today. Makes perfect sense.
YOU replied to MY comment clown shoes
Thing is these stories mostly depend on wether or not your editor approves you going for a postive story while the publication organization is still in the middle of dramatic sensationalism phase of the narrative. Mostly when natural disasters epidemics are covered there is a huge amount of emphasis on damages effects because well people naturally want to know how bad things are. Stories like this are either approved during a slow news cycle or when the editor wants a hope story to sandwich in between the chaos.
Don t allow editorials opinion pieces and salon.com
A lot of young people are being hospitalized because vaping has effected their lungs and people are obese overweight.
I think you meant to say they're not at all.
Did she forget or just stupid Or both
Weird how you know exactly what disease he's referring to while claiming it's confusing and ineffective to call it by the region where it originated and propagated...
Somehow no one noticed that half the country are violent selfish idiots who talk about killing liberals openly for fun. And now everyone notices.
Seems like 3M should be the subject of an anti trust investigation when this is all over.
Apparently there's always plenty of jobs available in DC.
Like the sour genitals of a 38 year old alcoholic from Nizhy Novgorod who hasn't bathed in a couple months and just banged a 19 yo krokodil addicted hooker with a raging yeast infection in the bathroom of a fishmonger's in St. Petersburg.
Anybody could do that no matter what legal parameters are. Most male with the right tools wig makeup etc and good experience with it can look like a female pretty easily. 2. you really think perverts and rapists really care they are breaking the rules
Social Distancing. Haven't you noticed just about everything is closed
Remind me in November how this plays out haha
There was a great episode of NOVA that aired Wednesday night that was fascinating and is pretty relevant to this I recommend giving it a watch if you have an hour of time. pbs.org pbs.org
This is a post I made more than a month ago to a Bernie Supporter as a former Bernie supporter to collect my thoughts There's a lot of former Democrats in this community tired of our unproductive public discourse and biased mainstream media outlets that don't report the news fairly. i.e There was a man who rammed his van into a Republican Voter registration booth in Florida yesterday and I see it on twitter but not on the front page of reddit or front page of other outlets. I voted for Bernie in 2016 primary HRC in the general and Romney in 2012 which was the first election I was eligible to vote in. I did not like Trump because I thought he would not be good for race relations in this country. I liked Bernie at first because I did like Tim Pool think he was genuine at the time discussed the impact of bad trade deals discussed how unfettered immigration led to suppressed wages of the low wage earners and discussed the exorbitant fees of health care and education. I have since come to realize from the Culture wars that there are a lot of disparate groups in the Democratic party hungry for power and there is a lot of identity politics that goes uncriticized because you are labeled a bigot if you even try to. As an American I grew up to value hard work individuality and to treat others as equals. In the summer of 2017 was when I started to listen more to what the Republicans were talking about. At that time there were 2 immigration bills going through congress one hard line and one compromise included border wall funding solution for DACA ending visa lottery program and I believe even made e verify mandatory and it got absolutely no democrat support. I knew at that moment that the party would not take the matter seriously. Trump at his last rally just said that the wage gains of the bottom 10 have been surpassing that of the top 10 for months. If the trend continues our Gini coefficient is set to decrease. The things I attribute to this are renegotiated trade deals cracking down on illegal immigration and removing incentives for people to illegally migrate here as well as the tax cuts which let businesses invest more and for big tech to repatriate money from abroad. Race relations are actually improving there was a poll released last week. I encourage you to listen to Trump's SOTU speech. His campaign this time around is focused on the African American community. Prison reform school choice opportunity zones and keeping the economy hot. Workers are starting to come in from the sidelines the labor force participation rate is slowly starting to tick up. We need 4 more years of this to continue. Trump treats me like an American and puts my interests first before the rest of the world. He values hard work and is not afraid to stick up for the Country's citizens interests when negotiating trade deals. He is way more moderate then the media would have you believe. I had a gut reaction against the travel ban when it was enacted but I see more of what it is now. Other countries need to cooperate with US Counter terrorism initiatives or get visas denied. Protection starts at the border look at some of mainland Europe. There are many terrorists attacks and they have a pourous border. I also had a gut reaction to the transgender ban at first but see it as more nuanced now. The transgender community unfortunately has high rates of suicides. A battle field may not be the best place to be but I would like to talk to members of the military to get their experience.
He's an immunologist the presser is not just about COVID19 but economy and all other related things too he probably has better things to do than waste 2 hours each day waiting in turn to speak for a total of 10 minutes.
I am so sick of hearing about this crap. Obviously trying to Americans is not their top priority.
It almost makes me wonder if republicans the DNC and pro Russia organizations are working to get Biden to win the primary as a weak opposition in order to get trump re elected. Something similar to the 1933 election in Germany. I mean it s looking like COVID 19 will be America s Reichstag Fire.
They have the same risk of bringing it home from the grocery store. If people can buy food they can work. What if their roommates are essential workers There are so many examples of why this doesn t make sense.
OP Brietbart Trump supporters and etc. They all make the same argument anytime a celebrity says something negative about their golden god.
You can go back to the early 90s when Dateline faked a car crash of a GM vehicle for a story.
And they'll then complain that the election is illegitimate. Oh wait They always do that when they loose.
The first M of 3M stands for Minnesota. They have over 10 000 of there 90 000 employees at their massive headquarters in Maplewood. I hate Trump as much as the next guy but 3M is not leaving the USA anytime soon.
Its Friday
Is anyone surprised The GOP is a living nightmare.
I was just posing the debate not siding one way or the other. I work in the energy sector dealing with balancing tighter regulations vs. technological innovation. A lot times you ll have Democrats come in and impose these much more stringent regulations that devastate a localized region or manufacturer type all in the name of less energy use. On the flip side Republicans do nothing and manufacturers aren t forced to innovate. In terms of renewables it s difficult to balance and quantify benefits when a good portion of the benefit is environmental. In my experience environmental economic analyses are difficult to measure due to the worth of the environmental factor.
You and your wife every time there's a Trump press conference from now on giphy.com
That is what Loeffler claimed too but I have my suspicions the traders have access to information us plebs don't
Essential in some states a Felony in others...'Murica
TIL this sub is anti pride
gt not a trump supporter but It always starts like this doesn t it
Ditto
That's heckin' insulting to those rocks.
Fauci Fauci Fauci This is the man I trust over anyyyyyyyy of these others mother fuckers
By GDP Alabama would be a little bit behind Afghanistan and a little bit ahead of Zimbabwe. However if you take out federal assistance I figure that that number would dwindle even further. Best case scenario assuming a free trade agreement with the United States an independent Alabama is a third world country.
That's not the same as telling someone to run over an IED. We have all seen dipshits do things for ribbons however they were always looking for a way to avoid injury in the process.
as a gun owner I'd have to say nah on both of those
Actually it won't stop them. It is like fines for big companies. It is just the cost of doing business... If you start putting people in prison... that makes them pay attention.
Thanks for being respectful
Britain google.com 3famp France ibtimes.com Denmark bloomberg.com Germany theguardian.com England telegraph.co.uk birminghammail.co.uk
Exponential growth not linear.
Who are he and Jared stockpiling for For the country Well someone should tell him the country is made up of states. It's right there in the name
Every time the Oracle speaks we collectively cringe. FTFY
What does it matter if people forget or not Nothing changes either way the entire U.S governmental checks and balances system has been solved and bypassed.
What a piece of shit. A runny lumpy left in the woods by a sick dog piece of shit. Actually that dogshit would provide some nutrients to the forest. Trump can't even make that much of a contribution.
I'm pretty sure Minnesota Mining amp Manufacturing stands with Canada.
While I agree with you capitalism has one master profit. And I guess they found better profit from the foreign market. Supply and demand can be a bitch.
Bullshit. When the story broke people called out Loeffler Burr Inhofe and Feinstein. Burr s case appears to be the most egregious but Loeffler should be held to account as well. I won t hold my breath for Feinstein.
I'm amazed she walks upright.
Alright man stay safe out there. I am thinking for myself I pay attention to what medical professionals are putting out not government elected officials whose sole goal in their career is re election...
It s sentimental. I m not sure how it makes them bad ass but it is a very honorable thing to get to do.
Libertarianism or conservatism
Acosta is a complete joke. He tries to make his stupid face look serious when he asks some bullshit question but he must know he's a joke and everyone thinks so. He is a complete asshole with no credibility.
Feckless c
Amen
Hilarious thats something i would have come up with sad i didn t however i m new to this app site
Not sure where you are from as some laws vary by state but yes one can own a firearm without much hassle. Most people I know aren t hassled for owing guns unless you are a fuckwit or paying too much attention to internet snobs. And no you can t own a tank under most circumstances so we all agree there is a point where our rights come with a bit of paperwork and necessitate a bit of due diligence such as filing for a permit to protest or obtaining a license to hunt deer. Its usually a product of living in a modern society with more than a few families per township.
Fucking right At least somebody gets it.
That s why you wait and do right by your citizens instead of trying to rush a virus.
I'm asking what you thought about the article and what Jared Kushner said about our stockpile. Are you ok with that sentiment And if you can answer without an emotional response I'll be really surprised.
And so the private companies should be reimbursing either the federal or state government for expediting the shipping right Are they actually doing so
Historically I suspect the name Benedict Arnold would get tossed out there but I cannot discount the rest of this thread.
Pathetic. In a time of crisis this just serves to divide no matter what you believe. Exactly the opposite of what we need. By all accounts done spectacularly lol. That sentence has the maturity of a 5 year old and is just complete bullshit because many people disagree.
Yeah... That is absolutely alarming.
He was the 6th President...of Pennsylvania.
there s still hundreds of kids in foster care i browse that site sometimes and the same kids have been up for years. most are minorities with disabilities. Some of them are nearing 18 now and it s tragic they ll grow up without families
Nty As a New Yorker who is in the essential field You re crazy This could have been fixed if the country as a whole decided to shut down completely for 2 weeks with certain things running police hospitals..etcs As someone who works in engineering field. Too much decided to continue working taking subways pushing limits to get to work Now those same people are asking why the government is asking for shut down of businesses. The same people coughing in the MTA
I mean I thought that wouldn t need a push kinda shows that state of the American media.
I m gonna go out on a limb and say that nobody in this entire subreddit is a scientist or software engineer. Trailer park meth dealer or holier than thou church employee maybe.
It s for the same reason that people can drone human beings halfway across the world. When you re far removed from the misery that you create it s a lot easier to do things like this.
Is there a Supreme Court case that affirms this
TL DR The ethics and parameters of Big Tech and the limiting to education with the ability to form your own norms is dangerous.
Many of them are doing exactly that right now. Early on China turned around a boat full of masks so they could use them. Then when they finally did send some out they were defective. The global economy is bullshit and we really should become as self sufficient as possible.
I was convinced this was complete sarcasm but then I looked up the other comments you have made on other posts.
Maybe instead of throwing insults like any libtard you can tell me what was wrong
Clarify Congress sets the date of the election. Not that he wont try to oh I dunno postpone it. Who KNOWS what this year has in store.
It s even worse that I read that in her voice
Voting in a new style of government entirely is not possible it's what happens after revolution. Personally I'm still on the fence of whether I'd back that
This clown s gonna bury my father w
Did you read it It is about a fox reporter who dared to ask a critical question and all of it is documented.
Looking back I guess you're right. I went to high school a long time ago.Starting with 8th grade it was Geometry Algebra I Algebra II Calculus Physics.
Really Aren't they setting up field hospitals in Central Park
Too fucking late Chuck. You thought you could ride the knife's edge until the next election while protecting the status quo. I hope the history books remember you.
7 so far
Since historically this administration had always found the most qualified people to handle many critical tasks Dr. Oz seems like the perfect replacement for Fauci who seems level headed and compotent..
Their final defence was all that was needed. Just admit he did everything he was accused of but vote against removal anyway.
What is the deal with people who think because a kid might have a bad life that they should be killed We don't apply that logic to any other situation.
You said he's against universal healthcare in your post above. That's a lie.
For pretty much the same reason.
Unrelated but an interesting piece of data. A German hospital tested every single person that entered the hospital 10 of people had coronavirus when not at the hospital for coronavirus
Oh yea I somehow managed to forget that all those people that lost their jobs also lost their health insurance...during a pandemic. This country is so fucked.
The problem is that a lot of the people who say this refuse to do their part to stop the virus s spread. Yes we have our rights but we don t always have to use them.
gt No Paywall archive.is
Damn
Politics is influenced by feelings science and medicine however is not so objective
Same dude that approved the IC Whistle Blower paperwork be changed from requiring 1st hand hearing seeing to hearing 2nd hand. Paperwork was changed AFTER the complaint on Ukraine came in to accommodate 2nd hand info of course. PS Rep Devin Nunes had his hand in this with accountability btw.
don't get smart with me. what i meant was April of next year 2021 which will be known as the time that Donald Trump's America has totally destroyed the Coronavirus. i think that for a very long way into the future history people and other people who take lots of notes will be saying that my Pandemic Response was perfect. in fact it's probably going to end up being the highest rated response of all time. the numbers and rates are very good right now but if they start to not be good then we will take action very strong action at that time. but until then states need to just go about their lives. no more of this economy killing staying home proposal. there are too many businesses mine included that are being hurt very badly by the Pandemic that Obama caused. i think if the fake news media was being honest then they would report on something like that. but nobody is even talking about it thanks to Jeff Bezos and Nancy Pelosi. i don't think there's ever been a president or even a human being really that has been treated more unfairly than i have. the Democrats are even trying to ruin the stock market to hurt my reelection campaign'
Clapclapclap Bravo
Can confirm. Even in OKC which has no shortage of gun stores damn near every AR has been cleaned out. Got the second to last CZ 75 in stock today.
Really Then how do the estimated 30 40 million illegal immigrants get by everyday Practically every job uses E verify which requires you to be able to legally work in the United States to be hired. So how are they getting paid
Same
By count. 1 or 2 percent won't change anything
You lie
The day they refused to admit they fucked up by going into Vietnam is when the US started to decline. They hit another steep decline with Reaganomics. They hit another one with the loss of their manufacturing with NAFTA. They hit another when they lost their freedom to idiocy paranoia and corruption with 9 11 and the Patriot Act. Then they really lost all credibility and integrity with the 2008 bailout and their continued military involvement in the US. They are now approaching their rock bottom after losing complete control of their government and electoral power. Their own people don't believe anymore. It's been a long time coming. I'm very scared to see what they will do out of desperation. Hopefully it doesn't materialize itself in a war. We all know the next big one is the last one. Its to bad one country run by a few corporations really jeopardizes the entire world. I'm happy the country is collapsing because in reality what good have they done to the world Not talking about the american people but its government. Like seriously. I honestly think the last president with integrity was Kennedy. Maybe Carter and look how quickly they ran him out of town lol. I hope the states divide. I'm just scared of china at this point.
That's only when POC demand equal rights
gt Going outside and interacting with society is EXACTLY how you spread a virus you dumb fuck. Sorry you can't understand this you dumb fuck. Let me know if I'm going too fast for you. You said absolutely nothing about interacting with people It's also very possible to interact with people and NOT spread the virus. Read a book. gt Don t you believe in self responsibility Of course I do. When I go out I maintain social distance I don't touch things that I don't need to I don't touch my face and I wash my hands as soon as possible. Don't you believe in self responsibility as in other people have a responsibility to protect THEMSELVES Educate yourself. gt If this were literally a libertarian world there s no way we would keep you around and allow you pollute the gene pool. Fuck off you statist asshole. gt I m saying that people should go inside because being outside means they will he be depriving others of life liberty and happiness. A big fucking lie. If you maintain social distance don't touch your face and wash your hands there's absolutely NO WAY to catch the virus. FFS take some responsibility for yourself. Also I'm not saying that people should go about their normal business. I'm not saying that people shouldn't voluntarily self quarantine in order to inhibit the spread of the virus. I'm LITERALLY saying that the fucking GOVERNMENT shouldn't use the THREAT of VIOLENCE to FORCE people to stay in their homes.
Like what There's literally nothing wrong with my logic. The vast vast majority of people recover from COVID 19 without any longterm damage. Why can't they gather If you're attacking me... well it is only a fine example of Ad Hominem.
Babylonbee has the real headlines.
All of the facilities left over from decades long cold war are a real boon to the luxury bunker industry.
The entire healthcare system doesn t work. I don t know if it s due to insurance or what but many hospitals have closed down too especially in rural communities and small towns. Plus the US has a high maternal death rate that s much worse for minorities a huge drug problem and a decrease in life expectancy overall.
Filed to JARED KUSHNER LOOKS LIKE A PENIS
Because public schools are working out so swell in the US Get real kid.
Yes it did lmao.
I prefer Kung Flu.
And just like I asked with the first round of way too much money how will we pay for it
I prefer Trumpsterfuck
I don't think the article was necessary. That statement is absolutely truth.
Polls do not really reflect that.
Yeah great society programs have worked great for ppl. LBJ was a racist. voting democrat for the next 100 years fatherless rate from 20 to 70 Democrat s were and are the party of the KKK.
Hi Balls of Adamanthium Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u Balls of Adamanthium amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
They are directly responsible for deaths and I wish something could be done about it.
Hey man I 100 agree with you was just genuinely curious since this subreddit is generally for people who label themselves
Ya god forbid the govt tries to work through an epidemic you daft mf
It got the name because Spain reported it first so everyone assumed it came from there. It was ravaging the US and Europe but because of a little thing called WW1 both sides surpressed the news cuz they didn't want the other side to think they were weak. Spain was neutral so they didn't have a reason to not report it.
Anything to hurt our status with other countries that aren't governed by someone's My Favorite Dictators list.
Yes because the people who live outside of metropolitan centers have different issues to solve. The electoral college is meant to protect national interests like agriculture and industry. The managerial aristocracy sneer on regular Americans but they deserve representation too. Especially after 20 years of being sold out to foreign interests.
Link
If people wear a mask will you open the state back up
It's not the chloroquine I'm doubting but your story.
California forced Uber to pay even more money to drivers a completely replaceable job that most people do for free when they drive around that resulted in price increases for customers. That was cool with them. But now suddenly when it comes to illegal immigrants working and depressing American wages price increases are suddenly not okay
Yea know minus declaring it an emergency opening funding working with china to try and get more information Starting a task force China travel bans. amp x200B But yea totally nothing. Jesus fuck how can you not even know the basics before you try to comment on political articles
How can his rating even be in the double digits at this point
It s not cheap labor it s ideological comfort. I ve worked and lived in these circles. My ex wife was an architect and was from Tokyo. There is a fundamental disdain for middle America and anything not perceived as progressive. They feel cool and metropolitan being surrounded by anyone from international communities. I m honestly fine with this and know exactly how they feel but globalization is clearly exhibiting its flaws negatively on our society and has proven detrimental to the average American.
Stop playing with impeachment reddit.com
gt It's just weird that you admit he's likely dehydrated and has been sweating a ton due to his severe fever I've literally shown like 50 times in this thread that you don't sweat during a fever. Like that's literally how your body starts up a fever by inhibiting your bodies ability to sweat and reduce temperature.
Fuuuuuuuuuck That's the spiciest official government correspondence I've ever read. He went scorched earth.
I was just making a joke about relativity.
glad you ve come around on that though it s a shame it took a pandemic to make some people realize how dangerous he is
The collective country s other option is Joe Biden...I just want to buy a cabin in a meadow and never deal with politics again.
Agreed. They're not even their own citizens' friends. Why the hell should anyone else think of them be friends with anyone
There's no way he'll be elected... 2015
I dunno.
No sense of humour.
Bernie Sanders is better than Joe not that I d support either of them. I feel bad for Americans. Always stick between a rock and a hard place.
They did. Still no bites. 18 bucks an hour for the blueberry farmers. One farmer reported one hit. One. There is a work ethic drought that we never speak of. I see it among the peers of my nephews and nieces. They are not money motivated in the slightest as they have everything given to them for no skin or sweat. At 7 I would run up a wild bull s ass for a quarter. Our little crew lied about our ages in the summers so we could pick fruit. It is much different now. This is where the conversation SHOULD begin not externally. How do we build work ethic into our children
The crash of 08 had over 5k suicides attributed to it. We're gonna have a ton more this go round.
Really good article from the Atlantic a couple years ago The Cruelty is the Point theatlantic.com
Article 1 Section 9 of the US Constitution states The Privilege of the Writ of Habeas Corpus shall not be suspended unless when in Cases of Rebellion or Invasion the public Safety may require it.
This is not true at all. And you aren't going to push that narrative here.
no this is because spain is too white
He talks for one hour and doesn t even relay the severity of the situation. He down plays it detaches himself from it and places blame on everything else.
Dilettantism dabbling. Just sharing because I sure as shit didn t know that word.
Sharpiesite
Thing is the Democrat Media Complex has been trying this and Trump's approval ratings are still solid.
It s kind of hard to not buy them when the government is not supplying hospital workers with needed supplies that they could die without.
You sick piece of shit
except that's exactly how it worked. the budget doesn't magically come out of nowhere. they deprioritized medical equipment among other things and raised priority for illegal alien entitlements.
And I m sure they won t interact or pose a risk to anyone else. They all already hanging out on the beach. Hey Guam here s some covid 19 patients I m sure they ll be fine GTFO.
Guarantee the people most up in arms about this are white SJW's trying to score those precious virtue points.
I'm sure they'll add bootstraps to the site.
So you also agree kavanaugh shouldn t be a judge right In case you ask I don t he should and I think Biden should be investigated for this and possibly remove himself.
You could always send an email to the biden campaign asking him to court progressives.
It's a fair point the homeless have become super spreaders. It would be wise to limit their exposure and possibly shelter them.
he's more popular than anyone else. people only voted for biden because the media brainwashed them into thinking he was the only one that could beat trump. issue by issue more americans agree with bernie than anyone else in the country
I agree.
edition.cnn.com 3M are using the excuse of but it s our humanitarian duty to help the world to make as much money as possible amp to break DPA.
That's an incredibly short sighted and ignorant response. Again talk about caring for people but don't give a fuck about the skyrocketing suicide rate when it happens.
I am wondering how hospitalized is accounted. Is it ER visits or is admission required to count
Spanish Flu. Similar measures were put in place in numerous states and as far as I remember schools and public gatherings have been legal for the last 100 years.
complain on twitter a lot. it seems to work winders so far. now you have an excuse to stay at home so you can't protest so that's cool
Fuck them right in the pussy
Tell him dude I'm tired of people doing that shit. They are just looking to start a fight and aggravate others.
Please show me a model that hasn't been 4x 10x off in its predictions. Then look at H1N1 and SARS modeling that was also drastically off. We are giving these modelers an outsized level of credence that their track records do not justify. You can not live your life or lead a country based on wildly inaccurate worst case models.
It s not what I voted for or my wife coworkers friends or frankly anyone else I know in my county. This state is so badly gerrymandered it s hard to get an accurate read. It s difficult to vote and when we do submit our votes get misread and thrown in the trash. During primaries this year I watched as our geriatric voting booth workers tried to figure out the machines. After about three attempts with one ballot they gave up and started throwing them in the trash after they wouldn t scan. I m pretty sure they were inserting them upside down. Yes there is a die hard conservative population but it s not as large as you d think. They re loud and local media eats it up. That mixed with a fucked up voting system is the real reason why these motherfuckers keep winning elections.
A public option would be a great step. It allows people the ability to be covered while still maintaining the health insurance industry. Also once people use the public option they would probably not go back unless private insurance started offering better plans.
It's different when it's them.
Wooo
Oh glad the journalist think that how about the thousands of doctors who recommended it according to a recent study who gives af what these clowns think
A lot too far
Trump s entirely self serving priorities do not change.
Wait so is the left Jewish or anti semetic I'm getting confused.
Sources
On a friday evening during a pandemic. The slow massacre continues
You started posting about politics 22 days ago. Nice hindsight.
The only thing China can make that last more than a week is a contagion Bird Flu SARS and This If it does turn out to be a man made disease in my humble opinion accident or not This would be a act of WAR and should be treated appropriately.
gt Nasty' Trump rails against reporter who asked about the truth amp x200B FTFY
You're a paranoid one aren't you
Economic downturn does result in death. During the 2008 2009 recession suicide increased by 4x. But my main point is such if you are virtue signaling that ruining the entire US economy not to mention the global economy is worth one life you don t live in reality. There are plenty of things we could do to limit loss of life.
Get fired for saving your crew or get fired for letting your crew die
Rule 6 User Created Title
Damn that triggered the shit out of Reddit.
Not a good look to quote Hitler 70 years later but hey.
it won't end. it will just enter a different phase
Holy shit I never thought anything that came out of her vodka slurred mouth would make me happy but repealing the SALT tax retroactively would be awesome. Thanks Nancy I don't need the money most people who benefit from it don't Still voting for Trump though but I love getting paid for your hypocrisy.
They're compensated for their time. It's like their job and stuff.
Of course. It s all Trump s fault. The fact that the military has been doing this for decades probably centuries is indubitably his fault as well. I m sure. Don t know how I can prove that but it just makes me feel all happy inside when I blame him for everything wrong with the world and life in general. s
My biggest concern is that chair at the bottom of the steps. Cant wrap my head around that decision making process.
And I'm merely saying you're wrong.
Libertarianism
Right Like you legit would have to not watch the news to not know that. My 8 year old ADHD running around making constant sound effect noises son knows more that the GA governor about the virus. Da fuq
Sure there is. All allegiance is to the state. That's what government run daycare and schools are all about.
I'm not sure why you linked that article it's an uncited opinion piece. So you think trans women should be able to use ladies toilets then What does locker room refer to
His job is political commentary
Uh he s a Democrat. Look it up.
Wouldn't you need a constitutional convention to make those types of changes to the constitution With the amount of bad actors in play right now that sounds like a very bad idea. As broken as things are right now they will make sure it's a whole lot worse for the people.
Yeah because they did a great job handling the Swine Flu and Ebola issues. Let's also not forget depleting the stock of medical equipment ie masks and CHOOSING not to replenish them.
Voting An American Right Flying on a plane privilege
Reddit should be renamed CHINA. Since they own it.
Why do all the evil people get to survive this virus
It is gullable people who hear what they want to here. The problem is Fox is trading in falsehoods should be illegal. The only way they should be able to do it is with a big disclaimer before and after each commercial break saying this is a work of fiction and for entertainment value only. Then they could say whatever they wanted to.
Do you think anyone has like tallied one money illegal aliens pay to the federal government Do you think these numbers might exist somewhere And do you understand that most taxes are paid through sales tax and property tax which illegal immigrants can t avoid
Damn. I scrolled to far down and I see the hate subs again.
trump only golfed on the weekends democrats refused to even stop downplaying the threat until march
Or how about the same way we paid for them the first time. They exist. Someone had to pay for them.
you could ve just answered the question.
They closed government in very conservative Idaho which is annoying because like I actually needed to go to the DMV makes sense it's closed because licenses and such are just a renew online right now but I just bought a car...
but it s liberals who are elitists
gt Fever sweats replacement sauna Uh no actually your body inhibits you from sweating when you have a fever. Its not until it breaks that youll sweat for a short period to cool down. amp x200B gt Jeez it's like you guys have never had a bad fever before... This is very ironic considering you body doesnt sweat during a Fever. lol amp x200B The worst part is that this is pretty common knowledge too.
Still better. Anything is better.
Hoo boy.
Asked a long time ago for one didn t receive one. I did take the Sapple Test the other day and my score was Conservative Liberation ish Right a bit center on the political compass. You cannot I think assign your own flair in this subreddit... I would like one though.
God why are all these libtards coming ok here and getting offended I thought you liked your echo chambers that guaranteed a Bernie Sanders win
gt Virus comes from China and European nations via planes. gt Fewer cases in Mexico than US. gt See this is why we need to close the borders. Makes sense. gt Trump says virus was nothing to be concerned about and cases would go down to 0 well after impeachment proceedings. gt Bill allows for treasury to hide which companies gets the bailout with no oversight. I guess oversight is partisan.
Old Turkey Neck just loves wasting time and money trying to discredit Trump. The TDS is strong in her.
There is absolutely no honestly for leftists right now.
The whole NSDAP platform was socialist. Read the 25 point plan. They went on to nationalize key industry expropriate land eliminate earned interest free education free healthcare and state jobs for all platform. They also blamed the 1 and bankers. All seems familiar. Now before you say they are racial supremacists so are the Chinese. And they are certainly left wing. I am a classical liberal. Small gov individual values and rights that are unalienable not granted by government. Nazi s are socialists. Sorry.
I don't think it was unfair at all. I'm disappointed in the results but I'm not bitter at all. That said even though I've voted straight Democrat tickets for over a decade I am not a Democrat and I don't find Biden to be an acceptable candidate. I'll probably vote for a third party. Or leave the presidential spot blank. Biden's views are directly contrary to mine on most of the most important issues and I just can't in good conscience vote for him. Nominating him has handed the election to Trump.
I thought all we had to do was pay our federal government and then China would make the world cooler again.
If people knew the full extent of the failure it would be much lower. Horrible testing failures How Team Trump Bungled Coronavirus Testing vice.com Disbanding the pandemic preparedness office snopes.com snopes.com Ignoring the pandemic until it was way too late. March 10 It will go away. Just stay calm. It will go away.
we will pay for it with a tax on the wealthy BUT HOW WILL YOU PAY FOR IT uhh well we will pay for it with a tax on the wealthy BUT HOW WILL YOU PAY FOR IT
By that logic someone with a terminal illness who will die in the next few years should not be allowed to vote. When anyone votes it doesn't affect them until the future. It takes like 4 months for politicians to even take office policies take time to write and pass and take effect.
That sounds completely acceptable. I suddenly wish I lived in Spain.
That whole thing about him never owning stocks while in office is not true politifact.com His wife owned stocks he just didn't have any in his name which isn't saying much when talking about conflicts of interest. It wasn't a blind trust.
You have no idea what you re speaking on.
6. 30 am in Moscow Russian.
gt The sheer number of trials alone that need to be handled is mind boggling You're correct It may be unprecedented...We won't know for awhile...
I'm not sure it's a partisan issue. I think it's more about leadership. Inarguably Ohio's Mike Dewine has been amongst the best in the nation. I've seen him praised by hardcore progressives. Florida and Georgia's governors have been embarrassments. CA Governor Newsome has praised President Trump and RI Democratic Governor Gina Raimondo has told the ACLU to kick rocks while arresting a bunch of jerk offs from MA who crossed state lines to play golf. I think the state that's going to get a lot of attention is New Jersey. It's a terrible perfect storm of abutting two major urban centers of Philadelphia and NYC. Its taxes are amongst the highest in the nation and its overburdened public employees pension system is going to collapse. Governor Murphy was amongst the last governors to allow a delay of State Income tax payments. There are several sanctuary cities and Murphy has hedged on shutting down construction. The Democratic controlled Legislature will enjoy going on a tax raising spree while constituents realize the only people left with jobs are government employees.
They can form Cascadia and my side can form Neo England. Granted we will have to separate my state between the Pennsylvania half and the kentucky half
Quite the hoax boys. More deaths than 9 11 more predicted deaths than US losses in Vietnam. Super glad we re three months behind on preparedness.
What s the solution then
It s not on this guy or anyone else on the internet to find a perfect solution. It s more the understanding that we can t just keep destroying our economy just in case The cure is becoming worse than the disease.
Wasn't just you actually it was the poor people assumption that got me and so many dislike us Boomers thought maybe it was continuing...ahh never mind...love old boomers. Sorry.
Not everything can be a tax on the wealthy. Yes they have a lot of money. That doesn t mean taxing the wealthy will pay for all of Bernie s platform. Things like M4A will mean tax increases on the middle class as well and that will cause a regression of markets and household incomes if not implemented properly. It s important to have answers to these questions otherwise the middle class and those already disenfranchised will get fucked.
If America gets any greater Mexico will have to build a wall to keep the refugees out.
Just how democrats want it.. Suppress voter turnout by any means necessary. including lying about russian interference and gerrymandering that doesn t exist and believing in fraud when there s no empirical evidence to support such a belief. democrats create voting policies like they manage pandemics without using scientific data. there is no scientific evidence that voter fraud does not exist
Just watched that episode and the one on his sack of shit father in law. Would watch again.
Because some times Google doesn't do this thing like give a person's perspective on something. It generalizes occasionally and I was curious as to that person's thoughts on the tomb.
gt My concern is more aspirational on my part it s more that I hope that I'm concerned.
Thanks
Clinton led a surplus in America. Bush left us with a recession. So did Bush Sr. When Obama left office my 401k was through the roof. Now it's down because the president failed to act sooner costing countless jobs and lives. Seriously don't be stupid.
That's a deep cut and I like it
From what I've read in the news they are only taking non COVID 19 patients as an overflow. amp x200B Checked out like 4 5 articles and all of them are saying they are taking non COVID 19 people only.
Yeah this is what I think is stupid. This isn t the same as the impeachment... oversight of funds is a normal business AND governmental procedure. He is basically already admitting guilt to misappropriation of funds by complaining so quickly and so transparently. I hate that people support this coward. I get being a Republican...I understand they have different political guiding principles than me... That is okay different strokes for different folks I suppose. But supporting Trump specifically is like supporting Hitler.
I thought Pence was it. Did the prayers not work
Exactly. Plus the DOJ and FBI I'm sure has dirt and a bone to pick with our president. Just lettem loose now that OLC policy wouldn't stop em. If Trump actually loses and leaves the White House he might try to pardon himself. Lol
Vote him out.
Exactly what I thought immediately.
Tainted by massage parlor happy endings.
If Brady can lead the Bucs to a Superbowl victory he's going to unquestionably be best QB of all time. I mean he probably still is... but surely even the hatiest of haters would have to admit it then
It s more funny than sad now. I just say keep crying and they loose their shit
how stupid can they get and WHY is what i want to knoa
You're in the wrong sub loser. Go back to your TDS pedo sub
the left wing media is inspiring terrorism. we already have laws where we shut down terrorist propaganda. you said to shut down CNN
Someone wants to regulate a weapon that can kill two dozen people in thirty seconds Well time to oppress and kill the poor and minorities for another generation Fuck em
Err the model projects how many people would need to be hospitalized. Actual hospitalizations are limited by capacity. How are 50 thousand people going to be hospitalized in New York when the maximum capacity is 13k I'm not saying that the model is perfect or without flaws clearly the virus has not spread out of New York as quickly as predicted but the line of thought here is inherently flawed.
good. the future of our country is at stake. we need to win by any means necessary. democrats can suckk it
That makes some sense. My biggest issue is that all mainstream news is just click bait. CNN and the rest are just trying to bring down Trump and get viewers that way while Fox is doing the opposite for the opposite viewers. Neither are news they are entertainment for their target market
He s such a pussy. Friday night at midnight you fire someone And of course not even directly. How pathetic do you actually have to be And for the GOP to continue to stand by this pathetic flesh of a human is even worse. I m sure Susan Collins is clutching her pearls right now.
gt you're seriously risking stripping others of their liberty by exercising yours Explain
Which is obviously why he s tasked with solving peace in the Middle East and distribution of life saving equipment around the country and planet. Fuck that are you kidding me You think he s qualified Lol
What...about ism.
Lol did you say that after 9 11 Or 2008 Shill.
Yes when i literally said i rather have this whole mess go away so people won t suffer. But sure spin it your way.
Fellow Oregonian here. Apparently so I guess we have been doing it wrong for years. I love not waiting in live to vote. I would much rather made a mad dash to the county office the day ballots are due because I forgot to mail my ballot in two weeks ago. At least I never have to leave my car
And flannel you can't forget the flannel.
Nope I just like to give credit where credit is due. OP has good taste and other folks seem to agree so I m trying to point the way lol.
I just checked it on the calculating machine. You're right.
I have never met a person in my life who avoided an important surgery for money reasons. I am assuming you haven t met one either.
Duh.
What recent study Just saying according to a recent study doesnt make it true. If you're talking about the recent study Fox and Friends pulled up it said 37 of physicians approve of the drug. That's not even half.
Do you really believe this to be true
Only if you say something that they interpret as being in support of Trump.
Funny how the new york times was concerned Trump would use his unchecked powers i.imgur.com to give Alaska to Putin... based on him having a phone conversation they didn't like. Now when he is implementing actual authoritarian edicts they cry that he hasn't used them enough.
gt I project because I'm an argumentative twunt who can't handle opinions that I perceive are different from my own. FTFY gt I said compare. I know that's why I linked to the definition of the term. Your own context clearly represents that you don't like people saying it's similar to the flu which is misrepresenting or disingenuously interpreting my post. I've explained it so that even children should be able to understand it. If you still can't that's entirely on you. But because I'm feeling generous I'll do what your're doing... on the remote chance that one more attempt might open your eyes. gt People need to stop fucking goats. Not only is it harmful to the animal it's highly unsanitary. Please stop fucking goats. The point You're not doing what I imply there just as I was not doing what you implied with your post. I'm not saying Guys this is just like the flu no big deal so the government shouldn't be strict right now. Your post implies that I am by arguing against it. What you're doing and what others have done is arguing against a straw man en.wikipedia.org an argument which wasn't even present. My advice to you same as the other user If you want to argue against people saying that find posts that are actually saying that and then read them the riot act. TL DR Try being relevant to the posts you reply to. People won't be annoyed with you as much if you do this.
Did he pull the old Soviet general trick and sell off government property for his own profit
Not true at all
This isn t just being mean this person has genuinely hate in there heart. And are ranting like a child at the mods
The time has come for us to do more than denounce.
What s 3M
You know his dad was a crook as well that was jailed by that tubby NJ Governor Chris Christy.
Get sick vs get sick that has a 0. 2 chance of killing me and probably a 20 chance of killing her Uh. HELL NO. Taking that high of a risk is fucking insane.
And here I was thinking Jabba the Hutt but it may just be the close physical resemblance forcing the comparison.
We all died and are in hell folks.
I hear you I think he'll win through illegitimate means one way or another.
It s like you re hung on John Bolton s claim as fact. The last sentence in the article states the team was disbanded. John Bolton is a hack take his words as fact at your own peril.
The candidate does not jay get to keep the money for their personal use or anything.. this is disingenuous claim
Yet this stupid fucker will be elected as President for a second term. Fuck.
Meanwhile a respected Navy officer was sacrificed for political reasons.
Is it at least taxable
My state recently passed mail in voting for any reason coincidentally just before all this started. So I m glad I get to vote without the line I would have been doing Mail in regardless of this outbreak.
Yeah it s called google
No. It's not Texas. Many people here drive an hour or more to get to work and our highway speed limit is 70. Riding a bike to work unless you live a couple blocks away is not even a remotely viable option in my state.
These masks were then confiscated by the port of New York
Yeah they call them TERFs. Trans exclusionary radical feminists. Germaine Greer is an example of a TERF. Making women compete against trans women on the sporting field is one thing but demanding lesbians sleep with trans women takes the cake.
It's about who is in charge. Who can decide on the use and distribution of the stockpile Who gets something and who doesn't Trump wants to decide he wants to be generous and he wants gratitude.
gt Blame the GOP. But not their highest official and what they treat as their supreme leader Trump is the current GOP. GOP encompasses them all.
Vote by mail is also easier to commit fraud with. You know that thing Republicans always want to investigate and Democrats always impede and call racist.
Individual states run the elections. AFAIK feds only get involved if there's fraud or rights violations.
The projection game is strong. Best of luck to you.
There is a scientific study published at the end of March No Evidence of Rapid Antiviral Clearance or Clinical Benefit with the Combination of Hydroxychloroquine and Azithromycin in Patients with Severe COVID 19 Infection sciencedirect.com via 3Dihub The sample size is small so the results are not conclusive. Any claims for or against the drug are so far unsubstantiated. Press on this study and the drug's efficacy A small trial finds that hydroxychloroquine is not effective for treating coronavirus finance.yahoo.com Fauci cautions against majestic leap' to believe anti malaria drug is knockout' treatment for coronavirus ashingtonexaminer.com Malaria Drug Chloroquine No Better Than Regular Coronavirus Care Study Finds bloomberg.com
They need to protect their toilet paper... s
The navy was already working on offloading the crew on his ship and arranging accommodations. The issue was already being addressed
That's cute. I want trials and executions.
Putin told him to just fire anybody he doesn t like and Donnie took his advice to heart like a good dog.
does he really fascist squidward nutsack
Right Like literally all you had to say was due to increasing numbers and news of our recommendations not taking much effect in society we're now doing But they're so incompetent that they don't realize how incompetent their excuse is and is literally worse than not saying anything other than the EO lol
Nope. You only sweat after the fever breaks. Or in the rare case were your body over heats beyond what it intended amp x200B mycarpe.com mycarpe.com amp x200B gt Once a person s body initiates the fever process chemical messengers called pyrogens are released into the bloodstream. Pyrogens are part of the immune system response and through a complex chemical process cause a person s body to raise in temperature. Once a person has a fever they will often exhibit symptoms like headache malaise anorexia and other sickness behaviours. A person with a fever will also experience heat generating mechanisms like skin vasoconstriction which leads to chills and goosebumps muscle contractions shivering and a desire to be warm. Once a person s temperature reaches its new high setpoint and a fever runs its course the body lowers its setpoint and begins to employ body cooling processes. Due to the fact that sweating is the body s primary way to cool itself down people who are recovering from a fever often experience sweating as a part of that process. It is the body s natural way of cooling itself down and regaining its normal homeostasis. 2 Heres you mayo clinc link btw which i know why you didnt link amp x200B mayoclinic.org mayoclinic.org amp x200B Depending on what's causing your fever additional fever signs and symptoms may include amp x200B Its not a symptom of every fever only under certain circumstances do you sweat and primarily once you cool down as well. amp x200B Stop trying to make excuses for this obvious lie.
I don't think anyone should ever complain about anyone being disrespectful to a Trump. If Obama spent all his time bashing everyone and everything I'd be find with people bashing Michelle too. I respect your opinion but I strongly disagree.
No worries. He just fired the IG of the Intelligence Community. We won't be bothered with pesky official complaints from the inside.
Please keep it civil.
I was thinking about who would be a good comparison to Trump worldwide and it just dawned on me. People often compared Trump to other U.S President such as Hoover Bush Jr. Harding Buchanan in term of incompetent and mismanagement. However for me Trump is basically Tsar Nicholas II. When he took power Nicholas II was completely unprepared incapable or unwilling to learn unable to understand why the Russian people wanted reform and had a stubborn refusal to admit his mistakes until it was too late. Like Trump Nicholas II was the absolute wrong individual at the worst moment in history to have held power over such a massive country and people. In the book Black Night White Snow by Harrison Salisbury about the Russian Revolutions of 1905 and 1917 The Minister of War Alexei Nikolayvich Kuropatkin described the Tsar Our Emperor has grandiose plans in his head to seize Manchuria for Russia and to go on from there to unite Korea with Russia. He dreams of putting Tibet under his power. He wants to take Persia and occupy not only the Bosporus but also the Dardanelles. When we ministers hold back the Czar from achieving his dreams he feels in his disappointment all the more certain he is right and that he understands better than we the glory and the good of Russia. That is why the Bezobrazovs singing in unison seem to the Czar more understanding of his purposes than we ministers Here is how Historian Barbara Tuchman described Nichloas II last Tsar of Russia The Russian Empire was ruled from the top by a sovereign who had but one idea of government to preserve intact the absolute monarchy bequeathed to him by his father and who lacking the intellect energy or training for his job fell back on personal favorites whim simple mulishness and other devices of the empty headed autocrat the impression of imperturbability he conveyed was in reality apathy the indifference of a mind so shallow as to be all surface. When a telegram was brought to him announcing the annihilation of the Russian fleet at Tsushima he read it stuffed it in his pocket and went on playing tennis.
Remember the ruling class uses regulations and managers to rule not lead.
Ehhh don t go to work so you don t spread the virus. Everyone I know is either being paid still working for their time through this so maybe if you re not you should get a new job that will pay or will let you work
At a certain point they will always be able to exploit the system regardless of measures taken so long as they are legal permitted to own stocks bonds or securities. They will always be privy to insider information by nature of their trade. I think barring all public officials from owning stocks and limiting it to index s would be enough insulation to protect against blatant abuse. Is that not realistic I realize it would likely never happen but in theory would it work
soulja boy tell em
It'll tear your face right off it's pure muscle
What do you reckon about this proposal leginfo.legislature.ca.gov bill id 201920200SB288
Cool didn t take me long to find a racist on this sub. Cool cool cool.
Well more like it's fan fiction of what stupid Dune might look like.
NY state is the Empire State. Enter Emporer Cuomo.
The symptoms he's describing are not in line with what the WHO and CDC describe as Covid 19 symptoms.
One is killing people over ego and there other isn't so...
Not only will that protect you from covid it will keep you from ageing also.
This article doesn't even explain why he might be lying. It just said he probably lied so he did fuck off snow flake
2 for 1 special.
get a stupid cheeseburger.
He's certainly trying.
Except John Locke didn't right or Constitution. It's actually worth looking at why the framers changed property to happiness.
Should throw in a penicillin shot for good measure
To shoot the virus when it tries to break into your house.
Yeah it s called a massive fever. Happens a lot with my pts in the ICU. He s actually sharing his story and it s legit. This IS what happens.
So the Patriot Act and the War on Terror are anathema to conservative politics. Gotcha
Ugh this is the kinda crap that makes the administration look ridiculous. I mean come on...
Did one of the politicians go out and forget to bring their reusable bag
With whom are we at war right now to invoke it And yes I believe it is unconstitutional. You ll notice that I keep coming back to that pesky document for my reasons to oppose the power grabs you seem to think are okay. I m not a pure libertarian. I m a constitutionalist.
Sorry about the mess down here neighbor.
New Orleans is looking like it will be the worst hit in the US at the moment.
Good thing the dossier isn't what started the investigation. I understand facts are inconvenient.
I honestly don t think this was the right template but oh well
gt But Biden's approach is more realistic in terms of being able to pass. He still needs 60 votes in the senate. Republicans are gonna block ANYTHING the Dems try if they have still have Majority in 2021. Why is Joe Bidens public option more feasible No one ever explains this line.
No the voters chose Hillary over Bernie by a wide margin. If Bernie wanted a real shot at the nomination in 2016 he should have entered the race about four or five months before he did to try to cut into her superdelegate lead.
The death toll will be far higher than one million if this virus spreads unchecked throughout the country for months every hospital in the nation will be overloaded for months as well meaning that any medical emergency even unrelated to this virus will be unable to get treatment. There is a reason that the UK briefly considered doing this and then quickly reversed their decision to actually mitigate the spread through social distancing and shutting down nonessential business. Letting this virus spread without doing anything pretty much guarantees that the entire healthcare system will be shutdown for months many millions of Americans will die and mass panic will most definitely set in on a scale much worse than it is currently.
I m currently in quarantine for a suspected covid 19 infection and I work as a first responder. I am using my sick time to pay my bills while I am on a department mandated 10 day quarantine from work.
Just because other countries take the earnings of one person and give it to those who didn t earn it doesn t mean we should. Collectivism is a vile system that only lazy people find attractive. My taxes going to defense No problem. Not a fan of the foreign wars but I enjoy a country that is safe from invasion and that with the exception of 2008 2016 no one really wants to fuck with. But to go to work then have what I EARNED taken in taxes and given to you or anyone else for your free healthcare or free college is absolute bullshit. Or given back to me in the form of some shitty government service that I don t want. I go to work for me for my family to be better off. You go do the same if you want healthcare. By what right do you or anyone else have a claim on my earnings
The problem that my companies and many others face is that foreign labor for high paying jobs is simply better than the domestic one with same qualifications for example the workers from India get a bachelors in India and come here to do master's and get a job here. But these same people are more motivated and harder working than their American counter parts. They also get paid the same as American counter part so it's not even cheaper labor. In fact it actually costs more for companies to hire foreigners as they have to pay the cost to sponsor them. It's simple the American education model needs to drastically change and output higher level graduates
The entire gulf coast is so screwed. Louisiana is another time bomb.
i was born in america and id rather fight for a different country. thats how evil america is to me anymore
Wrong national review.
Trump took his talking points from the right wing media. Just two days before the South Carolina rally which was only a little over a month ago Jesus Rush was telling listeners that COVID 19 was just a cold.
Category 3...
Lol
Ignorance is bliss bud.
Moose burgers
If you're attempting to suggest he was sweating while having a fever let me remind you that your body inhibits your ability to sweat while having a fever otherwise you wouldn't reach a higher temperature and that you only sweat as it breaks for a short period of time to cool back down. He lied.
We re not all bad. We need help though not ostracizing.
Let. The boy. Watch.
Nope. Just nope.
Ouch
Wow. What a great idea. Sleepy joe.
Novel from Latin novus new. An Ivy League genius like the DT should know that. He s good at this some people say the best at it like maybe he should have done the doctoring brain stuff instead of maybe you know like I get it the politics thing but brains he s got brains good tremendously brains.
You might hope but that hope would be foolish. Unless he goes and pissed on graves in Arlington the majority of his military supporters would not just stand aside. It would be an actual fight and he knows that.
Come on man do you really think the navy really cares about 8 10 mil Also we keep talking about the navy as if it's this giant robot of a machine and not an institution that's comprised of people like you and I is really ok with letting a hundred sailors die over 8 10 mil We spend more than that airlifting a dozen dudes to germany for follow on medical care if their priority injuries. More than likely to the point I've been trying to convey is that in unprecedented situations with knew viruses that dont have cures things dont just happen over night. CAPT Crozier in his letter even said that his recommended option would take time.
Funny thing is when I pointed that out to a cult45 member they gave credit to their dear leader I said they can t have it both ways he takes credit naturally for the accomplishments of those doing the work.
And Jan 21 is when the CDC announced the first case in the US. WHO still hadn t established the severity of it yet.
Andrew didn't say be more white. He said American ness. He's not wrong either. There are many ways to show your American ness. Eddie Huang was one of the people slamming this Op Ed. But someone tell me Eddie Huang didn't show his American ness when he decided as a young kid he wanted to embrace the Hip Hop culture. He's a successful Asian American. Would he have been as successful if he wasn't embraced by the American Hip Hop culture Now him being a cool Asian kid probably paid dividends growing up while the cultured Asian kids were more than likely getting picked on. I'm an Asian American. I grew up in Long Beach CA in the late 80's and early 90's I lived through a race war. To a lot of the misguided Asian youth gangs were an American thing. A lot of us picked that up and fought back and it effectively ended Asians being picked on in Long Beach. Go down a few miles on the 405 and you have an Asian community in Westminster that embraced their American ness by opening small businesses. Worked out wonderfully for them. Why do people think American equates to being white. These woke Asians are behind their 5k laptops dragging another Asian American for voicing his opinion on how to deal with the surge of racism. These woke Asians want him to say fuck this fight back but you know what to a lot of Asian Americans that isn't their way of showing American ness. Now what have these woke Asians done to help mitigate the surge of Asian racism besides inciting the infighting amongst Asians. Besides staying quiet when Andrew Yang was being dragged by MSM. When they were blatantly racist calling him John Yang and Andrew Chang. Where were they I know sitting back quietly and waiting for the moment to step on another Asian American to boost their presence on social media. FAKE ASIAN WOKNESS. A bunch of opportunist that suddenly became AA activists. The sudden surge of AA wokeness is fake as hell. They don't give a damn about other Asian Americans. They care about themselves and their circle. I'm willing to bet that most of you guys don't know that 45 years AFTER resettlement a good portion of South East Asian Americans still live in poverty. Some have poor educational attainment levels. A lot of them rely on government programs. How come these fake woke Asians don't bring that up. Why don't they come out and see why South East Asian Americans differ from their Asian Why not trend that topic amongst their blue check Asian community. Instead of dragging another Asian American because of an opinion that can easily be taken out of context why not reach out and talk about the sensitivity it caused. Why not reach out and create something to empower ALL Asian Americans through the non profit Andrew is pushing. This whole I'm doing Asian better than you on twitter is sickening. Fuck them.
We might be getting that
Pot calling the kettle black
You mean the one that served as chief advisor and wasn t compensated for her role. You want to be mad at anyone about that then point the fingers at the son. Thank you for further proving my point about checking your facts
The only time I ve ever wished for Fake News
I hope so. But what are we realistically going to do I've been racking my brain for options that could possibly correct them and I haven't found any short of open war.
he sounds pleasant to talk to
Hello redditkingboi thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news We are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. Thank you for your understanding. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u redditkingboi amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. cnn.com context 10000
I ve read the peaks for a lot of places will be late April. After that hopefully testing will be more available so we can limit big outbreaks and slowly open stuff back up in May. But to try to predict what s going to happen seems almost silly at this point. I am just hoping lives are saved during by the shutdown and jobs can come back quickly.
A homegrown terroris I mean militia has been threatening the legislature of Oregon on and off for a couple of years.
I actually want to see wide spread class action law suites against most of the media companies for fear mongering on this topic. We have seen significant damages to this country based off their hysteria and they need to be held accountable. The above law suit isn't going anywhere. As no one at Fox News was calling it a Hoax.
Russia I mean why not
obviously
In general yes. On reddit no it's not some tolerant majority of kind liberals there are a bunch but I think they're sadly outnumbered
I feel like I'll have a coronary and a stroke at the same time if I watch that show
And dependent adults won t be getting any.
Welcome here s my Rock
No need for the hostilities and downvotes. All I was saying is if a revolution doesn't happen in the US after this pandemic then it won't happen in China either.
gt not mediocre dumb dumbs. That's most of what they hire already. Indian and Chinese programmers who cheat on their tests get visas thru Google Apple etc and then get paid 50 of what an American employee would get paid.
There s a lot of people in the US with pre existing health conditions and even more people over 45 years old..
That seems way too high
They have a bunch of morbidly obese people. Fat is a highly significant comorbidity with covid. The south will be absolutely hammered hard. Fat people on a vent at its highest setting is a morbid sad sight to see.
Proof they found their own supply AFTER asking for federal assistance
I for one welcome views from the other side as long as they are respectful it makes for a meaningful discussion I'm glad you enjoyed the conversations here.
I bet he does.
Careful about pinging user names.
I think so.
The episode and a few others just get me so fucking heated man. Like holy shit what a bunch of fucking pieces of shit.
No. U toxic.
Trump is not the most well spoken guy out there but Schumer just oozes sleaze when he talks and it makes my flesh crawl.
Didn't celebrities go door to door out of district to endorse democratic candidates And wasn't Trump a businessman before a TV star So isn't your comparation full of shit
This is very disrespectful. It's every bit as lame as the people who insulted Michelle Obama because they couldn't contain their emotions about president Obama. Don't attack people's wives. There's no purpose in that.
gt A lot of casual readers might believe that Trump is actually losing touch with reality. Then they would at last be coming to their senses and realizing truth. Trump has long ago lost all reality. Witness his constant lying
And also way easier than being anyone trying to stop covid like understaffed doctors and nurses. Not to say this soldier guy doesn't deserve respect too but this whole post just seems kind of irrelevant Idk
I also really don't think he has any intention of running for president again. I know it's hard to believe he's the same age as Trumpelstlitkin but he's 73 and if he didn't run in 2016 or 2020 I don't see it happening in 2024.
My local sub is going crazy anytime they see someone outside their house.
Most of the world is in stand by mode watching Netflix. The infrastructure is fine.
I don't know what the media has reported on it. I also doubt you've ever read the transcript. Also the edit was not bitchy but your projection made it so in your mind. First time and last time here this sub is almost as toxic as r progressive and r Bitcoin.
When enough people get genocided
Agreed break up the Republican Party
U mad
Then we could have no police powers whatsoever because they necessarily infringe on Constitutional rights. There is obviously a body of law that justifies police action and even extraordinary temporary emergency action. But I will definitely meet you more than halfway and say what we've done is far and away an overreaction to the real risks.
Yes it does. You can be a conservative without being a cartoon character from a sitcom
r AltHeadlines
There needs to be de funding consequences for errors of this magnitude. We can t have a system that allows shoddy science to guide our government to shut down the economy and destroy people s livelihoods without severe consequences for the panic mongers. Over 6 million unemployment claims in the past week. These researchers should be among them.
At this rate if the GOP doesn t cause the US to implode by then
Glad to have you. You might check out a book called The New Right by Michael Malice.
As someone who has lived both in China and the US for extended periods of time let me just say that the CCP is doing an infinitely better job than the current American administration. I'd be more surprised if a revolution doesn't happen in the US after this. It's also a lot harder to revolt against the Chinese authoritarian government. I'm trying to be as balanced and unbiased as possible while typing this. Just sharing my honest opinion but I know many of you will strongly disagree.
I never had much of a cough. Its not a guaranteed symptom. But getting back to the original point if he's being honest about his symptoms I feel bad for him.
gt youtu.be t 1345 So I followed up and read the update to the initial publication as linked by this video. The problems with the initial study persist in this update as well. Obviously there are promising things in there but these reports should not be taken as confirmation of efficacy. The data that was covered in the youtube video for example does not include a comparison to untreated individuals in the publication. That is just the percent of PCR positive patients in only the treated group that data on its own is meaningless. The original publication by this group did include untreated individuals as controls still not a blinded study but better so I'm confused as to why they didn't include the comparison in this update. Additionally the only piece of data that they have is that PCR test. That assay is obviously the workhorse assay for clinical detection of the disease but it alone does not offer too much information. At this point we only have preliminary reports on a small number of patients with a single assay readout seemingly without adequate controls. It's just too soon to accept this as an efficacious treatment and prescribe it widely. As for the supply I hadn't seen that Israel was helping. Obviously that's great but I still think Doctors should exercise restraint in prescription of these drugs for coronavirus. At this point it seems more appropriate to treat patients with it in controlled expanded studies rather than to have every individual Doctor prescribing it off label to their personal patients at large scale.
A government has a potential for a monopsony being the only buyer will control costs. Doctors in other countries remain as some of the best compensated professionals. Their is no negotiating done on the individual level no uncertainty and no chance of going bankrupt for trying to take care of your own health. I do agree its crazy that insurance is integrated everywhere but as an individual for non elective surgery medicine is an area where making an informed decision without trusting a doctor can be impossible. There is all this bloat in the US system the insurance industry profits billions and all of that is coming directly from smaller and smaller pools of americans. One large pool gives the government all the buying power and following any other countries model will save the US so much money in direct costs and give the potential for people to be proactive in taking care of their health.
Its the same reason that if you go anywhere else on reddit and minorly imply trump had a good idea on something you get downvoted. Its because stupid libtards can never be smart lmao its wrong think and against the hivemind of this sub.
Yea just cutoff your main exports I m sure that will work out great for your heavily dependent economy
Petition to remove Trump from office by invoking the 25th Amendment change.org recruiter 1070699099 amp utm source share petition amp utm medium twitter amp utm campaign share petition amp recruited by id 45554310 7623 11ea 8b1d 1d7a70865254
I just really really hope some secret service guy doesn't decide to pull a praetorian guard. We need them to be trusted
gt even now it feels like he s not taking the virus as seriously as it truly is. You've got to be kidding me....
That s not creating the crisis.
Gotta be frank here. When it comes to agricultural jobs Americans don't want to work these jobs. I'm currently in Georgia USA. Because many migrants are stuck in their home countries and visa offices are closed there is a terrible shortage of labor for the upcoming berry cucumber and squash harvests. These farmers are BEGGING for domestic workers and have been doing so for years. This is the same in parts of Canada California and Michigan's fruit belt. A class of North Americans have declared themselves too good for manual labor. This is disappointing on light of the current situation.
I'm not sure what you are specifically addressing here. Can you be more specific What non existent problems are you referring to
How about Reparations for Men dying
no..... I was thinking something else.....
Ha My hospital is in a rush to use it for everything now and I'm just sitting back keeping my mouth shut thinking HIPAA violations galore.
Ghoul
Oh god yes. I m 100 voting for Biden and I donated to Bernie monthly. I think this whole narrative that progressives aren t going to vote against trump is insane and I feel bad for people who are falling for it.
yeah because biden won't do anything if he wins he'll literally be trump without the dumb tweets and maralago trips. but that's if he can win which at this point I don't see how he could. he's MIA during most of the primary hiding in the background during most of the debates only going on friendly media that tosses him softballs and he still stumbles and he's determined to redo the hillary campaign of 2016 as far as I can see it it doesn't matter if us bernie supporters vote for joe he still won't win. once these checks start rolling out covid19 starts dying out the economy starts working again trump will look like a shiny new penny in november and biden will still be talking about old news like anyone still cares. biden needs to get real if he wants to beat trump you may be able to prop him up in the primary but that crap won't fly in the general
Sorry. Did you mean it was built on slavery
Baffling isn t it
Sorry fucktard but ive already shown that you dont lose water weight at that kind of level from a fever. amp x200B Because you literally dont sweat during a fever your body specifically stops that function in order to raise your body temp. And if it was water weight the second his fever broke he would have drank water and gained it back. amp x200B Stop sucking Cuomo's fucking cock.
From right below the headline in that article gt A group of moderately ill people were given hydroxychloroquine which appeared to ease their symptoms quickly but more research is needed So as Dr. Fauci also said it would be a shame if patients with other ailments who actually need this to live can't get it because some people think it might help them but we don't have enough evidence to know it actually will. Put another way maybe isn't yes
YOU SAID THE MAGIC WORD AAAAAAAAAAAA
They deserve double pay and better benefits. We have given enough thanks. Unfortunately that doesn t pay the bills.
Overestimating the impact is absolutely the more responsible of the two options though. Economies can rebound government can bail out industries and individuals but we cannot recoup lost lives. Obviously there's a balance to find in all of this but I feel you're being dismissive of the work being done by these scientists for the public good. I think that most average people don't fully understand how these models work and thus are prone to misinterpret them media very much included but I think you're wrong to refer to this as shoddy science and to accuse the scientists doing this work as panic mongers. The alternative is what To not try to model or understand the spread of virus and just make our public health policies on our best guesses
When you phrase it as banning trans athletes they can pretend it's an attack on them even though it's just regulation that affects everyone and sorts them by sex.
I lost 12 in 3 days when I had mono.
If Romney eventually just lost patience and endorsed Biden that d be great it would open up yet another front Utah for Trump to spend money on.
It's not about making money. It's about people being able to provide an income for their families to pay for their houses and food while in times of turmoil. If we kick everyone out of a job for two months more people will die due to lack of savings then the virus will kill.
Yeah this is getting to be too much for me now he gotta go
You're right. They gave their friends and family members pork. I'm sure none of that money will end up in their pockets. s
Fellow non conservative though I wouldn t say I m a lefty either. Not sure what you ve seen on the sub or maybe you ve just browsing the top posts but our experiences have been quite different. From what I ve seen this sub is just the opposition answer to r politics. Both subs are hyper polarized and view American politics completely through the Trump lens every issue and thread gets focused around a stance of pro conservative or anti politics Trump agenda. If you sort by New and read through some commented threads you ll see this quite clearly. This thread will be welcoming and pleasant of course but I encourage you to dig a little deeper into the thread with less... nuance. I m sure the polarization has been emphasized even more by the influx of r the donald users though I don t intend that to be accusatory. It s simply the reality I ve seen over the past few weeks especially in threads around the pandemic. The anti democrat sentiment painted with dripping sarcasm and sardonic memes in the majority of threads is not what I d call even handed and fair The interesting thing and the reason I continue to lurk here is to see the parallels between the two. Both groups make identical claims about the other side being hive minds running election interference running propaganda and running corruption. Both sides attack opposing media with the shockingly identical claims. There s some subtle differences between motivations but it s incredible to see how the opposing tunnel visions have led to eerily polarized yet identical mindsets. In any case I agree that this place is great for getting the conservative pulse on issues. It also gives great insight on how the population is consuming news media because you ll come to identify trends between conservatives and Fox and match them to similar trends between liberals and the various liberal outlets. So I wish you luck and good fortune in your exploratory endeavors.
As a former Navy Nuke RO I can't help but think about it from that perspective. There aren't THAT many people on the ship who can sit at one of the two RPCPs Reactor Plant Control Panels while the plants are at temperature and pressure. If that department is hit hard you quickly find yourself fucked.
Work order what a dirty phrase....ick
Why do you speak of yourself in the third person
None of the above.
Clearly it is acceptable. To the US government and the American people. There s no mass outrage or large groups of people demanding he step down. Yeah people are angry and frustrated and scared but they tolerate him anyway. This will stand through many tens of thousands more deaths.
Possibly but I would argue it is more fear based that they will be pummeled by the radical Trump fan base. Go back to what many of them said about Trump prior to him securing the RNC presidential candidate.
Voter fraud does not happen on the scale you think it does and there is no evidence to support your position at all but yes you have a good one too.
How selfish are you People are dying and hospitals are being overloaded and you're worried about your own non essential problems. Stop being a selfish dick and just take a sabath this will end and you can get your testosterone checked as much as you want.
We are. It's his last chance to legitimately win an election. He wont. The really interesting bits are the ones that happen between election day and inauguration day.
I'm only comparing it to the flu for numbers and our reaction. We don't do anything to stop 10s of thousands of people from dying from the flu every year yet we have completely destroyed our economy over an illness that might turn out to be no worse than the flu or even marginally worse. It doesn't make any sense to me. Why are flu deaths not as valuable Or anything else we do that causes mass death.
I assume because they wanted to see if they have it but weren t symptomatic yet because there s like a 4 to 14 day window between infection and symptoms Also and don t shoot me because I haven t read the article yet was the testing done in a country or area where they re just testing everybody EDIT Yes they based this off of places where everyone got tested.
Do it then Fuck they gonna do
I m young and have no underlying issues so no I would not take some questionable drug.
Witch hunt is Trump's slang for I'm guilty shit I'm screwed.
mothership.sg mothership.sg From Singapore here. I understand the sesperate need for masks but when the USA overreachs and demands masks made in Singapore a plant that is here to serve the needs of the South East Asia region whom is going through the Covid 19 crisis too couple with the fact comments here well it just seems that only American lives matter. I know you guys probaly don't mean it that way. But it certainly leaves an unpleasnt taste in the mouth doesn't it. And yes it may be an American company but the labour and management to a certain extent are locals. Is it even philosophically consistent to simply say that the the masks are therefore American property by sheer virtue of the fact that it is branded as such
No. Even in the early 2000's it was a 11th or 12th grade class before that it was in college.
nytimes.com nytimes.com
Literally my same reaction haha
So you respond to my comment about poor voters with an unrelated comment and I m the one who can t read Sorry that I didn t follow that you completely changed the conversation. Maybe if you re going to respond to someone stay on topic
To the Guards Yes. The Old Guard has guarded the tomb minute of every day since April 6 1948. Even during Hurricane Sandy.
He said The models show hundreds of thousands of people are going to die and you know what I want to do I want to come way under the model. The professionals did the models and I was never involved in a model. At least this kind of a model. twitter.com twitter.com
Why Trump would want to risk the health if the not their very lives of his supporters defies my understanding of Trump logic. Gun owners tend to be rural older Republicans. pewsocialtrends.org
Anyways y'all ever notice how the deficit always blows up during Republican administrations
Still a suggestion recommendation at this point but will he continue to go further And can he legally
Evan evan evan can I get a fact check On the fly Seriously though this sucks and I hope she gets better soon.
Thoughts and prayers
What's the pandemic got to do with civil disobedience or other emergency situations unnamed If it's to address the pandemic it should be written as if it was to address the pandemic not how they are saying it. Edit the wording is what people are getting bent out of shape over and they have a right to be bent out of shape and ask questions if they have them just like every American.
Obviously there would have been another crash eventually but can you really determine the cause of a crash that didn t even happen And then to say we ll recover slowly than we otherwise would... based on what The recovery hasn t even happened yet. And a government shutdown of the world economy has never happened before we don t even have a baseline to compare it to. This is a crystal ball article.
If republicans are responsible for even a minor delay they re fucked. Or I just have too much faith in the American voter
Needs to be updated but not bad
He's one of those plastic aliens from Dr Who
WITCH HUNT Believe it or not.. strait to jail.
Just the voting part
gt By the sweat of your brow you will eat your bread until you return to the ground because out of it were you taken. For dust you are and to dust you shall return. gt gt Genesis 3 19 Hmmmm and what is the bibles opinion on the wealthy the uncharitable those who refuse to help their neighbors. Hmmmm yes that famous time Christ said blessed are the ones who don't care about dead grandmas for their Line Shall Go Up. I actually worship God friend. I have faith in his mastery of all things in heaven and earth. A Christian getting worried about THE BIG LINE Oh ye of little faith.
LA Doctor I made a wish to the Universe to gather protective masks for our brave healthcare workers and today my dream came true. What the fuck
There is an undeniable appeal to that perspective I admit. But what comes may worse.
I'm starting to wonder if the net worth he claims to have is based heavily on the amount of Russian money he's currently laundering. Pro tip donny that billion isn't yours. You're just a purse holding it for a couple months.
As a big Sanders supporter who is less than enthusiastic about Biden and wish someone would explain why they are ok with his record Iraq the banking bill Anita Hill etc something other than he's winning which isn't an explanation I am a fan of him reaching out. We don't know how long the primary is going to be delayed and delaying who he wants as his VP would be ridiculous. It's something that requires great detail and vetting. Otherwise we are more likely to end up with a disaster of a pick. Here's hoping Biden and his folks don't fuck this up
Pretty much any person or group throughout history that has spread ideas that fly in the face of the status quo. Maybe I'm missing something here but wouldnt MLK Ghandi George Washington etc fit this quote
Man. Trump is not going to do well in prison.
youtu.be Always brings me back to this.
Why am I sure that he will get no ban whatsoever for this from reddit admins
Who needs enemies when you have allies like the US
The World Health Organization didn't take it seriously. They're kind of an authority on the subject one would think
First honest question in a while. Allow me to finish my shift and I will respond
FUCKING TRUMP. A self declared war time president He's going golfing. The casualties and bodies are piling up. It's unfortunate they thought they were on his side. The level of incompetence at the federal level is at it's highest and widest.
If minorities are too fucking stupid why are they taking your jobs
I'd like you to witness...them hitting both buttons at once Trump Is an Authoritarian Weakman politico.com
Well according to that one PBS journalist this crap is considered a team sport by the press corp. There's not one of them present who isn't either in on the game or is too spineless to call out this behavior when they see it. They're absolute human garbage.
Unfortunately you re right.
That was like 66 of British with it were overweight or whatever. Well 66 of British ARE overweight so that doesn't exactly mean much.
Create the crisis. Exaggerate the crisis. Exploit the crisis. Blame Trump. It's a consistent Democrat play right now. Contributing factors count. No accountability but blaming ORANGEMAN BAD Yeah I'll make whatever claims I wish.
gt are Americans known for being slim or obese Let's let those who do not take care of themselves dictate government impositions on all of us
Unless someone is forcing you to not use your meds then yes Mental Illness is a choice. Unless someone is forcing you to take drugs then yes Drug Addiction is a choice. I love how you omitted Alcohol from your begging of questions mainly because Alcohol Addiction like Drug Addiction is 100 a choice. Why you might ask Because nobody is forcing you to do either.
fuck China they are the reason worl is in this mess right now
Fox news and her need to be sued for causing the deaths of many of their viewers.
Spoken like a true communist.
Joe makes that case by himself. He doesn't need help making the case.
Oh yea that s very fair. Thank you.
Standing off to the side nodding in the affirmative.
Oh the medical community would have a field day if this were to happen.
D. Yes. All of the Above.
Does NYPost know it's garbage
Please Remember Our Golden Rule Thou shalt not vote or comment in linked threads or comments and in linked threads or comments thou shalt not vote or comment. It's bad form and the admins will suspend your account if they catch you. According to topminds mods this absolves them of any responsibility.
It just goes to show how truly disconnected he is from the American people and how little he cares for them
Hahahaha. I assume you're referring to political correctness. Those days are over huckleberry.
America will literally be in ruins after the Trump presidency and it is totally his fault.
So are we talking conventional or thermonuclear devices
I thought you were an idiot until I read the second half lol I'm sure CNN could find some experts somewhere to back this up
If that person would die otherwise then sure.
Can someone explain how this wouldn t fuck the economy
This is TRUE Which is why we MUST BE RELENTLESS IN REPEATING THE MESSAGE gt That party needs to be thoroughly punished this fall pass it on. The party needs to either reform so that is agenda is not dependent on the destruction of America or splinter off a new party. If you vote Democrat until one of these reformations occur you are in fact acting to further forces which seek to destroy the United States of America in sum a TRAITOR. In sum do something or accept the outcome.
Bernie is the leader we need.
gt My question is why do we have to mill through candidates until we find someone with a scrap of decency and actual initiative to help the public We don't We can get involved in the process and help pick the candidates instead of just complaining. Few Americans know this secret.
I'd agee with that. But where the rubber meets the roads with rights is when somebody with a gun shows up to enforce it. They will tend not to care about right and wrong. They will care about legal and illegal.
If she could just crawl under a bridge like the creature she is never to be seen again I d be happy with that.
Where were they keeping them At the bottom of a lake Were they from the 1960s
youtu.be
I wish you good health.
I don t believe that.
thehill.com Better for you
Man fuck Woodrow Wilson with a pine cone.
I give it til Monday.
I saw this posted earlier today. I find it hard to believe that a random national sample of 559 adults only results in a margin of sampling error of 4. 8 points. There are what 371 million people in the U.S Who knows maybe it's right. Any statisticians or pollsters out there
I love how all your posts indicate that everything you know about Covid19 had come straight from reddit posts.
InfoWars down vote and move on.
I have kids. Can't really root for that anymore.
They could but let s not forget they make more than masks. And by doing that could about kill the company going to battle against the government over something so dumb.
gt dictator wannabe gt he mocks the wrong people on twitter a lot Thinking.
I like that the url says halfwit
And some of these people think the situation would have been handled better by Biden. Imagine 2 more months of travel when cases double daily.
People die of malaria all year round though right
No one's saying live life normal. Try to stay in but it shouldn't be required
Read title of this post. It's right there.
Do you think that laws are these weird wizard spells where ones says the same words that must coincide with identical circumstances and then the government gets to magically intervene Laws are left up to collective interpretation. This is so that we can have a flexible system that is able to adjust to the infinite amount of variables the universe throws at us and best serve the people. How do you think the concept of marshal law was created in the first place When do you think it was added Go back to 5th grade.
Using total deaths is weird How is using total deaths weird
Thank the holy spirit and Virgin Mary for voter suppression. Without it us Republicans would be in big trouble. This is America and God loves us the most. I ain't trying to help anyone who ain't white American. I always say keep the blacks and spicks off the poles. Keep America conservative. God bless us and only us.
It s almost as if small government promisies equate to a government incapable of responding to big problems. Republicans have blood on their hands.
Well said Now say it again im regards to illegal arrest and detainment.
False Proclaimed all the states with mail in voting and low fraud.
To put it plainly the US is just the bigger kid on the block. Canada or Europe can t do much in dire times when everyone has to fend for themselves. Especially since most of them are under the agreed upon 2 of gdp to military expenditures quota set by NATO.
Death fears this man.
I am really sorry but you are fucked really fucked And still 45 of your people would vote Trump back in tomorrow You best immigrate
Us black folk don t need hand outs. We re not as helpless as close minded white people think.
You always hear about survival of the fittest yeah Well apparently to survive in this fucking backwards society strength and intelligence mean nothing. Nepotism and psychopathy determine your status. What a time to be alive.
When aviators on a serious command track are approaching the time in their career when being XO of a carrier is in their sights they're sent through the Nuclear Power Pipeline. Not all of them make it through that program but most do.
I am fine with that as long as a person who is unknowingly sick and makes another person sick gets criminally charged.
If they refuse to hold him accountable maybe it's time we start holding his supporters accountable for their actions. No more engagement or debate We go back to Direct and proportional accountability for their behavior.
gt As an atheist and not exactly well read in any of the myriad of religions... Not taking you seriously.
Trudeau never shut down Roxham Road. Go ahead go to the country that can t get any masks for their doctors.
I never thought there could be a politician dumber than Sarah Palin. Ladies and gentlemen the 45th President of the United States.
My question was just regarding whether or not illegals farm workers are essential right now with what's going on. Nothing more. But thank you for the answer nonetheless.
It s like they want it to come true just so they can bash the President over it.
Worse than worthless. We're literally correcting Jared's mistakes instead of fighting this pandemic.
It means the system is working perfectly sadly as Noam Chomsky has warned us about ad nauseam. The 10 Principles of Concentration of Wealth and Power 1. Reduce Democracy 2. Shape Ideology 3. Redesign the Economy 4. Shift the Burden 5. Attack Solidarity 6. Run the Regulators 7. Engineer the Elections 8. Keep the Rabble In Line 9. Manufacture Consent 10. Marginalize the Population
That was an Vietnam era Unknown. The Unknowns for WW I WW II and the Korean War are still there.
The masks go to whoever ordered and paid for them as they're supposed to
A lockdown is not really supported by Swedish law
Again Trump is an idiot that takes no personal responsibility EVER.
The hourly TopPedo brigade is here once again.
Why do you think he stole the N95 masks Massachusetts purchased prior to Kraft flying to China direct Why do you think he's having a shit fit about 3M sending PPE to Canada and Central South America Why is he pitting states against each other in getting supplies Because Trump totally sold out the national stockpile.
Historical precedent is an excuse to let abuses continue on. FDR imprisoned Japanese Americans during WWII. Do we need to do that again He got away with it so it s fair game right And no the government does not have a monopoly on violence. That s what the 2nd Amendment literally is about. And what happens when the government decides your speech endangers the collective good Because you push dangerous ideas like traditional marriage You re endangering the gay community with your rhetoric. See what I m getting at Conservatism is defined as gt conservatism noun commitment to traditional values and ideas with opposition to change or innovation. gt the holding of political views that favor free enterprise private ownership and socially traditional ideas. What part of allowing nationalization of enterprise keeps it free What part of the collective good maintains private ownership
They are only promoting the idea of cloth masks now to give people a sense of security and control. People are scared and becoming irrational. A cloth mask isn t going to help you very much let alone they aren t promoting the idea of safety glasses pssstt because they don t want you buying them from the healthcare workers if they wanted you to actually be safer they would suggesting real medical masks and eye protection. The virus can stay in the air for 3 hours and it can just as easily get in your eyes. This is all just psychological comforting. Just stay home people
Don't worry Joe will fix it. He can rally unity and coordinate across the aisle. Blue No Matter Who
Apologies you re totally right. You would be ACCUSED. And GUILTY. What subreddits do that I ll subscribe and report them when I see it it s unconscionable to share a username in this fashion despite the sharer s intent.
Gotta love watching people support and write news where over the age of 45 literally means nothing to society. Thanks peeps. Is this the future of the country... Logan's Run
Had 100 basis points right They are at 0 now
That makes you a horrible county man. If somebody said sacrifice for your people what immediately jumps into your head But if Mexican children can do it cheaper
Turns out it wasn t a Republican that drank the fish tank cleaner. That woman looks like she murdered her husband.
That actually makes sense.
How come there hasn t been massive protests against the system yet
In Trump s case I m not so sure. I think he just kind of lurches and reacts following his basest impulses without any kind strategy or masterplan. Other right wingers Sure maybe. But unless I m like organizing a general strike or something what good does it do for me to personally get worked up or to get mad on the internet
I hope not either. Mahomes is a great dude. Wish y'all the best too
Yes continue to push the President trying to obtain the vaccine research with the stipulation that it'll be for Americans only or the production of masks and restricting the distribution to other countries aside. Keep focusing on muh 4 years like I've said anything about his decisions up to now and on some retarded lib con battle that I'm not even part of you subhuman yankee. You don't know where I stand on China retard. My bio calls for calling COVID the Wuhan Coronavirus My posts on China have been Fuck China for spreading this shit You don't know where I stand on Italy where I've laughed at how retarded they were for their hug a chink day when the virus was announced. You're throwing an emotional tantrum and propping me up as something I'm not whereas I actually have EVIDENCE for what I'm talking about. Guess what Italy didn't do Try to take the research for themselves and talk about hoarding masks for themselves. I don't care that people are Christian you daft cunt. I care that people are still going to CHURCH during this pandemic and contributing to the spread. I care that you dumb ass yanks are complaining about muh rights when you're not taking this virus seriously enough and DIDN'T take it seriously at all until 250 000 Americans contracted it.
It's not airborne. It's transmitted via droplet and contact. The people with N 95 are at a greater risk for it to become aerosolized by medical procedure.
I don t need to convince you you obviously think that losing a pound is only by losing 3500 calories. Which is true but that is for body fat and muscle. Water weight is held and lost as the body uses it and your body uses fluids far more when you are sick. People can wake up one day and weigh 7 lbs over their weight. It s why a lot of people quit working out after their New Years resolutions they start working out and suddenly gain weight in the first few days or weeks. Our bodies can adjust water weight quickly based on what we need.
Note in this pic they are boarding up Pike Market in Seattle. That specific shop' is a corner stall where they sell fresh flowers. Right next to a leftist book store Left Bank Books. They are boarding up because those entitled leftists will burn the place down looting it if there isnt anybody there to watch it. They do this every may day too because all those peaceful leftists break windows and set shit on fire.
gt We are running out of ventilators and we could have people dying because there are no ventilators he said. Where's the evidence of that Hospital beds are not anywhere near capacity. gt Don t use the word seize Cuomo said to reporters calling it a harsh word. He's telling the media what type or propaganda to spread
He'll be dead before this fever dream happens. Stalin had a lot of life left when coming to power. Trump is old AF.
Anytime I get a hateful message I ignore it. Won t waste my time and won t give them the satisfaction of a reply.
64 of all new deaths 1 327 as of 7 pm Eastern from 2 states NY 56 and NJ 8 What the chance the press won't make the distinction to scare everyone from the remaining 48
Good luck. 3M makes damn near anything used in almost every business. And what law are they breaking
Probably shave just scuttled the ship.
I am so thankful that Obama is not president. So very very thankful
I'm not nearly as confident as some on Trump's re election. The Dems mastered voter harvesting in California and took back the house based on fraud. Voter harvesting will be on steroids in multiple states this November and I think it will be a major miracle if Trump is re elected and the Republicans hold on to the Senate.
I CANNOT EXPRESS HOW MUCH THIS NATION HATES THIS FUCKER
Haha like Trump doesn't have dementia.
RemindMe 6 months
Yep. Pretty much everyone in my generation EAS d the fuck outta there.
Goddamn I hope we survive this but it's looking more grim by the day. He continues to consolidate power by firing anybody who might step out of bounds even if it's defined in their job responsibilities. Fire until you get one who doesn't push then move on to the next internal threat. The real horror are that these positions are in fact made for internal checks checks he clearly does not want to be bothered by. Republicans act like it's not nearly as offensive as fancy mustard on a hotdog.
What if you oppose both as unconstitutional
Ah The good old checking the date tactic. I really should get into the habit of doing this.
The guy is as dumb as his father in law. This Country has never been so screwed up as it has been for the last 3 1 2 years. Pray things change in November.
There is a political divide a watershed. One side is liberal and will always push an agenda more liberal than today's The other is conservative and seeks too restrict the influence of the other. This is two party politics in a nutshell. You must choose if you want to enable unrestricted power of government and lesser power of yourself or if you want to support individualism and it's political influence. I personal believe that all governments end up as socialist or communist because the citizens take their freedoms for granted and vote for self indulgent policies until the liberal party take authority and only the elite political players live the life that the citizens should live.
What rights have been taken from you The right to eat with strangers Do you think they had Olive Garden when the constitution was written It's NOT A PERMANENT THING. IF YOU COULD GET AIDS OR TETANUS FROM BEING CLOSE TO SOMEONE ELSE WOULD YOU BE SO CAVALIER This has NOTHING to do with RIGHTS and everything to do with being selfish and uninformed. Edit Spelling
Who banned it Fauci said doctors could proscribe it if they wanted to.
Unfuckingbelievable
gt What s the Secret to Jared Kushner s Doll Like Skin He eats babies.
The call to fire him came down from the trump admin yes
I hope ALL Republicans take the fish bowl cleaner miracle cure.
That's a super bold claim. There are a lot of pretty bad things on this Earth. Especially ones that effect people all over the world.
Yeah most Americans aren t that smart I m sorry. Look at what the governor of Georgia just said yesterday. He didn t know the spread is asymptotic either that elected official has been living under a rock or doesn t give a fuck. Idk which one is worse. And people voted for that guy...
Well it's kind of simple really. Y'see mail in voting could lead to vote fraud because there are unscrupulous people out there who will take advantage of mail in balloting because that's what Republicans would do.
Not to mention them cutting food stamps and throwing people off welfare. Arrrgggh
Kay Ivey just issued a stay at her me warning. A little late but oh well
Good thing you're not in charge
You mean like global warming
As an outsider you clearly don't know how our elections work. Trump can't do anything.
Title should read ruining the coronavirus response.
That is the definition of honor and integrity
And speculation is speculation. Kudos to whoever does his makeup. He looks pretty good for someone who is a 1. 5 gallons short of where he was three days ago
That's one small step for man amp x200B One giant leap for Autocracy
My mom is retired Navy and when I brought the matter up with her she got mad and said that they were right to relieve this man of his duty because loose lips sink ships and his leaking that information put him and his entire crew at risk from enemy actors. What would be the worst enemy in this situation today A nation from this world that's currently battling a fucking pandemic or the disease running rampant among the sailors in his own vessel Gee I wonder. Mom's capacity for critical thought goes out the window on two things I've noticed her unshakable loyalty to the Republican party and her inability to think outside the box when it comes to regulations and rules in the military. Anyone who leaks anything is a dirty traitor in her mind and anyone who kneels before the flag is a dirty America hater etc. She's a real piece of work. But she makes me wonder how many others there are like her. Not all veterans are as insane as she is but I'll bet a good portion of them are.
nytimes.com nytimes.com some of the doctors i work with have been prescribing it and see success not a mediacal expert but from what i understood works better if no pre exisiting conditions.
gt I dunno man. I just think it's super dumb to be mass prescribing a drug like this when there's so little evidence that it helps and when one of the tradeoffs is accumulation of eyeball poison. I know and there is a reason why one does not give those drugs to people with psoriasis if memory serves. I'm not saying its a good idea to willy nilly give it out like the Faux news turds are trying to push... just saying if all else fails and ones condition is projected to get categorically worse then there is the matter of the right to at least try. Therein healthy asymptomatic carriers would definitely not be a population one should give those medicines to less somehow magically data comes in that shows the drugs to actually be the cure the propaganda and idiots like to try to pretend it to be.
gt We love hockey and beer and curling. You're in. So everyone but the south then. Didn't we sorta try this before
How can this be resolved
Season 2 felt dirty season 1 felt corrupt
Please how can we let the world understand this People are starting to think it s the states as a whole that s fucking everything up but it s not it s trump and fucking GOP
Doing it for 1 5 the price any boss will take that deal
Poor Iran. They need those humanitarian rocket motors sooo baaaaaaaaad
Exactly 4 years is 146 Mooches
Sources
Negative. President is a federal appointment therefore a federal issue.
I m genuinely sorry about our withholding Canadian masks I hope our citizens learn their lesson from this administrations incompetence
I m sorry but if we had Corbyn in at the moment we would be in a far worse situation did you see his proposals And did you see how they worked out in countries like Italy Boris fucking Johnson is working is arse off with corona virus and a pregnant girlfriend to save yours and everyone else s life. Have some respect.
I don't need to know the full story to know that the email was inappropriate.
That s some bs and they are the scummiest people that exist. Edit the people who did it. Not all Chinese would do that Edit 2 I blame the Chinese government for this. They probably hired these people to do that. That s so messed up
So a hateful lunatic posted a hateful lunatic post....
It s not like he lost 10 over night he lost it over the course of three days and yes he was degydrated. That s why when you re sick you are supposed to drink a lot of fluids because your body is quite literally using it to help fight off the virus and any infection. Also just so you can understand that it s completely possible I lost 16 lbs over the course of a week swapping my diet to keto. Assuming I lost the normal weight loss of 1 2 lbs week I would have lost 11 12 lbs of water in that first week. The most water weight comes off in the first few days in the first 3 days of that first week I dropped 6 lbs. More than likely water weight. This man is sick and I bet his appetite is not what it was and also he s breaking out in sweats easily can drop 15 lbs in 3 days.
While they should have made the recommendation tax dollars are not fungible for things like this. Each department had their own budget. They can t just say well we allocated funds for this program but we now need it here so gimme. That s not how government budgets work. At least they didn t before the health crisis. They could probably get away with moving money around now but taking funding from one program as stupid as it was to pay for preparatory measures wouldn t happen.
a 300 delegate lead is the most dangerous lead
If there was a plan it was on the level of Pinky and the Brain. They were going to lose. They are going to lose. They have nothing.
I would almost make the argument that freedom to assemble is only partially impacted you can put as many people as you like in a digital assembly just not in the same room. It was hard to do that before the internet but now it's not that difficult.
Reagan also crashed en.m.wikipedia.org 1987 the economy. The two most likely causes of the crash were due to his economic plans actions. Republicans just so happened to be in office during the last three recessions 3 of the last 4 republoans in office and even though Democrats had about equal time in office for some reason they got lucky and didn't tank the economy. I'd say not destroying the economy and putting millions out of work is a pretty good way to help the working class given that republican policies are a near guarantee otherwise.
I feel personally attacked
Sorry we don't enjoy spending our lives as spineless cock holsters like you.
Same. It's a waste of energy and time but sometimes it just feels good to clown them.
And he's also using the old Friday night when people aren't paying attention announcement trick. He's trying to use not one but two methods of burying this news.
So ventilators were borrowed from areas of the state that haven't been hit as hard yet. PPE is still short across the state and Cuomo is still asking for assistance from the federal government to provide more ventilators and PPE. I wouldn't say moving resources around is the same as somehow finding more. A stockpile is useless if you don't use it when you need it.
You can literally make one at home.
It's weird to me that the only news sites that I can find this story on are WWLP WATE WRBL And all the websites look exactly the same. All the stories seem the same. Everything about these sites pushing this story seem fake and generic. Like cookie cutter totally real local news sites.
Lol no ones happy except the people saying that 100k dead is a good job after stating the whole thing was a dem hoax. I voted for trump in the last election because he saves me 15k a year in taxes 60k during his term but im willing to give that up for a more competent leader that will actually have people in outposts around the world in countries that are far from honest. saving our citizens from unnecessary threats such as this pandemic. im willing to look at the whole picture whereas alot of people in politics only care about their team
You're disgusting. I'm done listening to word vomit from someone as heartless and clueless as you.
So if you get the virus your doctor is one of the 37 who thinks the drug is effective you will side with the other doctors and decline treatment with the drug
BWAH GAWD FOLKS this train has NO BRAKES
He is a piece of Trumps unflushables
Sanders is rallying against the Democratic party. There are lots of Democrats who think that their party is doing just fine as it is and is not in need of a revolution. Those people will naturally be drawn to anyone who isn't him. Oh and they're both way too old.
What an absolute MADLAD
Benevolent dictatorships are still authoritarian. Before you say something just fact check yourself first and don't make yourself look stupid. Benevolent dictatorship A benevolent dictatorship refers to a government in which an authoritarian leader exercises absolute political power over the state but is perceived to do so with regard for benefit of the population as a whole
Tucked all way down there.
I'll take Actions that surprise no one who has been paying attention for 1000 Alex.
Do you want grandparents to die
Oh no the Canadians are coming
2 for 1 special...
This was in the past tense so its not a call to violence
That s a long ass title
What kind of proof do you have otherwise If you honestly believe this why the hell aren t you out there garnering more influence taking on a leadership position and changing the country for the better Or do you just want to suck on chewing tobacco and jerk off to r incest like the rest of these weak and cowering Alabama hoodlums
Should be completed before being qualified to run for office. The problem is that of the two major political parties one of them doesn't believe experts know what they are talking about.
They arent making precident. They are declaring precident the way Michael Scott declared bankruptcy. The problem is that a whole lot of people dont know any better and a whole lot of people who do know better just dont think that they are the one who should rock the boat. When Michael Scott declares bankruptcy they dont say that's not how that works they say because they would rather not get involved. This dude is telling you lies are facts and expecting you to keep your mouth shut out of habit. He expects that you were raised well and you follow the rule Thumper from the movie Bambi and your grandmother laid forth if you dont have nuthin' nice to say dont say nuthin' at all. People cant take power unless we give power. Phil Ochs put it quite well youtu.be gt Oh look outside the window gt There's a woman being grabbed gt They've dragged her to the bushes gt And now she's being stabbed gt Maybe we should call the cops gt And try to stop the pain gt But Monopoly is so much fun gt I'd hate to blow the game gt And I'm sure It wouldn't interest anybody Outside of a small circle of friends
As long as guns are legal in the US you are forced into the prisoner's dilemma. AKA better to have it and not need it than to need it and not have it.
Saying Pelosi fucked everything up is kinda laughable and sad.
I don't get how he had access to them let alone being able to hold onto them.
apparantley bernie is too now
The Ugly American.
Trump's Karen side is really showing in these press briefings.
How about no.
Just like that bitch Carole Baskins
Get hyped. You get to vote in 213 days
Impeach him for what exactly
He was literally impeached. That leaves assassination and military coup. Which do you think we should go for
Hurricane season is in the fall.
A message to all the true conservatives you can t oppose this and support the lockdown and be ideologically consistent.
I wasn' the op in that context. However to answer your question that is how capitalism works unfortunately where businesses are in it for their best interest not the interest of their workers. Look at Carrier after making huge show in 2016 they still moved most jobs into Mexico the next year. Look at Amazon a trillion dollar company that overwork their employees and treat them like shit and Bezos has the audacity to get a 129M tax rebate.
SERE school Oh man. I'm just gonna keep on enjoying my desk job thank you very much
Not really no
Presidential like It's just gonna fade away we totally have it under control people are just going to work and getting better That type of Presidential
No you didn't It is physically and mathematically impossible. You're either mistaken or lying. Edit just to showcase an example someone on a fast loses about a pound a day. Someone eating literally nothing
I agree with you. I'd say he's criminally ignorant as in it ought to be a crime to be as ignorant as he is. However my point has more to do with him not being an ideologue. He admires men who get their will done. And the more people they squash in the process the manlier he thinks they are. So had Jackson managed to keep the Union intact and avoided a civil war by hanging all the secessionists he could get his hands on Trump would be signing his praises for strongarming and bullying the South. I don't really think Trump cares to know why the North and South fought a civil war. But I do believe that he's under the impression that Jackson wouldn't have freed the slaves.
gt You all know what that means Sanders asked the audience. High deductibles high co payments high out of pocket expenses. gt Sanders also claimed that 500 000 Americans went bankrupt last year due to medical bills. You cant claim lower deductibles payments deductibles and also include that funding in how to pay for it Lower taxes means higher out of pocket cost. Lower out of pocket cost means higher taxes
You proud of being a bigot
You act like we don't have our own logging and paper industries here. I live in the Fox Valley and there's paper mills everywhere. Just divert confiscate that shit with the Defense Production Act. Bip bap bam problem solved. Also just use a fucking washcloth. Only doctors need that shit anyways and there's like 20 of them in the country if recent headlines are anything to go by.
Theoretical question what would it take for the people to rise up and take a stand against the government mandates to be on lockdown Whether that's simply going back to work or marching on the states' capitols Or are we simply in a prisoners dilemma
I'm sure hes got a lot of practice dealing with donnie every day now
The degree to which we have been sold to China by our elected leaders is the story the foundation that which colors all subsequent stories.
At least hard enough to flick and hear a thud more than a smack. Give it a try.
You can think of this as a principled stand if you want. All the rest of the world sees is a country that for decades has riled against the idea of governmental influence on markets a policy that was a major catalyst for the global recession in 2008 not to mention a justification for waging a war of terror in Latin America one of the regions Trump wants 3M to cease exports to incidentally suddenly turn on a dime and demand from the highest levels of its government economic isolationism in some of its most drastic forms. Isolationism at the direct and known expense of real lives of people who made the mistake of not being American. In other words the same country that forced other countries to rely on it for manufacturing supply chains and security in the face of global threats is now turning its back on those same countries. This isn't just an exercise in cognitive dissonance. This is a decision by a substantial portion of the conservative movement to forgo any semblance of ideological consistency in favor of isolationist paranoia. That's what's cowardly deciding that this was all part of our ideology from the beginning and being okay with what Trump is proposing knowing it'll cost lives instead of identifying it for the deadly hypocrisy it is.
If you murder a child at 1 years old or murder it just before it's born is it still murder or is it a late term abortion
This is r politics afterall. If it isn't dumping on Trump is it even real Just like the Kushner posts gravely misunderstanding what he said about the stockpile being ours the United States. To use send to states in need. Each state and governor have a responsibility to their people not to rely on the feds to babysit them. These journalists are disgusting.
Zzzzzzzzzzzzzzzz
Ah. A news anchor is creating national policy. So glad this is a thing
I'm asking whether or not people think that illegals that are working as farmers are essential under the current circumstances.
They're saying because they have guns they'll be the last one standing Negan is already marshalling his forces.
This. 100 this. Let the south burn. They deserve it.
dEeP sTaTe
Is glory gayner still alive It all depends on how much TP you have I still can t find the shit and have been stealing some from work. But TP survival
You're already 3 weeks behind on that one.
To much talk in this thread about farm workers. We are bringing in foreign workers to do high paying jobs software devs for example when we have capable people already here. We need to cancel high paying work Visa's except for super rare unique cases. Like a scientist who developed some therapy new tech etc. And is here to give guidance to us on how to do it ourselves. If silicon valley wants more devs they should fund training for our citizens.
Coming from europe just browsing this sub without getting political or anything r coronavirus is just an echo chamber fear. They act like it s a second black death. They love sensation such as young people dying which is kind of sickening. Also misinformation some articles seem to be wrong. Whenever I read my own country s CDC report the situation is much less severe than that sub makes it out to be.
Please don t say you guys It s not at all what any of us want. We have no control over what Trump does and it s really scary. Especially for those that didn t vote for him. This whole thing is ridiculous How could he expect us to succeed without working together
There has been a lot of misinformation and lack of nuance. In an ongoing pandemic with a novel not seen before virus it takes awhile to figure out IFR Infection Fatality Rate and CFR Case Fatality Rate These numbers are going to change but they become more certain over time. One of the big sources of differing numbers though is what measures are used in response. There are estimates at the high end for no action taken to lower estimate numbers based on all measures taken stay at home order quarantine testing masks social distancing Further timing is crucial. Covid 19 infection rate is exponential NOT linear therefore mistakes measures not taken soon enough made early in the pandemic have a much more significant impact. Also the timing of when to lift restrictions i.e lifting them at Easter would have been suicidal is important. Who to listen to then Dr Fauci gt Models had showed that the US death toll could be at least 100 000 with aggressive social distancing White House experts said earlier and as high as 2. 2 million without them. cnn.com Another expert that can be trusted MT Osterholm projections i.imgur.com Medscape has a good Covid 19 research and information Center medscape.com
The reason that Trump couldn't do anything about the Democratic hoax COVID 19 was because he was to busy with the Democratic hoax impeachment. IT IS ALL THE FAULT OF THE DEMS A s won't even help at this point.
Ok but you understand how there's a slight difference between literally eating nothing and being able to eat smoothies only. I agree Cuomo is full of shit on his story but exaggerating your story doesn't help.
How hard is it to say China lied.
Appeals to authority don't constitute proof no. Additionally primaries are a private enterprise and not equivalent to a governmental election. And I don't think mail in ballot were of particular issue regarding the primary. If you're claiming Democrats are more prone to abusing absentee ballots then demonstrate that.
Train them. People are motivated especially when it s for a common good unfortunately the common good goal is rarely brought up We accomplished large scale works projects during the Great Depression and trained up plenty of people then and during WW2. Why not now Everyone gets an education through public school and that creates a baseline then build on that.
Where in LA are you The freeways have been fairly empty for weeks. Check sigalert and you will see green for almost the entire city as opposed to the typical solid red traffic.
I was about to say... it s their right to sell to whoever they want. Even if we don t like it.
No thanks.
In what became the US in the 1700s you were either a slave owner or one of like 20 people who weren t. See where I m going here The Constitution makes it clear that there is to be no official religion in the country and yet to this day all three branches continue to base legislative judicial and executive decisions on Christian beliefs. You don t have to agree it s simply my opinion that it s time to stop mixing religious guidance in with public address. Unfortunately a hard divide between God and politics would likely lead to conflict similar to the civil war in this country. What were those states rights all the confederates were fighting for again
Hmm... Yes a global pandemic is causing people to stay home hmm yes... This means they cannot work. Trump's fault.
In all seriousness where the hell did you get that from. Fauci is a medical expert who's been in the field his whole life. Trump is not a medical expert. Fauci has much greater medical knowledge than Trump and should be trusted more than Trump.
They look like super villains.
Surprise surprise surprise
Wait a second I m confused. We ve known all along it was about the Magintsky Act haven t we Remember Russian adoptions I thought we knew all along that Goldstone used Hillary bait to set the meeting but it was really about sanctions. What am I missing forgetting
We should build a big shiny marble prison It can be a dual purpose Monument Residence entirely funded by tax dollars. All the cheap well done steak and ketchup one could ever dream of.
Donnie is number one on Facebook
At this point I feel like Trump would say go for it. His hatred for liberal states is our golden ticket.
Same for GOP.
Urges He didn't urge shit He literally emphasized saying it was optional and that he wouldn't do it. That's pretty much the opposite of urges.
Who the fuck knows anymore. All I know is the current moron in charge knows damn well that the NY State AG is coming for that ass the second he is out of office. So he's going to everything he can to avoid that day. He seriously wants to be President until he dies.
It's so funny gun nuts keeping trying to make the US Constitution into some magical text that caters to what they think it says. Never mind that the SCOTUS affirmed several times that the NO RIGHT in the US Constitution is absolute. That the 2A has limits and the courts have set SEVERAL of them that function as precedent. This is one of those cases. So before you start making comments you don't quite understand do some reading.
If a person attends church amidst the outbreak they should be required to null and void covid healthcare
You're the one that jumped out of the bushes to demand a source. If you didn't want to talk about it you could have just stayed silent.
gt As far as the gt 100 benefit payments I do think you have a point but alternatively alot of people just got kicked off their health insurance other benefits by being laid off so it could be argued that it is meant to offset that. That's a good point but with how much healthcare costs that seems like a poor solution to me. It would make a lot more sense to just have the government directly subsidize insurance rather than give a bunch of extra money to people who were paid so little before that they couldn't even afford insurance in the first place. For the 1 200 check apparently it's going to take up to 5 months for people who didn't file taxes last year with direct deposit which defeats the point in the swiftness of it's intentions too. Unfortunately the people most affected by that are likely the people most in need of it as well. If it were me I'd freeze mortgage and rent payments subsidize insurance costs give the business loans and sure up unemployment to ensure people can still afford the essentials and states can cover the sudden influx of claims. It seems so contradictory to try to stimulate the economy while telling us to stay inside and I feel like I'm getting screwed over for being responsible. My job made preparations in January I get paid twice the minimum wage. So now I can work remotely just fine while someone making minimum wage working part time is now being paid more than me to literally sit on their ass and watch tv. That leaves you rather bitter. I'm a liberal I support social welfare but you shouldn't be punished for working why should someone not working make more than someone who is Not only am I paying for that through my taxes but it's devaluing the money I actually get to keep. Edit btw are you sure you can't get unemployment Afaik you can't get regular unemployment but self employed people are still eligible for the 600. You should look into that.
His business was failing just like Trump. They needed it and it will fail again.
Yeah Like South Korea Taiwan and Sweden are doing.
What else would you call a bunch of marionettes
Must be Canadian Moron I guess.
Except being fired by Trump is like a badge of honor.
Did you just say sorry to a Canadian D
Are you familiar with false equivalencies
Probably because there are few mentally unbalanced world leaders out there to do as much damage to the world as Trump
And you don't think there's any way she slipped info from that meeting to her hubby He just happens to be ridiculously lucky
With no Destro to even remotely keep him on task. This administration is just filled with the like of Dreadnoks and Major Bludd. Even Baroness makes an appearance with Melania.
I frequently have to point this out. We are a country of laws.
A Jared only cabinet would be like an army from hell of evil stupid Mr. Meeseeks.
r coronanuremburg It needs to happen.
Wow that got authoritarian quick Government takeover of corporation Dogs and cats living together
They're doing jobs Americans won't do You're right because Americans can't compete with people who work under the table. A worker earning 18 hr before taxes in a paycheck is not the same as getting 18 in untaxed cash reporting 0 income and stacking that cash with government aid.
He was withholding from Michigan because he is feuding with the female Governor there. I m not sure of her name but she has been calling him out a lot lately and he isn t having it.
Lol ive been wearing a mask for over month and i was told i was feeding into a racist conspiracy theory for doing so. My how things have changed since early feb.
In this case using drinking and driving we are spending the license of all drivers because they have the capability of drinking and possibly drunk. That is not how it works.
In other words abandon all hope for the end is nigh This extreme fear mongering from the Left in order to cower the US public into giving up their rights is getting beyond ridiculous. And it s largely these journalists that are to blame for it as they are the mouthpiece of the Left and the harbingers of doom.
Omg. The negativity needs to stop.
Yea the leftists created the war on drugs targeting minority or inner city communities while at the same time smuggling the very drugs we were at war against into the country. Yea the leftist are the racists.
That interpreter did an excellent job relaying the tone of those comments.
Social distancing is the most minor from of lowered social interaction it's not as if we've all been locked down in our house with no option to leave.
Yeah don't I couldn't go past the first comment thread. These people are literally twisting themselves into pretzels of incoherent fallacious argument just to defend their world view.
Or what you spineless fuck Reek What are you going to do Reek
Yeah more and more I find myself unsubbing from stuff. I can t even be a part of my own state s subreddit cause it s all lefty politics.
chill bro
Not exactly. They ve shown that the virus was not created in a lab but they have not shown that it did not escape youtu.be from one.
Exactly people don t know if they have it. They can spread it before they know they have it. People have a freedom of religion and no one is going to stop them from believing. Responsible churches are having online services. Also the 1st amendment protect our freedom of speech but you can scream fire in a movie theater because it s a public danger. Large gatherings in a church are public danger.
Technically not in the Bill of Rights.
What makes them terrible and sinners exactly
le r dogelore has arrived also literally nobody not even my trans friends get offended if you misgender them. they'll just politely correct you.
Shove a flute up your ass and tweet that to daddy you nonsensical dunce. If dad wasn t a knuckle dragging moron they could see their family and go to work
So he was removed when a letter he wrote asking for help leaked. Having some passing familiarity with the Navy's communications system I can tell you if it leaked he probably leaked it because the only channels this would be appropriate information to communicate on would be up the chain on a secure system. Information that might give our enemies a leg up on understanding a potential weakness in our military readiness is not something to pass around lightly. Maybe if there was broad malfeasance by command and people were dying rapidly AND there was no legitimate military reason to accept those casualties MAYBE you could justify going public morally although it takes a lot of morally' to overcome the UCMJ
Condoms are 99. 9 safe. Lysol for the last 1
Lol you literally have no idea what you're talking about bud. Troll somewhere else
Ebola named after the Ebola Valley in the Congo. Spanish Flu not actually from Spain but labelled anyway Guinea Worm West Nile Virus German Measles Ross River Fever Marburg Virus St. Louis Encephalitis Rocky Mountain Fever Lyme Disease named after Lyme in Connecticut etc see a pattern yet Chinese Virus what's the actual problem here
Dont forget giving path to citizenship to illegals
Data is benign but comparisons are not. Choosing to compare countries with dramatically different populations and densities off just total numbers is clearly trying to push a narrative.
Kinda sad to see so many people on reddit with such a low low bar for hate... Essentially anything you find that you dont like or agree with is hate according to you. Whats ironic too is that Leftists are generally the ones spewing the irrational hate
Interesting.
Lol no thanks I'm not putting my name on a list of wrongthinkers dissedents. I've seen the way Dems talk about taking guns I'm not giving them the means to target me.
Why should America aim so low You know there are lots of countries with that standard of living right Interested European here that stumbled into this space
Off with their heads
If Romney did interfere and took over for Jared I would feel that is an improvement.
Tar and feathers would be a good look for her
So the 9th arrondissement of South Manitoba
Whataboutism is OK when leftists do it We have three coequal branches of government. What was the chamber that starts all spending bills focused on Protecting the country or wasting time on a Ukrainian hoax What did Pelosi know and when did she know it Why was she encouraging people to crowd into cities like San Francisco
No
My republican family would love this news. We should worry about america first they can keep their doctors and medical supplies if they want.
Yeah it's called free trade and free markets.
so much for loving liberty
That wasn t me insulting them and calling them stupid though now was it I don t think just because you work at Starbucks your stupid but a lot of people who work at at Starbucks are crazy PC far left people and those people are stupid Lol I can t argue with stupid.
Where did I say random group
David Barton is a legend.
That s how those states turn blue.
Jail
How heavy are those goal posts The DPA authorizes the president to force companies into contracts they must obey. That isn t a regulation
This man his family and this entire administration are a direct threat to the safety of every single American.
I knew as soon as I saw the captain had been removed that the administration had made a martyr out of the kind of captain we all want to think epitomizes what being a ships captain means. He was a good man saying what needed to be said to to paraphrase save lives that didnt have to be lost on a ship during peacetime He was looking out for his men. His men who man the ship. The ship that projects american military might. This captain was looking out for US in a way that I havent seen this president stand up for us in three years. Fair winds and following seas Captain Crozier. We clearly arent worthy of your kind of leadership. You know... the good kind.
I can see that. I always thought that he initially tried to say perfectly normal call or perfectly legal or something flubbed the delivery and said perfect call Because he s a child and can t admit fault he just doubled down and kept saying perfect call
B.A W.
How about this We establish a voting week and allow a wider range of documentation to show someone is a citizen and who they say they are. Like a bank statement. It's also free to get an id or you can use your drivers license or whatever. Then would you finally be okay with voter id Weeks you be willing to acknowledge it as not raciss
FFS I thought I was the only one who believed this economy meet wall So fucking frustrating watching this economy being turned into a recession.
Move to a blue state. The federal government will collapse but I'm watching in real time as our government in Washington state is picking up a lot of the slack. I can see the transition for us from united states to significantly more independent states going pretty smoothly.
it's all expenses as a whole vs all cuts as a whole. they prioritize everything and anything below a line gets cut. was taxpayer funded college for illegal aliens above the line and ventilators below the line if taxpayer funded college for illegal aliens was not above the line wouldn't ventilators have been farther up
Well in that case we thank you for buying so many of our dollars in this terrible time. Without you kind foreigner we could never operate in such a reckless manner.
Even if Trump wasn t lying he has had 4 years to replenish it. He is such a liar and so infantile.
My point is that he doesn't have to try to 13lbs of water weight is nothing for a dude his size. If he tried to he could definitely squeeze out more. There are a lot of MMA fighters who cut 20 even 30 lbs for a fight. Hell I did 10 lb weight cuts as a teenager It's also like... Really bad for you. Would not try at home.
This is about wanting to take credit.
Yep totally faking. The virus does not make you hallucinate
So what's the transmission rate that justifies suspending rights Hard numbers please not whiny platitudes.
Will Will There are more than 7 000 dead already my friend. Almost entirely due to Republican malice and incompetence. And disinterest. Don't forget their disinterest.
As long as less than 2 million die its a win Only paraphrasing him slightly there.
Coronavirus is clearly a deep state democrat.
Again you missed the point of what I was saying Republicans have been working in small steps for years. Taking over local governments state legislatures and the lower courts. They have worked on gerrymandering and policies that slowly erode voting rights while allowing large amounts of corporate money to flow into elections. They ve been doing it for 30 years and have been reaping the benefits of being a minority of the population while still somehow capturing the senate and the house and presidency consistently. If Democrats could come together and accepting small changes over time to the system we would already be seeing progressive parties instead of far right and centrist candidates.
Where does it say in the Constitution that your right to bear arms is limited by fire rate Should your right to free expression be limited now because the framers couldn't have predicted the internet
I always make the joke at the start of July that I'm happy June is done because June is pride month. I usually get a ton of yah same
Time for them to get their military back.
gt Immigration control also restricts freedom of movement If you enter a place you enter in accordance with that place's rules. Otherwise I could enter your house and steal all your toilet paper without getting in trouble.
Genuine question but if you don't get to hear other points don't you just spiral down a well of confirmation bias. It's easy to believe something if that's all I see. Not trying to start an argument but just curious
But it s not the largest democracy on Earth. That s India with over a billion people.
gt So you are free by being charged with a crime and put in a cage Do you really not understand the difference between an act and the potential consequences for the act should they come to pass Are you really claiming that an act speech should be banned because there's a potential for a bad end result gt So if you go out against quarantine and a cop escorts you back into your home and tells you to stay there does that agree with your delusional worldview as well It's delusional to understand that a government employee is violating a guaranteed right because there's merely a potential for harm Sorry you think so. If you called yourself a conservative in the past you should definitely stop now.
Literally anyone would have done a better job of handling this. ANYONE. Republican or democrat. That's how much of an embarrassment Trump is to this country.
Every now and then I am surprised by reddit comments. But look at you two playing nice.
Honestly I'm torn on this. I hate the way we revere guns in this country. But there are Asians in this country being attacked simply for being asian because racist assholes are getting violent. They have a right to defend themselves but like fuck.
Exactly I am sick of supposed conservatives telling us we can not raise minimum wage or government mandated benefits because it'll get in the way of the market. The market should decide. Yet when the market decides wages should be higher the democrats AND REPUBLICANS go out of their way to import millions of people and allow illegals to take american jobs because business wants to avoid paying the market rate. Let the market decide what a job is worth and stop protecting massive corporations over the american people.
Exactly this
That s what he calls himself. He also supports libertarian policies. And even if he s not libertarian he s DEFINITELY conservative
We could just go here mayoclinic.org Where fever is listed as a cause for dehydration Oh and Cuomo claimed his fever was 103 which is severe and according to the Mayo Clinic entry on dehydration gt the higher your fever the more dehydrated you may become. What's this npr.org gt A mild case of COVID 19 in and of itself is not dangerous. But in some cases more commonly in older people and in people with underlying health issues a mild case can progress to a moderate case that could require some supportive care such as fluids for dehydration typically in an emergency room or urgent care center especially if hospitals are overwhelmed by the most acute cases. Dehydration caused by COVID 19 Wow sounds like the exact thing Cuomo is talking about. What's this houstonmethodist.org gt Serious symptoms of COVID 19 include gt Dehydration Wow dehydration is a serious symptom of COVID 19. One more source just for you from your own country https cdn contenu.quebec ca cdn contenu sante documents Problemes de sante 19 210 30A Guide auto soins anglais.pdf 1584985885 gt Frequent drinking is important because fever causes perspiration and major loss of liquids. Major loss of liquids interesting. Is the government of Quebec lying Is the Mayo Clinic lying when they say a dehydration can be caused by a fever Is the Houston Methodist lying when they say dehydration is a serious symptom of COVID 19 Thanks for the suggestion on reading and learning.
I hope it doesn't get that bad. But sometimes it takes drastic events in order to have drastic changes. Look at all of the social safety nets that were created by Roosevelt during the great depression. Of course it took a world war to fully stabilize and progress America's economy to new heights as well.
Because they want to be Kings and they're terrified that the opposition thinks the same way as them. Fortunatley for them DJT actually cares about our core principles and serves all of the People.
As an American we re fucking trying but the slackjawed right wing fuckheads are basically burning our nation to the ground over some kind of spiteful bonfire. Supposedly they can only get it up if they think of crying liberals so they d burn their own house down if it meant barely damaging their liberal neighbor s shed.
His mental mask is starting to slip...
I never want to hear we can t pay for it again after they threw 1. 5 trillion into the stock market and it did nothing
This may be true but Democrats and Republicans were all saying the same stuff in feburary. Ho watch videos of Nancy Pelosi inviting crowds down to china town
Thank you for taking the time to explain. My country has its own Trump fanboy for a president but at least we have multiple parties and that make it a lot harder for him to do whatever he wants. I mean he tries but he tends to cave when everyone pressures and his approval rates shows even though we won't really know for sure until the elections
it's going to be damned hilarious when the people this will affect will disproportionately hit the commonwealth read old poor rural WHITE people than us in jefferson county or northern kentucky or fayette county. if this thing actually takes affect who do you think is going to be in the better position to make sure people have the required documents the cities or rural areas
That's only if Trump and Pence are no longer in office during Trump's term
And they call us the hateful ones
Yeaah I am not sure if you are being sarcastic or just a crazy deep state nut nut because believe me I see comments like these even on reddit now.
In the same article gt Under sequestration the CDC which managed the stockpile at the time faced cdc.gov a 5 budget cut. In its 2013 budget submission cdc.gov HHS decreased its stockpile funding request from the previous year asking for 486 million a cut of nearly 48 million. The SNS is a key resource in maintaining public health preparedness and response the administration said. However the current fiscal climate necessitates scaling back. gt gt The decrease caught Rehberg s attention at a budget hearing to review the request. Also gt The next year the administration again proposed cutting the stockpile s funding from the 2012 funding level but it warned cdc.gov that reduced funding could result in fewer people receiving treatment during an influenza pandemic. And then there's this gt Congress did grant extra funding in response to emergencies but even then the stockpile was a small ticket item. This is a failure of the system as in both sides. If one side goes in with the expressed intent on cuts to the national stockpile and the other side just bends over after weak resistance IT DOESN'T MATTER THEY'RE BOTH WRONG. Very few voices were bringing this to the public's attention and actually making a compelling case at the time. Get your facts straight
Lets see we have been saying this for a month
As an insider looking... around... I'm also skeptical these elections are going to happen without Trump pulling some dictator shit. I think he's going to call martial law declare the election postponed and deploy troops within strategic locations in the US. So many others keep saying this can't happen because Speaker Pelosi automatically would become president on January 1st 2021 but that law is defined in the US Constitution which has already been violated multiple times over so I don't hold much hope for the US Constitution saving us. I want this fall to happen soon because I want to know if we still have a functioning government. We will know by January.
Where in any of my comments above have I advocated the position that I am content with any number of deaths Stay on topic. We are discussing the deceptive use of statistics to push a biased narrative. You're over here getting your feelings hurt because somehow calling out deceptive statistical comparison means I don't care about the data the statistics are relying on. This is why leftists and conservatives struggle to have reasonable conversations. Everything is about feelings to lefties and you accuse us of not caring when we point out problems with your logic instead of examining the logic.
How hard is it to use the actual title of the article
You can type words on reddit.
Point 4 of the 25 point plan is No Jew therefore may be a member of the nation. I think I heard Bernie say that at his rally the other day.
But is killing people with the disease you have illegal Seems like a grey area
Yes I said Trump probably didn t have anything to do with the CPT of the Navy that was removed and I was down voted never mind that the guy messed up. He seems like a decent officer but you know if I can get pushed out because I was falsely arrested later cleared and the charges sealed this CPT deserved it for messing up and sending that letter to 30 plus people. You can t let info that you aren t combat ready public you just can t when you have a rival flexing their muscles next door. Those people are toxic and so few actually served it amazes me.
It was reformed under a different name and Fauci didn't disagree with the decision.
Not true. He's great a fucking everything up.
Criminal negligence is a thing.
This is the funny part. Libertarians are so utterly stupid and ignore common sense that they go around preaching for things that the parents of their own ideology objected to. It's the same how people go around preaching about Adam Smith when they've never ever read 2 passages from the Wealth of Nations.
gt he'll do some feel good legislation yeah the environment would be marginally better and some social issues wouldn't be up for debate In other words he would be significantly better than Trump in every way that matters. Not as you just claimed Trump without the dumb tweets and maralago tweets There's nothing wrong with arguing that we can do better than Biden he's definitely not my top choice either. But claiming that he would be no better or only marginally better than Trump is extremely stupid. There's really no other way to put it.
Sweating is literally the second symptom of a fever after increased body temperature obviously listed by the Mayo Clinic. Problem with that take it up with them I'm not a doctor. Just a dude who's lost a bunch of weight before from illness and also from weight cutting.
You might interact with someone who interacted with someone and so on.... with an illegal. Virus' don't care what your nationality is just that your human. No treating everyone is a recipe for second and third waves preventing us from getting back to work
Even Pelosi is fed up with her. She's like the coked up ID of Pelosi on steroids
aint they closer to the prosperity gospel
I had heard it was the other way around he exonerated Trump so they nixed his testimony.
The second part MIGHT have some support but the first has nothing. How is it China's fault for the disease We have known about it since December and didn't do anything until almost March. Even if they lied about statistics we did nothing for a month after the first confirmed case.
Honestly Trump is the greatest business man to ever walk the face of this earth
I m so done with her she has to have been dropped as a kid
Spent all his time shopping for brown suits and freebasing fancy mustard.
Really feel like GOP states are more about food and oil and manufacturing
With hydroxychloroquine we knew its side effect because it was an already established drug. With a new vaccine we dont know what the side effects could potentially be.
Dumb meme is dumb
Hello possibly untrue thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u possibly untrue amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reuters.com il 0 context 10000
I feel like we're in Disney's Robin Hood. There's a toady inside the archery target running around for the sheriff ensuring it always hits the bullseye and somehow this doesn't matter to the massive crowd of spectators. Not to mention Trump is CLASSIC Prince John crying and sucking his thumb and Kushner is a Sir Hiss if I've ever seen one.
Wait. This law was passed by Congress and he signed it right He can t just change it now. That s not how our government works. The Executive enforces the laws passed by Congress they don t get to choose what to enforce.
He ll also probably wait until lives aren t at risk
gt When you look at a map do you see that darker outline between states and countries and along the ocean I read this like 15 times and have no idea what you re talking about
If he stops endorsing promoting protecting and acting like witches maybe a witch hunt wouldn't be so devastating. I know he's using it to describe a reactionary systematic and relentless perceived persecution there's that projection again but like his boys in blue are so fond of repeating why you runnin from the police if you didn't do anything wrong.
Other subreddits do feature things like this without usernames obscured and aren't found guilty of anything. But we know that we would be ACCUSED... Because there are people that just LIVE to accuse conservative subreddits of violating rules that other subreddits violate all the time with impunity.
Honestly... That sounds like a better pitch than Biden.
HE LIED Fucken enough with the falsely claimed crap...He fucking lied. Again.
And yes the blind trust is likely just legal aircover because there are too many coincidences. Feinstein is a billionaire because these coincidences always seem to go in her favor. Technically she's not but her husband is. He's doing that CA bullet train to nowhere that's billions into the hole among other shady things.
Republicans decided to believe in alternative facts instead of actual facts.
gt It has no defense against intelligence war. This.
As someone from NY upstate not the city I despise Schumer and think this letter is awesome.
They've got those 50 new golf carts though. s
of course not it it s obviously real. i was just mentioning it could be a phony statement
Of course he didn't know because that would require him to think more than one step ahead and he's incapable.
The media is trying to pin all the blame for this on Trump. Sitting back and taking it is not the strategy I would pursue.
I did what I could. I commute from 215 Windmill to 215 Charleston and see a dozen California plates each trip.
The real irony here is that Trump never has confidence in anybody that shows true integrity.
Haha. They think im Chab. How cute. Anyways Please Remember Our Golden Rule Thou shalt not vote or comment in linked threads or comments and in linked threads or comments thou shalt not vote or comment. It's bad form and the admins will suspend your account if they catch you. I tell you this because according to topminds mods this statement absolves the subreddit of any responsibility for brigading and now they cannot accuse us of brigading their brigade of our sub.
That's what I was going to say. I'm all for ID if it's literally so easy that nobody would have barriers to getting it. Like they take the machine to your neighborhood for a day and you line up and get them. The problem with voter ID laws is they stipulate everyone must get an ID then they close the ID offices within a 30 mile radius and restrict hours of the offices that are 50 miles away to Tuesdays and Thursdays from 1pm 3pm. So they basically become impossible to get.
It s an interesting thought though. If the US continues to grow no matter what government scope is going to expand especially with Urban areas becoming larger and rural areas getting smaller. Free shit is definitely a cultural thing that s been happening not only in the US but the world as a whole but there s no denying that after this virus and recession the government is here to stay as a larger part of the economy welfare tax s etc I d say that the structure upon which the American economy is built on has slowly been eroded by both Republicans and Democrats and it s been showing sign of weakness but now it s starting to fall apart. I mostly agree with your last point but I d still say there are some pretty obvious things we as a nation could do to ease some of the glaring obstacles to voting. Things like making voting a national holiday for important enough elections. Increasing voting booths. Both play a role in making having a job or a kid less of an issue to go vote. Some of the restrictions to getting a voter ID are out of date and just being honest remain from the Jim Crowe era.
No in a free market 3M would be able to jack up their prices to U.S retailers and those retailers would be able to buy their products and increase their prices accordingly. They could then use the influx of additional profits to scale up production or purchases to respond to increased competition from other manufacturers and sellers entering the market chasing those higher prices. The free market would allocate masks to the people who need it the most instead price gouging laws make it illegal for retailers across the country to drastically increase the prices of in demand products such as face masks soap bleach and hand sanitizer. kare11.com There isn't a law in MN outlawing price gouging yet cease and desist orders are being sent to retailer such as Menards for increasing prices. So why should it surprise anyone that 3M is selling masks to other countries if those countries are willing to pay for the masks. Everyone is will to buy masks thr question is at what price
I swear everytime I read or hear her ideas I get slightly dumber.
gt The act of seizing a business is a communist idea to some degree as you are saying It predates Communism. Every time an army or goverment seized a necessary economic goods or factories by force it's War Socialism. Marxist Socialism AKA Communism is the idea that everything would work better if the state practiced war socialism all the time. Of course the results are every goes to shit the longer you practice Socialism. America has a long history of practicing War Socialism in times of crisis and war. Typically with corporations we generally replace the leadership with someone willing to put the country first as we did with Henry Ford during WW2. Actually having the goverment run the factory is likely to result in a disastrous drop in output if done for very long. I predict that 3M will soon have new people leading the company who will comply with putting Americans first and that will be the end of it. The age of the multinational corporation with no loyalties to their home nations is about to come to an end.
If you read the comments on the linked article it reeks of racism Fucking hell everyone s a moron I guess
Well that s some made up bullshit to got there
gt crybaby nonsense Won us the last one fellow conservative
Congress won't fund a useless wall State of Emergency declared in 2 weeks A Pandemic threatens hundreds of thousands of lives Fuck all for 2. 5 months and fighting Governors over medical aid if they aren't kissing his ass
Its so sad to think that the spiritual fathers of Trumpism are either in prison or awaiting sentencing. When will the monuments be erected to honor the contributions of Manafort Stone and Flynn
She can break out her I really don't care do U jacket.
It's an extremely common sentiment amongst clueless white liberals. youtu.be
Yes but if the article title isn't civil there's no need to even look at Rule 4 because the Rule 1 is already violated. It's like saying I'm innocent because I only broke law A but not law B. It's not how it works. The title is uncivil. Rule 1 says be civil. A rule was broken regardless of rule 4.
This actually makes me feel really good Losing people 1 and of course losing the economic gains this country has made in the last several years is a complete bummer but at this point getting back to normal is what this country needs more than ever. I am so glad I don't hate the president nor feel the need to blame him or any one individual for the impact this virus has had on our country. At the end of the day it would be unsurprising to see a political agenda for these models and you can almost feel the democrats smiling wider and wider the more people are out of work. Presidents get blamed for economic slowdowns it just happens and the Democrats know it better than anyone. They are really seeing the political opportunity here and the more they let themselves and idiot 22 year olds on reddit blame Trump for deaths and the economy the better they feel about themselves. I think Trump thus far has absolutely cemented reelection but I've been wrong before plenty of times.
This is a symptom of the problem. The actual problem is Far too many office holders with a D after their name. That party needs to be thoroughly punished this fall pass it on. The party needs to either reform so that is agenda is not dependent on the destruction of America or splinter off a new party. If you vote Democrat until one of these reformations occur you are in fact acting to further forces which seek to destroy the United States of America in sum a TRAITOR.
Exactly a 6 or 7 man team with a surveillance assist drone could easily wipe out a 20 30 average joe militia.
Now is a good time for states to fend for themselves and stop broadcasting his bullshit.
I have been to the Normandy American Cemetery. It is amazing and the view leaves you breathless.
Think about it this way. With all the coronavirus stuff happening and news feeds being flooded with it it's important to have some uplifting news like this sprinkled in. It's not like we care about the more pressing news any less.
Fortunately my employer has a business account with our big bank and a CC with them. If you have those things it ll prompt you to enter your info then you get a message stating they ll get back to you soon ish It s set up rather crazily atm which is a shame as so many are trying to retain employees.
Why are we still calling these asshats journalists Let's call them what they really are propagandists.
dude honestly as a former californian now bostonian bernie supporter who has been fucked over twice... i m ready to fucking riot. i hate this country so fucking much. we have been rotten to the core for absolute ages. this isn t new.
Nobody cares who you have sex with or who you are attracted too. You do not have to ENJOY SEX' with a trans woman if you don't want to and aren't attracted to her that is absurd. There are plenty people who will be attracted to her don't you worry about it. A trans woman should be able to bring their penis' into the ladies toilet because they are female and that's where they feel safe. They are not a threat to the women in there.
An election is literally a popularity contest. If he was more popular....he would be winning the Democratic primary election.
Damn. So I guess the constiution isn't right because it was written by slavers Fuck free speech right
Ya just struck me as odd is all because where I am no one can just get tested' for it.
No Biden is better. Sanders is just better than Biden. But it's fine continuing sowing your chaos. You're doing a wonderful job.
Interestingly enough investments into renewable energy infrastructure such as solar hydro or nuclear is far more economically beneficial in periods of greater than 3 years. This is actually what I wrote my thesis on. If you compare the economic advantages of fossil fuels it's almost exclusively in short term periods of lt three years this depends on a few variables such as geographical location but can be anywhere from 2. 5 to 5 years average is around 3 These are good for reelection purposes but are poor for long term sustainable growth. The two biggest factors which make renewable energy technology investments optimal are the higher long term yield than fossil fuels and increasing jobs in the energy sector. I think where a lot of people miss the boat on that last part is that re purposing our infrastructure will take a significant amount of time and throughout that time nearly 3 4x the jobs of the fossil fuel industry will be needed created to handle the challenge. Most people do not realize it but the fossil fuel industry is largely mechanized and automated to an extreme degree. It also sends most of it's profits off shore to foreign countries which is another major problem renewable energy technology investment helps solve. Another thing people really never consider is public health and safety. China's smog clouds are notorious around the world and are a direct result of fossil fuel consumption. Long term consumption leads to these masses of CO2 that retain heat generating a higher average temperature which threatens the local environment and creates a lower quality of living. There is also the concern of contaminating water sources from oil and natural gas plants and distribution as well. The increased emissions and contamination yield higher rates of cancer heart attacks neurological damage and a lot more. There are a lot of major problems solved by a transition to renewable energy for both electricity cars production etc. I'd honestly be happy to discuss them with you as I've spent a significant part of my life studying this. What I will leave you off with is that it is mathematically incorrect to say that renewable would shut down the economy. It's the total opposite. Germany and many EU counterparts have seen economic growth in energy sectors due to investment of renewable energy. Heck even China has boosted their economy with it and they've passed by the US in that regard. The entire world is shifting to this and seeing massive payoffs so my question to you is why do you feel like this will work everywhere but the US Where is your apprehension
He s going to oppose any form of voting. Then once votes are tallied if he doesn t win he ll refuse to leave because it s a ploy by the liberal Dems. A witch hunt that in his mind won t count as a real vote.
gt If he'd have done his job in January he wouldn't feel the need to resort to this bullshit now. In all honesty we would most likely have been in the same situation that we're in now. The sad truth is that 3 months isn't nearly enough time to get an entire supply chain to increase production. The factories and their suppliers are all set up to efficiently produce slightly more than average levels of items. It can't possible satisfy the demand of everyone in the country trying to buy the same items at the same time and then everyone in most other countries doing the same thing as well.
New York state is 100 going after Trump once he's no longer President. And that was before he started fucking with them over the N95 masks and really made them pissed off.
Because Romney is actually an American Senator instead of another GOP scab from Trumpistan
Oh. I see that now. Just like all the Demon crats making stuff for political reasons. Sure thing. You're totally right.
this is something a totally innocent and totally exonerated person would do yes
All those games I impulse bought during Steam sales may finally be played
Hold up the Trump lovers certainly did move in during the 2016 election cycle its the reason I get down voted anytime I bring up our presidents history of anti gun rhetoric.
No more sorrys this time Donny
Well some people report diarrhea and I don t know about you guys but when I m out sick with a fever I have no appetite and sweat like crazy. I haven t gotten that sick in awhile though... Some acetaminophen and anyone can feel 99 for a couple hours. I don t get why people are wishing that he gets worse. Doesn t matter what political side you are on that s just fucked up
Bummer about the paywall.
Most of the people who own guns are Republicans a group that has always loved Trump. There's an argument to be made one I don't necessarily agree with mind you that more people on the left should own guns. Right now if there is ever a need for an implied or direct threat of violent revolution resistance it's not the most oppressed people who are going to have the weapons. It will be the far right.
I wasn t talking about my birthday when I said that i was talking about why the month shouldn t exist in the first place
Duh you just have the nanny do all of the feeding and taking care of the kids. Have the maid clean the house and the butler do all the shopping. That leaves tons of time sniff your own farts and act cultured. Yuppy scum doesn t know a damn thing about what it is like for Americans in quarantine.
No wonder the dumbass is broke.
Shall I start holding my breath now
Peak capitalism.
You cant run a phone call above the fold of the times. A letter will be posted in image form.
Hi CharyBrown Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u CharyBrown amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
Please stop with this shit. Even if Trump wanted to cancel elections he has no authority to do that. And even if he somehow magically does it literally doesn't matter because the presidency expires on January no matter what.
Democrats openly admit to selecting candidates on the basis of their race alone.
Clearly who ever posted this isn't following the rules. See my opinion is who ever posted this is an idiot. What I just said is no more offensive then the post itself
gt it's almost impossible to run for political office particularly president but most offices if you confront people about racism the same goes for women running for office discussing sexism Hillary Clinton brought it up on air in front of Donald trump. Its almost the main talking point of the left against the right if it wasn't there wouldn't be those subreddit you mention or an entire fraction of culture devotes to the disscussions about these topic.
So your plan is to let everyone get it and have hundreds of thousands of unnecessary deaths
Never go full Democrat
Less. I can't even carry a firearm to protect my family. I have to have an expensive permit to even purchase one. And if I'm pulled over with one not locked properly I'll be imprisoned. NJ
You think there's going to be a vote
He is a living breathing person with a family and friends he is fighting for the lives of now well over 100 000 sick people in his state. He has fought tooth and nail for every bit of aid that he has received he has begged for help on live television. What can you not respect about him What makes him so despicable you don't care if he dies It's just upsetting to me that we can't unite and see this as a national problem not a partisan state by state problem.
N95 masks are not made out of pulp. McMaster wouldn't be having such a hard time trying to find someone to make the material needed for n95 if we could just buy pulp. They are made out of a plastic.
You d be surprised.
Uh huh... You're talking about how confiscating something at the docks works So was it the FBI here or city or the state Do you know Is this actually reported anywhere with details Because Medical supplies headed to Boston confiscated by NYC and Medical supplies headed to Boston confiscated by the FBI imply two very different things.
That's a Fancy way of saying DICK MOVE A HOLE
You seriously think that groups of random people around the country would have nukes Jfc do you want the end of the human race
gt Obama administration depleted n95 masks national stockpile true In this instance depleted means reduced not reduced to zero
If I m still alive when this is all said and done. I would really enjoy seeing Donald Trump go to for corruption and being disloyal to our nation.
Let's not forget that historically in time of crisis the government has stepped in to ensure that every citizen gets their needs met think rationing during the world wars or scabs during labor strikes
Hahaha Right Spooky Ookie
He needs to get some fresh air lol
gt Also never forget how the media also ran headlines about Joe Biden s victory in South Carolina. sorry not getting your point. Are you saying there's some sort of conspiracy that the media reported news
Seems like an over generalizationO.o
Naw Kenneth Copeland looks like he ll eat your kids if you don t pay him a gold coin to cross over his bridge.
Trump don't give a shit about anyone but himself.
We can help though. If you are forced to go out shopping pick up a few essentials and leave them on the door step of an elderly neighbor. When we see hand sanitizer etc we buy extra for them.
White supremacists writing about white supremacists.
Senator Loeffler already is
People also won't pay 5 bucks for a cucumber. The problem is imported produce. 6 bucks for local grapes or 2. 49 for Chilean grapes. What do you do Protectionism Wage fixing Most choices are going to test and perhaps contradict some conservative values and beliefs around the free market. All will also have some sort of undesirable consequences like tariff wars higher prices or protectionism. At the end of the week it's about what best serves Canadian and American families.
She encouraged people to come out and shop. Doing the exact opposite of what almost every state and city has ordered people to do now. De Blasio did the same thing. Cuomo dismissed the idea of sheltering in place and having any sort of quarantine like some European cities had to do. Perhaps if they had been a bit more responsible earlier on...
Most didn t really want us in 2016 either.
Me too man me too.
How much has the T rump family invested in that corporation that is making the drug he keeps hawking
didn't the courts say in the early 20th century that they can restrict rights
They need to get this guy in a room with a a mental group and ask him if he knows he s lying or if he honestly believes what he is saying is the truth. That both what he said 2 weeks ago and what he says today which is the total opposite is the truth both times. If he says yes to that instant 25th amendment removal for being senile or delusional or psychotic narcissist or whatever you wanna call it. If he honestly believes what he says is true because he said it it s done. Also should be removed for lying to the American public over and over again if he says he knows he s lying.
Same with the nuclear testing done in Nevada where the radiation was exposed to civilians
Ah yes this is what need right now Ha Just listened to a podcast where the best leaders in a crisis focus almost all of their energy on the top 2 3 priorities almost at all times. This isn t those priorities.
Stellar mental gymnasts.
She gets stupider by the day AOC keep your mouth shut till this horrible thing is over you have nothing intelligent to contribute. When we need bullshit identity politics again I'm sure youll be able to run that unintelligent mouth again.
gt At what point do we decide we can't cater the country to the dumb ones Well if you are a democrat....you continue along this line until you are certain that you have killed the economy of your state.
You d think most people would unite about this topic but it s as divided as anything. Media deems it racist to hold a country s government responsible for their actions. Nice.
Back when we were still holding on to some sort of hope that someone would start stopping him Yeah I remember those days.
Biden's not in any active government position so he's trying really hard to seem relevant
No the real lesson is never talk to law enforcement without a lawyer.
He s coming into contact close contact with up to thousands of people a day. If he didn t do it people would criticize him
Drumpf should be brought to trial in the UN for killing probably 250 000 Americans when this year is over. Could of been one or two million if he had his way with no advise from thousand of doctors. Canada help us. Get the other world leaders to banish this prick from free life. Lock Him UP
Really It reads like it was written by a teenager. Is that why you relate
I suppose it s different by state. PA s order doesn t have language like that. Our governor said the other day it s more to force business closures and law enforcement will focus more on educating and reminding people about the order where needed. I still draw the line at the issue I described above but that s why I added unless a state s order prohibits that.
I feel like this is a subreddit full of the kids who couldn t be quiet in class even when everyone else is gonna get punished for your actions. Like for once can you just listen to someone You re sitting here hypothesizing someone enforcing things on you just because you re eager to resist. Take this seriously for the people around you.
Fredo is a joke.
We're screwed. Trump also said today he won't allow mail in ballots. Ever since 2016....this nightmare never ends.
The federal govt is a backup to the states own preparation.
None of them did anything wrong.
You don t say....
So much for the 2nd Guess it was just an excuse to collect guns and go shooting with buddies after all.
Not according to journalists who went from America to check it out. Trudeau doesn t let journalist from Canada go and see.
Yes and the White House is Salem
out of curiosity what do you think the defense production act is exactly
Oh boo hoo. Americans have to help Americans first and there s a problem when Florida can t buy American masks because the factory is giving them to foreign countries just cause they are willing to pay more. A republic is always liable to change direction and the direction we need to move in is one in which American corporations but Americans before their pocketbooks.
Super biased Check Myopic Check Full of half truths and misinformation Check Try posting this somewhere else shill.
This fucking administration is exhausting. Vote these fucks out.
Now imagine how mentally troubled you'd have to be to vote for the guy.
Seeing as how much red tape was slashed so far I would think they would do something similar with the vaccine but I'm not sure tbh.
All you can do is just remember this and everything else and Vote Blue in November.
Retaliation lmao Canada has 0 power or influence over anyone.
He should tell them he got the results but before he tells them he wants to give each reporter a hug. Would they let him or run.
West coast states too...
hate has no home here
That's a huge concern of mine. I live in a suburb of Baltimore Maryland which has an unfortunate history of rioting. I really hope that's not next our Governor Hogan has been doing a great job and was trying to get out ahead of all the precautions he closed schools early and didn't wait for Trump even though he's a Republican this is a blue state and he's been moderate.
He's now more popular how than when he was elected. The majority of Americans approve of his handling of the crisis
But then who would be left
Good for you kid
Well he and his wife were voting Democrat before.
So here you know the process keeps going up and up and up and so a multitude of reasons why vote by mail in my view is not acceptable Ralston went on before adding the president said it best this will be extremely devastating to Republicans and conservatives in Georgia
This is why we need coffee is hot and do not microwave hamster warning labels
Saying we are having positive results by trying a drug is in NO WAY saying it's cool to drink fish tank cleaner with a similar chemical in it. Theres absolutely no liability on trump here whatsoever
No its a in over his head and cant even be a decent human oversight
Worse than worthless. We're literally correcting Jared's mistakes instead of fighting this pandemic.
The economy opens back up. Oh. Ok. So it s just that easy then. That s like saying The nuclear reactor starts back up. But LITERALLY THOUSANDS OF TIMES more difficult.
Crozier is a an American hero. Plain and simple.
You could use an alt account and post it to r subredditdrama or someplace. Hypothetically of course.
gt Cheat on your significant other Whatever in the eyes of the law. should also be illegal btw
Seems pretty sus to me considering most of the people dying are elderly and have a heightened risk due to smoking obesity or some other issue.
Are you 9
I m asking if you d rather the government do nothing and establish no restrictions on travel and gatherings. Perpetuate means to forward the problem. Which is what you d be doing if you didn t adjust your life to social distancing
Yeah I imagined it would be as bad or worse for Army and Marines. Thanks for confirming.
Yes taxes are taken out of their checks.
Why would China pay to make their virus seem worse All of their efforts point towards them wanting to downplay the situation.
If you re not planning on voting Trump out you can go fuck yourself you piece of shit.
Lol I'm the brainwashed idiot yet you happily espouse how grateful you are for the state owning you
It'll never happen because all of our states governments are technologically backwards. Like I said I can guarantee you with 110 absolute certainty that all of the tech workers working for every single state are bottom of the barrel crap. Private sector pays us all so much more than government is willing to shell out. From new grads... to experienced professionals as myself.
Assuming the deaths are counted correctly by our state's dept of health... Like I wouldn't be surprised if they're trying to pull some political protection fuckery where they go if the cause of death cannot definitively be attributed to COVID 19 we're not going to count it
The people paying for the tests who do not have insurance should not be able anywhere between 1000 to 3000 why is that a debate for you If we had M4A already we would have had a better response and fewer people would be completely without pay and healthcare for the next foreseeable 6 months. People are going to start really hurting because the vast majority don't even have 2000 in their savings.
But why is sticking things in his mouth.
Well for one 3M uses tree pulp imported from BC Canada to make the masks. We stop exporting masks they stop exporting material we can t make masks.
Still use them it will rot the virus
Ameribros is my new favorite word What would be the respectable Canadian equivalent Canadads Or Canapals
Direct primary care is the answer when it comes to a good market based healthcare model. Unfortunately it doesn't solve the problem of what to do when you need to go to a hospital or specialist.
and I didnt say you did advocate that position.
Wait I thought Pence was running the response
you can sue anyone over anything.
Your comment was unintentionally hilarious
He's only proving that sometimes you get lucky. There's no evidence that testing supply is increased because of Pence. Only that he isn't apparently acting to prevent things from getting done like the stable orange genius.
So your argument is that Cuomo was vomitting and shitting his guts out despite him not stating he had either of those symptoms Well that settles it All we had to do was make up a special tailor made case that he didn't state had had Easy peasy. Oh and again your own article mentions it's just water weight that you gain back once your drinking fluids again. Further debunking what he said.
Flatten the curve NOT the economy has been a popular talking point on fox news foxnews.com trump has repeatedly tried to claim that a recession would be deadlier than the virus nytimes.com sad to see how closely aligned with the right r politics is
If you thought I understood the issue you wouldn't have tried to explain it
I d still vote for her over Doug Collins and since it is my district
But what about those on cities with red mayors
That tells me that the Senate is full of Scumbags except for Bernie
The last straw.
No kidding.
I can confirm. I have multiple business and personal accounts with them and have banked with them for over a decade. They would not give me the PPP loan because I don t have a loan or credit card with them. Couldn t get anyone on the phone to plead my case. Not a happy customer at this point.
He's great I look forward to watching him every day
He probably is envisioning Trump carrying them all down to the post office himself too.
Good article talking about State and local responsibilities vice Federal
Louder for the dnc lapdogs in the back
On a Friday night how unexpected.
Is that a serious question Why do we import glassware No enough sand How about clothing not enough cotton or wool in the US Maybe we import TV s because we don t have the necessary components PCs IPhones household appliances and a million and one other things It s because Canada produces that particular item at a lower cost than we could do so here. If push came to shove I can guarantee you N95 masks would still be available. No doubt now would be a bad time to have to re make a supply chain but we could. Not disputing Canada has the largest number of trees that they already providing the material or would be a lot more efficient than any new production start up in the US but the US seems to have a lot of those tree too. I don t know enough about the N95 supply chain. But I would be willing to bet if there was a need to make everything from US produced sources we could do it.
Now do Palestine you idiot.
Don't use open arms to welcome the Canadian takeover. Use your walking legs go to your voting station and vote for the guy who wants the US to become a developed country similar to Canada.
You call people using reason neoliberals What do you call yourself FuckTards
Remind anyone of feels good...accomplishes nothing or.....because people are too fucking stupid to make their own decisions the government will do it for them
Fox News is widely watched and had been telling their viewers COVID 19 was no big deal and precautions weren't necessary so they are relevant to the spread. A few of the headlines calling them out Mar 16 2020 For weeks some of Fox News's most popular hosts downplayed the threat of the coronavirus ashingtonpost.com Fox News Gives Elderly Viewers Coronavirus Misinformation esquire.com Fox Host Jesse Watters admits he didn t take coronavirus seriously until today March 16 I went to visit my mom this weekend and she made me wear gloves to come inside of her house. She is suspicious that I might have coronavirus.
Why are Conservatives so scared of a fair election
Either you blindly support this prick or you're fired.
Id pay to see him executed
The Press should be on trial....I m ok if journalists are tried for the murders of all dead. They are complicit with the Wuhan Virus and China.
He didn t mention any of that in his letter. He just said that there were cases of COVID among his crew and that such an environment was a breeding ground for contagion. How come he didn t mention any of these other circumstances Not fighting just holy hell confused because this seems like really important information
Y all need to stop giving her attention. At least give her attention if she introduces a bill. Amplifying her empty platitudes only helps get her message out.
There must be a consequence for this criminal negligence
I hope so. We need to beat this and sooner the better. For everyone except dems and media
A full revolution is actually constitutionally prescribed in this instance just saying.
Such a snooze fest amirite. Being told what to do all the time Now that's what I like
Again with the dead eyes.
I was here quite a bit prior to the 2016 election. It's swung heavily pro Trump since then.
I figured And I wanted to address it. Because there s always one genius that says oh em gee nazi whenever his name is brought up.
No
It s not logical it s racist.
Hard pass.
You're being sarcastic right
it's just a tax credit So it's a 2020 tax credit
Don t make them come down there and burn the Whitehouse again then he ll be sorry
That is appropriately savage.
Gosh you're right I totally forgot to check when this came across my desk this morning and then I just allowed it to happen. It's like the other day a month or so ago when Trump was playing golf and I was upset about it but I forgot to press the button all of us American's have and I just allowed it to happen. It's also like that time when I voted for Hillary but my vote was within a geographical boundary that made my vote worth less than some people in another geographical boundary so Trump won the electoral college and I just allowed it to happen.
you think the number of people with access to that is high at all suppose that s the difference. you assume people coming here to work do that more often than not. I think otherwise
you don't care about women and they don't care about victims. They care about using it as a political weapon. The sooner conservatives understand that the sooner they need to understand they have to fight back. you can't believe the accusers just because it's what the Democrats tell you to do. you can't cave to them when they accuse somebody of some bullshit nonsense the way the Republicans handled the kavanaugh thing was perfect. They did not cave or hand an inch to the Democrats. That's the way they need to handle every single timee they need to be able to look Democrats get in the eye and say fuck off
Isn t this the drug POTUS talked about and was mocked for.
Law offices need to be near the courthouse ideally
I'll link you straight to the source. It's a lot of reading to wade through but worth knowing the actual policy positions and plans. joebiden.com For example the first point I mentioned a 15 minimum wage is in his plan to encourage unions and empower workers. gt As Vice President Biden helped get state and local laws increasing the minimum wage across the finish line including in New York State and has supported eliminating the tipped minimum wage. He firmly believes all Americans are owed a raise and it s well past time we increase the federal minimum wage to 15 across the country. This increase would include workers who aren t currently earning the minimum wage like the farmworkers who grow our food and domestic workers who care for our aging and sick and for those with disabilities. As president Biden will also support indexing the minimum wage to the median hourly wage so that low wage workers wages keep up with those of middle income workers. It's only one part of a lot of key actions he's alleging hell work toward.
You fit the definition. If you aren't then what are all those guns for
Most are because November then January are the hard pass fail tests for the country. So far everything has been soft tests. Mass protests are a thing that you can do. Doing more than that You are flipping the table in the hopes that you flipping the table first allows you more control of where and how it lands rather than waiting for Trump GOP to flip it. Most people hope that the country is still solid enough that a flip isn't needed. Maybe a forced removal from the table for some but not a flip.
When will the cure be worse than the disease
Gas is cheaper than dirt and the supply chains are strained... Now would be a great time to be an independent trucker
It's like government is shit at doing shit.
Could we fucking not have prions right now douses himself in bleach
One can only hope. There are still some who despite seeing all the damning evidence Trump and his entourage have been carelessly leaving around Washington will still turn a blind eye to his gross negligence. They think he does nothing wrong. This is truly a scary time that a vast population are willing to glorify someone so much.
No Democrat should be allowed to use any drugs given to us by Israel since they hate them so much
so you mean this NYT article is anecdotal didn't happen right amp x200B Malaria Drug Helps Virus Patients Improve in Small Study A group of moderately ill people were given hydroxychloroquine which appeared to ease their symptoms quickly but more research is needed. nytimes.com nytimes.com
Plz take Idaho first
Best laugh I have had today. It's probably why she was a service worker at Starbucks no critical thinking required.
To be fair rights are imaginable doesn't give the Gov't the right to take em away but still
They re letting off steam. Like when they wrestle those soft toys in their university safe spaces.
I identify as black Therefore I qualify Money please
really
But seriously I need your car.
For context the USA did not block medical supplies to Cuba a company declined to ship Chinese goods to Cuba because of the 60 year old embargo on Cuba.
Vote mofo. Call your state legislators and governor's and ask for vote by mail. And call your congress critters and ask them for federal funding.
Don t worry just vote Biden in he is incredibly smart and quick witted.
Meh. It's Reddit. I'm used to getting downvoted for weird reasons. I don't let it bother me. And I fully support the Tomb and those who guard it.
Is that what you think Trump cares about
Jesus Christ this sub is fucking looney
Communist don t care about lives just power.
gt my supernatural claims totally unsupported by evidence What is with liberals seeing the word God and freaking out He's talking about the principles that lead to flourishing which is what those on the right value as being fundamental to everything. If it really offends you that badly just ignore the word God the rest of what he says makes perfect sense regardless.
I feel ya. But unfortunately for all of us cool Americans land mass gets an undue influence in our democracy
gt Poverty is a singular outcome yes but it can manifest from many different scenarios and situations. We aren t trying to fix poverty here we re trying to get people money so they can get through the epidemic. gt People can be poor for many different reasons and a one size fits all solution to poverty is not going to adequately address disparities between different groups of poor people. The solution to solving COVID 19 related deaths in rural white Appalachia might be a smoking cessation program. The same program in urban black Michigan would probably be ineffective because what they really need is a nutritionally focused intervention. I m not an expert on the specific issues here so I ll defer to you on that but why would we be certain the intervention for poor whites be less costly than the intervention for poor blacks. Even if you concede they are different in kind urban vs rural etc that isn t a concession that the poor blacks would require more money. It seems to me that AOC is making a different argument than you are. gt The same reasoning can be applied to this outbreak COVID 19 kills people in different categories at different rates for different reasons. Sure but let me use an example. All of the data show that most of the deaths from coronavirus are men. If we wanted to have a medical intervention would be aim it at just men Of course not since some of the people that have the virus are women and many men don t have it. We would aim it at people that have the virus or are at risk of being badly affected or have asthma history of smoking etc
You re fucking insane
gt Propping up wat criminals should empower us I No. The fact that we see these leaders propping up war criminals should not scare you it should empower you to make change. Being afraid of something that has taken place for generations has not made things better. America is a living war crime stop being scared of that fact and do something to change it. Cowering does nothing. gt I feel like you can t keep track of what you re even trying to say Feel harder.
Your lefty friends wish death on every republican. People literally were calling for COVID positive people to spread it at Trump rallies. Does it make you feel better to wish those things on others At least we don t wish him to die.
Can you point to a journalistic source saying that it can't be a possible treatment That seems unlikely since its been in use for many weeks months. All I've seen is we have no evidence its a cure
gt Ryan Reynolds and Celine Dion Don't forget Cobie Smulders Nathan Fillion Seth Rogen Emily VanCamp and dozens of other Canadian actors
Wait which part is there a threat at I watched the video and read the article. I didn t see anything about retaliation.
gt A mortgage in the Carolinas for those of you who have equity... the rest of us are renters and this is pretty helpful.
IMHO 4 times too large is pretty accurate. The disease grows exponentially and you were able to get the right order of magnitude with limited data Good on you
It's a whole different ballpark when he's failing on such a massive level. This isnt a normal election not with everything going on right now
Amen
gt If the virus was already in the US and around the world how would a ban on China specifically stop it It was in much high concentration in China at the time compared to the rest of the world. Having a few cases somewhere does not justify adding many more. The highest incidence of the disease was clearly in China at the time so it made sense to restrict flights from China. When the number of sick rose in Europe a ban was put in place for those Europe as well but somehow no one cried racism then. gt but I'm saying her statement is about how she thinks Trump is unnecessarily creating racial issues through the Chinese travel ban People can always see racism anywhere when they are set on seeing it. The travel ban was necessary. The ban was extended to Europe soon after when it was clear there was an outbreak there as well. A ban was also put in place for Canada. Why aren't those ones not called out as unnecessary or racist but the China travel restriction is automatically racist This has become the problem with democrats insistence that everything is motivated by racism and various other nefarious reasons when common sense can explain it. The democrats are convinced that Trump and his supporters are racists supremacists crooks idiots etc. So they see and interpret everything they do through that lens. Travel restrictions on China He did it because of racism not because it was the F in epicenter of the outbreak. And this extends to every single thing he does and it is constant. They always latch on to the most nefarious explanation for everything he does. I see that as paranoia and prejudice and I am sick and tired of it.
Who is AG The headline makes it seem like it is the Attorney General but is some twitter handle.
The goggles you clowns where are nuts
People are adults and can take that into consideration themselves. Journalists aren't an exacting respected profession themselves. Thinking people should be skeptical of everything they read.
Ecause Trump is tired if playing the president game its only been 2 weeks but boy he is beat. He is now delegating to Someone else oh look Jared over there an un appointed member of his cabinet.
Do not post calls for violence.
Can t believe America doesn t have something as basic as voter ID for elections... trump is on the dot.
They're not. Many including my dad are going about business as usual or in his case even more to prove a point and because they believed his bullshit that it was all a hoax and not truly serious.
I've been downvoted heavily before on this subreddit for saying this and I will probably be downvoted again but I am super duper brave so I'll say it anyway I sincerely believe that she is a fraud or at least started out as one. The reason she looked like a complete and utter retard on the environment was not because she actually believed what she said it was because she believed it was what her audience wanted to hear. Candace Owens isn't dumb enough to sincerely believe any source that isn't a org isn't reliable. I encourage everybody who reads this to look into her background. Do you know why Candace Owens became a conservative activist Because she used to be a stereotypical SJW that wanted to set up a doxxing website for people that said mean things online and it backfired spectacularly. She said she became a conservative over night her literal words after the leftist activists were outraged about her doxxing pet project. Nobody does a complete 180 like that. Of course people can dramatically change their political beliefs I did so myself but not as quick as she did. The reason she became a conservative over night is because she knew the jig was up and a career as a left wing outrage peddler was over so she became a right wing outrage peddler instead. The only reason Candace Owens is even popular on the right in the first place is because American conservatives are just desperate to have young people of colour on their side because the left's deeply racist identity politics is working better than anybody likes to admit. Now downvote away.
He was the inspector general who read the initial whistle blower report and deemed it serious enough to make public thereby stating the impeachment investigation.
This is a pea brained child's take on conservatism.
I like how Trump claims he was unprepared due to Obama but also says the states were unprepared and it s their fault.
As a suggestion nothing. If the government forces you government overreach. People need to have realistic expectations of the masks though. They don't keep you from getting sick just inhibit you from getting others sick as easily if you are sick. They also need to fit right and you can't keep messing with them on your face as that defeats the purpose. The majority of mask wearers I've seen out and about so far are constantly messing with them on their face and these are the people who want to wear masks think about if mask wearing was mandatory.
This doesn't solve any of their current problems...
You think he's ever stopped at just one of anything
Specifically those right apply however only because of the 14th amendment. Prior to it's passage the bill of rights did not apply to state governments there's a direct court case on court outlining that the bill of rights did not apply to State Government Barron v. Baltimore. After the passage of the 14th amendment the court began applying the bill of rights through a legal concept known as incorporation. To date most but not all amendments have subsequently been incorporated to state governments but not all.
Protest. Please I wish the US understood sooner that protests can work or be a good response to clear evil now it's too late for this but please there are ways other than just voting and really in the land of the free you can't complain or cops shot you Is it really like that or is the propaganda making you think protesting doesn't work I wish people fron the US the best and that you use the deaths of thousands in the hands of stupid people in power as a pulley to get outside of the hole you are in as a country that was dug by your fathers and yourself.
It would solve the hurricane problem.
I ve got a real life story similar My brother in law sister in law my other half brother and his wife have THREE bachelor degrees between the two of them. She is going back to school yet again as we speak both late 20 s Neither of them could find a job and do I let them stay in our basement and pay a little rent. She routinely tries to insist that going to college and getting an education is a must and that people that don t aren t educated they are both huge Bernie supporters One day I mentioned that college isn t for everyone and a Trade School is a great option for some. She continued to go on about how trade school people aren t educated. That s when I reminded her that she s living in the basement of a house that is owned by someone that went to trade school and he also has no school debt. I also told her that just because someone goes to college doesn t equal being educated. I went on to say that someone that gets 60k in debt to be in a field that pays 36K a year isn t very edition my in my opinion. Went on to say if your Liberal Arts degree was so good she wouldn t be living in my basement. Her husband has an Arts degree and recently got his BS in geography Tons of debt and can t find a job that pays more than working for Costco
Please no calls for violence.
I want to smear shit all over his fucking face.
Glad you made it
its
When I was in my teens and 20s a LOT of young people loved socialism. How many 50 year old socialists do you see these days For what is happening right now temporary solutions will help but I doubt they will remain permanent.
We should all be very concerned at the lengths Trump will go to in order to get a second term. The moment he leaves office at the very least NY is going to tear him a new ass and a LOT of corruption is going to come to light.
Do you understand that you and others like you are unintentionally capable of spreading covid 19 and making the pandemic worse businessinsider.com So is your desire to go the gym worth potentially killing others as a result
Okay. I don't really care if you do.
God that awful but man that s a good one and I love it.
Trump's 2020 campaign slogan MAKE AMERICA GREAT AGAIN LIKE BEFORE HE BECAME PRES
Some of us might. I can't believe that we're witnessing what amounts to the looting of america.
December 10 2019
This all makes me so very sad to read. I feel like I should be extremely happy with my situation and instead I still feel like I am struggling to stay afloat right now.
Trump 34 000 lies in 3 years.
Here s what I m waiting for a journalist to say With all due respect Mr President we frankly don t care if you find our questions nasty. These are important questions and want you to answer them.
Trump cant suspend anything each state runs thier own elections if enough states cancel to cause noone to reach the threshold of electors then the senate picks from the top 3 vote getters for president and the house does so for vp if there are not enough congress people to form a quorum it's a bit more up in the air
What you're seeing is not what's happening.
They need to get more creative with their insults.
It is a disaster I agree. There's even more job loss than that on a global scale. But didn't they have a personal responsibility to have savings for themselves put aside for times of crisis If they did not isn't it their fault The American Constitution makes way for this situation to happen. They should have been prepared as informed citizens. What happens for those who are at high risk of death for contracting the disease and don't want to die from the virus if work mandates them be there There is a massive portion of the population that would be in that predicament. I guess they choose their life over their job.
New York did and was told to fuck off because Kushner did some napkin math.
For those wondering How can it be this high obviously a fine question you should know that historically Americans rally around in time of crisis. Trump's approval surge has been pathetic by those standards and last I looked it's low compared to governors and foreign leaders. Americans know he sucks.
He only likes golf balls because they make his hands look bigger.
At this moment I d welcome them with open arms.
Boats n hoes
np.reddit.com There's a fair amount of stupidity in it He wuz entrapped 1 but a lot of the dumber comments are downvoted or at least controversial It's not terrible at least by r news standards.
link thenation.com The use of Zyklon B on the US Mexico border was a matter of interest to the firm of Degesch. In 1938 Dr. Gerhard Peters wrote an article in a German pest science journal Anzeiger f r Sch dlingskunde which called for its use in German Desinfektionskammern and featured photos of El Paso s delousing chambers. Peters went on to become the managing director of Degesch which supplied Zyklon B to the Nazi death camps. He was tried and convicted at Nuremberg. In 1955 he was retried and found not guilty.
A trump reelection is the end of our country of the rule of law and is the solidification of a fascist dictatorship. Yes y all better vote blue no matter fucking who or y all are helping trump win. It s that simple.
Ready for the same people to start saying there isn t enough of the drug and it s all Trump s fault
Dem here I pop in to see news and topics that are normally missed please don't ban me. Rush is kind of broad stroking this let's not forget that the corrupt ones is Washington are loosing their ass as well in the stock market. I haven't lost my job yet but will be in trouble in 2 weeks. Dems are not happy that this happened people are going to die and that is never a reason to celebrate.
Please tell me how you could accurately model the flow of a novel virus in a country of millions of people living in a wide variety of settings with a wide variety of lifestyles and with high variability in the symptoms severity and timeline of individual infections WHILE the novel viral pandemic is ongoing... This isn't shoddy science it's just a highly dynamic and complicated thing to model.
Right. Healthcare can charge whatever tf they want because we don't see it and it's just expected that insurance will cover it. Insurance is the 1 reason healthcare is so expensive. It didn't help that having insurance was mandated for years. If it was designed to fail which I believe it was then the Obama administration seems to have done a pretty good job bringing it down.
Is Reddit Chinese owned Asking for a friend.
gt It could also be because the Comfort for some reason does not accept COVID 19 patients. You didn't read the article which states that. THE POINT is that if hospitals were being overrun then the ship would be filling up with non Virus patients.
I was wondering where all these shitty comments were coming from.
yeah the nobody breaks the law. nope nobody. anyways have a good one.
gt Hilarious every comment on this is so short sighted that they think they will just be able to go to the grocery store through this entire thing like people are still going to work. That's not true but claiming it makes you feel like your comment is enlightened right
She drank smoothies but was not able to keep any solid food down. This is our 4th kid and this is by far the worst her nausea has been.
yea it s very heart breaking
Wash it
Kenney going all in on oil is seeming like a Trump business strategy too.
Oh your state would feel it when LA and NYC tax money stops funding those small towns.
Say anything you can to detract from New York. Which has roughly 1 3 of all cases. New Jersey is doing great as well. Here is the wonderful leaders of New York saying there is nothing to worry about. ijr.com ijr.com
I guess it's better to have something and not need ot than the other way around.
Tough call I guess.
I m hoping we burn ourselves to the ground and get a better government out of all of this. Except I know damn well that if the US shits the bed we re becoming a religious dictatorship. Fuck it if Canada would have me I d move.
Why does our president suck so much
AT 10PM ON A FRIDAY DURING A FUCKING GLOBAL PANDEMIC
A grown woman is equally valuable to her unborn child. They're both humans. Calling it a non sentient fetus is your way of justifying killing it by dehumanization.
gt Alright maybe not every single business is trying to make a profit but certainly a vast majority of them are I think that's fair to say. Unless they are a non profit company they are looking to make a profit. Even nonprofit companies are looking to be in the black Just because you are trying to make a profit doesn't mean that profit comes before all else. gt Look at almost every major coorporation in US history and you will absolutely find evidence of prioritizing profits over human life or good morals. No one ever denied that cooperations not all prioritize profit above anything but alot have morals and look out for the betterment of others. gt Anyone who believes in the myth of the altruistic billion dollar coorporation is either working for a billion dollar company or a liar. Again that is not true.
Hydroxychloroquine has been around for decades. It has been tested and well tolerated. It is even given preemptively to travelers to malaria regions to prevent malaria. At worst it may do nothing to help this disease but it's not some random chemical cooked up in the lab overnight that might kill tons of people. Doctors are very familiar with this drug's side effects and contraindications. gt Also if there wasn't time for any studies then why not just release all the current candidate vaccines to the general public Vaccines are completely different. These are a new compound. It's a false analogy to try and compare a brand new vaccine to a drug that's been used for over half a century for a wide range of diseases. Furthermore there have already been some studies on Hydroxychloroquine it's just that the naysayers are to bitch that the studies weren't large enough weren't randomized double blind etc. All the things that take months or years to accomplish. But my point is they couldn't care less that none of this has been done for any of the other random antiviral drugs being experimentally used. The only difference is that Trump didn't say anything about those drugs so they don't get politicized. gt And yeah I know the opposing argument is that suicide rates would spike due to a depression but I haven't seen any articles or people quoting actual sources. It's just a bunch of people taking Trump's word for it You don't have to take Trump's word for it. You can use your own common sense. You'd have to be a fool to believe people will not die due to the economic effects The simple act of moving up everyone's schedule up an hour each spring with the pointless Daylight Savings Time causes a 24 increase in acute heart attacks openheart.bmj.com more strokes aan.com increase in suicides car crashes healthline.com Drowsy driving is similar to driving under the influence and work accidents. A prolonged economic shutdown with millions of people losing their jobs or businesses is bound to cause untold number of deaths already that we may never fully realize. Furthermore we have no idea what the true fatality rate of this disease is. The numbers keep getting revised down. The initial number of 3. 4 was utter bullshit. The latest estimate is now 0. 66 thelancet.com 20 30243 7 fulltext It may still be much lower than that. We don't know what the rate of mild or asymptomatic cases are because those people aren't being tested at all. One report where they tested an entire town of 3000 in Italy showed 90 of the population infected but 50 75 were asymptomatic. So the fatality rates may be much lower. If it turns out that this is not much worse than the flu that kills up to 90 000 a year then this level of shutdown very well may end up killing more people than the disease itself. Therefore it is absolutely the President's responsibility and concern to balance the effects. It would be dereliction of his duty otherwise.
So does Trump twitter.com s 21
You know the future The so called experts have been wrong in the predictions for 2 months now yet you think they will be right now It was supposed to peek last week now irs next week. And next week it will be another week ect....
The economy is absolutely fucked bud
Yup. He was getting apoplectic toward the end there makes me think he was planning some cheating and this jacks it all up for him
And 8. 6 million registered democrats. I'm having trouble understanding your point.
Wow just wow. Yall need an education
Ah great another person who doesn t understand exponential growth. Let s take your high numbers for Ebola and Covid So each person with Ebola infects 2. 5 people and each person with Covid infects 3. 9 people. Those people subsequently infect the same respective amounts of people the same for the next. The difference between the two numbers doesn t seem that large right Not even twice as big of a number. Let s see what we get after 6 iterations of infection gt 2. 5 x 2. 5 x 2. 5 x 2. 5 x 2. 5 x 2. 5 Gives us gt 244 So we would expect 3. 9 to give us something similar right Maybe twice as large gt 3. 9 x 3. 9 x 3. 9 x 3. 9 x 3. 9 x 3. 9 Gives us gt 3518 Over ten times as many infections. Granted this is using the high number in the range but saying that it s much more contagious is absolutely correct
How
They should send to everyone and get it back when taxes are due if they figure out it wasn t needed or not eligible for whatever bs reason they ll come up with.
From my experience this seems to be a non partisan issue. Unfortunately worry about my freedoms are now taking back burner to people I know dying.
That question is irellevant the problem is that government interference is not always bad it is bad when it is bad it is good when it is good. Just say it how it is. Covid laws are objectively a good thing You can support the free market and also support common sense you know
Probably not. Don't worry though nothing will happen. The citizenry of the U.S is too apathetic to actually do anything. There will be a lot of complaining for awhile a couple more things leading towards something similar to Russia and then people will start to get used to it.
gt 3 million masks ordered by Massachusetts were confiscated in Port of New York leading to creative alternative gt Gov. Charlie Baker said a complicated international plan to purchase over 1 million N95 masks for Massachusetts health care workers and first responders was hatched after a previous order was confiscated in the Port of New York. Advertisement gt Around the time that we had our 3 million masks that we had ordered through BJs confiscated in the port of New York at that point it became pretty clear to us that using what I would describe as sort of a traditional approach to this' wasn't going to work Baker said Thursday. gt The governor did not specify the agency responsible for confiscating the masks. gt After losing that initial order Baker said his administration landed on a cooperative effort involving New England Patriots owner Robert Kraft Ambassador Huang Ping Dr. Jason Li Gene Hartigan and the state's COVID 19 Command Center. gt The coalition arranged a purchase of the masks in China which were flown back to Massachusetts Thursday aboard a New England Patriots private plane. gt The supplies were then transported by the National Guard to a stockpile in Marlborough. gt Our administration will keep pursuing the PPE necessary to support our brave front line workers who are working tirelessly to save lives during this pandemic Baker said.
You'll get it eventually just like the dozens of other corona viruses you've had previously. We may get a vaccine or we may not. We're talking 18 months at best. You'll get the virus and long recover before then.
imagine fox commenting on Chelsea Clintons Husband running the Covid response
wouldn't you wanna know wouldn't we all i guess some things are better left unknown to the plebs like us. we wouldn't understand.
When you re working 50 hours a week in a shitty job just to make ends me trust me even if it s free you won t bother applying or renewing your ID card because you know you have to physically go somewhere so someone can see you to give you your id. That means you ll have to take a bus etc. It s like being forced to vote twice...
not much worse than the flu lmao
absolutely. the jobs are there and we want to work. we're just not allowed to
That Daily Show video brings the hammer down.
Yeah. Sigh But what are we gonna do.
I can t wait to shit in the Trump Presidential library.
I wish. Having the president of the USA owe you one is a pretty valuable favor though.
The DOJ is looking to suspend Habeus Corpus. Frightening stuff.
Ivanka and him are criminals
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r negativewithgold Facts Pelosi made her statement on 2 24. There were 48 confirmed cases in all of the US. Trump made similar statements... 10 reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
Yes. So you're starting to realize this was bound to happen and its not trumps fault that the virus is where it's at now. Good.
The whole fam is ignorant
They weren't Producers were handling it. They'd film him separately. It's rather obvious from the way the boardroom scenes were shot and edited together. The man is a fraud from top to bottom.
America didn't shit it's bed. Trump lost the majority of votes. He did what he always does he strategized a winning loss. What that means is he knew he was going to lose the popular vote so his campaign focused on the lowest educated districts to win the election through fearmongering and lies. He is a specialist at losing and still getting his reward. It's the same strategy he used when he was bankrupt he convinced the banks that THEY would lose more if they didn't keep his brand alive because it wasn't the property loss that was going to be the big one. Be the best loser is his strategy always
I would bet the US heavily subsidize medical production and we lump it into national security spending along with the military. Pearl Harbor changed the way we hold a strong standing army 9 11 changed the way we proactively projected power abroad COVID19 will change the way we look at healthcare. I don't think we'll go so far as to nationalize health insurance but I would bet we become self sustainable with production of medica drugs and appliances.
Interesting Haven t you just answered your own question on where the money will come from to cover payroll The only difference is that the U.S is backwards and treating it potentially as a loan.
How does someone with no SS number get assistance illegally
I read about that part of the order and believed it was only limiting the sale in store. You could still order that stuff online for delivery or curbside pickup. That said I am not surprised such an order came from Bernie s home state. And I sadly wasn t surprised when my local news in PA picked up this story and people started hoping our governor would implement the same rules here. I do think it s an overreach.
Ah the self delusion of American Exceptionalism it doesn't take you as far as it used to.
Sure but most likely after the conservation efforts that have not even been mentioned are started enforced strengthen and then eventually abandon. Nobody is starting a war over water.
We absolutely can't trust him we shouldn't trust anybody with that much power
Right but I think people in NYC advocate for no cars in that city. Have you seem people suggest no cars outside of a downtown area Cause that s kind of crazy.
The problem is right now means testing delays that money. Retroactive means testing will scare people into not taking it.
Dude's got dead empty eyes and apparently severe brain damage. Who would have thought the most unqualified full of shit con artist in the history of presidents would handle a situation like this so poorly Its almost like there's actual thinking involved in being the leader of the free world and it's not just a big fun game for psychos to stroke their egos with.
Are we certain that suspected Chinese spies have been expelled from Senate staff positions
He did this for 2 reasons. 1 it would hurt Republicans. Higher turnout usually though not always hurts Republicans. 2 it would be implicit admission that we will still be totally screwed in November. We will be. We will be in the second round where various moronic trump supporting governor's open their states too early and cause new outbreaks.
He wont win this time any more than he won last time. He will take. And nobody will know how to stop him.
What civilian has an N95 these days Even simple dust masks used for home construction projects are sold out in stores... Wolf is encouraging home made masks. Constantly touching your face as you're shopping to mess with a mask you don't have set up right is arguably worse than no mask at all. And having a crap mask setup could be unhelpful as well as the user may think it's helping when it isn't I saw everything from tshirts up over the nose to scarfs to dust masks with the nose bridge informed to pretty well made looking cloth ones with elastic. Most people had masks on the crappiest end of the spectrum and were almost permanently adjusting them. Promote good practices all you want that's great but if the government mandates mask wearing that's when the line is crossed. And from what I saw on my latest grocery run people apparently need coaching on how to wear these things too so efforts are probably best spent informing than mandating anyway.
You need to calm down. There isn't a false choice between total lockdown and rampant irresponsible spreading. Governments have used crises to justify trampling on human rights throughout history.
It s the 3M distributors. But 3M knows and hasn t done anything about it. We can be murdered by capitalism.
Who is that blame helping Honest question.
Nah. States should decide minimum wage not the government. Liberals in California are too lazy to work for 18 an hour because they would rather not work at all. If 18 isn't enough then the free market indicates the wage must be increased until someone will do the job. If not the job is not essential.
Fuck this is a great letter. When I was in lower grade school this is exactly how I tried to express my emotions but didn t have anything like the near accurate grammar of this letter. This is an example to all of us who have until now mistakenly believed the tantrum was dead and buried. We salute you Donald yours sincerely the civilised world. pussy grab Just sitting back here now in my foreign country waiting for the tirade of downvotes I fully expect.
0
He suuuuuuuuuucks.
If you don't consider it to be a human you're just an ignoramus sorry. That is a matter of scientific fact and is not up for debate. The only thing you can do is quibble over the word being How would you define it If it's in terms of sentience then why shouldn't we be able to kill newborns and infants as Peter Singer thinks we should be able to do If you admit that you'd save a human newborn over a fully grown pig the latter is surely more sentient than the former then you admit that the value of human life is essential rather than functional. But if this is the case then killing human fetuses is clearly morally evil.
Don't worry Donald Trump Jr. might seize on the idea to get back in the limelight. I don't think we've heard from Jr. or the other one.
Many of them are going into lockdown because of the loons from NYC who are fleeing to other areas. Bad enough New York already busses of their poor and homeless to other cities but now their sick as well
They have 30 days to sign up that's not how long their coverage is.
You're preaching to the choir... this sub is an intolerable circle jerk. There's a reason r politics is know for being one of the shittiest subreddits.
Republican gun nuts would never stand for that
When one fights monsters one must make sure not to become a monster themself.
gt when Trump has an idea it automatically becomes reality. Did I say it was going to take effect Or did I say that your President is ruining your reputation WITH his ideas I know you conservatives don't typically pass grade 10 but even a third grade level reader could comprehend what I said. Our President isn't a joke just his ideas are Subhuman yank. gt Trump tweeted that we should detain all Chinese immigrants. So that s definitely going to happen. As soon as he tweeted it ICE started rounding them up. WTF does that have to do with anything I care about his ideas of handling the pandemic that's causing other World leaders to tell him to fuck off you moron. And Trump Supporters pretend to be these extremely logical beings until their God Emperor is criticized on shit he's done then it's nothing but strawmanning and emotional tantrums.
Liberals think the entire fucking world revolves around the shitholes of NYC and Los Angeles.
Really Not that the guy ate aquarium cleaner instead of the drug trump was referring to That seems like a much simpler defence.
A person took it. A person. People means multiple persons. That person who took it is what we call an outlier.
Personally I think we are getting just what we deserve. Everybody looked at me like I'm a moron telling them Trump was a con artist. half the people that I ask what the hell they were thinking when they voted for the guy still think he's great. People were too lazy to care or see the difference between a competent administration and this mess Trump gave us. Quite honestly if that's what America has turned into we deserve to fall apart. I really look towards this election as a last chance to shift something and I have very little happiness with my options. Unless somehow the Democrats decide to give me Bernie.
Pretty sure I had the virus this Monday was fucking insane. Auditory and visual hallucinations. Very fucking weird
Ah yes 2deep4me
I would say don t give Americans nothing at all cuz that s what it is
If this is your solution you don t understand how a pandemic works or why inaction would be devastating.
Don't give them any ideas lol
Do you really Then likewise. Unique times.
I'm not an American so I'm going off second hand reports here but I think it's pretty clear that what he is saying is that whilst those things are for the American people they shouldn't be in the control of the states. Presumably because your federal administration seems to like some states more than others and would like to retain control over which citizens get more help than others.
Right Humanity is fucking dumb.
Completely agree which is why many places are only allowing entry for their own citizens or essential personal. But the virus spreads by both legal and illegal entry which is why border protections have to be applied to both.
Because they don't have supply chains that are tightly intertwined across the world's longest undefended border Canada supplies 3M raw materials to make masks and hospital gowns. There are health care workers living in Windsor and working in Detroit.
gt Let s declare martial law because hey we might need it. Love it. But you can be sure most reading your comment won't understand it
You should look at videos of our food stock pile. They put it inside man made caves dug out of the side of mountains. No air conditioning or anything just a giant dugout cave of storage warehouse like.
he s not stupid just gaming the system so he profits while people die.
It s not that complicated guys. A national stockpile is saved for the nation and prioritized as such. They can t just knee jerk send it to any state that asks for it. So in the case of NY asking for it it is prudent for the feds to make sure they don t have any extra of their own before just giving it away. NY did end up finding their own supply after asking for federal assistance... was Trump being a douche in his response Yes... but the spin around this is ridiculous.
Are these surveys only targeting a specific class or something I just don t feel the numbers ever add up.
Then why are you arguing with me
You need a string bag. Can put it in the washing machine to clean fits easily in any pocket carrys a lot and is much more sanitary by design than a closed bag. If you're really fussy you can get a nylon one and rinse it out in a little soapy water after every use. Drys almost instantly. Much stronger than any one use plastic bag and you know where its been.
I didn't think I could despise Trump any more than I do but every single day this repugnant maniac proves me wrong. Please everyone vote this monster out of office on 11 3 2020.
Fuck Barr I hope DJT cans his ass if he tries to go that far.
I agree. He genuinely believes following some of the shit the Acting President has called for would put his actual soul in peril. It's bizarre but I'll take it.
Remember folks the heat will kill this off
You spelled STD wrong. He's ambulatory gonorrhea.
As merely a voracious reader I'm eagerly looking forward to the countless meticulously researched history books about this ridiculous era that'll start coming out a decade from now. Assuming I live to see them.
No no don t you remember That was Obama s economy. And it was until right before Wuhan Virus destroyed the world markets that is the exact point that it became Trump s. Why Because the American left and the media are a bunch of fucking lying assholes.
It makes us believe we are individuals. quote from the article about quarantining with family What Why state that as if it a bad thing
Don't laugh Yesterday while reading news articles I saw 2 large ads by Conservative Buzz asking SHOULD HILLARY CLINTON FINALLY BE BROUGHT TO JUSTICE It tells me the Republicans are so desperate they're going back to beat the same dead horse.
You can't even brake check your way into a totalitarian regime.
gt This idea that well Trump should have ignored us trying to remove him from office is fucking ridiculous. Exactly. What do you expect a president to do as you feverishly attempt to remove him from office
Economically they are not shit holes. I'd classify a 2000 month 300 square foot apartment with crime rate through the roof and dudes tweaking on meth in the bushes to be a shit hole though. I'm talking about quality of life.
America will be the most infected country in the World while other countries heal all because of Conservatives. Lol.
r selfawarewolves
most people can't go home for a week because no paycheck they will go homeless
So you want Trump to be your dictator.
So you're aware that not self isolating can cause people to come down with the virus needlessly. Why on earth should someone be able to pass on this lethal disease and not be punished bid you have an STD and spread it it's illegal and this should be too it's only right wing obsessed Americans who seem to have any issues with fining disrespectful cunts who don't care about anyone other than themselves.
We're the best at getting Corona. Number one.
The similarities between him and my grandma who is certified senile are endless.
gt The areas getting hit the hardest are the ones run by the Democrats Because Trump said don't help them unless they fellate me I stopped reading there because you can't get even that much right. Always someone else's fault. Trump 1. Bigly.
gt People will need jobs to return to which won t be the case if businesses go bankrupt. After seeing the way some of these companies behave particularly the executive leeches who run them we might actually be better off letting them fail and letting someone else seize the opportunity to start a new company in their place. Or in other words we need to start treating companies the way companies already treat their workers easily replaceable.
2... and here you are casting broad generalizations.
He's now got pretty good cover to evolve his position on M4A given the pandemic. It would be a pragmatic decision because it has become the rallying cry of the left wing of the party and he's going to need some of those votes if he doesn't want to be Clinton 2. 0. Of course it's likely that even if he did come out supporting M4A the goalposts would just move further left because 2019 has shown that there are a few very loud voices on the fringe willing to try and suffocate any campaign that isn't Sanders' Hopefully it would at least minimize some of the damage.
Reality is whatever they want it to be...
Phew......you the real mvp
Well the 2nd Amendment was really about making sure some feckless politician didn't sell us out to our former masters like England or France. Meanwhile the biggest 2A fanatics actively cheerlead a witting or unwitting America dissolution machine. It's a crying out loud irony.
Ignorance is forgivable if one learns I think we re all frustrated and resigned to all the villainous Republican government officials and voters not learning. Learning from mistakes starts with first acknowledging the mistake. Record shows denial is unshakeable with the lot of them.
This is why it is also called the Tomb of the UnknownS
Yeah no. There have been gay main characters before Will and Grace Modern Family and there continue to be ones. At far behind a 4 rate. And plenty of shows get political. And you don t get to speak for all gay people. The conservative gay folks on this subreddit disagree with you a lot.
Guess who has nothing but hate and disdain for the UN
No. I will likely be fine yes but my partner has asthma. I will not give that to her. I will wear a gas mask to work if they make me go back in person.
Do you mean the retiree that just saw his life savings drop by 30 The retiree on a fixed income
Schumer has the gall to say stop the pettiness What a douchebag.
Foreigners do not have a right to American supplies and suppliers in a time of national emergency.
gt respects him for having a hot wife who he wants to bang Jared has another wife we don't know about Ivanka is beautiful in the same way Jared is handsome. He always looks like he's about to rip a big fart in gym class and the alphas will toss him in a locker for it.
Nice I'm fucking bored
So he s not too busy with a pandemic
If after all of the research and trials are complete it turns out that this is an effective treatment then it will be the right time to claim that this is an effective treatment. It is irresponsible and dangerous to insinuate anything else until then even if in the future it turns out by chance that you were right. Even if for no other reason that there are people who depend on that drug to survive for its actual proven benefits.
gt The White House instead rejected the prospect of allowing new sign ups across the 38 Affordable Care Act marketplaces it controls a decision that shocked the health care industry caused widespread criticism and prompted a scramble within the administration to find a new way to care for the growing population left exposed to the pandemic. gt You have a perfectly good answer in front of you and instead you re going to make another one up said one Republican close to the administration. It s purely ideological. gt That declaration surprised even some officials in the Health and Human Services Department who believed the concept was still under consideration. And amid a crush of criticism from Democrats led by 2020 front runner Joe Biden it worried officials who viewed the verdict as an unforced error in the middle of a historic pandemic. gt It s a bad decision optics wise one administration official said in the immediate aftermath. It politicizes people s access to health services during a serious national health emergency. gt Health insurers that would be on the hook for covering the new population including the Blue Cross Blue Shield Association had also thrown their vocal support behind the idea. gt A Special Enrollment Period would offer much needed coverage to millions of Americans and mitigate the potential impact on providers and hospitals which will be forced to rely on emergency funding the Association of Community Health Plans wrote in a March letter to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Administrator Seema Verma. gt The move made sense to many in both the industry and Trump s own administration because Americans who lose their health insurance as a result of losing their job are already eligible to sign up for Obamacare outside of the traditional month long enrollment period. With the coronavirus pandemic straining hospitals and the administration s projections growing increasingly dire health officials began signaling to insurers that it was preparing to give the broader pool of uninsured Americans a fresh shot at getting coverage three people with knowledge of the discussions said. gt If Trump had chosen instead to reopen the HealthCare.gov website as 11 largely blue states that control their own markets have already done people without insurance could buy more comprehensive policies that not only would cover coronavirus but any follow up treatment mental health care and future check ups. gt The White House decision also caught the hospital industry off guard frustrating executives who spent the past week awaiting guidance for how strained front line facilities could access the new funding.
Well since the flu is 0. 1 and COVID 19 is 0. 66 based on recent estimates it passes the 0. 5 threshold which means you lose your rights now I think it was in letter written by George Washington or something. Duh. Edit Hot damn do I NEED to put the s
The GOP is already freaking out over losing Florida since Rick Scott and co made it damn near impossible to qualify for unemployment back when he was governor. They re going to have to essentially helicopter money to people and none of them will ever want to do that and would rather point the finger until the banks force them to guarantee the banks will get theirs back which the banks will and they ll probably get too
Agreed
Your example that voter ID isn't voter suppression... is a country that's using voter ID to suppress minority voters What the hell's your logic here
You are saying the quiet hope out loud
I dont think people should we should publicly celebrate Christmas for like a month because a small percentage of the population believes in Santa.
Again not surprised people don't I'm surprised mega corps don't
So he allows foreign interference with your elections. He imposes Nepotism in such a way that no one is sure if its reality or satire. He removes your rights on a regular basis. He destroyed your economy and stole trillions from Americans so he could line the pockets of himself his friends and his family. He bribed congress during his impeachment. He unilaterally used his powers to assassinate someone so that it would boost him in the polls. He has stabbed nearly every one of your allies in the back. He allowed a pandemic to wash over the US. AND NOW he is withholding aid from states he doesnt like and effectively commiting genocide against you. I have asked this in several other threads and I'll ask it again WHAT DOES THIS MAN HAVE TO DO BEFORE YOU ALL GET OFF YOUR ASSES AMD PROTEST
And when Canada was flooding the US with cheap softwood products forcing American mills producers out of business that was ok. Nice try.
Why is the word leopard all over reddit lately
Trump is a billionaire and the presidential salary is nothing compared to the fortune he sits on I don t however like government officials trying to benefit off of a global crisis All in all our country as a whole has to do more to keep the spread as slow as possible
Flat. However when it gets rolled out is up to debate. Here in MI they are supposedly updating the UIA system but it was admitted that it is dependent on the federal government as well. It will be backdated but it's hard to say how it will go with this shitshow of an administration in charge.
Lol we can all see you are upvoting your own comments.
I've read that all of the recovered remains have been identified but the Tomb still stands for those who were never recovered.
If you were gonna provide the link anyway you could ve left out the rude comment
Eh I don t see abortion as a strictly conservative issue. I feel like it was hoisted up the conservative banner by religious interests conservatively I m for more individual rights.
Yep... the state is selectively choosing what things are worthy... which is arbitrary value decision. I hope every one of these Stay at Home laws are shutdown or heavily heavily modified to be far more permissive. Governor Northam CHURCHES BAD LIQUOR STORES GOOD What I like booze but it's less valuable than the first freaking amendment. Unfortunately I doubt these things will happen soon enough to impact the current crisis. It'll only prevent stepping next time.
And why would that algorithm not apply to other parts of the country Please explain how an infected community in Chicago or its suburbs somehow can completely avoid having their own outbreak The author certainly doesn't answer this question.
Yeah we'll just have to disagree. You keep converting constant voltage to alternating
It s the income tax I pay so fucking much income tax
You want to pay more for food We pay more for food we have less money to spend on the rest of the economy
Congress is sworn in on Jan 3.
All Americans need to remember this. Stop buying their products
Yea but Dr. Fauci just went on Fox News and said the drug hasn t proven anything. He said he hasn t seen any information that shows the drug actually helps. So where did Trump get his info
Y all really weren t.
Yep that's why the only thing I went to town for today was a shitload of seeds and machine grease for my tractor. Hope y'all make it through this ok too.
Great we've now alienated the Canadians too. What's the fucking endgame here
The booming economy was nice while it lasted. We are going to turn a corner that will send this country into a spiral very soon.
Obama gave the health insurance industry a handjob. it didn't hurt the insurance industry at all.
Cool if you're just gonna read random shit into my statements you can do that without me present. Enjoy your ignorance I've heard it's bliss.
gt Based on the fact that it s not a person in any other way it s not an independent life form let alone a citizen. Its DNA is separate than that of the mother's It's absolutely independent in terms of identity. If by independent you mean not requiring external aid then newborns aren't independent either. And why should citizenship matter You can't kill someone just because they're not a U.S citizen. You haven't provided any good arguments this entire time and you haven't offered any rebuttals to mine. Unfortunately you're a typical pro choicer heavy on assertions and light on evidence. Let me not mince words there is no place for you in the conservative movement. We will never accept murderers or their apologists. Go play with the folks over at r politics clearly those are your people.
Well this is bleak news. Maybe he can come forward and speak about the internal workings of the Trump Administration
My dad has been going out more than usual multiple trips to a state that was one of the hardest hit for fun between Jan and now. As if he's trying to prove a point when all he's going to do is get himself my mom and others he comes into contact with sick or killed. We even asked him what about his grandkids how would he feel if he killed one One has had multiple breathing issues He doesn't care. Though my mom says he's starting to snap out of his Trump Fox Limbaugh stupor. We'll see.
The 8 opposed were relevant because the Senate was trying to pass by unanimous consent. That was how those 8 senators were planning on holding up the bill.
a fucking leaf lmao
Again note to everyone this was not directed toward the average intellectual on reddit. This was directed to the people only blaming trump nobody else. Everyone is at blame here
If you prove an idiot is an idiot and they don't realise you did it and are still an idiot then its not a victory.
I don't think he'll have to pardon anybody because none of these people are ever going to be charged. The absolutle worst that can happen is they lose elections the democratic party is too spineless to ever actually bring the hammer down on their criminal activity.
forbes.com 70509b632208 3M is an American company and was ordered by law the make as much as fast as possible for the USA instead of selling to one of their distributors they were required to sell to the USA And from the memorandum to the order since 3M was not complying gt The Secretary through the Administrator of the Federal Emergency Management Agency Administrator shall use any and all authority available under the Act to acquire from any appropriate subsidiary or affiliate of 3M Company the number of N 95 respirators that the Administrator determines to be appropriate.
Conservatives can wave any legislation away and cry unnecessary spending of tax dollars The burden of proof is on progressives to drag the country through progress by passing things instead of just saving tax dollars by slashing every entity that keeps regulatory capture from affecting our every fabric of society
How long do y'all think until me mentions ratings for this move
Did you just assume funny's gender It's La funny bigot
while allowing 5 million people to leave the country. The media right now is focused on using the pandemic to beat Trump in November. But when the dust all settles China is fucked.
Impulse buyers are thinking it s the apocalypse. Most people you meet at the range have a couple boxes of ammo squirreled away and that s it. New gun owners suck.
President Pandemic
Oh no Trump is mocking people It's definitely the same as shutting out their voices He's happily worked with lefties like Van Jones or Yang to push legislation through or did you forget about the First Step act which finally passed Also Salon is a biased piece of shit which even Wikipedia calls a tabloid
A departure from openly malicious governance is a pretty fundamental change.
That's nearly how it did work before Trump took office. Many departments with experts running them who the president would consult with and rely on. Then Trump took office and either left leadership positions unfilled or assigned cronies to them who intended to dismantle and or profit off of those departments and assigned control of everything else either to himself or Kushner. That's how we ended up here.
Anything coming out of his pie hole is nothing but lies.
I m an essential worker and I can t stay home asshat. I see so many people a day that should probably stay home but don t. Guess what generation they re from... Also what the fuck are you going to do if you leave your house See a baseball game Go to a bar Go to work at a nonessential job
You sound like quite the hateful person
As soon as my 1 200. 00 deposit drops and is available my ass will be at my closest Chase branch making a withdrawal.
Honestly I don t give a fuck pardon the language what AOC says. I d believe that bitch Carole Baskibs before I believed that imbecile
Trump said states are on their own. They should take him at that and act accordingly. But they aren't The federal government seems to be in a failed status. I just don't think most of the governors have the nerve to take back what they have ceded to federal control. Something needs to give or the US will continue its slide. I don't think the citizens will do anything because the poorest are just trying to feed and house themselves. The middle class is just now starting to realize bad stuff is happening while they were watching netflix youtube and hanging out on the internet....
Trump will cancel 2 trillion in debt owed to China.
The US nuking Canada would do it though.
Everyone that voted for Hillary Clinton meaning most voters absolutely knew this was possible.
Medical supplies that he clearly does not think deserves to go to any of the states. So where does he think they should go cnn.com
And then they will argue about if their rights are being violated in this thread essentially complaining they have to do their part and make a temporary sacrifice to do so. It's pretty sad.
It's a real Zoolander moment.... the States are in the USA....
Maybe he promised them an Osama Bin Laden type raid and kill was coming the second they leave jail.
He s definitely not a hypocrite. He s very smart and a great scholar. Check out his works for yourself.
Voting Bernie in MD primary but i would vote for a literal pile of shit over not voting or voting for donald trump. If Trump gets another 4 years this country very may well crumble.
My states not getting anymore ppe from the federal government. My wife also works in health and she has a surgical mask that s she s supposed to keep in a paper bag and reuse until the end of the pandemic.
salon.com salon.com You are absolutely right.
the obvious reason trump won't wear a mask he will look silly in a mask and it will hurt his ego.
LOL. Natural Selection toys P
I've been listening to podcasts about conmen and swindlers and it seems like everytime it's a Republican lawmaker for the past forty years they just start crying Democrat witch hunt. Anyone trying to get them to take responsibility for anything no matter how crooked they know they're being is a witch hunt. I guess it works to rile up their base. I'm so tired of both sides at this point. Stop bickering like children and run the country like you're supposed to.
If it's a witch hunt guess who's the witch
It's a crew of 5000 At the time of the letter 100 soldiers were infected. A virus can spread exponentially depending on it's r number which is between 2 and 3 nature.com so every person will infect 2 more people this is being generous likely more than three since it's a small area t 0 100 infected t 1 400 infected t 2 1600 infected t 3 6400 infected Hours definitely did matter.
Have a nice day
Lol. Someone actually just asked Trumo that at the briefing. Are these people friggin dumb
You had one change of removing it from the office now it is too little too late.
Counting the days til this is hopefully over
Yes that's if you're trying to drop 20 to 30 pounds within a week. I'm saying 13 pounds of mostly water in 3 days is possible when you're a large guy with a lot of muscle mass. More muscle more water. Lot of fluids low carbs water flushing. Anyways not gonna continue this debate it's dumb and wasting time. If you don't want to believe me you don't have to.
All Bernie supporters are about to get a good taste of socialism pretty sure they won t like it.
Oh yhat'sa mistake They were supposed to send all the defective equipment to California and Washington state.
Are you implying it's called Spanish flu because it killed mostly people from Spain
Central Park is open but the citizens are in a stay put order. Go on YouTube go to the search area and look up Time Square Cam Even though Time Square if open there is no one walking around.
Threatening to boycott America by withdrawing existing goods and services in response to Trump s unprovoked hostility is NOT equivalent to militarily attacking and killing a country s entire citizenry. And you know it.
Fucknut I like that.
Religion does not equal truth. what the fuck
My bad it's r politics and I was going against the hivemind and am getting testy against the misinformation spam. No I shouldn't do that research anyone making the claim they are the same masks should do the research since proving a negative is unreasonable. They have to find one instance of truth while I have to find 40 instances of untruth
I think ol' Mitt knew which way the right wing winds were blowin' even back in 2012.
The best way to lower the cost of insurance is to get everyone in the pool. People sitting on the sidelines are the reason insurance is so unaffordable.
Either it cures helps with symptoms of covid 19 or it's false hopes. My outrage comes from a fact someone asks how could one think that covid 19 is treated by hydrochloroquine and you're like here look at this video with great explanations And yet there are no explanations in the video. Smells like it's just a smoke screen or you just want to open your mouth.
Why fire him now though
Nay Playboy.
No shit Trump is such a bumbling fucking idiot. So dense so predictable so vindictive.
I don't think he'll need Putin this time around. A second wave of the virus in November and important states w o vote by mail may well lock him in. shudder
Thanks
He isn't miserable though that's the problem. In his mind he's the greatest and he's having the time of his life. He's the best at everything.
Young Pelosi Last thing we need is 30 more years of that bs
I mean he s a pretty liberal republican who was relaxed on abortion expanded state healthcare in Massachusetts and honestly when he was governor there was more in line with Obama s policies than trumps. I don t get the I don t agree with him except for this.
Somebody needs to take this little girl s phone away and make her stay in her home without any supper.
The point that I was making is that the vote was close enough that Trump won the electoral college despite losing the popular vote. That is what is concerning. I said that it wasn't like Clinton won the popular vote with 70 of the votes to show that the vote was closer than InkBlotSam's comment implied. That 70 was arbitrarily chosen and my point doesn't depend on that. It was a close election and the fact that it was that close despite Trump being an objectively stupid dishonest and horrible person indicates that a significant portion of the American electorate is either complacent with his behaviour or supportive of him. That's a horrifying thought. Further your comment betrays either a misunderstanding of how American president elections work or a movement of the goal posts. Had the popular vote been the metric with which the victor was chosen both candidates would have campaigned differently by focusing on different areas etc... and the results would have undoubtedly changed. Having said that I do think that the popular vote should be metric to decide the victor in future elections. Perhaps you should learn to comprehend things that you read better. The commenter PleinDinspiration who replied to you easily understood what I was saying.
cold or flu or whatever. Freedom of assembly is a cornerstone of american freedom. The fact the police so readily trample the 1st amendment is what worries me. Those same officers would be going door to door confiscating fire arms if they were told to. Its all of the authoritarian precedents that are being set that are worrisome to me.
gt why does a ditzy first termer get as much press as the speaker of the house because hes the president i assume
Also isn't it interesting that prior to this there were Dems looking to decrease the penalty for knowingly giving someone HIV Don't hear any of that here.
Hey working class Floridians stop voting GOP because they clearly do not give a fuck about you.
The drugs are working.
Mr.Pence doesnt look happy with how Trump runs. Look at his face... i dont know...
Now my Barbie collection feels incomplete she lamented while anxiously awaiting her Supreme Court Justice Kim Kardashian Barbie.
Saying look at this country is different than saying your country needs to do this It's no coincidence that people in other countries don't mind policies that sacrifice American jobs and that's usually where I draw the fuck off line. It's very easy to talk about the importance of sacrifices you want others to make. Also pretty sure anyone criticizing acid attacks and suicide bombers wouldn't call them Brits sincerely. I assume their whole point is that those are imported cultural values.
You re a moron. It s water weight not fat. How do you not understand basic bodily functions Have you ever been sick
The Feds are dhipping the good back to the US. Handing them to the drug companies and starting a bidding war with the states. Since when is FEMA supposed to protect corporate profits
Trump took credit for the stock market before he was even inaugurated.
Correct. You are confused. The leftists are anti Semitic. They always have been. From Hitler to Stalin to Marx himself who was born into a Jewish family. Many Jews are on the mainstream left however. With the radicals taking over the party we ll see how long that lasts for. Simple enough for you
Trump or Kushner Or is the answer yes
Why not just give more money to poor people instead of making a race thing
An administration of lying self serving useless assholes and parasites
Yup.
Agreed.
Damn.
What a sad example of a bitter and hurting soul. I actually feel bad for this person. I truly hope they can find a way to get rid of the anger and hate before it consumes them completely.
sOmEoNE wHo lIvEd hUnDrEdS oF YEaRs aGo hAd difFeReNt vIeWs oN thInGs aND dID tHiNGs wE dOnT lIKe nOW
Prolife atheist non religious person here. The Bible has zero to do with why abortion is wrong.
Look we aren't without our assholes but for the most part as long as you aren't coming here just to cause shit and calling people retarded we might disagree with you even very passionately and things might get heated but end of the day we will on the large welcome you here. Your ideas won't be popular but we are more than willing to hear them and discuss them. We do tend to punch back and when taken out of context we can be made to look like jerks but we are just passionate people like anyone else. Welcome here and here's to many arguments between us in the future. But think of it like we are professional wrestlers we will talk mean in the ring and after that the beers don't care who we voted for.
Acting Secretary of the Navy
There is no unintentional here though.
I m not in the military but I think they view blame differently.
Well you need a prescription from a doctor to get it so it s not like people are buying it otc.
Use the Digital Millennium Copyright Act.
Thanks but this is America Bot.
gt Layabouts I swear to christ none of this has anything to do with wall street. This is about restaurants and local businesses that may or may not re open after all this is over. You are about as conservative as a wet dish rag. All those restaurants and local businesses still exist. A month or so of rent moratoriums will do them just fine. So we're agreed than fuck the Big Line shop local. Excellent Nice to see actual conservative options from a supposed conservative.
When major cities are emptying their prisons and sending out lists of crimes that are no longer enforced it's easy to do the math. Hopefully people realize the police were never going to be there fast enough to protect them in even the best of circumstances.
It does if you're addicted to conspiracy thinking.
gt None of those states have bans on chloroquine. I read the governess emergency decrees on all 3 states. All them stated that it couldn't be proscribed to treat COVID 19 by requiring that the us only be for FDA approved uses of chloroquine of which COVID 19 wasn't on list. gt They've restricted outpatient prescriptions to avoid people stockpiling the drug. The feds have enough doses to treat 5 million Americans sent just by Israel alone and we have plenty of other supplies of that the Feds already bought up. We've got plenty. Resisting was not done out of a need to stock pile it. It's cheap and easy to make and we've got plenty. Not giving them out would only result in more people dead of COVID 19. Can you explain why they wanted more dead Americans gt Plus the FDA approved emergency off label prescriptions so that part of the restricted ended up not meaning anything. That was Trump going around the Governors bans when he realized leftist control states were not using the drugs. Once the FDA approved it it was no longer possible to escape blame for the extra deaths not using the drugs would cause.
The US is a product of a two party system. When there is always a majority the winner will do what they want regardless of what the people want. If there is a minority they are forced to work together
I was going to make a long reply about every ripple effect that would come from this. Instead I want to talk about one point you made because I feel it is the most important one. I don t know how to do the copy paste thing where it gets indented on my phone but you said if you don t want to keep the system afloat that s easy. Keep people in poverty and watch things collapse. That s what the Republicans generally do. First I don t think republicans want to keep people in poverty at all. The entire conservative philosophy is about giving everyone the same opportunity to succeed based on the merits of what they do. This could be a whole different argument though. Secondly I would argue that a basic income does exactly what you don t want keeps people in poverty. Having an additional 24k a year sounds wonderful but the entire economy would shift as result. It does nothing to give people the resources to move up in society. Everything would cost more. That s just basic economics. With more money available products cost more. In reality you probably aren t able to buy anything you couldn t before with the exception of the homeless Anyone on unemployment probably has those checks stop coming. Why would unemployment continue to run when you are already getting 24k for existing How does someone in this society go from the lower class to the middle class Is it any different from how it is right now Is the quality of life better for the bottom 1 These are the questions to ask if you interested in this working for the poorest members of society. I don t think a positive thing happens for those members of society imo. The next step is to ask about the quality of life for those in the middle class. I don t think there is any question that it goes down though right Everything costs more taxes for that class would go up jobs in that bracket are likely to pay less. A result of all expenses for businesses going up is they have less money to pay employees that operate outside of a minimum wage.
r killthosewhodisagree
The problem that President Trump the CDC and the rest of the western world ran into is China lied about asymptomatic transmition and the WHO reported China's lies as facts. Back when it looked like only seriously ill people could transmit it danger was minimal as long as we kept seriously sick people out of the country or put in them into quarantine. By the time we knew we'd been lied to it was too late. Korea Taiwan Singapore all knew that China was full of shit based on the SARRS outbreak and took on the problem on the basis that it could spread from asymptomatic people.
gt many Americans would gladly surrender 1. I want all of your Maple Syrup. 2. I'm not speaking French. 3. I'm keepin' the flag.
The taxes are higher but i'm willing to pay for those that can't We need to take care of the poor down cast the widow.
Thank you. This should have been a day one requirement for anyone using public transport.
Coronavirus prompts Vermont to order Costco Target to stop sale of nonessential items Private company didn't make the decision. Vermont made the decision.
Fun fact you have zero rights that come at the expense of even a single unwilling participant. Which means that by extension you also do not have the right to endanger the health and safety of others just to exercise your rights.' Sincerely A conservative with a fucking brain.
Not the entire right but they can limit it
Reporter What do you have to say to the American people at a time of crisis to calm and reassure the nation Trump That was a nasty question. You're a terrible reporter. Looking for sensationalist news. You work for Concast. I call it Concast. Paraphrased but that is basically what he said to an insanely softball question last week.
Barbot AHole
Fraud NEVER happens in an election isn't that right Broward County
I believe that the 1200 cheque was meant as a cash float to get people through the period where they're waiting for their EI benefits to kick in. Additionally there are also people in situations like myself who dont qualify for EI doing contract work was dont with a contract and waiting on the next I would argue that the 1200 should have only been handed out to people who needed it but that would probably come at the cost of time which defeats the purpose of getting it in people's hands ASAP. As far as the gt 100 benefit payments I do think you have a point but alternatively alot of people just got kicked off their health insurance other benefits by being laid off so it could be argued that it is meant to offset that. I dont think this stimulus will do anything close to stimulate the economy but people gotta eat.
There s no evidence that your observations are accurate or truthful. You re opinions aren t fact.
What are they stockpiling it for An emergency
Every day I get more and more serious about moving to another country the US is awful. I don t think any amount of voting and protest will help save this corporate republic cesspool. I don t want to live here where my government wants me poor dying and worried for my existence on a daily basis.
Killing people based on opinion good. People having diverse opinion bad.
I don t think people think they were being ignored per say but I m 99 sure the Navy said no to quarantining 4 000 sailors individually in Guam. Do you know how much money that would cost in per diem One hotel is 70 night on the LOW end of the Navy strikes a deal with bulk prices for rooms multiply that by 4000 5000 sailors for 14 days and that s easily 4 million the captain was asking for. Again those numbers are on the LOW end of the spectrum. Hotels in Guam are closer to 200 night so 8 10 million ish Pretty sure Big Navy said they d rather risk it and lose a couple bodies what s 100 sailors than spend that kind of money on one ship. There s no way of knowing for sure but carriers have excellent communication systems like you said it s not a destroyer. There were no issues in conveying messaging the issue was with the answer he got in my opinion.
Does he have a cure for cancer to Its great to have such a genius for president. I bet he does maybe the reporters should ask that
The article doesn't quite support their hyperbolic headline but in his heart of hearts even I think even McConnell would like to have Pence in charge now given a choice. Pure speculation on my part though I don't really understand these peoples' thinking at all these days. God help us all.
Fox News didn t hit the airways for another 70years.
Another desperate plea from Trump for more foreign help with his 2020 campaign. This firing is a clear signal to Putin and others that he is open for the business of foreign intervention in the election again
how so
They should institute the firing squad for these people... and make it a pay per view event.. after a few of these nut bags.... poof.. no more national debt..
I ve met more people who are American that get paid under the table than illegals.. most illegals I meet are truck drivers for Walmart or some other stores like that.
I leave my mail in quarantine for 5 days.
Two things can be true at once. No he isn't advocating for people to go out and work in these conditions. But he is pointing the hypocrisy that these congressmen are still receiving government pay checks the Covid 19 relief bill had a Congressional pay raise in it for crying out loud while the US has just broken records for unemployment claims. If they were sacrificing they would do something lioe donate their pay checks to a medical cause imo
They were raised that way.
Listen to experts not the politicians. Experts have all been skeptical about this drug. We got one of the world's leading experts on this particular virus here in Germany and he's been very skeptical about it from the start. Today he explained how even the recent more positive studies are not all that promising. Most likely other drugs will become the preferred treatment options. Here is a good interview in English this dude has been saving our sanity with his daily podcast zeit.de
Damn I bit horse teeth gives a hell of a blow job...
Seriously. Kushner said what he said most likely because they intend to sell off the federal stockpile to the highest bidder.
Use both and you're 199. 8 safe it's simple addition.
Not to be rude but you miss much of the problem with Trump promoting these medications. All medications need to follow a path of testing and retesting. For any politician to go on the news and hype up a medications potential aid is not done to aid people... It's done to brand the medication with the politicians ego. By all means these promising drugs needed to be moved to the top 20 for immediate testing and retesting... but jumping that step is criminal. Those drugs are used for other illnesses at present and have supply stocks at levels for those conditions. Jumping in large numbers on the limited supplies directly takes those medications away from the people who doctors know for a fact need them. Second is supply chains. Once testing does narrow in on the right medication and right dosages there then needs to be enough produced to be able to meet a demand at this level. People screaming for a rare drug with limited production does not help anyone. There are medical ways to go about this entire process. It's awesome these drugs are showing results. That does not make Trump going on tv and talking them up before needed steps were taken was OK. It was a petty ego move.
I agree. That's amazing
Dr. Oz said... Hold up the green coffee bean Dr. Oz We are listening to that quack Fucking what
I seriously couldn't tell that it was Satire until I saw the NPC mission statement at the bottom. I read through the whole article top to bottom and just kept thinking But this is something I would actually expect a TDS leftist to do. I don't get it...
It s fda approved it s not going to require guinea pigs it is helping people
I always type that but my phone is dead set on that no matter how many times I delete it from my library and I always forget to hit the stupid little arrow
Yes.
Country demographics 27 Gen Z 22 Gen Y millennials 22 Gen X 20 Boomers 7 Silent generation Z and Y and a sprinkle of the others are PUSHING for socialized medicine hard. I totally agree the european healthcare system is being shown it couldnt handle this pandemic they allow illegals too and would kill their elderly triage The government choosing who lives or dies fucking sucks. Trump has a REAL chance to change our healthcare SYSTEM forever because its horrible. The prices are outrageous and so are surprise bills. I think if we came up with something thats less hurtful to everyday people who didnt ask to get a heart attack or cancer a stroke anything else we d be happy. OR ELSE.... after 2024 a democrat pushing m4a and not something more innovative abolishing private healthcare is stupid we will be in a lot of trouble because this topic will NOT go away. Change to our healthcare is coming because the newer generations OUTWEIGH the older ones. Right now luckily young people suck at voting but they propelled Sanders someone who hasnt accomplished shit as a Senator politician to look like Jesus because he wants healthcare for all. They even ignore his open borders giving illegals healthcare nationwide no cash bail other horrible proposals. We are in dangerous times. I like Rand Paul involved for sure he will come up with someone that doesnt impose on us too much or raise our taxes to 40 50 in the MIDDLE class like Canada Europe fuck that. South Korea has universal healthcare and rated the best in the world but I think we can learn something from them but not fully adopt their system. PATRIOT CARE IS COMING TRUMPCARE lmao
If you praise him he'll give you the other inch.
I mean impeachment isn t really necessary considering the crisis at hand will determine the election. The virus isn t Trump s fault so if he can effectively save lives and save the economy before November he d be fine.
They are one of our greatest friends and allies and they bought them. You fucking idiot.
The Bros the Bros lol.
If anything is to come from this mess I hope it s that more people finally wise up to just how much the ChiComs are NOT our friends.
They guard the tombs of 3 Unknowns. They are from World War I World War II and the Korean War.
I can still identify as a black woman right
gt is super high. i moved when the prices of the city i was living in were too much.
it's not about the primaries. it's about the general election.. when Democrats are given complete control over the voting laws they use voter suppression to create one party States. look at California. The way they set up and gerrymandered the voter policies made it so that it's not even possible for a republican to be on the ballot.. and then of course they want you to go even further and take Republicans off the ballot in the general election to..
Not me I want to maintain the status quo so I can have a middle class life inferior to every other developed nation because murica
Really Dr. Oz What s next Dr. Phil or even Dr. Oetker This man is a literal exposed fraud.
So this is the Confederate States of America now I guess
The NYT recently had an interesting series on American babies who were affected at the clinical trial stage Pursuing an Untold Story of Thalidomide nytimes.com
Literally not what I said lol. Your water weight adjust based on your bodies needs and how it is replenished. He probably holds closer to the average amount of water weight which is 65 of their body. He possibly lost 7. 5 of water mass in the span of 3 days due to lack of replenishing fluids lack of appetite and off on sweating. His body will adjust after he is healthy and may assume back to his 65 of water weight. When he starts working out again then his body may end up storing more water weight possibly up to 75 Then when his body has adjusted back to normal it will get back to 65 His daily fluctuations may range from 60 70 water weight due to what he's eating and how much water he takes in. Stop being ignorant. I'm not making anything up I was athlete for 14 years of my life and spent another 7 years in health and fitness as a hobby.
Gen X to the rescue
New York tried.
Now walk around in a city that smells like lol.
Honestly I would question her judgment if she didn t. Realistically her family owns the stock exchange It is unreasonable to think she didn t have several sources for this information. All the power players saw this coming. Even an average idiot like me was saying the market was going to cool off back down to 22 500 back in January.
gt Canadians are getting that amount starting in less than 3 days. apples to hand grenades. what canadians are getting is using candian monopoloy money. that's only like 1400 usd. also it's not going to every canadian and is far more restrictive than what bernie is proposing or trump already did.
gt A gun is nothing more than false security in a pandemic. It's worse. They're a dangerous liability. People who are already on edge are more likely to accidentally shoot a friend or family member or some other innocent bystander than a home invader which is an imaginary figure. There may be looters but they'll rob stores. The narrative of marauding bands of home invaders is 100 pure bullshit. It's degenerate fantasy. Gun owners especially first time gun owners who are ignorant of basic firearms safety and have no practical experience let alone any training are a menace to everyone else's safety. Guns are one of the very last things that should be added to the current mix of fear and uncertainty.
Poll During the debates who's nose will get too heavy from lying and hit the floor first
Well don't be a dick about it
They aren't This person is clearly parroting Trump's talking points.
Crazy I love Canada I swear. Seeing trumps ugly mug staring back at me haunted my last couple of years in the military. Sadly he haunts my ass on Reddit as well. No lie though your PM is much better looking I wouldn t mind his picture up. Would ve been less jarring lol. He s also probably better at every single thing you could possibly measure for a human being.
not for domestic in the US and not for flights to non high risk countries iirc
Tedros Adhanom should be arrested. If individuals can be charged with attempted murder or bioterrorism for either breaking quarantine or purposefully contaminating people places or things then I don't see why this stooge shouldn't be put on trial for crimes against humanity. Every death outside of the Pacific is on him as far as I'm concerned. This was a regional health crisis and it didn't have to turn into a global pandemic. He let the entire world down.
is anyone else seeing the linked article change to an article about Kushner when I was about mid read the article switched from talk about Fauci amp Dr. Oz to shit about Kushner. what gives
I'll give you a hint posting the real answer will get you banned.
You might want to reevaluate Trumps love of other dictators his actions and the base that wants to see America become a trump dynasty. Edit twitter.com lang en
You are making the assumption that the employees monitoring the stock pile informed the Trump administration it was severely lacking and that the level that it had been at for the past 6 7 years was not the normal
He never called it a hoax. He called the Democrats portrayal of his response a hoax. Of course you already knew that... I see this tactic all the time and I just don t get it. It doesn t fool very many people and it feeds into the whole fake news narrative. You neolibs are your own worst enemy.
That iceberg That's a hoax. Fake News. It's not there. It will melt in April when it gets warmer. It will get much smaller. We can destroy it by ramming straight into it it's so small.
Lol maybe if youre a transgender black woman
America has been interesting. It's about to get much more so.
What federal restrictions From what I understand the feds put out a guideline the states are creating the orders. Should the feds be able to reverse what the states ordered This is a serious question. I may be wrong in my interpretation of the situation and the role of the fed state government.
It's better than 80.
Imagine being 80 years old and having so much hate for someone
gt I also love how he clarified his comment that 72 of doctors are prescribing hydroxychloroquine in Spain and Fauci was like Cool' Pundits treat it like a game as if opinions and feelings override the results of objective analysis. If you can hit someone with a sweet zinger that means we should all ignore science right
Hell yeah I forget the brand I have currently but I have 3mg gummies which are great. Can have a nice super chill light dose or take like 3 if i want to really space out.
Even if this was a government plot Republicans control three quarters of federal government so its probably not the Democrats.
Watch what he does with them. He'll use them to make state governors slurp at his tiny orange balls.
Trumps approval rating is hovering a bit below 50 most Americans actually either like Trump or are indifferent apathetic
Under control is not an either or state. How much virus is out there will determine our course of action. Realistically this virus will be with us for awhile. Years probably. It s not the type to burn itself out. Assuming that 2 months of stay at home flattens the curve significantly and we have pumped out PPE and respirators for hospitals you would allow businesses to reopen and urge at risk people to continue to self isolate. Schools will already be closed but you have to let kids go to camp and baseball and the pool. You have to have your summertime economy.
Where are all the deaths
gt Alabama doesn't have a stay at home order. Alabama doesn't have a lot of things. Like laws against incest...
Let us spray.
So you're saying you'll never get sick again At some point you'll realize that's simply irrational.
He said he wanted the churches to be packed on Easter Sunday which is April 12 a week from Sunday.
We're fucked either way. Florida hates itself.
That's a given at this point.
Kentucky s deep red though Louisville and Lexington are blue. Our governor has come right out and said that the federal government is outbidding us on PPE. Despicable.
There s literally no reason to not do so that a reasonable person can justify.
Somebody needs to tell this guy the nazis surrendered in 45
Not correct bloomberg.com I take this issue of European solidarity very seriously and am therefore certain there will be authorizations soon to export masks to certain countries Health Minister Jens Spahn said at a news conference in Berlin on Monday. We re not categorically against exports but want to understand what happens because previously it was so that masks went not where they were most needed but where most was paid.
I'll bite. What exactly has Trump done that can't be explained by simple laziness incompetence racism apathy myopia vindictiveness and narcissism I earnestly believe you're being a little unfair to the guy right now.
Thanks stupid ignorant voters you mean
Well that's terrifying to think about.
Don t you mean one of the worst people to ever exist on this planet
That wasn't their argument at all.
He really went college
It's just dishonest. Do I think Joe Biden is a racist for saying poor kids can be as successful as white kids No. People make gaffes when speaking all the time. I don't think she meant that she would be fine with a genocide in a foreign country and it is extremely unfair to believe that from a quote out of context.
It s a free country is about the worst simplification of understanding a society that openly expresses liberty and fights for freedom. Nonpolitical freedom is associated with autonomy not a society governed by rule of law Liberty is freedom bound by reasonable constraints within a society to prevent stomping on the rights of others in a rational way. This is why laws exist which follow concepts of liberty. You have a responsibility to a society to behave within its rules until you remove yourself from it. You may have the freedom to spread disease from consent but you do not have the liberty to spread disease from consent as that is harmful to society. You are required to quarantine. Common sense is not so common.
Don t be dishonest Jared Kushner is always qualified to shut up and take qualified people do their jobs.
OMG the hammer pulled you off
Conservatives are the party of oppression. They vote to Oppress Ethincs Women's rights LGBTQ Outsiders any other nation They only vote pro for gun rights and the rich.
a lot no one I can find a Facebook group that surely wants Chris Cuomo dead. I can go on twitter or reddit and read some idiot hope this kills more conservatives it won t the cities are packed with liberals
GAO found that 1 illegal aliens in the United States generate more in costs than revenues to federal state and local governments combined 2 estimates of the national net cost of illegal aliens vary greatly ranging from 2 billion to 19 billion
That is a ridiculous analogy. You put the mask on yourself first because if you pass out the child is incapable of putting the mask on themselves or the adult. Other countries are not your children. This is a global issue with allies trying to work together. Canada sheltered Americans on 9 11. Never asked for anything in return. Gave them shelter food necessities. Would Americans do that for Canadians We can't give them shelter cause America has to put America first. Should Canada withhold its pulp Singapore withhold the 3M masks made in its factories How many outsourced 3M factories are there Should those governments seize the 3M factories in their countries That seems to be the type of free market this sub is starting to support. But yes thanks for being such a great neighbour. Don't forget to chant all lives matter while endangering your neighbours up north.
he chipped his tooth when his wife tried to beat the shit out of him for lying about having covid 19
He didn't call the disease a hoax he called it the newest democrat hoax a witch hunt weapon using it in a partisan fashion to make him look bad.... and guess what he's right
Andy boy isn't all that great either tho to be fair.
gt Burn it all down. Isn't that the justification people gave for voting for Trump They wanted to burn it all down How's that working out
Now we get to wait and watch someone say this is anecdotal and means nothing. P
bakeracttrump
gt Except... Except nothing. I didn't equate it to the flu either in mortality rates or R0 value. I'm saying it's in between the flu and ebola though closer to the flu. This is not incorrect. Maybe you don't know much about ebola which has a mortality rate of nearly 50 Corona pales in comparison. That's what I mean by perspective. If people only compare it to the flu yeah it's bad. If they compare it to various other things there's a wider perspective. Handy char in this article telegraph.co.uk In yet other comments you still seem to have missed the point of my post and would rather argue against something that wasn't present. gt Just because you aren't seeing the level of death you could be seeing without these shelter in place orders does not mean the orders are doing nothing. Complete straw man. I'm not advocating more or less severe measures being taken. I'm only talking about how perspectives will have more variance between individuals especially in relation to civil rights issues which also have a high variance.
gt I ve voted Red my entire adult life Hey Fellow Conservative Kids
We have no way of knowing. China has lied about everything.
Democrats don t pay bills or work. LMAO. Stupidest comment I ve read on this sub and that says a lot. This whole comment is ridiculous. Keep things the way they are because they benefit me and mine. We can associate ballots to legal citizens over the age of 18. It s not fucking rocket science you dip shit. Ease of access to vote is the problem.
Thank you for this
Reminds me of the then Prime Minister of my country who fired both the Attorney General and Director General of the Anti Corruption Commission for investigating his corruption and embezzlement straitstimes.com cases. He lost the recent general election and now faces numerous charges in court. Has any American former president ever been charged in court for misconduct which occurred when he was in office
gt They just tried this with the French When
gt Faced with the prospect the virus could rip through the nearly 10 000 people who live on the streets or in shelters Sometimes the best solution is for nature to take it's course
We don't endorse his actions and apologize on his behalf.
That's only true if the President is a Republican. If a Democrat was anywhere near as bad as Trump both Democrats and Republicans would vote them out of office.
So did Lincoln and he did it against protestors. The government arresting you for going outside during a dangerous global pandemic is completely okay if you want to actually do some good to fight the virus.
Does anyone seriously read national review for the articles
What are you doing to stop it Gimme some ideas big boy
Dude instead of providing a reason why illegal border crossings are not harmful in a pandemic you keep going off on these tangents about the veracity of Fox News medical supply shortages Houston and Dallas how other countries ban people from the U.S and now the U.S is spreading the virus. People crossing borders is not good in a pandemic because it has the potential to spread the virus. That is why I think border protections should continue to be enforced. So we don't have external infections to add to our internal infections. We can quibble endlessly over the details of ICE's response but keeping out potential sources of infection from entering is a top priority for any country.
Late stage capitalism it's a subreddit and don't dismiss it too quickly. Oh... you'll wanna dismiss it right away for sure
Presentism really isn t a good look especially on people like you when you have no idea what you re talking about. Big yikes.
Obviously faking. These egotistical gangsters think that everyone is so dumb they can low effort okie doke whatever they want people to believe but they just end up making complete fools of themselves.
And only a week ago they were calling for people to return to work and the elderly for making the great sacrifice for Tump's stock portfolio. And 4 weeks before that they were calling this a Democratic hoax.
2016
You d rather have trump than Biden Really
And then you self enforce your own delusion with confirmation bias Everyone else.
Oh please no
It's actually not.
Either give me blind obedience or get the fuck out
Dude have you seen r politics or twitter or any other social media It may not represent a large portion of the population but it for sure highlights a lot liberals who think it s ok. Why even come to a conservative sub Don t you have enough places to whine about us elsewhere
This is typical communist crap. Back during the Great Leap Forward Mao had all these ideas that he could just command people who aren't farmers to farm and iron works to produce iron and they couldn't Then fearing for their lives they lied about their progress. Do not trust China.
America. Wtf
It is. ashingtonpost.com
Wasn't being sarcastic you are right though on Reddit you can never tell
Fuck me over a barrel and call me smithson McGee. These guys are idiots.
One of their Senators had a literal Chinese spy on her staff.
Deadmau5 Skrillex 2020 Anything would be better than this. For fucks sake Gym Jordan could probably do better.
I mean trump is the worst man president in history and Pelosi is one of the best speakers of the house so
I m sorry I was more replying to the comment above you to jump straight to calling me a demented moron however is hypocritical when talking about jumping to the extremes. I m sorry for the confusion but when people say they feel no sympathy is annoys me.
Wait what You make up an imagined conversation to quote and then criticize Biden for it Have you heard Trump Very bigly brain that guy. All the best words.
Sources needed
This is the way....
i think it would. this one of the better solutions given
Statements like that are meant to warn against Hitler not Fauci. You flag waving morons are the reason USA is the hardest hit
Fuck kushner.
The Democrats are doing their best. That's part of the point of their push to decriminalize illegal immigration.
Jeeeezus.
Hey salt lake city fits too.
Everyone on reddit is a liar at some point
I bought something from amazon yesterday by your logic I help amazon pay their taxes.
Wow you guys need to learn to read. This is what the blinded followers of the GOO believe
Sanders is the political equivalent of the 7 Minute Abs guy from Something About Mary.
Not my fault you had to whatabout Obama to defend Trump.
Imagine having so much hate in your heart that you take the time to write something so vile. This person needs help.
I remember somebody saying they still don't even in Washington where they already have this option. Still works for the rest of us though.
If the wages go high enough people will eventually want the jobs. They just don't want a hard manual labor job for 10 bucks an hour. The agricultural industry is used to paying little for labor and Americans are used to getting very cheap produce. I am not convinced at all no one wants to take the jobs. The pay is just too low
Nepotism. It s a wonder. I don t have any idea why trump would do that. Like I honestly can not even try to fathom and though process of this. His very large iq must just dwarf mine but like... didn t we as a people like the entire population of earth decide that kushner was terrible at whatever job his daddy in law he looks like the kind that would say that tried to hook him up with
Just as soon as he found out whose ass he needed to kick.
gt That's our president's motto apparently. Pretty sure it's been updated It will be zero any day now and we'll reopen the country at easter there's now 250 000 dead and lock down for months. I've done a great job 10 10.
As a WA resident it's hard to feel like our curves are 100 accurate. Yes we're doing better than Republican run states like Florida Georgia etc... but we're also just as woefully behind with testing and equipment as the rest of the country and as such have no firm idea about how well we're actually doing.
Yea those democrats really downplayed the virus....
I would never give these propagandists the benefit of the doubt. They are banking on you doing that and they take advantage of the human desire to do that.
If this man had 2 brains what a half wit he would be.
Right I challenge all trump haters to get Corona virus and really show us all how wrong he really was.
This is exactly what happened to my mom. My mom wasn't TDS she voted for him but it was more for Pence. She never really was enthused about trump and kinda disliked him. Since these briefings she changed completely because she was watch them then seeing the reporters and then seeing the reporting on the briefing. One day she says to me you know fox does have bias but they're probably the least out there. I can't believe how ABC is reporting on this and the reporter's questions are so stupid. All at once it was like a switch had been flipped btw this started first with the whole Kavanagh thing. She was appalled at the Democrat and their media's handling Like I said she isn't a rabid liberal just a normal American housewife. I think we'll find a lot of people are waking up because of this.
Wtf is a trump Is that that guy still trying to be president No one cares what he says anymore.
Ok. What does that have to do with Hillary Clinton
He doesn t have the stamina to be a serial killer. Can you imagine him trying to dispose of a body He d have to stop for a breath or a Big Mac after every 10 feet.
Kurt Eichenwald with the tentacle porn
Please help us come the general election. We need your help to fight against right wing trolls foreign and domestic. We were attacked by a shockingly obvious intel op and all of us lovers of freedom democracy cooperation and objective truth are being attacked. Please stand with us if only on reddit.
The broth is getting more concentrated as it evaporates
Give him a chance
I missed it. What did he say
oh ok I see what your point is ok thanks for the explanation
I have a few family members in their 50s who have gone through the Wuhan flu and they said it is about as close to death that they have ever felt or come so this is saving lives in the long run. People are trying to downplay this like this has happened before by comparing it to the Spanish flu but in modern times nothing like this has happened. On top of it they have no evidence yet if it can be caught again once you get over it. They only have one case so far in the world of a Japanese woman who has tested positive twice so IF which could be a very big if... what happens if you can catch the Wuhan flu AGAIN after getting over it Then what do we do Is it a little fearmongering yes... and I blame this largely on the media for overhyping this shit but this is a new thing for the modern era of the planet and if we find out that the Wuhan flu can be re transmitted... our national deficit and other things will be the least of our worries.
Totally not a dictator move.
Means he cares less about your life than personal grudges.
All of this arm chair psychology is crap a diagnosis takes multiple sessions for examination. You can tell this stuff over snippets and what you see on tv
Another crisis. The ventilator shortage is being blown way out of proportion. That's the exaggeration. How many hospitals are crammed full of WhuFlu patients that require ventilators Oh.... Right. Yeah. The overall crisis No that's not what I was referring to.
One is getting on a fucking airplane the other is a fundamental right you have as an American. You can be dumb as a sack of hammers and still vote as you so clearly demonstrate and there isn t a problem with that. It s America Literacy tests were racist voter suppression in the Civil Rights era just as Voter ID is now. The system is preventing people from having the time or the tools to be able to get the things they need to vote and it s doing it specifically to the lower class and the less privileged. I know this is as good as watching paint dry but maybe while you re angrily typing your reply some of my words will permeate that thick cheese like brain you have. Doubt it tho
Boom Roasted
They should put Jared out there more. He's great for getting people to dig deep for some more Trump hate.. 50 during an ongoing domestic cataclysm is pathetic by any measure or rationalization. People hate Trump and they should.
Well I haven't heard of a DJ who killed people or destroyed the environment for profit so yes you are correct. DJs do have a better track record than businessmen and thereby are more qualified to hold public office. Bassnectar for Senate 2020.
So basically what's happened to Bernies online support
It s called money
That s because he s a contradictory idiot
Would you Like to Build an App Is it the Same Voice
President Trumps approval ratings are rising sharply. This is precisely why networks like NPR and MSNBC are now refusing to air the President's update. They don't seem to care about the fact that these briefings include vital timely information about the crisis that can help people. nope...it s all about orange man bad
Sure. Go have a revolution then since it owns you too.
google.com
As he should. This is 100 a attack on our electoral system. Mass fraud and mass ignorant voters who have no interest or no clue what is going on.
Or just be asymptomatic
If not Bernie I am sure his surrogate Linda Sarsour is no doubt liking that point. Leftists have a long history of antisemitism.
Someone's mad that his god emperor and his followers are a cabal of doofuses.
CompUSA where they told me I would get a free keyboard and mouse if I purchased today.
Correct. The authority was already given to the government before the crisis. Quarantine and disease are things we already planned for. gt The federal government derives its authority for isolation and quarantine from the Commerce Clause of the U.S Constitution. gt Under section 361 of the Public Health Service Act 42 U.S Code 264 the U.S Secretary of Health and Human Services is authorized to take measures to prevent the entry and spread of communicable diseases from foreign countries into the United States and between states. gt The authority for carrying out these functions on a daily basis has been delegated to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention CDC gt Under 42 Code of Federal Regulations parts 70 and 71 CDC is authorized to detain medically examine and release persons arriving into the United States and traveling between states who are suspected of carrying these communicable diseases. gt States have police power functions to protect the health safety and welfare of persons within their borders. To control the spread of disease within their borders states have laws to enforce the use of isolation and quarantine. gt These laws can vary from state to state and can be specific or broad. In some states local health authorities implement state law. In most states breaking a quarantine order is a criminal misdemeanor.
What do you think happens when you have a high fever Can you think of any possible mechanism through which a fever might dehydrate someone
I believe they are complicit because this is what they want.
Yes but it extends when your actions violate the health and safety of others.
while liberals are toiling and studying the exonomy would be collapsing even if it was more deadly than the flu it wouldn't be that much more deadly than the flu. we don't shut down the economy twice a year for flu season. we don't order the entire nation to stay inside every time allergies start kicking in more people get injured every year from car accidents and we haven't banned cars.. during flu season we tell at risk people to stay indoors and use protection and that's it. That's how we do with it.. I noticed the Liberals aren't so concerned with studying and double checking the numbers when it comes to things like climate change. when it comes to that they want to take the first Huffington Post article they find and use it to drastically alter the economy.. in fact I'm seeing a theme. Liberals constantly trying to trash the economy..
keep asking him about the stockpile its all that matters at the moment
Individual rights do not extend to violations of the rights of others. You're not allowed to smack someone in the face just because they said something that pissed you off. Neither is it a right to kill an innocent human just because he or she is inconveniencing you.
My man
It's not empty. arlingtoncemetery.mil The Vietnam crypt is now empty after the remains were identified but the others are not.
Honestly I would have 0 problem with people having this shitty belief if it only impacted themselves but if you don t quarantine self isolate then you raise your risk of getting the virus which increases everybody else s risk of getting the virus including your mom dad grandma grandpa wife husband sister brother mentor anybody. And you might be in a low risk demographic but those people might not be. It s not for you it s not for me it s for everybody and the greater good. Yes it sucks to be quarantined but it sucks for everybody and it will suck for a whole lot longer if we don t slow the spread and flatten the curve.
I thought it was bathing in virgin blood.
I understand this line of thinking. How can the dem and the whole country progress toward a better set of policies if they have no incentives for it never a negative reinforcement for going so far to the centre that it pushes the centre to where republican should be and the republican so far right it is confusingly similar to well polished fascism. The centre voters actually do have this they can vote republican or not vote and force the party toward them but leftists are expected to shut up and get in rank to go and vote politely as they are told It sure isn't working it is very likely to have been a major cause in what brought trump to power last election. I really do get that way of thinking and I do agree with it in principle. I also fear that if it leads to another 4 years of... Well I don't have qualifiers strong enough to express what I think of trump his administration and his policies... If it leads to more of this is it worth it this time to die on that hill For me no but also I am not American so my opinion is ultimately worthless. Still I am impacted negatively as is most of the world by the action of this administration and I really would hate it to go on any longer than Well I hoped it would stopped at the impeachment trial so... There you go...
Dude isn't even making a political stand and yet somehow it's political.
I don t usually believe in name calling... so I ll just say I m sorry that you re so sorely uneducated. I see there s no point in having a scientifically based argument bc you do not understand science and basic physiology. Stay safe internet stranger. This disease is not a joke.
Who else is going to protect us from our own best interests
This fucking guy.
I think every governor that has a conversation with Trump should post the conversation publicly. Of course bleeping out anything that would be national security Let Trump blow his own whistle for the voters...
Aight. So i agree with your sentiment and have no love for the man i just need to hit a reply on this. You were pefect till you name dropped tech. I mean would a decision maker normally lean toward technical depth or strategy and leadership Of course Jared probably has neither of those but hear me out. If a CIO was speaking with a group of consultants experts and he had differing information do you think he actually pulled out SAS as you mention and start playing on the keys or do you think he got that information from his team members Why would he ever need to know Python or R His role is to take all the information question it concrete it and make the best decision that aligns with the business goal and executive strategy. And as someone who has a few years in the corporate data science realm amongst a myriad of other disciplines mentioning those specific languages seems weird. If your gonna drop tech go balls deep. Might as well hit it with methodology algorithms and frameworks. You ever work a job doing this stuff or just academia Not trying to be a jerk just actually curious. Anyway yea Jared is a joke and we all know as much.
I am skipping the NBA draft next year even though I know I m a shoe in first rounder.
All house terms are two years. Only Senate terms a staggered.
Corporationsbare people my friend Mitt Romney
Biden Trump absolutely needs to invoke the Wartime Powers Act. Uh sir he already did that. Biden Well he needs to invoke wartime production powers to force companies to make medical supplies. Uh sir he's done that and also the companies are volunteering to do so as well. Biden oh well I'll let history judge his perfomance then. So Biden wouldn't do much differently except force companies to do what they already are doing. How diplomatic. Chuck Schumer Trump needs is doing a terrible job. His briefings are a campaign rally. We don't need partisan pettiness right now. Trump Chuck I'm doing the best I can. Also why ask me to stop being petty when you were petty in your response to me Also I've only defended myself from petty and untrue allegations from your side. Schumer Well for starters you need to appoint a military person to oversee the ordering of supplies. Trump You mean this guy Meet Mr Polowski. He's been doing this job since the start. Where you been Chuck These Democrats obviously aren't paying much attention to what's going on since their attacks and Monday mornings quarterbacking are out of date telling Trump to do things he's already done. Get these clowns out of here.
The Interstate Commerce clause is super abused and the Supreme Court says it's great. For example you're not allowed to grow things for your own use due to the interstate commerce clause grain for your own cattle or marijuana etc if the feds don't want you to. The Supreme Court says this is interstate commerce because it could theoretically affect interstate prices. Compared to that quarantine rules would definitely be upheld. Note the local quarantine laws are state laws so have nothing to do with the Constitution.
But what was Trump's basis for it being effective I read the article the transcript of the briefing and he didn't seem to mention it
Sincerely yours Mic drop
Maybe Trump declaring war on Canada will be enough to spur Americans to take back their government by force. We are bros and we know the Cheeto war criminal and his cronies don t speak for the majority of you.
Tell him to go back to Kindercare. They miss him there at play time.
I d prefer a single payer or M4A system but the idea that a public option and subsidized marketplace won t be helpful just seems wrong to me. A single out of pocket doctors visit cost as much as a year of her premiums. It makes me feel much better.
Did your kite even read the bill
Unreal
Northeast US and we shut the main office in mid March with 100 remote work from home for everyone. Earliest return to the office is not earlier than May at the latest guess No layoffs yet.
Maybe... we'll never know though because apparently the concept is that the United States needs to be replaced completely with foreign workers to make our economy so amazing it will take care of the worlds problems. P
Trump only hires the best Slovenian hookers.
Of course they can. Your government should be doing the same thing if they were in the same situation.
Well if you think I couldn't help owning slaves if it was legal why would you I mean you idolize a slaver.
I understand your fear but let's remember most people recover from the virus over 20 never show symptoms and we'll all get this eventually.
Second best case scenario is the system completely fails. What does that sound like to you
He literally just said what the guy before him said.
Trump didn t do well in Utah in 2016 either. There was that third party republican who got a lot of votes. I imagine if Romney let the charge Utah might have a change of swinging. Arizona elected a democratic senator for the first time in 30 years in 2018. They will likely elect another this year. Stranger things have happened.
This thread was brigaded really hard that's why you have tards below yelling at you. You're always welcome to bring more of the same level headed discussion here in the future.
Who is this milquetoast fuck
That seems a bit too intelligent for the trump administration.
They don t pay federal income tax
I don't want to sacrifice anyone. I think long term the economic collapse that we're heading for will be far worse in terms of death and quality of life. Grandma and Grandpa don't have to go out and the elderly immunosuppressed can stay home safe but I'm 23 with a good immune system and there's a very good chance that I will be just fine when I get the virus. I don't have a choice but to work. At any given time how many of us are just a thousand dollars or less from getting kicked out of our homes
Trump is hard to pinpoint he says so many weird things so I fall back to looking at his actual policies which are the opposite of authoritarian policies.
You shouldn t forget that the Amy Klobuchar and Pete Buttigeig campaigns endorsed Biden before Super Tuesday and the media ran headlines in those endorsements. Also never forget how the media also ran headlines about Joe Biden s victory in South Carolina.
Prereqs are brains and they're in thin supply in that family.
I thought war on drugs was a result of Nixons and Reagan s administration. proof en.m.wikipedia.org
According to Wikip dia Canada has 10 of world wide fresh water. USA around 7 Per capita though Canada has roughly 15 times more.
TN as well. Very grateful that Strickland has been treating this very seriously and doing what he can to make everyone in the Memphis area also care.
Our attack geese are already there. Don't mess with the cobra chickens.
It doesn't matter its just an IG. This is just a distraction to get people to stop paying attention to Jareds fuck up and all the attention they accidentally drew to the stockpile supply lines issues.
oh for fucks sake he s been downplaying this pandemic for months. now that it hit us he said he saw it s a pandemic even before others called it a pandemic. every expert in the country sais that there is a need for ventilators and equipment except for trump and kushner who sais that they are exagerating based on their experience. have you seen the hospitals they are overwhelmed. America has the most covid cases in the world and you still trust him
The face of a man realizing not at all for the first time how good he could ve had it if he d just married a nice Jewish girl from Long Island instead of one of Trump s daughters.
What are you even going on about You do realize that when democrats' call having to have a photo ID to vote suppression they are talking about the cost of the ID it's self. The ID cards in India are issued by the election body it's literally a card for voting. That is an entirely different conversation than telling someone you had to be registered to vote and then asking them for a totally different ID. democrats correctly call it suppression because they are being asked to prove a second time who they are.
I haven t heard about this. Why does he wanna throw people in jail Just for being outside
Holy shit lol jokes on you Defense Production Act look it up and read the words and then let it sink in. If they tried to offshore production that shit would be nationalized so god damn fast haha
gt Atkinson the inspector general for the intelligence community alerted lawmakers to the Ukraine whistleblower complaint detailing allegations about President Donald Trump's improper conduct. And there it is
Oh fuck off you Soros bot.
If this 4 year term is any indication of how many public servants diplomats intelligence officers Trump will continue to clear out if he gets re elected the republic is dead.
All of Trump s rhetoric is threatening to destroy not only 200 years of peace and prosperity between our two nations but the precedent and reputation of the friendship between the US and Canada which is both a point of envy and hope for most other liberal democracies in the world. It s a relationship that has blossomed and overcome centuries of enmity between France and Germany and is slowly progressing forwards amongst democracies in the Middle East. Re militarizing or securing the Us Canada border more heavily is a line that we as both Canadians and may not ever come back from. Trump s actions are not normal and a response like THIS from Trudeau or any Canadian PM for that matter is a sign that my government is close to being done with Trump s actions regardless of his motives.
is this article incomplete Eliminating that stressor for 90 days I think will go a long way he continued noting that the offer could be extended beyond 90 days depending on how the fight against the spread of the virus plays out. Apparently AOC thought this did not go far enough because it ignores lower income people who pay rent Isn t that actually a fair point What s the point of this segment of the article
he probably spoke the truth which was in direct conflict with Trump's rantings and babbling.
I agree. If he had been the deciding vote it would have gone the other way.
Yes. One can only hope we come to a way to reduce domination Domination Nation I will keep this peotically short. USA was born from wild hungry greedy risk takers wanting to Dominate a new land. USA stole lives land brutalized Indigenious Domination. USA built on slavery Domination. USA converted slave power domination into currency. Needed to store domination. USA created Dollars to gauge a person's level of being able to dominate. USA considers Dollars as capital instead of tangible items to dominate. USA born into Capitalism using fictional Dollar. USA creates markets dealing fictional capital called Dollars to dominate. USA dollars after fits and starts creation controlled by private banks domination. USA private banks indebt citizens to harness wage slaves domination. USA banks reposess tangible capital if wage slave can't pay domination. USA private banks bankrupt indebted citizens unable to pay Dollars Domination. USA bosses control wages and profit is King domination. USA corporations coalesce and monopolize domination. USA corporate bosses control Dollar flow wages domination. USA courts side with the Dollar over people domination. Capitalism Domination of each other
Yeah because the label that said POISON NOT FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION wasn't enough of a reason to double check ALL of the ingredients. If you need to be told to NOT DRINK fish tank cleaner well we as a world do not need you in the gene pool. He quite plainly talked about the malaria drug. There are ingredients in your shoes that are also in food you eat so do you need to be told to not eat your shoes
The chain of command are complicit in the cover up. They are the ones that deserve to be relieved. Brass has been playing Trump's tune perfectly for 3 years and counting.
It s a good comeback to remind the libertarian ultra conservatives how stupid the rest of the world considers them. Excuse the blow up but this thread is absolutely ridiculous. The more you stay inside the quicker this will all be over.
If you had taken the time to actually look at the document it is the implementation of Section 42 of United States Code which is law passed by Congress. Edit See Section A Legal Authority if you are still confused and need clarification.
Absolutely. It's a completely unsustainable business model. But having a national food surplus and not being dependent on other countries for our food is such an advantage. It's a tough problem. A business that thrives off exploiting cheap labor for limited times of the year. Wages don't matter people want stability and the promise of still having a job a year later. I agree about wages and benefits but it's seasonal work how can that work And the industry would require a revolution to go from cheap labor to high paid workers plus benefits... What can we do
gt A full rollback of the limit on the state and local tax deduction or SALT would provide a quick cash infusion in the form of increased tax rebates to an estimated 13 million American households nearly all of which earn at least 100 000 a year. nytimes.com
He really is. He needs to be removed. The international community is going to want to try him and his administration for crimes against humanity.
Wow. Thanks for this. It s tough for a lot of us right now. For a while it s felt like everyone hates us because of our shitty leader. I m glad to hear that we re not all associated with him. It feels nice. I m sorry we suck. Thanks for the kind words.
Gotta get em out while protesting is an illegal health hazard
Nope that other one is your belly button.
Plus the U.S is a broken democracy at best but more like an oligarchy.
gt Biden who leads Sanders in the delegate count by 313 according to NBC News' tally said that he wanted to personally alert Sanders that he will announce his vetting committee in mid April as it appears that his pathway to clinching the nomination is more likely than that of the Vermont senator s. gt I don t want him to think I m being presumptuous but you have to start now deciding on who you re going to have background checks done on as potential vice presidential candidates and it takes time he said. gt In an interview with Jimmy Kimmel last week Biden said he felt almost guilty talking about the process of choosing his vice president who he has pledged would be a woman even though he has not been chosen as the Democratic nominee. Dude has way more class than me. I wouldnt have handled it nearly is civilly lol
To be fair you have to have a very high IQ to understand Rick and Morty. The humor is extremely subtle and without a solid grasp of theoretical physics most of the jokes will go over a typical viewer's head. There's also Rick's nihilistic outlook which is deftly woven into his characterisation his personal philosophy draws heavily from Narodnaya Volya literature for instance. The fans understand this stuff they have the intellectual capacity to truly appreciate the depths of these jokes to realize that they're not just funny they say something deep about LIFE. As a consequence people who dislike Rick and Morty truly ARE idiots of course they wouldn't appreciate for instance the humour in Rick's existencial catchphrase Wubba Lubba Dub Dub which itself is a cryptic reference to Turgenev's Russian epic Fathers and Sons I'm smirking right now just imagining one of those addlepated simpletons scratching their heads in confusion as Dan Harmon's genius unfolds itself on their television screens. What fools... how I pity them. And yes by the way I DO have a Rick and Morty tattoo. And no you cannot see it. It's for the ladies' eyes only And even they have to demonstrate that they're within 5 IQ points of my own preferably lower beforehand.
Oh wow clever. So please since you desire attention. What would you do to cure the world and how
This is why they freak out when they don't win elections.
its a factual story there's not many articles about it mainly just warren calling the trump administration out on it and requesting information from the FEMA administrator Peter Gaynor documentcloud.org but its being highly twisted to fit their agenda NY wasn the one doing it before. They're twisting it now since Cuomo signed an executive order to confiscate any unused PPE and ventilators instate to redistribute them where needed. also the entire reason Massachusetts was buying them themselves this way was because trump told them to do so rather then rely on the national stockpile then turned around and outbid them on orders of PPE to drive up the price. as well as confiscating the ones they do manage to order. they then give blue states less then 20 of their orders from the national stockpile and fill 100 of orders from red states that ally with him.
Trump doesn't own shit until Americans make him own it.
At least I'll be alive s
Jesus Christ. It's 11 PM on a Friday in the middle of a pandemic and this toddler is still obsessed with taking revenge. It's fucking gross.
Would you obey the quarantine or be more driven towards protest action
Blue Check twitter on tilt right now
agreed my conservative friends and I have had this same discussion. We use facts and data from any source to reason our way to an opinion. The few liberals I know argue and try to make their case based solely on how they feel something should be often in spite of unintended but obvious consequences. The weird part is that you can discuss the two different ways of reasoning with the conservatives they get it Try to point out to a liberal that they are using emotions and feelings instead of reasoning with facts and logic they'll just stare at you like you're an alien that just fell from the sky. They see us as heartless for thinking like a robot. This makes it so ironic to me that liberal politicians all use the same phrase over and over again. We need action based on science and the data whether they are talking about coronavirus or climate change it's always action based on science and the data or the proven science and the data support my vision. If you haven't noticed this just watch how often you see this phrase used.
gt Americans do not want this job not because of laziness but of the harshness of the work environment. Doesn't this make you disagree with him then
Captain Crozier told the Chicoms a 4. 5 billion dollar US carrier could not perform its mission in the Western Pacific. He seems more like a traitor than a patriot to me.
Her argument is wrong because she is a hypocrit That s how facts and logic work right
White supremacists are Center left Demokkkratic party identity politics Richard Spencer is a socialist Your phobia and ism claims are 100 fabricated and you know it but you re a communist and lying is part of your political weaponry. Also there s nothing wrong with being a nationalist course unless you re a commie. Finally there s no cages and the kids are in temporary holding cells at the fault of human traffickers coyotes shitty parents. If you keep strawmanning and lying you re gonna be reported. Be warned and start telling the truth
It really won't
Well what if you're into something But cui bono Who besides the buyer benefits Where would the money or quid pro quo go to
My dad can t fucking factor you cannot tell me old school was more efficient
Enjoy gulag comrade seems you've had a little too much to think today
Fair enough.
The administration is handling it fine. You are looking to troll. You re ill informed and have no idea what you are talking about.
1
That s the theory. But average people seem to think that the plan is to shelter at home until the virus is eradicated which will never happen. The goal was supposed to be to allow hospitals to operate at capacity Remember that meme graph of bending the curve showing the lower curve hitting the hospital capacity line We are supposed to be pushing our hospitals to the limit yet it seems like outside of NYC hospitals are well under capacity.
Out of the frying pan into the fire.
I did vote but because I live in California my vote matters less than someone living in a smaller state. In fact a majority of Americans voted Hillary. Likewise my state actually took Coronavirus seriously and shut everything down. We get next to no federal supplies. Meanwhile all the states that voted Trump stayed open and they get all the supplies they request.
Ahhh so you have to wait for the same thing as me Here's hoping it comes in time. Good luck out there Stay healthy
seriously Hahahaha. You haven't seen the many things about Fake news and the Mainstream Media covering it up If you're not even going to prove it then I won't bother reading further. Even though the Spanish flu is just as likely to have come from Spain as anywhere else.
So what about Pelosi and the Democrats for fighting Trump when he wanted to close our borders It's funny how liberals say he was slow to take action yet they ignore the inconvenient truth such as this or that our own CDC and media was denying the severity of this in January and into February.
Oh no
They would be the same loyalists that reported conspiratorial Americans to British governors during the Revolution.
gt Weren't we suppose to get an ACA alternative Trump was unable to figure out how to rebrand the ACA with his name and get his cut. So we got nothing.
Once you correct for the democrat bias that's like 33 regular pinocchios.
gt Why wouldn't the voters have voter ids Because it makes it harder to harvest votes this is a practice that democrats have perfected ensuring that they win any close election. Ballot harvesting is the collecting and submitting of absentee or mail in voter ballots by volunteers or workers. They offer to fill in the ballot for you. The ballot is not submitted unless the democrat is losing. The volunteer will go to a heavy republican area and say what a big fan he is of the republican candidate. The clueless voter feels secure that their ballot will actually be cast for the republican.
These arguments only ever sound convincing when put through this hyper American vocabulary in reality its just stopping unnecessary social interaction in order to not cause unecesary deaths.
Glad we're on the same page there
That's basically 100 negative but good base will never tell the truth.
The counterpoint is the 10th amendment and the inherent powers of the states of which police power is one of the largest. Police powers necessarily deprive people of constitutional rights so there are strict limitations on them. However for limited emergency periods the wide application of police powers to curtail otherwise Constitutional rights has been upheld in courts. The question is what justifies an emergency there are other causes of death as bad or worse and how long can an emergency last
gt Please everyone vote this monster out of office on 11 3 2020. Assuming we have an election.
Here's the part Cuomo if everything we do saves one life I'll be happy needs to read gt Kerstin Hessius who runs a government pension fund has been arguing that money vs lives is a false choice. Rising unemployment hits pensions directly she says. What s more the tax base disappears then we have to start cutting welfare. And Swedes should be proud that we have not extinguished the entire society as many other countries have done Quote from here nypost.com
gt Conservatives used to be pro military. Lord forbid one pushes back on DJT. Hey look a leftist concern troll. Good of you slip up and reveal your true colors.
What do they mean by dying with the virus though Like dying in a car accident while sick Or dying of diabetes while sick The former is with but the latter is definitely from
Can t we cancel our debt anyways and force other countries to continue buying at low rates through military dominance I believe China Japan and U.K have most of it so if we cancel theirs they won t be able to do anything about it. Especially considering japan has a joke of a military the U.K won t last 3 days and China is at least 10 years behind.
gt It's an ugly future. So you're saying we actually have a future That seems pretty optimistic.
I respect people as humans... I do t care how they identify themselves so Your point is...
So then the multiple games of golf trump played during that period was not a waste of time then
Not me man... lt take a long drag off a blunt and cranks up Jethro Tull gt
Cuomo is ding a bang up job
Trump is going to build beautiful voting booths. Some say the greatest anyone has ever seen. They will have the best coronvirus protection like nothing you have ever seen. No coronovirus is getting into those booths. That was a mean question. If it was any other real network they would have fired you by now. Let's get some questions from some real reporter... s
You think he is describing pneumonia He doesn t have a cough. Someone can feel weird in the chest from inflammation. Prior to full blown pneumonia his symptoms align with inflammation
This is uncivil and I'm calling the tone police.
It's good that you're open to new ideas. Me here's my views Live and let live. I think we all have the right to go out and earn a living based on our talents. I don't care what goes on in your bedroom. I don't care what color your hair is or what country you're coming from. I don't care what you call your god or if you don't have one at all. I think if you're from a foreign country and you want to come live among us legally you're to be respected. I think as a society we should embrace people who are trying to better themselves offer the guidance they need to succeed. And I also think if politicians ask me to sacrifice my hard earned dollar they should respect my labor and not squander that dollar. And that's about it.
gt I would like to see a good discussion when this is over on whether to require some minimal Made in America standards for supply chains that are considered essential for national defense. This should include medical essential chemical production and various types of factory made goods. gt gt Nothing carried away. This will increase costs during peacetime. I would at least like to see this get considered and the pro and cons discussed. It's not good being unable to get stuff we need because other countries might not be willing or able to help. We actually do have a version of that already. The Buy American Act and to a lesser extent the Trade Agreements act do just what you describe. But they aren't a broad requirement yet.
The companies in the Dakota oilfields were able to attract labor just as every other region or industry that needs employees. You raise compensation until you get people willing to do the work.
your underestimating how bad life can be. but i hope you realize that the life of a grown woman is more important and valuable than a non feeling non sentient fetus
So because the first reported case hadn t hit SF that means she got to give irresponsible advice Then why not apply the same logic to Trump There weren t reported cases nationwide so he didn t need to do anything national right That s the logic your argument dictates.
It s not but this guy is literally taking talking points from Pravda on how to spin a narrative.
B but I was told China s the one who grabs people out of their own homes against their will. That s something China does not us right
Love how this is only news in r conservative and none of the libtards who get their news from CNN will have any idea that a man was arrested for planning on blowing up the White House
I really need to read this. I love michael malice
You had me at meat tornado
Hey aussies still love Kiwis leave us out of this.
gt I also want to give a quick update on the Teddy Roosevelt which we spoke about the other day. We are we found several more cases on board the ship. We are in the process now of testing 100 percent of the crew of that ship to ensure that that we don't that we were able to contain whatever spread might have occurred there on the ship. And but I also want to emphasize that the ship is operationally capable and can do its mission if if required to do so. So the ship is pulling into Guam. It will be pier side. No one on the crew will be allowed to leave anywhere into Guam other than on pier side. And we are already starting the process of testing 100 percent of the crew to ensure that that we've got that contained. The sailors who have been flown off the ship are currently doing fine. None of them have been required to be hospitalized because their symptoms are very mild their aches and pains and those types of things sore throats but nothing that required hospitalization. So they're in quarantine now on Guam.
I was trying to find that out but got muddled in the flavors like no excuse' and the like. We'll need to keep an eye on older swing states that have gone blue ish too like VA. Fortunately CO is safe wrt that.
A message to all the purity test conservatives you can't pretend there isn't a difference between everyday governance and a serious global crisis. I don't like all these major federal moves in a conservative sense of course but I'm not going to act holier than thou and pretend we don't need to take some unique actions just to win conservative points.
Seems like a way over generalizationO.o
Have a look. imgur.com
i understand your view though it seems like trump could ve done more with the information provided. even now it feels like he s not taking the virus as seriously as it truly is. check out the movie contagion. it introduces a way of measuring the infectivity of a virus how many people it infects before showing symptoms. covid 19 s rate is between 4 and 5 i believe and it has a 5 day incubation period. being entirely fair to your point neither party is handling it as it should be handled. i appreciate your view but february 24th was well before the virus got as bad as it was or there were any stay at home orders giving her zero reason to be nervous.
I have a feeling that at least some of that lopsidedness comes from the fact that we tend to just downvote if even leave a snarky reply and move on. They do a lot more reporting to the admins especially as a weaponized brigading tactics. Those at AHS and TopMinds aren't just posting links they are engaging in brigading and you know a ton of them are reporting directly to the admins.
A ham sandwich wouldn't have gotten us here
I find you're very suggestion frightening
gt Standing up for our rights is the opposite of inaction. I m talking about inaction regarding the virus. Just letting everyone do what they want. Stay home or dont Your choice If you believe that I ll repeat you don t understand how pandemics work or why that would be devastating.
There will be a stronger push towards automation and virtual work. If we're lucky our economy will become more seld sufficient again.
gt What percent of Americans over the age of 45 do you think have a preexisting condition I don't know...but if the number is significant then we are fucked
gt Ad hominem has no place in anything. You clearly don't know what this term means. gt You don t get to say we won t accept you I am part of the we like it or not. And I'm in the NBA. See it's easy to say things that aren't true. gt It is not in my view a human life until birth. See the first line in my first comment. Ciao
No ad hominem is when some idiot you finds something wrong with a tangential part of the discussion and uses it to say everything the other side argues is now invalid. It's like when liberals dont know that AR doesnt mean assault rifle and people try to say that eliminates them from the gun conversation. It's pathetically self serving.
But it's like 1984 and Brave New World were cut up and pasted together Burroughs' style. Half the country probably not even half are living in a world where they're willfully embracing alternative facts and history and the other is just shaking their heads in exhilaration at this point.
And what exactly are you hanging this hat on Is it Trump's fantastic polling numbers the steadily growing lead he had on Biden in head to head polling in swing states the record low unemployment numbers the booming stock market the perfect response to the COVID 19 pandemic the Red Wave of 2018 or something else Because if it's any of the previously listed reasons I don't think they actually point towards Trump's strength.
I wonder how shocked they will be when they inevitably suffer from the tyranny they so desperately asked for.
Drop the boot licking bullshit it s getting old
Trudeau invokes national emergency status and he can do whatever he likes particularly the reallocation of medical professionals.
Nobody is saying otherwise.
Nope. I am not going to get it. She is not going to get it. Like I said I will wear a gas mask to work if forced to go back in person. Thankfully my work is being extra cautious. Hopefully I'll be working from home until there is a vaccine.
Soooooo... what's your point Controlling a pandemic is a government plot
Chinese virus Magaria.
Yep. It's maddening to listen to it for me personally because it's just more bullshit pie and I cannot stand that. They are living the lie up to their eyeballs.
3M loves the US. Ask the city of Cottage Grove MN about 3M. A city of 35 000 that is down to 2 wells for it's drinking water due to 3M dumping chemicals from their plant.
Same bud. Same. They can t ever just sit one out eh Like no matter what the fuck the situation is it always somehow ends up being about them.
How the hell are we supposed to get masks
I think a bit of skepticism is healthy here. Don lemons waterworks seem at the very least a dramatization. It s possible that he both has it and it s not as bad as he says. I do agree this seems like an unhealthy thing to obsess or care about.
So nothing
Wtf is a trump Is that that guy still trying to be president No one cares what he says anymore.
Wake me up when November Ends
More if you are anyone other than a white male landowner for sure
Tell that to the afghanis.
For the private companies. Trump sells to them then they mark up and sell to the states.
Is it bad if Im laughing
I only say he s a hypocrite because the religion he represents is based on a relative truth. Personally I don t believe there s a god and that s just my opinion and I can t say it s a fact. Catholicism is rooted in the idea that god is real powerful and you should have faith in his existence. The issue is that Catholicism asserts that it is truth that god is real. Since there isn t much evidence to support this you shouldn t assert it as fact. I m sure this guy is very intelligent and contributed a lot of great work to our world I m just saying that this one aspect of him makes him a hypocrite. And that s not a bad thing and it doesn t invalidate your argument.
Correlation not causation
If you had a rational thought it would die of extreme painful loneliness.
Enlighten us
Actually its a group of republicans who are sick of alt right nutjobs trying to take over the party. Just a bunch of Idahoans who put their own time and money into backing good Republican legislators. Of course Ammon Bundy's followers would make fake news accusations like this.
You too
Trump pulls out sharpie
I think you are misinterpreting me. Many comments in this thread are saying that mainstream journalism was wrong. I am asking for examples of that. Because any of the articles I've read have agreed with the opinion you just gave.
When the government gets rid of its airforce navy marine core it's armored tanks.. it's vastly superior weapons oh yeah and might as well add nukes. There are easier ways to commit suicide if thats your wish than yelling 2A HERE WE COME and running down the streets with a handgun
Mike Pence looks like his prayer has been answered.
The stockpile is obviously there to be sold to the highest bidder in these times of scarcity so that they somehow get to profit off of this. What else was I supposed to take away from that Admiral's explanation
I don't want to argue with anyone here I'm really not about that I do however have one question and it is sincere. Are you saying Hitler was left wing Because that's fundamentally wrong. I don't want a left v right debate but honestly why do you think this
Clearly we have a systemic problem in this country of people the vast vast majority of which are liberals or left leaning who wish to intentionally and maliciously spread misinformation for the sole purpose of slowing or impeding this country's path to recovery. Would you join us in calling for forums like Twitter to publicly hold these people accountable for their lies and misdeeds
I didn't realize the president golfing during pandemics was such a problem. can you show me all the posts you made criticizing Obama when he went golfing during the swine flu and during The Louisiana floods and during a bunch of other important times I'm sure you were just as concerned when the black president went golfing as when the whitee president did because because I'm sure the president golfing is just so important to you. I'm sure it's definitely not propaganda you're spewing cuz you heard it on CNN. I'm sure it's totally not motivated by racism.. pumpkin golf as much as he wants. I don't give a fuk. you don't give a fuck. The only reason you're mad is because he's whit
gt Trump has long slammed Democratic proposals to expand government insurance and decided this week not to temporarily reopen the Obamacare marketplace to allow nearly 30 million uninsured Americans to purchase coverage during the pandemic. The title of the article is misleading. Plus the economy will come back. Look what he did in 3 years. We'll get through this together. Have faith.
Yes your right especially in NA 3M isn t wrong keeping NA supply lines open benefits everyone
He turned against the mainstream views of his time. He was thoroughly consistent on liberty by the end even though it was not a popular position to hold. Some things are consistent regardless of the time such as liberty. The core concepts of liberty are the exact same today as then though people such as yourself are far too willing to give it over to daddy government. I think you have a fundamental misunderstanding of presentism. Presentism is dismissing any and everything because they held some different beliefs even though much of what they held is still valid today. It is another form of prejudice leftists love to practice against those who lived in different times. Dismiss everything because of few flawed beliefs commonly held in society at the time instead of taking a nuanced approach. And what are you going on about with deities Projecting your edgy neo paganism on to me Lmao
I don't know what rock you've been hiding other but I've see three per week since he got elected.
A small price to pay for New York Btw i don't believe this is a deliberate act of war just playing devil's advocate
His failure to put NYC on a lockdown when places like the Bay Area and Chicago were already doing so was a failure. Especially considering that NYC is inherently the most at risk place in the country. But please let's not act like Trump doesn't have some terrible quotes from March as well.
i agree. there is already the welfare state and the army of NGO's and bureaucrats and politicians and of course some banks manage some programs. these people number in the millions. they would gladly welcome anyone into the trap. people will be competing with illegals and guest workers for jobs in a 50 percent unemployment economy. all the while contending with grifters drifters and thugs. furthermore when they leave home there will be a higher probability of burglary since some jurisdictions do not prosecute property damage or theft or robbery. expect a parabolic increasing trend in criminal behavior post quarantine. i expect it will be messy. there will be culture clash between rule of law with property rights and socialism. hopefully progressive leaning unemployed will see the counter culture created by progressive values legislation and policy but universal basic income will be appealing to people who are not future oriented thinkers.
No such example. Each time there is some sort of crisis like war terror attack epidemic...The government takes away more and more rights adding more taxes in the name of security Just look at China as an example of the ultimate goal. 2M Uyghurs imprisoned massive public surveillance networks numerical ranking of citizens no human rights disappearance of dissenters. They forced all citizens to stay home and practically kidnapped suspected sick people found on the street. Tossed them in vans and disappeared them too.
Day by day I slowly become more glad that I m not American. Before 2016 I used to relish the though of permanently moving to NYC and establishing myself there. Now I d probably think twice about such a move. I wonder if anyone else is in the same boat as me. Trump and how COVID has been addressed have left me with such a negative view of the U.S now.
Pelosi really needs to respond with the president is still focused on impeachment when we should be focusing on the health of the American people and then say how we need mail in voting because of health reasons.
So much for being a Germaphobe.
That s some 1984 Ministry of Truth en.wikipedia.org Ministry of Truth shit there.
He forgets hes on live stream.
What can anyone do about it What can any ten thousand of us do about it How many people have the energy and resources to muster ten thousand people Your question is less insightful than you think.
Well like their supporters didn't ridicule them. I guess I'm seeing it from the wrong angle. I understand now. I still think it's a disillusionment to say that will ever happen to Trump
Also the generals all like to have our Navy like we're in a war in the most offensive posture but we're not in an actual war. Our enemies are a few dudes in the middle east who wear sandals to work. Even if IF someone attacked an aircraft carrier while it is at it's weakest... well that's a bad choice for whomever made that choice and anyone within a 500 yard vicinity with all those tomahawks that would be launched. The way I understand it a carrier is really like US' penis we swing it around playing chicken with people to blow it up that's mission 1 mission 2 is flying planes. The real deterrents and the real war fighting machines are the hundreds of destroyers and dozens of submarines that don't even have to shoot nukes some have conventional weapons.
But that s what happened. They were called the Dixiecrats and they held the balance of power for a long time.
Fauci still Debbie Downer on it.
I don't think Jered's species is capable of reproduction.
Have y all never worn makeup and taken symptom suppressors
Again the team was disbanded. Tim Morrison is another republican back. Can you provide anyone not spinning this with bullshit word salad
gt It is a well documented fact that Trump populated countless government positions with people utterly unqualified for their jobs. I misread populated as copulated Oddly enough copulated seems more fitting.
Plot twist Trump genuinely believes in witches and is admitting to wrongdoing.
I didn't come for a news source but was looking to have conversations about the news and politics. I should say I just came to Reddit for porn it's more respectable.
gt Shes dangerous as hell. No her handlers are. The Justice Democrats need to be stopped. However off the cuff she proves again and again she's stupid as a bag of hammers.
They just got one this afternoon.
Because your freedom to go out matters more than trying to maintain national health.
We're providing welfare to anyone who can schlep across the border so the 3T we already spend on entitlements is going to bankrupt us. 3T basically equals our entire tax revenue literally everything else in the budget is borrowed. And ALL the stimulus that's flying through Congress is also borrowed.
I have questions. First I think you are correct about one thing the national stockpile wasn't prepared for an emergency of this magnitude and that's not entirely Trump's fault. Which is why following the federal response plan developed by Bush and further cultivated by Obama was necessary to flatten the curve. Trump decided against taking that route so we are where we are. 1. What are the better ways of allocating supplies 2. Why havent we done that 3. Why is the Fed competing with states to acquire these supplies Wouldn't it make sense for the Fed to act as the sole purchaser and then distribute supplies as needed Heck the states could reimburse the Fed if state autonomy is a big concern for you. 4. Why is the Fed feeding reserve supplies into the private sector where they are resold for profit in an ultra high demand marketplace They said this was happening during last night's briefing if you don't believe me I watched it live
Basically what I've learned from all of this is to never talk to the feds especially the FBI. Even people who were completely honest have had their responses changed after the fact in order to charge them with lying. Also how come the government is allowed to lie to us but someone may legitimately misremember or omit something and the FBI throws the book at them
The share that need a bed
To speak more plainly parent is illustrating the logical fallacy of a false dichotomy. The more you know. braintrustmusic.files.wordpress.com
Putting aside the crazy... what does that have to do with Trump firing Atkinson...
Machines have no bias. There's a distrust for technology I get it. I trust what I work in. With proper design and transparency we can achieve what we all want. Secure voting for citizens transparency and accountability. Harness the stuff instead of fighting it. There would be no votes to find there would be no absentee ballots there would be no locked boxes of votes in some back closet when your vote is in your pocket on your smartphone there are no excuses.
I sincerely hope you reported them to the admins.
Personally I think that's a consequence not a cause.
What does this have to do with anything
3 out of every 4 Nazis was killed by the Soviet Union. The other 1 was divided up between the other allies like the UK US Canada France and Poland. Did the U.S give the Soviets a bunch of war material Yes but 85 of that material was given after they had already defeated Germany at Stalingrad ending Germany's ability to wage offensive war again. The war was already lost by Germany well before Normandy was ever stormed.
Trump is now a dictator in every way besides control of the media
You don t know what actions were taken before. You and everyone else are arm chair generals in this thread. I ve written many a memorandum for official record to cover myself on advise or requests for information action that were denied. At those points I moved up the line to the next person in structure. You don t know the real story and no one else here does either.
Just go to the Fox News YouTube comments.
At least you tolerate trans people in that way too many don t. But surgery is extremely expensive not all trans people can get it many will end up only getting the top surgery so they can look how they feel. I mean why does it matter if they have a penis you aren t going to see it nobody is sitting at the doors of the locker room doing an underwear check. So if they present as female what s the issue
I really really want someone to call him an idiot on live television directly to his face. Please oh please
Joy Behar is a die hard Never Trumper and an Obstructionist that will never skip a chance for a cheap dig.
He should probably also not have porked half the hookers in town
I m glad to hear that. I think it s obvious the media wants to maximize the economic destruction of this to get rid of Trump.
Whatever you say.
You should be in the over 45 club and watch the way people talk about us someday... might offer some perspective. P
gt again
Don't people have a personal responsibility to have savings set aside for a few months of job loss due to unforeseen circumstances Don't businesses have a responsibility to have some liquid assets set aside for a rainy day fund Wouldn't these entities just win economic social darwin awards if they can't make it through this time of restrictions No one has immunity to this virus because it is novel. Everyone is technically at risk. It doesn't just kill the elderly and those with weakened immune systems. If we experience something as bad as the Spanish Flu wouldn't this be a good trial run to ensure that each society has a refined response that can be both swift and effective
The majority of Americans apparently want it this way. Even the Democrats why are supposed to be the good guys don't want to much reform. Need to compromise. Need to work together. Gotta keep the donors funding us. All those worst case scenarios that those who worked on campaign finance reform warned us about came to pass. And now it's just corporate raiders. It's like the way they take over a company and sell off all the addresses then declare bankruptcy. Tamara what's happened to the United States of America. We got the Toys r us treatment.
It s going to become federal record for all to see in the presidential library.
Obviously Bernie. I will not vote for Biden unless he does some serious Progressive ass kissing but he's already said he has no sympathy for the younger generation and clearly does not care for Progressive politics.
He stuck his dick in trump's daughter.
If we were actually a democracy Trump wouldn't be president.
gt conservative Reevaluate your political ideology
We have a Montreal billionaire dying of Corona in an ICU right now after contracting it from a wedding. Rich people should remember they die the same as poor people.
You're so eloquent... Please tell me how I'm wrong... 1 popular vote doesn't determine the victor although it should so your race analogy is idiotic and 2 the 2016 popular vote was still horrifyingly close. How anybody could support Trump let alone 46. 1 of votes completely baffles me.
gt Just as your freedom of speech does not apply to shouting fire in packed building. My freedom of speech absolutely DOES apply to shouting fire in a packed building. That famous saying is 100 incorrect. The court case it comes from ruled the exact opposite of what you seem to think. If I happen to cause a panic and people get injured or killed I can be charged with that but not prohibited from shouting fire You want to take away freedoms so that you feel safer. Guess you'll be banning guns next. gt Your freedom of assembly does not apply to roaming around during a quarantine. So you feel that the government should be able to take away freedoms depending on the situation. Got it.
I was unaware of that. I resend my dislike of all Republicans. Only those who are actively harming Americans
Soon.
I made a general comment about government authority. That s the relation. Frankly Trump is on firmer ground considering he s using the Defense Production Act. I ve never seen precedent for overturning the 1st amendment but that pastor did still get arrested.
Probably wasn't what OP had in mind as a ton of people think Ben was a US president but its a fun technically true fact.
You mean other than the Asian American hate crimes he had stirred up Do you mean other than claiming a pandemic the rest of the world was taking seriously was a joke leading to literally irreversible economic damage and loss of life a magnitude higher than it should have been. How about closing the pandemic response team What about disparaging all media except the ones that are out there grovelling to him leading to a nation wide disbelieve in any news. Southern borders. How about using his office for the sake of personal business growth Withholding much needed disaster relief from Puerto Rico. There s a lot this barely scratches the surface. Educate yourself before saying something so blatantly stupid.
We had one in Utah. Mia Or something.
1200 wont even pay one month rent in Colorado.
Probably some eurocuck. auntie
I hope we Canada don't get petty about it. Any retaliation by us just jeopardizes more lives. Doesn't matter what flag they wear.
Technically he went up the ladder first before taking it to Congress against Bill Barr s wishes He did do the right thing though and he continued to do his job protecting the whistleblower once the heat was on.
Back to the Future II
Literally no proof that Americans are doing this. Also no proof that these Americans are doing this on behalf of the US gov't Fake news. Way to go MSN.
I disagree. I'd much rather keep my Chinese and Indian coworkers than work with the average Dallasite and I lived here most my life. If the locals aren't going to be proficient in work while culture continually hinders productivity I shouldn't be forced to work with them.
New Yorker here 100 agree do they also not realize that the rate at which they are shutting everything down and closing businesses that it will run the city into the ground If no one is working no one is able to pay the godforsaken rent so they ll turn to leave after the lockdown is or at least hope to. The homelessness is already out of control right now I can only imagine it gets worse and worse and summer starts to come in. Landlords still have insane property taxes they must abide to so rent isn t going anywhere. There s going to be a lot of vacant apartments. A lot of vacant storefronts neighborhoods turned to trash. I wouldn t be surprised if it s San Fran in a few years if they don t get their act straight. I m definitely not sticking around for much longer that s for sure. Paying all this money and now I can t even go out shopping for food without a mask on and a designated destination in case the cops stop me. The streets are empty only the drug dealers on the streets and a few locals with their dogs. No tourists no kids outside no cars It s becoming a hell hole. And the liberal royal families who live here up in their penthouses aren t saying or doing jack shit.
Did he mention if it was a Federal or State authority that confiscated them The only articles I can find that resemble a report of masks being confiscated in NYC was from hoarders.
Isn t this just the entire Trump Office
Unless you wanted plausible deniability Either way China definitely started this they covered it up lied mislead the WHO and downplayed it until it was too late.
You must be a Democrat then who thinks anything prior to Trump doesn't exist as a reference point. That's ok though nothing I say would change your mind anyways. As for the people hurting and scared of course I feel for them but am optimistic about it. I know that's a rare thing on your side of the fence since it's always fear mongering hatred and holier than thou attitudes though. P
5 lbs is 2. 27 kg
gt If ever there were a time for big government for ambitious programs for a central role for federal authorities it is right now. If ever there were a time for qualified people in government it is now. I'd settle for halfway competent and willing to listen to science at this point. Trump is just frightening at this point I'd been skipping the briefings most of the week but caught part of the one today. Just plain insanity. The CDC recommends face masks and Trump relays the message one minute and undermines it the next. gt Kushner's translucent presence his affect bereft of even the slightest hint of empathy in perfect synchrony with his callous words was a spectacle suitable for our nightmarish times. I'm not quite sure who creeps me out the most Jared Kushner or Stephen Miller.
Ya I'm sure it's all president. You don't even think for a little that there is way more going on This country is not run by one person it's run my lots of people who make lots of money
Yep. The very same.
Christ. If I were your shoes I'd have left before any lockdown.....
Well there were. A lot of those career subject matter experts have either quit or been fired and haven't been replaced.
Your point was a fair one people are just interpreting it as defending Fox. It's really hard to push back on anything anti Trump Fox on here but props for trying.
This is honestly some civil war shit right here. States working together to smuggle in medical supplies against a federal government seizing and pirating them At what point do states try to form a more perfect union and just give the middle finger to the feds Also I couldn't be more proud of the Commonwealth. This took some guts.
Kill poor people lest it disrupt the middle class
There is no full list of every departure in Obama's administration or any previous admin It does not exist it would be impossible to create such a list over 10 years later using only the internet. The best we can do is compare positions compare cabinet turnover compare departures of the tippy top execs etc. forensicnews.net
gt 3M responded publicly Friday morning defending its efforts by saying the company and its employees have gone above and beyond to manufacture as many N95 respirators as possible for the U.S market. Good to hear all US orders have been filled at a reasonable price.
Exactly. I hate Joe Biden but fuck man he can't be worse than Trump And if he is fuckin' impeach remove and get someone else in. Simple as that. I already voted in my primary and hope others will vote for Bernie too but I'm not gonna revenge vote because my guy didn't win. And if Bernie wins I hope the people on Biden's side vote for Bernie instead of revenge voting.
I'm ok with this. I hate the dem plan to force everyone on shit state run healthcare and I think that if healthcare was completely privatized it would be more affordable but I'm a human being with compassion and as a human of course I don't want people to not be able to afford healthcare. I think that Republicans and Democrats agree on a lot of the same problems. We just have very different solutions to the problems.
Well now maple syrup costs 1 million dollars. The apocalypse has taken a peculiar turn.
Somehow my favorite claim from Trump is still the boy scout one. He was the keynote speaker at a jamboree and decided to turn it into a campaign rally bbc.com After some pushback Trump claimed vox.com the boy scout leader had called it the greatest speech ever made to them. In terms of his lies it's small and stupid. But just comically dumb.
Brilliant
Sounds good to me.
Revolution.
First you need to get off this American Exceptionalism bandwagon. The success of your country is almost nothing to do with your calvinball democracy bill of rights constitution attitude you got a free continent slaves to build it up and didn't get bombed to rubble. Good job. Start taking a look at the many many other countries that are doing just about everything better. Take a leaf out of their book.
Can you so called conservatives just decide if you like capitalism or not
The problem is we don t know. We don t know how many people with mild symptoms have the virus as most stay home not wanting to infect others. The other problem is we don t have sufficient tests. To think that one side or the other has the perfect answer is idiocy. People are dying. That is tragic. There are reports of hospitals closing d t financial troubles. It turns out when you can t do elective surgeries and 40 of your revenue disappears it s hard to keep doors open.
Thing is it s Trump making these calls. His prime directive is to get re elected and the death toll from the virus is killing his election chances. So he has to stop it by any means necessary or there is a chance he goes to jail when he no longer is president
Oh okay KY is handling it better than IN I m guessing. Don t know who the governor is
Doesn't make sense to damage one's own country's major economic hub though
Headlines of the future will blame Trump for not looking into choroquibe sooner
I feel like this is a no atheists in a foxhole situation. Everyone is 2A in a pandemic. I love the outrage at meeting the opposite of the gun shopping narrative. It's like Welcome to the struggle Stop being ig nant
This motherfucker passes the buck all the damn time unless he's trying to steal credit. How the fuck do his supporters not see this
Well you sure seem proud to be against it looks like you re a sinner too
except they are buying it for the sole purpose of profiting off it. i have no problem with buying things in normal circumstances but this is a clear emergency and there are not enough PPE personal protective equipment for frontline workers. there is a reason price gouging is illegal. there is a massive difference between personal property and hoarding for profit. amp x200B buying a bigger than necessary house isnt killing anyone. buying these masks are killing people. that is the difference.
They probably assumed that the previous administration didn t do something completely stupid like use up all of the supplies and not say a word about them all being gone. I know I don t do a complete inventory at the start of every shift. I just assume that if someone took something they d note it... especially if they took almost the entire stock.
It's the same in our capital Berlin Germany. There is no Secretary for public health Only a Secretary for public health AND Gender Equity It's a madhouse.
I love being cold. I was born in Fairbanks Alaska and lived in Northern Canada for awhile and now in Pennsylvania and even for me it's too warm here. I was looking at the year round temperatures for Iceland... I would love every month
You d rather four more years of this Come on. I really don t want Biden but at least Biden wouldn t be doing this shit. Bernie can still win it s a long shot now... but he can. Let s hope that happens. But you re really telling me that you want more of this over Biden Please reconsider.
You may not have a 2024 if Trump is reelected but do what you want.
It s not dementia. He knows Fox OANN et al will provide cover and it s common knowledge that Trumplicans swallow doublespeak.
Bro I don't give a shit about dead casinos. Atlantic City was doomed when other states legalized gaming. You are literally obsessed with Trump. Get help.
Out in the mid west there are plenty hard working conservatives. Regardless it's not anyone's place to allow illegals to effect market prices whether they think it is good or bad for the economy. The law is the law.
I know you didn't read the article and only come here for the karma and reinforcement of your ideas but I just wanted to let you know you're an idiot. The man consumed fish tank cleaner... ALSO the woman is not a Donald Trump supporter she literally donated to the Clinton campaign. I hope Trump kills you next.
Imagine having your father in law masturbating vigorously in the corner while you pound away on your wife with your angry inch I don t envy Jared.
I think he s doing fine. Get a broader perspective.
This hopefully will give pause to the military and their families who vote red no matter what.
The the media should shut the fuck up about dwindling stockpiles and blaming trump. Supplies literally piled up in government warehouses are inefficient and delay the distribution of needed supplies around the country. Our stockpile was inadequate for a pandemic fueled by media fearmongering and 24 7 doom and gloom coverage. We arent replenishing government warehouses aka stockpiles of medical supplies because there are better ways of allocating medical supplies from dozens of different companies around the U.S and suppliers around the world.
DO IT
Good. This is evolution in action.
Great perspective. Thanks.
Blue states are getting the vast majority of federal aid and the media is still somehow persisting in this narrative. They have no shame.
You as well.
because instead of coming out with a real policy he just floats a possible vp choice story every week. the vp choice won't win him the presidency literally everything else he does will win or lose it he's focusing on the wrong thing and liberals are falling hook line and sinker for it.
Why does this fucking matter even one iota
And apologize profusely during the takeover.
gt You weren't clear at all. Start with that. I plainly stated that Trump wasn't responsible for the state of stockpile resources which is why he should have followed the established pandemic plan from the start to flatten the curve and reduce need so the resources weren'timmediately depleted. Pretty simple to understand in my opinion. gt It was the process from the start. Delays occur during a pandemic with massive shortages on a global scale. The delay occurred because people failed to act in a timely manner. Looking at Trump here. gt I already told you that it's not just states and the federal government. What's most complicated is expecting the federal government to buy up all of the supplies and then figure out what is needed across 50 states with private hospitals businesses and health care facilities that need PPE. Are you really that clueless to think your solution is less complicated Right but the point of the mobilization act is for it to only be states and the fed. I already stated that the states merely need to inform the government of how much it needs and where when to send it. The government by way of it being the sole purchaser can then streamline the distribution of supplies based upon states orders. Simple logistics. I spent my entire career in logistics. I'm not sure why you think a free for all bidding war between over 50 competing interests with no obligation by private companies to sell to any of them is somehow more efficient than a centralized distribution plan. Not to mention the uncoordinated supply chain that results from such a system. Makes zero sense to me. Frankly you're the one that sounds clueless. gt Why haven't we done the thing you just elaborated. Trump literally said he didn't need to nationalize businesses when in fact he did. I'm following it pretty closely.
It's not anytime for witch hunts....witch hunts which hunt...witch hunts...dole bob dole...bob dole bob dole.
There are no words to describe him but I will give it ago..... he is another soulless greedy vain pustule afflicting mankind.
Have you ever seen a movie called Idiocracy
Its got what plants crave
Did they though This will be overshadowed by more idiocy tomorrow and the day after. The GOP White House doesn't give a shit about harsh speech's or criticisms. It's just fake news to them and their cult. Something has to give.
The US is the real shit hole country now
And what about the immunocompromised that need to work to support themselves How do they stay home
Illegal alien is the correct legal term regardless of how much it's frowned upon. Dehumanizing Maybe.
Pride month sucks because my birthday is in June so isthe best president s trumps
Every business can do similar measures. Send people back to work
I wonder which state will have the shot that starts civil war II
If we're supposed to stay home shelter in place then only people living basically right at the beach will be able to go on the beach anyway is that right
Pedantic Do you even know what that word means And support is a revealing choice of word...as opposed to say believe.
I'm 100 sure the US would rather have bread lines than give up their military supremacy. I worry very much that they'll begin to use it more aggressively.
Genuine question if and it's a very farfetched if Trump were to impose a national quarantine would you support and or obey it
Heck of a job Brownie
No kidding they have security problems a little reading comprehension goes a long way I was commenting on you saying no serious companies use them plenty do and the issues were all recently discovered you implying that companies that used Zoom before the discoveries are not serious companies is a strange and ignorant thing to say lol.
They actually really haven t. From the slave work in the foundational days of the country to the braceros during 40 s and 50 s to the cheap farm labor now. America has always relied on and built a country out of cheap foreign labor.
Not trying to be a dick. I don t understand how this is an answer. Seriously not trying to be a dick. One would think causing infighting would be easy with so many pissed off chaotic illogical people. But they re more like water. United and flowing in their never ending destructive chaos.
So explain why it doesn't apply here.
But those are numbers with everything closed right Wouldn't the numbers increase drastically if we opened everything up I don't want to have the economy ruined but at the same time I don't want to get sick and passing it to my family members and having it kill them
Been saying this for months.
gt During Friday s coronavirus briefing CNN s Jim Acosta asked President Trump a simple question Where is Dr. Fauci referring to Anthony Fauci the epidemiologist who has become the public face of the nation s response to the infectious disease. Trump responded I don t know but every time you ask that question whenever he s not here you say Where is he Is there a problem No problem whatsoever. Trump really hates for anyone else to be more popular than he is. gt Sometimes I ll ask him to come because that s the first question you and a couple others from the fake news establishment ask Where s Dr. Fauci Could it be that people want some reliable information from someone they trust instead of bullshit and bluster from someone who keeps claiming to be doing an incredible job' as thousands more get infected and die every day
Or think more Trump is a good idea to gr8 people to vote for their candidate next time. Or think it sends a message to risk letting Trump win.
Im not following you. Comment said he was. I said he was. You said he wasn t. I provided an article. Now you agree
Obvious shill is obvious
It's not even about the money and there is science behind this where a truly shitty job even if you up the hourly wage the person eventually breaks down and it becomes less about the money and more about being happy maintaining sanity. amp x200B I can't find the damn article about it so you can ignore me I guess... sorry. They basically did a sample of people working shitty jobs and upped their salary by double and within a few months they were right back to where they were originally. Hated the job hated feeling like shit all the time and the money finally didn't mean anything to them.
To illustrate why it is not a reasonable request at this time. Americans should be cared for first to pay their rents from government mandated work closures. There is a point to be made that restriction of movement is the weapon we need to fight the virus but that is not the angle that AOC is coming from. If we need to provide food to people so they can remain in place I would be much more receptive but to insinuate that people illegally in the Country should receive these cash payments is ridiculous. Under what other circumstances do we reward lawbreakers How do you distinguish between economic migrant and asylum seeker
Involuntary Narcissistic Rage
He d win re election...... This might actually be a plan
youtube.com v HR0ntCN67G0
How stupid are you
Without any kind of interventions social distancing school closures etc. estimate 2 million people will die from the virus. That does not account for hospitals being overrun. Look at Italy for real world evidence. NYC is dense and will take the biggest hit in my opinion but the rest of the country including big cities where large sections of the economy are located in will be hit in major ways. The hit will be worse if no interventions slow down the infection rate. imperial.ac.uk
No. It isn t.
Every thread people assuming what kind of masks people are talking about. Makes it almost impossible to have a discussion. This is a dangerous time to promote confusion regardless of your good intentions. This is a thread about cloth face coverings not N95 masks or any other kind of special filter.
Amazing Btw it shouldn't be called the Spanish Flu. It should be called the American Flu. It originated in Haskell County Kansas. And spread through Camp Funston on Fort Riley.
Yes.
Just wait until someone has an adverse reaction which under the best of cases there's always at least 1. All we're going to hear about is how trump is reckless and getting us all killed
The SARS vaccine that was developed was never used because it immunized you against one strain of SARS but it made the rest of them even more fatal. I don't remember the specific term for it but your immune system produces antibodies for the strain the vaccine covered even if you got a different strain which allowed it to basically go unchecked in your body Since this virus is very similar to SARS we may end up never getting a vaccine that's safe.
Hmm your flair says america first but you seem to not be bothered by the fact that trump and his teams response has lead the rapid spread of the virus in our country. But it's just a cold right Country will be open by easter right Let's tell them it's nothing while we dump our stocks right It seems like you arent really actually america first just my two cents though. Countdown until I'm dismissed as a never trumper or it's all fake news or downvoted into eternity 3....... 2....... 1......
As a fellow American Canada our leader is a treansous cloying irredeemable pile of yak feces.
Don't forget unemployment beyond anything we've ever seen.
I don t get the point you re trying to make.
If I am reading this right the administration is telling the uninsured that they will be covered for the treatment of COVID19 by hospitals. That the affordable care act is unnecessary without addressing what the uninsured are going to do if man woman child has ANY other health emergencies. Not only that hospitals have no idea when they will get reimbursed for their services. Sounds like a lose lose.
You re an idiot.
Next thing you know Trump will shout COOOOBRRRAAAA after every speech. He is clearly Cobra Commander.
I'm afraid these are some of the young people you are talking about bbc.com
We have suspected Chinese spies in our media outlets and we haven't considered expelling them until now What the unholy fuck
It would only invite the homeopathy nutjobs to attack him at that point in addition to the exiting idiots trying to attack him for siding with the democrats'
Hmm I m sure there are legit companies out there that use zoom. Centene uses it one in six people with health insurance in the US is on one of their plans...they re a huge company
Yep. Barr and Mitch. They keep enabling him.
Most everyone that chooses to drink and drive are not intentionally out to harm anyone. But it's illegal for the very reason that it can and often does have that effect.
Fool me once shame on you. Fool me... well ya can t get fooled again
He is one and the same. A completet fucking moron and waste of fucking space.
Not the least bit surprised the perp was a muslime.
If he has a good point idea and is able to communicate it to those in power what is wrong with that
No. It's a reverse Oedipus. That's the easy answer. But it's the right one.
They're sure gonna miss us when we all die.
Ba dnews for you we have been in a war with China for decades now we are just starting to realize it.
gt New York City will suffer more than other places as a result of its population density. What difference does that make in terms of how the virus spreads That makes a hug difference as viruses spread exponentially. A one fold difference in population density could mean a many fold change in the number of infections
Why are you here. Unsubscribe and be done with it. Nobody wants you here.
So so so true. People have been prettt quiet about Obama s economy recently.
If you can't see why Bernie is a giant hypocrite for denouncing dark money and then allowing his own organization to use dark money I can't help you.
Got it. Thanks. I find this debate fascinating but I usually shy away from getting involved in the conversation. I have a lot of very strong political stances that I m now sure of after 30 odd years of consideration but I still find myself waffling on gun laws.
Once the bodies start piling up I wonder if Americans will do anything.
Did you read the whole thing They reorganized it. You straight up lied and are now trying to deflect and strawman. Pelosi was telling people to go to Chinatown the WHO said it was was no worry about a pandemic 3 days earlier. Biden can wriggle all he wants but 7 days later Trump issued a travel ban and Biden called it xenophobic.
How fat is he
gt How stupid are the people who think it s more Important to focus on getting back to work than it is to not contract a potentially deadly highly contagious virus The people pushing this idea won't be going back to work. So it won't kill them. They are rich assholes like Rush Limbaugh and Hannity who dont give a fuck if poor americans die in the streets so long as they and their friends can make a profit off it. Remember the rich can get tested while the poor have to become visibly sick and for a while had to also name someone who tested positive already to get a test. The rich republicans are literally trying to kill americans with this shit.
Wait I thought we were using Spain as a negative example of socialized medicine. Confusing times man.
Yessir agreed.
You do not give one single shit about rape. This is some fake woke grandstanding. Trump is murdering THOUSANDS. He's committing illegal acts every fucking day.
So what you are saying is he is not taking in any liquid to replace lost ones
This is a temporary thing. Losing a house or going hungry is much more preferable to dying. The stats show right now over 10 confirmed mortality rates for people over 70 with average 8 for those with pre existing health conditions. And by health conditions yes heart disease is included which HALF of Americans have. If you add in diabetes asthma CRD and cancer we are looking at a good 65 of our population. If we all went back to work and let this very easily transmittable virus spread that could mean a death toll of 9 of around 200 million Americans. Idk about you but I d gladly take losing 10 20 million Americans jobs to losing 10 20 million American lives.
Ew I'd rather not lick that man
gt Any job taken by an illegal is a lost American job. You made this claim. In order for that to hold true you have to assume the number of jobs available is not dependent on who is filling those jobs. If you do not assume this then your statement is false. On the second part I agree.
Tell me something I don't know. Point is that Trump told his admin to refuse service of PPE to blue states and those who badmouth him. Alabama is none of those so why is Alabama being fucked
Professional Asshole.
Welcome to Conservative where IBiteYou keeps asking How is this racist daily
Agree. That said FUCK CNN.
I'd say slowing the disease to stop people from dying is a protection of the most fundamental right which is life.
Good. The world needs to turn it's back on America and treat us like a hostile power for once.
I freelance web development large amount of my friends are software devs free lancers. I was under the impression a good amount of reddit are in the tech field.
I don't know why I keep thinking she'll never say anything stupider than she already does. And then she does and it's like Lady stop digging please there are special ed kids that are laughing at you now
Can you imagine little PETA like virus cells protesting normal viruses infecting people That would be funny.
Right on. Edibles I mostly go for the oils now that they're legal in Canada it's nice knowing the exact dosage and production quality of the product. Big fan of the Redecan 30 0 drops.
Clearly not.
gt Presumptive Democratic nominee Joe Biden has been dinged several times by fact checkers over claims he has made during the coronavirus crisis including a total of 11 Pinocchios from the Washington Post. Damn WaPo NAILED Biden 11 lies TERRIBLE ashingtonpost.com Too bad WaPo also said Trump made over 8 000 lies last year alone averaging over 22 a day...
So I guess all the people working at grocery stores and delivering packages during this pandemic are just stupid right They don t deserve any respect from people because conservatives like to demean them for whatever reason.
His eyes look like a man on a LOT of prescription drugs...
We passed unacceptable 3 years ago. We're all on this rollercoaster until it stops and apparently America's brakes aka checks and balances just don't work. New York California and Illinois need to lead all the blue states to revolt. At this point we just need to be two separate countries.
That s how it starts for so many that are blinded by the media spin. First they see something for their self. Then they see the lie the media gives them about something they already know the truth of. Lastly the realization that the media is lying to them and that they can no longer trust the media version of anything.
I didn t watch GoT because it HAD dragons make believe crud
Only yes men and very focused and attentive non observers in this administration. So what if it's a coincidence that an evil empire needs exactly that too to succeed. It's only a coincidence guys Trust me Unlike those evil whistleblowers
Let's all remember that not everyone in Alabama voted for Trump disparages big government and called this thing a hoax four weeks ago. Not everyone brought this on themselves.
Leftists often resort to arguments over Israel. It isn t perfect no doubt and I am not some Zionist. So I don t really care. Funny though always Isreal. I guess it must be the only imperfect country.... or maybe it is something else....hmmmm
To be fair some countries have done a little to stand up to China.. for instance Chinese people have been blasting Denmark on their social media because a newspaper published a modified version of China's flag https jyllands posten.dk pictures image 11898346 wdqprq ALTERNATES h 5 3 ledersidetegning mandag 27 01 20 rgb and the Prime Minister refused to apologize to China for the flag. They also have a Pillar of Shame statue hongkongfp.com that voice support for the Hong Kong protestors outside the parliament which they're refusing to remove. There are plenty of small gestures like this throughout Europe.. But I do agree that they're doing way too little and I sincerely hope EU also start a trade war with China support Taiwan independence do something to defend Hong Kong Xinjiang and Tibet start calling it the Wuhan Virus or the China Chinese Virus and ban Chinese companies such as Huawei from their markets.
This is another good example of the difference between a scientist and an MD. A physician is trained to know what has been proven to work but is not going to be an expert in cutting edge science. Not necessarily anyway. Some might be but the MD title does not by itself mean that their opinions carry weight. If someone says X of physicians say such and such I'll almost never believe it. Why Because if it's some number greater than 5 and less than about 95 then it's something we're unsure about. Less than about 5 means it's quackery pushed by only a few nutjobs and more than 95 means it's pretty much established knowledge. Keep in mind that these are not hard numbers they're just illustrating the point. So 37 of doctors means about as much as four out of five dentists. And again it's scientists doctors with PhDs who advance medicine. Many also have MDs. And shame only anyone especially a politician who reports a survey as if it carries scientific weight. So stupid.
i view california new york and virginia as most corrupted governments. then illinois and massachusetts and new jersey. washington and oregon may as well be california. chinese influence heavy on west coast. my money is on virginia gov. blatant disregard for natural law will start civil war there. immediate marshall law declaration then west coast supports virginia and massachusetts joins in with new york. and florida and new jersey to control seaports. on the other hand the kentucky gov. with what amounts to shackling might be the last straw with the coasts supporting kentucky gov. or inland states west coast close roads railroads and airports to west coast. the progressives in Austin texas might try something but that city is relatively isolated. wadda you think
You want a woman in the men s locker room then What about her safety She s at risk bc people force her to go into the men s locker room. Isn t that kinda picking and choosing
gotta meet the Yuh Fiyad quota
This is one of the coolest not political political comments I have ever seen. Come back and visit any time you like friend.
I cannot wrap my head around the idea of someone buying a gun especially one with a 30 round magazine as a safety measure during this crisis specifically..... during Katrina I could understand but a virus I almost feel sorry for the people buying these guns with the intent of self defense only to dramatically increase the risk of accidental or intentional homicide as well as suicide for everyone in their homes
Without its weapons of mass destruction the US couldn't fight its way out of a wet paper bag right now. Between obesity and COVID BTW isn't the US Military busy down south going after the OIL sorry I mean drugs.
My fucking god.
So Chuck Schumer a sitting Senator is either grossly under informed for a man a his stature in which case he shouldn't be spouting off or he's spreading misinformation to partisan ends. Oh wait he's both. Biden is doing something similar saying we should be doing things that the president has already done. Is anyone going to call these people out No they're Democrats.
You know what the US has become The schoolyard bully who beats up everybody for their lunch money then goes home and cries alone because they can't figure out why nobody likes them.
Are you mad bro Go ahead and link your evidence that this chemical really works go ahead and check in with Dr. Fauci. I'll wait. Now maybe one day it will be proven that it's a valid treatment but that day is not today. Also you should look up what evolution actually is. It sounds like you want to just genocide an entire generation though I'm not sure you know what generation I am from.
Did Scott realize that Republicans would get laid off too or did he think it would just hurt those people
No I ve been cooking my meals.
Yes as is tradition.
The homeless have a much higher short term risk though. Still idk why we can't do both.
Wrong
You'd still want that Visa tho.
My cat is 4 years old what is that in Mooches
I wouldn't blame you. Trump is true human garbage.
People who kiss trumps ass
Just in time
Fucking circus
Someone's been making suspicious stock trades timed perfectly with Trump's behavior as President. They've made billions so far. vanityfair.com
Makes you wonder what would have happened if our tax code was structured to give an appropriate amount of money to the government to deal with an unforeseen emergency
This is the stupidest post if anything it shows democratic states as being the worst prepared... washington ny ca.
So China sending reparations our way Yes I'm on board.
What about using the NG medical personnel and military police to augment the law enforcement and medical community
Well I am not knocking on Heaven's Door...
My people have been here since 1621 and nobody's running us off. What's your problem to be so easily pushed around
because he will just call them nasty questions and tell the reporters they should be ashamed of themselves
No lol hes Rabban Harkonnen
Medical treatment is guaranteed by law and there are countless aid agencies that provide food.. they get federal to provide what they do and most are forbidden to ask questions about citizenship.
No he wasnt don't you ever get tired of your repeatedly debunked leftist talking points
twitter.com s 20
Even this modeling only predicted at peak that New York would need 8 000 ventilators. But Cuomo said he would need 30 000 40 000 instead and the media skewered Trump when he said that was too many.
I didn't specify anything. But a lot of the late night hosts base some of their segments on false premises. Do you not like to hear that
And it s still happening. No company would tolerate this much incompetence. Fuck Mitch
Can you believe that Obama did this
gt Your rights stop when they interfere with the rights of others So we have no rights to leave our home as long as the flu exists Or is this different because mommy government said so What's the fatality rate where rights cease to exist I must have missed that number.
Take back your country.
He'll start. If we draft a QB it won't be until next year. Super sad about Cam. Hopefully we can get Trevor or Fields
You also burn up water when you have a fever because your metabolism increases. And while you're technically correct about not sweating while having a fever your temperature will fluctuate and you will be on medication to lower the fever causing you to sweat throughout the day. To say that a fever doesn't cause sweating is a bit pedantic.
gt Believing that trials in life can become long and deplete their patience it is during these times of weakness that Muslims say Subhanallah to help restore balance and perspective and put their minds in a different place altogether. learnreligions.com Or it could mean this. I mean she s bad enough as it is. She doesn t need people helping her seem worse.
If they can t afford food you think they can afford a gun
How do you know Todd down the street whose dad came illegally from Mexico and married a white women looks like us he can t be illegal
Sanders calls for WWIII
2 days The coughing passenger didn't do this.
Until someone crosses a state line right
X
We are reliant on them sending the materials to make the mask before you cite the other comment in the thread that claims using that pdf that there is no pulp in there s he ignores what all of the broader materials are made of and the fact the pdf itself says made with globally sourced materials And great sir master of the art of the English language and metaphors and such Canada is not a little child relative to the US they don't need our help when the US cannot even take care of themselves. They are buying masks just as we buy many things from them. To jeopardize that trade relation makes no economic sense. Additionally the r conservative philosophy is in favor of capitalism so why then would 3M be prevented from selling to Canada when they are not a defense company This is a humanitarian good much like medicine.
gt Biden and bathhouse Barry got extremely lucky Ebola and SARS didn t go any further than it did. And that is relevant because I dont religiously identify with a political party. I dont understand how some of you get so offended by someone calling out a political party. I literally could go on and on about trump but you are too delusional to accept all the fucked up shit hes done. 1. Hes a racist 2. He cares about his ratings more than the fucking pandemic going on 3. Hes a fucking moron that doesnt know how lead a country in a time of need. He doesnt consult experts and is fucking delusional when he said business would be back as usual by easter. But no I'm in the wrong because im unbiased person who couldn't give 2 fucks what happens in America. Obviously the US is doing something wrong when they have the most confirmed cases in the world. So YES it is the orange mans fault.
And then he ll get jumped n robbed lmao
Elections are a state issue and the federal government has no business in it.
It normalizes the incest and very dumb decisions made by leaders.
I believe that's what the experts call a dick move
If you are referring to me your are welcome If you are referring to these Guards their minimum is way above the maximum of most of us. Especially myself.
We have access to a drug that is life saving for a number of disease but that is not proven to be effective in treating COVID 19. Why can't we just let those people die so those afflicted by this pandemic can at least have a placebo Fox News
They have the tennis facility in Flushing and Javits Center as well set up. Central Park is run by a private charity. We have the peak in the next few days as well. So it ll be interesting to see
gt I m not sure what position you are trying to take I just like discussing it prevents my bored ass to play stupid online games
So were you one of the 118 people who paid 2800 for Bidens web chat My guess is he cares more about them than he does you
Hold on do you retards think trump has done a good job Lmao hold on what No that s a joke right
Wouldn't it be a shame if the Republican Party broke apart twitter.com twitter.com
If Chuck Schumer were an actor instead of a politician he would be typecast as a bad guy. I mean look at him he is genetically predisposed to be a piece of shit. Edit he had me at aoc could win an election against you youtu.be
Oh bro come on admit it you ve never paid a federal tax nor employed anyone in your life.
Yeah that's because Biden voters are already immensely privileged unsympathetic and only stand to lose if the peasants were to see how things truly work in this country. Sorry not gonna be fear mongered into voting for a serial sexual assaulter bc he's not as bad as the one we have as president. That's asinine. Keep the downvotes coming neolibs.
The originator made it too easy for the leaker
Awesome thanks for the thorough answer. I wasn't even sure how to search for that.
I'm calmer than you are.
Ok so maybe you re a witch then
I hate the idea of government control but having this one thing under state control is leading to some states having way lower numbers and others exploding and then people travel. We will never get a hold of it like this. We will be shut down for ages. As Fauci and several others have said do it now get it under control slowly open back up. They chose to lose people over money but we are literally just losing loads of both. Peeing section in the pool.
I don't agree but he makes his argument in the video... He thinks people cheat if you use mail in is not secure and that you should have to have an ID and vote in person.
Why does it take so long
It's depressing as an American to see Trumps approval ratings be so high among some segments of the population. I don't understand how he isn't more hated.
gt we need less experts We need REAL experts that report facts that can be confirmed and not bullshit that fits an agenda
The professionals did the models and I was never involved in a model. At least this kind of a model. Like... Big yikes.
Ben is the weak link at DW
But we already have that
If you can't beat the market with your investment techniques you should consider just investing in the sp500. Even with the drop which I believe is artificially lower than the actual state of the economy great time to buy It's still up on when he took office. The dow is up too and the nasdaq is way up. Seriously look into just hopping on an index fund if your investing strategies are leaving you with a lower balance than when Trump took office especially if you've still been contributing during that time.
gt Biden's reference to xenophobia was about Trump's long record of scapegoating others at a time when the virus was emerging from China Bedingfield said not to the travel restriction. gt gt Biden's campaign advisor to CNN cnn.com
Really As if he even cares about tests. He turned down tests from Germany.
I m wondering why a horrifying war criminal is treated like a hero by the president when this actual leader is being fired. This administration has incredible double standards when it comes to who they choose to promote.
Who are you gonna trust me or your own eyes
And nobody is doing that by going outside. You have the right to hide under your bed until you believe the boogie man is gone. Nobody is preventing you from doing that. The naughty people going outside are not in any way violating any of your rights. They are not forcing you to hide under your bed. They are not coughing on you unless you are breaking the social distancing rules in the first place. Grow up and take responsibility for yourself.
It could also be because the Comfort for some reason does not accept COVID 19 patients. gt One hospital director called the ship a joke suggesting it wasn't actually helping the city's hospitals in a meaningful way if would not accept COVID 19 patients. businessinsider.com businessinsider.com
Do you have anything published Is there anywhere I might be able to read your thesis I'm super interested in this.
Till you're in an actual war and your military gets roflstomped
I think there also has to be something broken in your brain. Some people are raised in shit and rise above it as adults.
You married someone with TDS Man love really does make people do strange things. At least she's willing to listen to you.
gt kill other people for personal gain shit Sell your car hypocrite. gt Authority wants us to keep working as much as you do True which is why state and federal gov'ts have shut down. gt The critical thinking disconnect is genuinely fascinating. I agree.
Remember the Drafts for WW2 and Vietnam
I'm aware they have a coastline I just recall most of it being swamps.
If compliance is voluntary we DO have a problem because people aren t smart enough to realize why having hundreds of people together at a church service right now is a really really bad idea.
It is true that a government commissioned task force determined that in a severe pandemic scenario New York state would not have enough ventilators to address projected need. But the task force did not issue direct recommendations for the state to buy any more ventilators. How the fuck is this false
Is that a serious question Is a modern day journalist lying to make himself or his cause look better amp x200B Based on the evidence we've compiled since 2016 it is almost axiomatic that modern day journalists lie with regularity looking at Fredo and his causes specifically our level of confidence that he is making up symptoms out of whole cloth is VERY high. So we conclude YES he is exaggerating.
Ya it was to turn a phrase. He's so transparent he's showing us outright that he's an idiot. I completely disagree with your opinion of hhis approach. I base this off the opinions of the doctor and very prominent epidemiologist in my immediate family. Anecdotal sure but they are literal experts gt An idiot feels that they know everything whereas an intelligent person knows that they cannot possibly know everything. That made me laugh. Trump is constantly claiming to be the absolute authority on virtually everything he talks about. Nobody knows better than me
Be Best
Anyone who has lost their job is eligible to sign up for plans on the ACA exchange.
I see what you mean but I'm thinking about people in dire straits who don't have the luxury of waiting for the economy to turn around so that they can get their jobs back. A desperate person who needs that money to survive this will also spend it and benefit the economy.
no surprise. some legislative bodies use language direct from the ADL for their legislation. hopefully we will see the end of ngo's and sig's and lobbying. hopefully
So you don t bother reading replies before responding Got it.
Idk is it really just ignorance and lack of education that leads people to blindly believe accept and support undeniably disprovable statements and beliefs that Trump and his administration express on a daily basis At some point ignorance becomes a choice.
I can 100 get behind your remarks.
The virus only affects Trump voters o I C...
Bro 11 in 3 days is not that severe. 11 in one day is when you need to be worried.
Said right after he was elected that it was a hostile take over of our government. Deliberate methodical destructuring raping and robbing our government and the citizens of this country. He will not stop and we are headed to a time when a revolution will be impossible. He has weaponized our own citizens against anyone that opposes him.
The projection and false bluster in his answer is off the charts even for Trump. Y all got a Psycho in Chief. Yikes.
Ok a loved one is older and has underlying issues. You would advise that loved one to not take the questionable' drug
Ah the tolerant left. I've received two really crazy messages in the last two weeks by unhinged lefties idk what they think they're accomplishing
Yeah.
Nah it's because people are lazy especially liberals. We have people in this country who demand socialism rather than wanting to start a business because that takes effort.
You should post it there see how many downvotes you get.
what exactly is the point of this
It s official. This is the most toxic post I ve ever seen on this sub.
Looking through your post history all you post about is Pakistan or Muslims. Are you an Indian
Because that is what his experts were telling him health.com gt I can tell you all guaranteed that as we get into March and April the flu cases are going to go down. You could predict pretty accurately what the range of the mortality is and the hospitalizations will be Dr. Anthony Fauci director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases said in a White House press conference on Jan. 31. Gladly Trump was listening to his experts instead of the democrat media i.redd.it They thought it was a total overreaction i.redd.it Trump listening to experts too prudent steps against what many say is a once in a century pandemic. You can armchair criticize all you want but you don't get to be credible in doing so.
Dr Fauci said if doctors want to prescribe it then can though and there is nothing stopping them for doing so. I m astonished by the how the host is putting forth evidence on why they should be prescribing more HCQ to covid patients and was blaming dr fauci for why the prescription rate is low.
Jared Kushner is as bad at protecting the country as he is at looking like a normal person that possesses a soul
The US already has four times the number of cases you have in France. I think we'll see those mass graves even before the end of April. And they'll still be obsessed with Trump then.
Wow you hate him enough to post that you hope he dies on unhinged extreme leftist subs like r fuckthealtright r sandersforpresidentand r politics. Not to mention comments that call Trump a killer clown. Surely your opinion here is unbiased and rational. Mods do your thing.
I would argue your assumption that Gen Z amp Y are 100 socialist is flawed. Gen Z may even be skewed Republican. forbes.com
The pillars of the economy were fundamentally strong prior to the crisis it will recover when the crisis ends. Yes there will be casualties. There are with any decision. Economies recover business are reborn jobs are found lives don t restart. Sorry for all that are struggling this will touch or has touched many.
No shit. It's the other half we're worried about.
Months after and he can say that he gave him a chance. Also covid19 means a lot can be hidden. PoS
he s already doing that michigan is a purple stage and one he desperately needs to win and the hospitals are already in dire need. so far he sent enough to cover 2 shifts in a hospital.
that's a very fair point. I can drop my tinfoil hat now.
I m not wearing leather and eating my neighbor so I guess he did ok.
Exactly.... a trump presidency for another four years will literally kill the progressive movement for years to come. especially if dems dont win the senate when there eventually is if there eventually is a progressive president it would suck if all their policies get shot down by the courts.
This is not essential. It s an MLM scheme.
Hahahaha. If so hes an idiot. You don t think he would be a bit nervous if a group of well regulated US citizens of the Islamic persuasion decide to pull resources and purchase an ICBM or two
Fauci gives no Faucs when it comes to Fox
denying what the shanghai thing or the NY thing or both
Genuinely curious what brings you to a conservative sub Here I'll link r politics for you. Go start arguments there instead. Also some of us think putting millions into poverty is not the best idea. You have to think about the repercussions of things other than just regurgitating buzzwords you're hearing on CNN.
Is this one of Trumps The Best People
I am suggesting what many might think the polling suggests
They're not wrong
It s funny for branches to attempt to be individuals when individual was used as a derogatory when in service.
Damn bro
gt Doctor they took HC and are experiencing arrythmogenic cardiomyopathy. We need you to do something so their heart doesn t fail gt If you self medicate you deserve to die. I m not helping them.
There s nothing that can prevent someone from getting the other than avoiding people who are infected. Not until there s a working vaccine. This drug is being promoted as a treatment only.
If there is concrete proof of this voter harvesting it s on the American people to stand up against this. Politicians won t do anything about it so it s up to the people. That said you have to be sure and your actions can t be insane.
Cringy as shit.
adoptuskids.org
I'd be interested to see the ventilators vs population stats for the USA presemted as a percentage and compared with Gaza's ventilator access as a percentage of population with and accompanying picture of some good old american weaponry. Would be especially interesting given that the US has a shockingly bad shortage of ventilators right now whilst spending 748b a year on its war machine
I hit my limit if free articles
Narrator Trump interfered with coronavirus relief oversight
To be fair they could use an ITIN to pay taxes. However I would wager that the majority of people who are in the country illegally and subject to deportation because of it aren t exactly lining up to put their name on a list for the purpose of having a smaller paycheck. It s like how in the state of TN where marijuana is illegal you can go get tax stamps and put your name on a nice govt list for all of your illegal pot plants so that you can pay your taxes on them. I m sure tons of marijuana growers are lining up to pay their pot taxes and put themselves on a list that the government has access to.
This is what socialism looks like folks but not like Capitalism. This doesn t happen with capitalism. It s happening now because a socialist is running for President.
ignorant and uneducated are fundamentally the same concept.
Well you are in for a treat
The worst part is the recent actions make me reflect upon history again and discard nearly all what I believed in when I just had accepted it without critical thought in the past
I don t even like trump and you guys have turned me to his side. Get a fucking grip. What is this the 300th time you ve tried this You re achieving the opposite of what you re going for.
The stupidity in this sub amazes me every time I see it on Popular
Okay okay I dono why that happened.
I don't think the children of illegals should be here either but that's a whole different topic.
I'm curious how much influence these nimrods actually have over people. It's probably a frightening amount.
Go jack off to a Bernie poster. Bum.
Thanks for the link
Partly false Dumb article. He disbanded the pandemic team. Why would anyone try to defend such a stupid move Please don't be a puppet and accept stupid decisions as a good thing. All you need to know right here. thumbor.forbes.com specials images.forbesimg com imageserve 5e5a23b0d378190007f4a205 960x0.jpg fit scale
I never understood the criticism of it being a possible treatment just because of who told them. I get that the left absolutely hates him and would jump off a bridge if he told them not to but I don t understand that they think that he just picked a drug at random as maybe being effective. The very nature of journalists should have been to ask where he got the information and he simply could have said Dr. Fauci the guy standing right there. If you don t want to look dumber than the dumb guy take a second before saying something that can be proven to be dumb.
O lerd Dr. Oz youtube.com v M w n 8w3IQ
Densely populated area causes virus shits on planet demands praise and credit if it can figure out how to wipe own ass. Brilliant.
Is Trump exaggerating his intelligence by calling himself a stranger genius
gt for all we know at this point at the same rate as the China virus This just isn't true. In locations where mass testing has been effectuated South Korea specifically the mortality rate is 10x the latest Flu A. Not to mention that these are additional deaths people will still continue to die from the flu as well. The US hospital system cannot handle the glut of incoming hospitalizations which is why social distancing and slowing the spread is so important. Otherwise non COVID 19 patients are going to be unable to access care because beds will be full and doctors will be in short supply.
eventually yea ive never seen anyone so happy that people died like a democratt
It means you no longer live in the United States it's now just the united states.
Grover Norquist is a fucking murderer.
Damn I was with you for the first half and then you jumped to insulting that guy for no reason
It s because they ve been using that same line of bullshit since Bush jr. when he was president it was well it s because its Clinton s economy It was just as much bullshit then as it is now.
Last time I checked the coronavirus doesn t care what your skin color is
What s his twitter name I will get an account just tell him to piss off.
Tens of thousands
Denmark checks its Capitalism which is what America desperately needs. How better off would all Americans be if medical bankruptcies weren't a thing If generations of young adults didn't begin their lives tens if not hundreds of thousands of dollars in debt for their higher education You don't think there are some greedy soul less individuals here that would love to start pay day lending or medical insurance or student loan companies Well too bad. They can't here. Because Denmark doesn't allow markets to be free to use your ridiculous right wing justification spin for blatant ruthless exploitation. It allows innovation and competition in areas that aren't essential to modern day human life. Everything else is not free to do what it likes. And guess what It works better than the US. It's my opinion sure. But I am currently living in the better juxtaposition of what the US needs and it's a set up like Denmark. And we're just going to gloss over my whole point about needing more than two parties so that people literally can't have a government like the US's where doing nothing is acceptable
Swearing at someone breaks Rule 1 Civility. Example Fuck you Swearing in general is allowed. Example What the fuck
Holy shit he's so guilty
You might have had it already. Blunts I switched to vaping bud a while back but I do miss the extra buzz of the nicotine.
Brains
You could swap these idiots with the Kardashians and it would probably improve.
Who the hell decides what's essential To some a new toaster oven is non essential right now but for others that may be one of the only means to cook food. Of course the same state that gave us Breadline Bernie is deciding what their citizens can and cannot buy.
Right basically stating people will die if we don't purchase more ventilators and Yahoo indicates well they didn't SAY to buy more ventilators...
Great thumbnail photo. Which one of these is the face of someone shitting their pants
I reject a multiple economics assessments and propose my own I m not saying you re wrong but calling well documented facts false is just ignorant.
This isn t babylon bee
Yes you do with consent. If I am sick and me and my wife both decide to consent to the risk of contact we can get each other sick and its 100 legal. Its a private party on private property with family and friends everyone who will make contact with each other is informed of the risk. They can opt out if they are afraid of the risk. This isn't defensible. If you don't want to get sick don't go outside and don't have contact with people. Its a free country.
Since COVID 19 has not distracted Trump from covering up his crimes then right wingers can stop pretending that impeachment distracted their orange conman from the impending pandemic.
Fuck this moppy haired orange prick
Thank you. It'll be a crazy crazy year but you really only live once. I hope we both pull through regardless.
My dad was raised liberal and became a republican politician. There s hope for you yet.
That's classic Kilmeade. If someone can prove they're smarter than him and can present verifiable facts to dispute what he says which of course isn't difficult he just sits and mopes around like a toddler that got told no by their parent.
They keep damning National Socialists as everyone should but that attitude is exactly how so many Germans were able to tolerate the extermination of Jews Popes and Gypsies. If he lived 80 years ago in Nazi Germany and he was reared to believe that some group of people was the source of all evil he'd have no compunction killing others systemically. There is no moral system at play in such a mind just an us vs them tribal mentality that dehumanizes the them into the source of evil. If conservatives and republicans are national socialists they're not then everything is justified. Violence murder everything is on the table. And this mentality is incentivized here on reddit.
Martin is ten times the person these clowns are He returned all his investors funds by a multiple Sure he did illegal stuff but anyone ever stole from you and made you whole x 2 4
Catastrophic incompetence.
Look how many lawsuits are out there against Trump right now but are held up in the courts because his lawyers spew bs like you can't charge a sitting president Well guess what Trump loses in November he has no leg to stand on and the courts and all their grandmas are out to get him. They wont just drop the charges because he's no longer president. Biden doesn't have to do shit about this. Just let the courts run their course and he's rotting in prison in no time.
How can you possibly
People didn't care about the Ukraine shit when impeachment proceedings were happening what makes you think they're going to care about this when they're in survival mode in a pandemic and great depression
The problem is... we took this seriously in January and ordered them at that time. We waited for them to be made and then Trump cut in line... or at least is trying. We will soon be making our own masks. And if we beat down this virus we will sell them to you.
gt If people are willing to take a risk it's just that. This is a disingenuous statement on your part. Irresponsible people are a risk to others in this context and yes it is entirely within the government's purview to prevent that.
Drumpf and his administration of idiots Too bad it isn't PAINFUL to be that ignorant
Wouldn t be a bad idea. Then rub salt in the wound a year later by stating you voted for the opposition.
People stopped caring about science and this is what happens when you refuse to teach things like evolution in schools.
Link
did he actually say dictator
He thinks the White House is a shithole.. thats why he is always at Maralago
You pretend like I just love Trump. He's milquetoast conservative. Just better than anything the Democrats offer. I don't think you understand the full extent of the first amendment. There's more to it than just talking.
He should fuck trumps wife
I don t traffic in racist tropes. As conservatives we believe in the sovereignty of the individual and unalienable rights granted to every human being. I hate collectivist racists.
I m insane because I m saying to respect service workers and not demean them. Got it thanks.
And yet he beat Hillary oh dear
He has put aside 100 billion to do it. His plan seems short sighted because everyone could do this and I doubt that much would cover it.
Thanks for the update
Honestly I can't stand her or Islam in general... but... learnreligions.com learnreligions.com It can be said during times of perseverance... and now I am defending Ilhan Omar... Subhanallah
It takes me about 35 minutes to bike versus 20 to drive cause of traffic. I really just hate sitting in traffic and then don t have to work out after work. Yes it s not viable for most hence why I said that in my comment previously. But it s not some hippy liberal mode of transportation like everyone always makes it out to be. I just googled weather July insert city 91 is the average for Houston and 93 for Little Rock. Tbh both Texas and Arkansas are hot and humid. You sweat a lot either way but biking in the morning helps. The afternoon I m going home so who cares
gt Fearful that trump is propping up war criminals and firing actual military leaders No. Whataboutism is a fear based tactic. Those things should empower us not scare us. Trump is a war criminal like his predecessors. What about doesn't work when you are talking about to people working from within the same neoliberal war machine. Obama is a war criminal so is W Bush Clinton s as was daddy Bush Reagan...you get the point. Whataboutism is arbitrary and callow.
Maybe they think they can scope snipe a virus
They are missing the point aren t we holding off and mitigating risk to keep the hospitals from being overwhelmed and hoping warm weather will make it less contagious.
Hi there is there any book I can help you find Yes I'm looking for the Trump autobiography Okay which one First they ignore you. Then they ridicule you. And then they attack you and want to burn you. And then they build monuments to you Oh yes First they ignore you. Then they ridicule you. And then they attack you and want to burn you. And then they build monuments to you I believe we have those in the bestseller section
gt I like how one leftist person says This is very common. This happens here ALL THE TIME. gt Maybe they re average people with different values that genuinely want what s best but don t share your idea of what that is Ah yes. Average reasonable people who disagree with others WISH THEM ALL dead all the time. gt But how can you read something like this disdain it for what it is and then turn around and basically pull the same stupid shit. Are you speaking to me I don't go to leftist subreddits and wish death on everyone. I don't I never have. You look at this submission and THIS is the response you have. To try to chastise US in our OWN subreddit where leftists are posting things like this all the time.
You answered your own question. Senate majority leader Bernie would be far more effective at creating and sending policies to the president than the president. Also the lead statistically is strongly in Biden's favor. Team up negotiate a deal lock him up
Is getting people killing.
Question How does a Jew not see this
For some reason you refuse to read anything I post gt and at least half are paying income taxes despite lacking legal status. gt half are paying income taxes despite lacking legal status. gt paying income taxes gt despite lacking legal status. My post is including employment wages. Can you stop acting like a toddler now I m fine with you disagreeing or providing information that proves me wrong. Throwing temper tantrums doesn t help this discussion in the slightest.
I audibly retched from that mental image. Thanks
Ha so you judge intelligence based on reddit post history from a partly owned Chinese company I m sorry you are that close minded stay healthy out there and don t forget to go outside and get some exercise. Stay healthy dude
I'm usually neutral on most issues like lost people but I tend to lean towards some liberal ideas more than other but I don't understand how you can argue that a male who turns into a female should be allowed to compete against females and vice versa. You are literally at a biological advantage and it makes the work the female athletes put into their sport all for nothing.
CCP... not China.
I d ask what is worse than a massive recession but then I realized Trump will just teach us by the end of April.
Acosta s
It s on the whitehouse.gov website...I think it is real.
Man that guy's face just cries out for a tire iron to be taken to it.
Very helpful I'm sure people in hospitals are thankful for these kind words.
It's odd that in 1984 the Party rewrote history at an industrial scale. A constant churn of fabricating and altering evidence so that the current truth had always been the truth. Whereas apparently in real life you can just say your new truth a few times on TV. All the while the public still has unfettered access on demand to your previous statements but it just doesn't matter.
gt the math is The math didn't get that way by itself.
Make it free and easy to get.
Another fine example of liberal stupidity
So just to be clear wasn't obvious in your inane reply you do believe that Houston Methodist and the government of Quebec are lying when they say COVID 19 can cause dehydration Just a yes no would be perfect
The states have the power under the 10th amendment to ban large gatherings in order to protect others' right to life.
gt When everything is a witch hunt nothing is. When the witch hunts keep finding witches they aren't witch hunts anymore. They're just hunts. For criminals. Criminal hunts if you will.
You can say that but without proof I'm not going to believe it.
I just figured that was a typo since 2009 was very much less than two decades ago. But sure if you want to include that oh look more GOP control. And before that oh look another Dem president with a GOP congress. So we're back to 1994 at this point. Two and a half decades. The Democrats have had exactly 2 years of being able to do stuff without the GOP and by your own admission they tried to get this done. But it's a long term project and 2 out of 25 is not going to get the job done. But sure both sides are the same except one tries to help and the other blocks them from doing so perennially.
Is there any goddamn chance he can be our next president
Oh I can't wait until the NY attorney general gets rolling after Trump leaves office
The article fails the mention why we are flattening the curve. The number of hospital beds ventilators hospital staff etc. cannot keep up with the number of cases if it keeps increasing. That is not a NYC problem. That is a problem anywhere there s a cluster of cases. 10 million jobs lost is terrifying and shutting the economy down will have a long impact on nearly everyone. But I don t feel like the authors argument tackles the underlying reason why we are shutting things down.
You're asking how you can override the braindead decisions of the most powerful man in the world Nothing. There's nothing at all.
That's a pretty cool article thank you for sharing the link.
ofc republican voters can but there's a lot of reasons why the Democrat party pushes for vote by mail. The easier it is to vote the more the poorest less educated young and minority voters will be likely to cast votes. GOP voters in general are higher propensity voters. They turnout no matter what whether its a general or mid terms. The turnout benefit would substantially help the dems more even if GOP turnout benefits from this. Also down the line the democrat party wants to legalize ballot harvesting which is a lot easier to do if there is heavy mail voting. Ballot harvesting is what lead to the GOP being destroyed in Orange County CA.
Over under on Fauci
Nasty journalists
Can we stop with the keep discussion civil bullshit and just say fuck this piece of shit instead of beating around the bush
Work
google.com Every fucking time.
Exactly. Trudeau won t retaliate at this time
Their hatred is really shocking. I genuinely wonder what compels someone to believe this bullshit about other human beings not to mention want us all to die.
Holy shit South Park is right We are gonna go to war with Canada.
Can we trade alberta for washington oregon and california
I appreciate the data analysis using population adjustment. However this is heavily skewed via their analysis toward low population areas as the steps that large cities LA NYC Seattle have taken limit the effectiveness of the data they provide especially in relation to trajectory and growth of cases in the regions.
The message he is sending is that he is unfit to lead. He over ruled out NCO s when he pardoned that shit bag SEAL and now he relieves a Captain that was looking out for his sailors. Trump is a shit bag and it s time we make that clear as vets.
It s not even called the federal stockpile. It s the Strategic National Stockpile. Not for the federal government. For the nation.
Yes exactly I've had this same thought several times. When liberal friends of my grown kids come around. I take the opportunity to ask them what they think about things. The feel a lot about nearly everything but they don't know much about anything. Example What do you think about Trump me He's a racist biggot not very smart etc.. them Ok so as a person you don't like him what about his policies and the things he's accomplished since taking the office me What You've got to be kidding...he hasn't accomplished anything as President them Really What about allowing Veterans to see any doctor when VA hospitals are too busy to treat them What about allowing the VA to fire abusive employees of the administration What about giving fatally ill people the right to try experimental drugs that may save their lives There's a lot more but have you heard of any of these me No what Was it actually him though I don't know I'll have to check on that. them Another example when I'm watching the democratic debates I'll ask my kids to message their most liberal friends to see what they think about what's happening on the debate stage. Everyone one of them every time doesn't watch. It's their political party and they don't even watch. Which brings me to another realization. To remain a Democrat you've got to almost purposefully avoid learning anything about your own party or you'd seriously question why you support them.
Ok so one calls it temporary and the other does not put any time restrictions. That is not reassuring
We outsourced the mask making to China...so we do not have the means to make enough masks fast enough...
Most of those places have the largest cities and subsequently the most international travelers students workers and immigrants. Don t worry it ll spread further soon enough. Blue states doing the heavy lifting as usual.
Shouldn't lies be in quotations since a great deal of what they push out are actual lies or half truths
2019 can we just get to 2020 already 2020 hold my beer
I have a bachelors in Political Science and Economics... and I ll be the first to tell you it s a paper weight. Women s studies shouldn t be considered a bachelors... Capitalism didn t fail her she failed herself.
I've visited. Spent time in LA when I was stationed in San Diego. Wouldn't want to live there or NYC. I have a friend that lives in NYC and she can't wait to leave. You might not think they're shit holes but I do. It's a matter of opinion.
You sound pretty reasonable to me and it seems we are just looking at this from different perspectives. You've taken the time to outline your opinion in a very clear and well mannered way. I appreciate that. I'll say that I am open to being wrong and in this scenario hope that I am. I guess we shall see how this shakes out. Although I disagree with you on many points there are also a lot of points that I agree with you on. I can see that you have a good grasp on things. Nice talking to you.
There is a lot in that link to read through. I m trying to figure out if our total number of tests of greater then or less than other countries. It doesn t make sense to look at testing per capita if we re comparing gross total positive cases. If you want to use testing per capita then you need to relate it to number of confirmed cases per capita
Damn 4k a month..just once would change my life..
Why close a cemetery Not like large crowd go visit a single grave
keep asking Trump about Kushner every day
Getting even a marginal amount of apathetic to vote.
It would be nice if social distancing was all that we were doing. But as I ve said several times it s not. Businesses are shut down all over the country and people are losing their livelihood.
Most likely people are getting tested because they have come in direct contact with an individual that has tested positive for COVID 19. If they test positive even though they show no symptoms they at least know to quarantine themselves.
I do not have either of those and I make due. Crazy what some deodorant and a change of clothes will do
I would say people like you should hang yourself but again evolution will take its toll and your stupid generation will be destroyed anyway enjoy while it lasts
This isn't to bash Fauci. This is just reiterating based on info we had few truly knew how bad this could be.
How many of those voters make up the population
Hospitals are already overloaded. Doctors and nurses are dying trying to heal the sick. Please help the people giving their lives on the front lines. Protect your family keep safe and help those who cannot help themselves.
Lmao
Don t underestimate the Mormons. Romney is backed by a hundred billion dollar organization. He wouldn t stand up to Trump unless he had power in his corner. I think he can center the religious right though and undermine Trumps base. Either way the Mormons are too puritan in ideals to stand for Trump s barbarism. We ll see how Conference Sunday goes.
Trump is a blessing for this world
Good thing that is not the issue.
These people are the biggest fakers using any kind of dramatics to get attention. I always chuckle at the silly GIFs on CNN that have Anderson Coopers jaw dropping at something he already knew hours earlier. So ridiculous.
I think they are referring for their respective states to be able to remove them. Once voted in they can't be removed impeached questioned etc. They are invincible.
It's amazing I have so much respect for them.
That's sexist. Use a gender neutral word like fucking moron or piece of shit. Otherwise reddit will ban you because they're dumb ass liberal cunts
Yes he is a low rent m
Will the United States enact it first parliamentary system and elect it first Prime Minister of the States of America therefore abandonning the presidency system with Donald Trump as the last president of the USA o To be continued...
Those who would give up essential Liberty to purchase a little temporary Safety deserve neither Liberty nor Safety. Benjamin Franklin
That s because you re a hard working conservative. Most people today are softer than cheese
It s more insidious than that. Anything to dramatize bad things to make a Republican look bad.
No one is calling it false. Fauci said that more clinical studies need to be conducted before we can say for certain. Science doesn't follow feelings. It follows proven facts.
Maybe they should live off of minimum wage until bars and restaurants re open to show their solidarity.
Your crack dealer is probably still open crack dealers don't actually make very much money. ted.com language en
You don t know what sins are
Pride is used as a pretext for a bunch of morons to wander around wearing barely anything and behaving in ways that wouldn't be tolerated for anybody else. Nothing prideful in that. Incidentally lots of LGBT think the same.
Trump influences woman to drink fish tank cleaner Liberals Kill this man Obama influences woman to drink fish tank cleaner Liberals This woman is a liar
Almost non existent npr.org npr.org amp x200B gt The largest study so far to look at mortality among coronavirus patients on ventilators was done by the Intensive Care National Audit amp Research Centre in London. It found icnarc.org that among 98 ventilated patients in the U.K just 33 were discharged alive gt gt The numbers from a study thelancet.com 20 30079 5 fulltext of Wuhan China are even grimmer. Only 3 of 22 ventilated patients survived. Those are some truly depressing odds.
Wrong. What's funny is that if you had stuck to US which is what the argument was originally about you would have been mostly right. According to Wikipedia 33 of the world's population is Christian 48 of the US is Protestant while Catholics make up 23 So 71 of the US is Christian. That leaves about 30 non Christians. That's still a division. A rather significant division of people who don't celebrate Easter. Why are you dividing our great nation instead of focusing on what unites us
Donors don't have to be a person. The money is funneled through multiple organizations connected to these PACs and there's a crapton of PACs. All this money is coming from somewhere and it's not from people like me and you.
Sorry the meme made it sound like you were attacking the current response to the virus. I apologize if I misinterpreted your meaning
From the angle of the first time he had a beer. You know The Oracle and whatnot.
I think it speaks more about yourself if you think it s possible for an idiot to have had the business and now political career that Trump has had. He may not speak eloquently or be a genius but he s no idiot. I m pretty sure they aren t wanting to release which companies are receiving bailouts as it could negatively impact their stocks but I could be wrong
Who fucking cares he didn't say shit to Kushner in person it's all fart and no poo
Ben Shapiro though
Not even just that the political alignment of new york makes it an enemy territory. Part of the reason federal medical equipment is being withheld from NY.
That's fine with me. Karma's a bitch in the long run... Americans have a long memory over those companies that started here and fucked over its citizens.
So no chance pelosi had information about coronavirus before the meeting
You have to recognize that these people are the same people that have overhyped every other outbreak. The people who are propagating all of this fearmongering are the same ones who told you Assad gassed his own people in Douma. These people are liars and frauds.
Thanks. I knew my recollection was making the quote more coherent and intelligent than it really was. The fucking trash that would wear such a thing can't be expected to have proper grammar.
This man discredits his religion.
The whole media is trying to make the point that the federal government responded too late to this. Pitts asks him a loaded question that assumes the federal governments mismanagement killed people and Pence make s no effort to dispute that even though there are numerous points he could make like the January 31st travel ban the media opposed and that our deaths per million are better than most Western countries including a the UK France and Spain. It s not rude to push back perhaps street fighter was a little extreme.
I assume they claimed national security.
This totally seems like a very important priority at the moment.
Yeah I know it seems unfair but it's actually fair totally fair the best fair. But look at it like this we here in America need them more than you do. But isn't the reason you need it more is because of your breathtaking incompetence Why don't you act in a little more positive It's always get ya get ya get ya. You know what That's why nobody trusts the media anymore. What I'm not with the media. I'm the prime minister of Canada. Look let me tell you something. Be nice. Don't be threatening.
And it was the conservative party of the day that brought you him.
This guy science.
1
omg i m never gonna change my view. i think that if a woman doesn t want to raise a child she shouldn t have too. this might be because of protection failure or even rape. it s morally wrong to try and take that right away. who gives a shit about a dumb fetus that can t even care for itself.
Why don t we give all our relief money to China
What if some worker at the lab was selling used test animals at the wet market Wouldn't be the craziest thing I've heard this year.
i'm aware of what s means lol
You thought they were against abortion for some sort of ethical reason. Nope. Strategic baby reserve.
I m all for that. Start at the top
I hope kushner likes assholes cuz this sis just ripped him a new one
I have been using the gun argument all week and people are trying to tell me they aren't the same. If the government figures out that they can tell you what you can and cannot do bc of a pandemic why can't they tell you what you can and cannot have next It's the frog in boiling water example. It's never a big jump its always little by little.
This is a political subreddit not a news subreddit. Politics is all about persuasion
My guy it was better under Obama. You can t waive your magic wand and get exactly who you want for president. The reality of the situation is you chose the best of the available choices.
Virginia would like to be on the winning team now.
If you ever hit me and I find out about it.
Fuck doctor oz but he s talking a out there flu vaccine not bad In genwral
when Republicans retake the house they need to open an investigation every single week. put the Democrats under so many investigations they won't be able to do anything else that's the Democrats strategy and there's no reason we can't use it..
I have found that most of the old Trump voters are either actively suicidal or actively hate the younger population so much that they d act suicidally if it meant fucking over the younger generation.
With the tax dollars that California and New York pour into the federal government which gets disproportionally funneled into the red states they could afford their own nations. California Oregon And Washington could become the Pacific States of America and New England could become the Atlantic States of America. Let the red states collapse holding onto their guns fetuses and hatred of brown people. Without the tax dollars of liberal states they go bankrupt.
Rules for thee but not for me. Remember if the left didn't have double standards they wouldn't have any standards at all. It's blatantly unfair but at this point there's not much you can do other than go to another website e.g thedonald.win
I was very concerned but I got over it. Susan Collins
I ll donate to this Kickstarter who s can make this happen
No insurance companies that can t pay their out their claims is what caused the 2008 financial crisis.
So glad we don't have to deal with his daughter anymore.
There shouldn't be a federal stay at home order because situations vary across the country. New York is not at the same threat level as say Wyoming because of differences in population density and travel. It doesn't make sense to lock down places with little or no infections. The states or local governments should be left with such a choice.
It's cheeseberder you filthy casual
That site layout is terrible on mobile.
Game changer Hmmm.....where have I heard that before
most of us
Maybe essential but please don t be stupid about it Texas. Be smart. Actually care for your congregation and don t encourage mass gatherings where vulnerable people will be at risk. And NY can suck it.
Sounds like he has stage 4 cancer. Do these people even try and make their lies believable anymore
This subreddit has a MIX of many different people with different opinions. There are some conservatives here who are very PRO precaution and social distancing. But let me tell you that people estimate the value of a human life ALL the time in the insurance industry for the purposes of life insurance.
That is a crock of bullshit you eating Cheetos on your couch is not a gun to your head. And the sickness is only preventable if you stay the fuck home and the fact that it is under reported means there are more cases not less. Your made up narrative isn't even internally consistent.
Aren't we supposed to be KAG already Not MAGA. Or are all the bodybags a bit of a downer
Remember you cannot reason with people who still support Trump. They're borderline retarded and will simply defend him and disparage anyone who doesn't like him at any turn no matter how dumb they sound doing it.
Trump is a national security risk.
Or the even more amazing concept... what if the Wuhan Flu can re infect people Then what I dunno I feel bad for what is going on because it sucks for a lot of people but god damn it's like people are throwing common sense out the window.
Maybe Trudeau should point his anger at who gave the world this plague aka the Communist Chinese government Also I thought Trudeau was quarantined with the Covids Also Canada threatening a countrynwould be the ultimate lulz.
YOU are making the claim not me. YOU should be supplying the source.
That s where tariffs come into play then. What good is money when our economy is tanking because no one can work anyway If you truly value capitalism you d be doing everything you can to make sure Americans can get back to work before the dollar itself tanks. If we had enough masks for everyone we might be able to ease some travel restrictions.
I'm a Social Democrat that held his nose and votes for Hillary but I find the modern DNC and Democratic establishment fucking repulsive. That said we probably agree on more points than we disagree politically and at any rate I'm glad you see Trump for what he is. Cheers
Agree its a short term solution for a long term problem.
It s Trump Fault
Pro military Trump supporters to show some courage in 3... 2...never
nah man it's simple. biden sucks. bernies voters will not support him. he's a dementia addled rapist who is against everything bernie stands for. the dems don't have a chance. it's over.
The point was that Pelosi is trying to blame Trump while she was saying and doing the same or worse.
It's no point arguing with these people just let them be hateful in there little fuckingecho chamber.
No. But it's complicated.
That dude looks like a literal SCP. It s creepy AF.
The change in action was to not shut down the economy.
You literally just disagreed with yourself lmao. If there is a substantial difference between may be and devout then there is a substantial difference between potential and cure Nice try......
Why are you proposing this as an either or
It is such illogical thinking. I need guns to protect myself for when the government inevitably turns against me but you should still blindly listen to the government since they protest us with their guns especially if it only negatively effects you
Holy shit I've been looking for that word for literally as in literal literal like 20 years ago definition literal 2 years. Unfalsifiable argument. Thank you.
trump has like 70 something but there s no way even half of them are real
gt But if we were at war with another country and supplies were low and he decided to use the DPA to make an American company make more ammo or whatever product it is that we needed to win would those who are upset about this feel the same way This analogy fails because it assumes the USA would offset its theft of material by contributing its much larger and more powerful military in which case of course it's alright if they take the lion's share of munitions. Canada probably doesn't have the infrastructure nor the use for let's say 20 TLAMS but a single American Arleigh Burke would and has the fire control systems to make the most out of those missiles. Assuming that by we you meant Canada the US and NATO are all against a common enemy. If America was fighting someone alone and he used DPA on an American company I don't think anyone would give a shit. In the fight against COVID 19 prioritizing supplies to America grants no such advantage everything the US can do medically everyone can do as well and HAS been doing. If this was for the only sample of a life saving vaccine you COULD argue the greater infrastructure of the USA could be used to mass produce but this is just masks. Everyone in every country gets the same use out of them. It isn't a cruise missile or something where the launch platform is going to vary wildly in accuracy and capacity based on the country that fired it.
Wanna talk about mental health and resignation when the Dems are front running Sloppy Joe.
Fauci just stated he doesn t care about feelings that it might work he cares about the facts and data on if it would work stating that it most definitely does not work..
Mia Love
I wonder how much effect shutting the country down had had on these models. I'm sure there's alot wrong with their statistical models but there certainly must be some allowance for actions taken to combat the virus yeah What I mean is where is the distinction between models with no little actions taken and near full shutdown like we currently have. Don't just want to blindly believe whatever is written. Trust but verify question everything etc.
Yeah let's make everyone stand next to each other before coming in the store amp then let's make sure we make them all shop in the same parts of the store together
I wasn't talking about this sub in general. I could've posted this in r therightcantmeme or even in r ourpresident if I look at the posts and comments there. This was just the first hate sub I saw on my way scrolling down.
My bad I would support and believe the one that accused the other of sexual assault. And yes you are being pedantic. I say I believe women and then you come along and try and make the arguement wHaT iF tHeY aRe BoTh WoMeN You know precisely what I mean.
Nah he should stay in.
Why free Just sounds like another big Government program. Couldn t the private sector do this at a fraction of the price
gt Trump is perfectly incapable of not embarrassing himself. FTFY
Or you can just be like Trump and scam people out of money
Are we sure it s not photoshop Seriously tho I hope this twitter trend hurts the fuck outta his feelings
And you still don't make any fucking sense. I'm not replying to you anymore.
This right here is the real tragedy. Conservatives are all about muh rights muh guns muh house but when it comes to other s bodies and individual freedoms they screech quote the Bible like an insane preacher
Because pride is the worst sin and pride in sin doubly so.
Yeah let's just lift lockdowns and make everywhere like NYC after it spreads great idea
And lands a seat on a CNN panel
Spanish isn t a race.
Where does he think everyone has to be this weekend Everyone's home this isn't an effective way to bury news in an almost nation wide lockdown.
Perhaps No they are.
I would really like a source on this because everything I m seing are full hospitals and exhausted doctors. e.g youtu.be
You really shouldn t tell people to stop making assumptions when the entire premise of your dumb ass screed is built on an assumption. Now borrowing one of your dipshit lines unless you re a medical doctor please kindly shut the fuck up... kid.
You know in NJ they've been blocking roads with trees and coming after you with a lynch mob if they think you're an out of towner with corona. Holy shit where can I find out more about this
gt Margaritas either way. I saved the date I love margaritas.
Its airborne
RUSH IS RIGHT
Folks this is what we like to call nuclear spicy
Not until our war with Eurasia ends. Don't worry peon those in charge will tell you when they no longer need to usurp your rights.
That too
I'm not so sure about that. Remember up until a week or so ago people were saying how good Germany's response was compared to our response And also Canada's Now look at them. The virus is spreading out of control there too. Due to the exponential spread of this thing even the strongest action only seems to delay it or slightly. But eventually it gets out of control. I don't know the deal with China who claims to have it contained but people aren't trusting their numbers.
Can he just shut up for one day.
most of us actually think for ourselves and aren't reactionary knee jerk partisans like 95 of reddit.
He wouldve been mocked by the media non stop for mentioning it if he had.
How in fuck is Henry Kissinger still alive
That isn't necessarily a great idea. It just means that they would be even more beholden to lobbyists.
I don't think anyone is advocating for guilty until proven innocent.' What most are making light of is the rank hypocrisy. Their rules don't apply to them only to Republicans. It took 30 years for even some of them to admit Bill Clinton is a scumbag. Maybe it'll only take 15 for Biden.
Specific to N95 masks the Obama Admin did fail to restock after the Swine Flu. But Trump has been president 3 years so he gets blame too. in other words at least on N95 masks there was bi partisan effort to not restock our stockpile.
I understand that but being young is not a 2020 concept. We've had recessions and bad times that economically DWARF what is going on right now so this has affected older' people who were once young. That's the concept I'm trying to get across... this generational generalization bullshit needs to end sometime soon even though I know it never will. I might just shut up because it's actually depressing to watch people just give up on everything because they've been locked inside for like 2 3 weeks. The amount of people I've seen this week who are locked inside but going off about ordering food streaming getting fast food delivered Amazon galore internet social stuff watching movies with your friends over the internet and all of this amazing stuff... and then week 3 or 4 rolls around... suddenly their future lives are ending and dystopia is around the corner and we haven't even scratched the surface really. I'm just gonna zip it.
Let's be fair. There's no way they'd ban and or quietly downvote us instead of having a friendly discussion.
I'll vote for Biden if I absolutely have to but I can't say I share your optimism that Biden will prosecute anyone over this. Obama didn't go after Dubya for the shit his administration pulled. I know this is orders of magnitude worse but Biden seems to be in denial about the viability of partisanship these days. Obama made an attempt at it but at least he knew when to quit trying to negotiate with the Republican legislative terrorists that are now staging a slow rolled coup.
He also said we have to stay unemployed until there are zero new cases and zero deaths. NY's unemployment fund is gone in two weeks. He needs to help figure out a plan B because his plan A will end in civil unrest when the free' money runs out.
whistleblower.org Resources About Whistleblowing histleblower.org Truth Telling in Government A Guide to Whistleblowing for Federal Employees Contractors amp Grantees PDF histleblower.org Speaking Up for Science A Guide to Whistleblowing for Federal Employees PDF histleblower.org Working with Whistleblowers A Guide for Journalists PDF histleblower.org Working with Whistleblowers A Guide for Public Interest Organizations PDF histleblower.org
Nuh uh As a resident of a confederate state please for the love of God don t leave me with these psychos.
You have no concept of physiology or disease processes. Your opinion means nothing to me. You clearly have no idea what you re talking about. Stay safe and smart This virus doesn t care who you are.
Lol thank you
F
I would love to know what you think of the anti privacy bill that the government is trying to pass. Personally I find it disgusting that they are taking our rights during these difficult times.
Why is this fucktard celebrating the return of plastic bags Plastic is horrible shit.
This is y we need to go back to monarchy. I advocate for monarchism in america.
gt but we know the Chinese flu is from China. Then why would you link a comment contradicting that gt Uh yeah. Han is a race. Who's calling it the Han Virus gt Leftists in this very thread have called it racist. Media types all over TV have called it racist. Your gaslighting attempts aren't going to work. I literally told you how to disprove them and linked the ethnicities of China. I guess I should have know you wouldn't read the info I provided. gt That was for the Spanish flu. Hahahahahaha. You thought that their conversation about the Spanish flu on wikipedia was about the Chinese flu Keep on trucking indeed. And yet you still insist on calling it the Spanish Flu. How ironic and serving to prove my point that you're scientifically illiterate. With a bonus Historically illiterate.
We do need to work together but there s a reason airliners tell you to put your air mask on before helping others.
They didn t set the guideline that they should all be full lol
Well said.
Not true. I'm from Washington too and there's a tab on the ballot you keep to track that your vote was accepted.
Because all that's need to mollify the country is to accuse someone else of doing what you're doing so they get confused and check out. That hunter Biden thing What they're accusing him of is what the president's wasted cumshots have been doing since day 1.
Easy. The War Powers Act during WW2 allowed the US Government to trample all over our constitutional rights. The way our unalienable rights were trampled upon by all branches of government would make you blush. They were rounding up entire races of US citizens for camps in the name of national security. To the best of my knowledge its not happening today. So thats one example from history your welcome.
Is it weird that I heard this question in Bernie's voice
I work ed in a very wealthy town and noticed there's a huge number of leftists. I realized this is simply because they're never subjected to the problems caused by left wing policies. They're not competing for jobs as line cooks or data entry clerks. Their private school educated kids aren't concerned with the children of illegals flooding the school system. If you live in a security building on Park Avenue gun violence probably isn't touching you. If you're not worried about needing public assistance it's easy to assume there's enough for everyone. If you're in a tax bracket paying 100 000 in taxes it's easy to generously not mind paying an extra thousand without realizing an extra 500 is a lot to some people. The price of gas going up 2. 00 gallon or licensing fees increasing by 50 is meaningless.
Citation needed
r selfawarewolves
Trump YOUR FIRED
Right I forgot money is more important than lives. You wouldnt be saying the same thing if your immediate family started to drop due to the virus.
At this point beefing up SOUTHCOM is more about making sure the Venezuelan Navy doesn't sink themselves before they get arrested for drug running.
she dead
And licking the stamps and putting each on in the slot individually and making sure each one drops before inserting the next one. The same way he's do it.
When I see her face I just imagine all the millions and millions of people Nation wide who have a slap for her face...actually being able to slap her face....that s just a whole lotta face slapping for her....slap slap slap
Another vet here. Once I read that he sent it to 20 or 30 other people I knew he sacrificed his career for their safety. It worked it saved thousands of lives.
That old chestnut.
Start a catalog.
In Alabama only 6 of people 18 30 showed up to vote in the primary. Six fucking percent. I'd say they don't give a shit.
What I cited was an addition to the order from yesterday. The dpa was in effect last month. Just because a company voluntarily complies doesn't mean it's not bound by it. However 3M stopped complying when they took and tried to fill orders for foreign countries and action was taken. Completely justified. I dont understand you people. You scream for Trump to enact the DPA. Lie that he didn't after he did and then complain when it gets enforced.
Was there a credible allegation against Kavanaugh I don t recall hearing one.
I don t see that on their website Do you have a link
Reality has a leftist bias. If you're that bothered r conservative would be happy to take you
Amazing how the sides work together to protect the gold isn't it Amazing how the work together against the people. Data proves Medicare for All would have saved lives yet the D's side with the R's to help profiteering off the infirmed.
It pays to be buyable.
On West Wing they would have called this Throwing it out with the trash...
Everything about every fucking day of this fiasco is unacceptable. When will it be ok to actually say You know what guys. You have really fucked this up more than we thought was humanly possible so what we're gonna do is let you go to one of your fucking golf courses and we'll take it from here. They just need to go away. The entire administration is fucking useless. And while we're being all polite trying not to ask these cocks any questions that might upset them actual humans are dying.
wrong. the youth turned out. they just got drowned out by boomers and libs. biden on the other hand absolutely shouldn't count on bernie voters. that's why he'll lose and he'll lose hard you think south carolina is gonna save you lmao
I agree COVID is much worse than the flu. It's as simple as a set number of deaths by flu per year compared to an exponentially growing number of deaths due to coronavirus in a matter of months. The difference between the two is clear. Thank you for speaking up and looking at the numbers rather than opinions.
OMG you forgot the S
This isn t even a politics sub it s an Anti Trump subreddit. Please change it to r AntiTrump.
47 million people are going to be put out of work over these projections. Keep that in mind.
Good lord you are a LEGEND Fam
I think what I said was ambiguous. I could have spoke more succinctly.
If you are referring to Commanding Officer of the USS Theodore Roosevelt Captain Brett E. Crozier then yes that is terrible. He was doing his best for his sailors.
gt Isn t he basically admitting to his sex scandals being true He's toying with the OJ Simpson fine line If I Did It legalese grey area just to fuck with people who are paying attention. Icing on the obedient Russian stooge cake.
It's funny you say that but I used work in a IT company where most of the developers are conservative.
Step 1 Don't live in NYC. Step 2 Congrats you beat the Coronavirus.
closerweekly.com Is this hot enough to risk your kids life for
I love how the text went from an advanced college degree level of writing to...barely a high school level. This has Trump written all over it
Wrong Cuomo dude. Chris is a CNN parasite.
No amount of help will help this lost human.
We aren't at war genius.
Notice how there are now constant advertisements promoting HIV drugs on TV Right before the Dems started pushing to decriminalize the spread of HIV suddenly all of these billboards started popping up in California promoting these new drugs. Sick stuff. One of the slogans was F ck without Fear Clear is here and it showed the LGBT flag. I am sure if you dig deep enough you will find that Gavin Nusom Pelosi and Feinstein and all these Dems have connections to the big pharma companies that are putting out those HIV drugs. Always follow the money.
Oh darn I can't get anyone to come to my quarters to do my nails anymore. When will all of this be over DONNIE
The princess cruise that had an outbreak with full quarantine showed only 20 of the people were infected. Which means the other 80 either quickly go over the bug or had some natural immunity. Which means only 10 even have symptoms and a much lower percentage is even critical enough to need an ICU.
gt Only that he isn't apparently acting to prevent things from getting done like the stable orange genius. And that is why at the current moment I support him being the president of the United States lmao
Wait did Breitbart change its headline gt Joe Biden Now Supports Trump s China Travel Ban He Said Was Hysterical Xenophobia
The only way to keep these bastards honest is for lies to cost them money. Time to start filing suits.
Combined
I guess loose lips don't sink ships revealing a defense weakness. Isnt that what this was about
I regret only having one upvote
I am not saying that all state's unemployment sites are rigged but a lot of states are set up to minimize the number of people that can get on unemployment. Then it kicks them off as fast as possible.
He s worried that a mask would rub off the ridiculous spray tan on his face. This guy looked straight at a solar eclipse. He will probably be protected from the virus by being POTUS. But it wouldn t surprise me if he ups and decides to interact with one of his spiritual advisors who think this is all a hoax and catches the virus.
Is that true Either way is neglience a defence that should work in court Sorry for punching her. I didn't think punching wildly at the group of people would result in any individual being hurt and being able to trace the harm I inflicted on them back to me Ignorance is no excuse.
That s a fair point I guess I should be more specific and say access to things like Medicare and Social Security
Oh lord
What and no thank you
Thats the temptation political leaders are expected to resist for exactly this reason. Let doctors in private prescribe drugs. It is such a poor political calculation.
This shit just gets more embarrassing day after day.
gt shrill woman. Especially from Michigan or Massachusetts.
But Susan Collins said he learned his lesson s
Ironic...
You know there's a pandemic and a fair number of states have a stay at home ordered right.
Jared isn t nearly smart enough. I d say he is Peter Pettigrew.
Slavery and the holocaust were legal. We're talking right and wrong not legal and illegal. Two different things.
Manslaughter is illegal. So is battery even when the criminal in question claims they were drunk or from their senses or whatever. Spreading the disease is equivalent to battery. If you wouldn't accept someone punching you you shouldn't accept someone coughing at you.
Who's Piggy then
How do you get money is more important than lives An economic disaster like a long shutdown would cause would in the end kill far more than this virus. You don't have a job you don't have money you don't have food or a roof over your head not to mention the emotional and psychological toll this takes on humanity of being apart from others. We've got to get out of this somehow once things start calming down the problem here being if you ask me that so many states are ignoring any kind of guidance.
Even the coronavirus news which is REALLY important is politicized.
People are saying there were a few working in Florida google.co.uk q trump illegal worker mar a lago amp ie UTF 8 amp oe UTF 8 amp hl en gb amp client safari
smart Bigbrain idea if I ever heard one
Do you know where you are Authoritarianville
Does the public want one though I'm new to US politics but I get the impression that anti corruption crusaders are the first to bow out of elections. Perhaps with the exception of Bernie but even that guy can't even beat the most hated woman in politics.
You misunderstood. The supplies weren't part of the US stockpile but were donated to China by American companies. The Trump administration's only involvement was having the State Department ship about 1 trucks worth of medical supplies. Again this is next to nothing in regards to how quickly they'd be used.
Nope. As a mod here....just nope. We have a range of opinions about corona here. Some people think it's very serious. Some don't Some think it's kinda serious. There's probably someone here who thinks aliens brought it to Earth. Some think that it's a CIA plot. Some think it's a China plot. Some people are quarantining themselves. Some aren't There is a range of opinion on this subreddit because BELIEVE IT OR NOT....there s a range of opinion on actual Earth about this. People having different opinions about something is HEALTHY. If you go to a subreddit where everyone's saying exactly the same thing about everything...you are in a bad place.
Chicken and the egg of fake information
But by defending such a political triage you are saying that.
They conserve nothing. The future is right wing not this bullshit free market import the world export our job conservative It was always a lie.
Maybe they shouldn't be living in a foreign country illegally
Well president Mierdas did say fend for yourselves Shit he himself hijacked a shipment of masks headed to Germany from Thailand and redirected to the US. Gotta get yours na wha I'm sayin'
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r topmindsofreddit Topminds sticky our posts that show how stupid they are. reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
Nice of you to make an account just to say this.
Hey guys I have an idea. Let s break into federal warehouses steal the supplies and actually use them for their intended purpose. Give them back to the states.
But as the other comment stated that will likely increase the price for produce. It's a solution but at the end of the day it's going to make another set of Americans unhappy. It's a pick your poison kind of situation.
You do realize a Street fighter only adds fuel to their fire because they want you to go after them so they can trap you.
Very true about 3 years... Here's hoping for a somewhat positive change in Nov. Won't change that A LOT of US of A likes the past 3 years...deeply concerning...
Let s convince everyone to vote for him
What did we expect out of a reality tv star who's catch phrase was you're fired
and you didnt say anything to prove his point was wrong. just a link to a website.
Dumbass trump doesn t realize who makes the pulp for those masks
Is he living in a sauna
MSM believers believed what their domestic media told them. Others knew better.
Hello Infidel8 thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Infidel8 amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. edition.cnn.com context 10000
They're retooling an auto part facility just outside Toronto business.financialpost.com
Not sure I buy this. Every state has cities. 25 of Nebraska's population is concentrated just in Omaha. I don't think state level lockdown granularity is fine enough for us to base lockdowns on population density. Which begs the question is it worthwhile to lock down cities while leaving the countryside open Personally I doubt that it would mitigate economic impacts very much. I also think that it's probably pretty close to what happens in practice in a state wide lockdown anyone from Walla Walla WA want to chime in Are there any police around enforcing the lockdown
Umm trillion dollar tax cut sound familiar there guy. Guessing you re a trumpet since you had to throw out an Obama diss for no apparent reason. Like the other side doesn t give obscene amounts to corporations.And dude people are hurting and scared you show a little respect.
Damn roasted
Anyone wearing a hijab probably doesn't align with America's individualist and anti pedo warlord values. I'm ashamed to be in the district that elected her.
Let er rip
so exactly what I said... gt Now the Democrats are politicizing the coronavirus Trump said. They have no clue they can't even count their votes in Iowa. gt This is their new hoax Trump continued adding that attacking the White House s response to the coronavirus had become the Democratic Party s single talking point. He didnt call the whole thing a hoax. He called the Democrats politicizing it their new hoax. You just can't read. I'm sure you thought his travel ban a month ago was racist too. Lmfao.
It could. About the only thing left to do. Pretty tough to achieve though.
gt Goddamn shit the bed Maynard James Keenan
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r shitpoliticssays A federal election is a federal issue. A state election is a state issue. Simple yes r conservative What's Federalism reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
I also know its truly terrible but I agree. Fuck them and fuck the dipshits going to churches in intentional defiance of the stay at home orders.
OP is smoking meth.
gt college chemistry You give them far too much credit.
imagine being such a petty racist that you care how when the president goes golfing. And we know you're racist because you never cared when Obama went golfing. You've never cared at all. Obama went golfing during multiple crisis including the Louisiana floods. you never cared.. girls don't have a problem with the president golfing. They just have a problem with the whit president golfing
Oh my god this is what everyone I've talked to in Southern California has said so far. There's almost no one on the freeway or streets in LA and Orange County DO CONSTRUCTION RIGHT FUCKING NOW
You do realize that would directly lead to more americans getting sick and more Americans dying right
Biden is a band aid for a pretty bad wound. Maybe some Neosporin to heal it up a touch. It's sad but I've relegated myself to being ecstatic about the prospect of that as opposed to this shit show
HAHAHAHAHA
i think you forgot an s around there somewhere
Can some lawyer initiate a class action Wrongful Death suit against FOX News It would potentially bankrupt the company when this is done. It could be in the hundred of thousands of plaintiffs. Just allege that the network knowingly spread harmful information and repeatedly refused to correct it even when the facts were widely known. As a result anyone who watched FOX news and died could have a case.
I too would like a yes or no answer from this expert.
Conservatism isn t synonymous with free market fundamentalism.
gt Deputy Peter Strzok referred to as the Espionage Machine Party. A small group within the FBI and intelligence community conspired to prevent the election of Donald Trump through the illegal use of FISA wiretaps and as an insurance policy to remove him from office after he won. gt Aside from the FBI's headquarters in Washington D.C there are more than 400 offices nationwide with employees who coordinate investigative efforts as well as work with state and local law enforcement on various cases. FBI agents collect information and give it to U.S attorneys or other DOJ officials who decide whether to prosecute based on the evidence gathered. gt Since the September 11 terrorist attacks domestic and international counterterrorism investigation has been a major focus of the FBI. To that end the National Security Branch of the FBI was created in 2005. The NSB's goal is to investigate potential terrorist and foreign intelligence groups operating on U.S soil and thwart plans that constitute threats to national security. These efforts are aided by provisions of the USA PATRIOT Act that removed barriers preventing intelligence and law enforcement agencies from easily sharing information. FBI agents also provide leadership and guidance to local law enforcement agencies so they can more effectively investigate and prevent acts of terrorism.
I've seen prayer work. And we could go 50 or 100 exchanges not convincing each other so I'll defer to acknowledging your experience and behaviors. Our experiences are just different. I think the real problem is people go to church to try to be more moral but that's not the way it works. I have my faith first. I go to church religion to be with people of a like mind and a like faith. Really it's a club. And like any club not everyone is going to agree with all the rules. If you don't agree with the rules if they don't fit with your faith don't go. Or switch religions churches. I haven't been to church in about four weeks. If I don't go for another six months so be it. I still have my faith. But if I went to church without faith I believe I'd be doing it wrong. Faith comes first. And if leaving the church and becoming atheist has made you a more moral person congratulations seriously. I'd stand behind you infinitely more than any money grubbing role playing fake pastors out there any day of the week.
Calls for violence will NOT be tolerated.
Are they going to take back their apology for Bryan Adams
What I have a said that makes me a leftist you simple minded retard
It s unbalanced to compare the worst case scenario of the virus against optimistic scenarios for economic shut down. If overestimating the impact is the responsible course then that is the approach that should be taken on all sides. We are already on course for a second Great Depression. The last time we had a Great Depression 85 million people were killed in the resulting World War but this time we have nuclear weapons. A full blown global war will kill 7 billion people. Is this likely Far from it but it s on par with the extreme unlikely upper bound scenario of 2. 2 million deaths that was repeatedly cited in the media for the impacts of the virus. If we re going to indulge in worst case scenarios then we should do it for all sides. Then it becomes a battle of competing tail risk extreme scenarios which is no way of making policy decisions.
latimes.com
I mean dont just downwote him at least have a friendly argument While we are at it what about trump calling it a hoax and just ignoring it at the start when it could have been stopped easily Oh yeah and the laid of pandemic preparation team never to be replaced I mean tf Please come up with counter arguments don t just be like democrat bad D
I'm Canadian. 3M may stop exporting supplies to Canada due to Trump. But I get it. America needs these supplies more. And the thing is the better America does the better Canada does since a majority of our new cases may end up coming from the US thus it's only reasonable that 3M should focus its supplies in the US rather than Canada.
I'm just amazed that the military hasn't couped Trump's ass already.
There was a few seconds where 3 cohosts who are remotely hosting a show from 3 different locations didn't know which one was suppose to talk next.
I'm trying really hard but I guess I don't have enough brain damage to understand how or why wearing a mask is racist. You have my sympathies for having to deal with such stupidity.
gt So just to be clear wasn't obvious in your inane reply Just because you were too fucking stupid to find it doesn't mean it wasn't there. gt gt gt you do believe that Houston Methodist and the government of Quebec are lying when they say COVID 19 can cause dehydration Not a permanent 15 lbs worth like Cuomo suggested. And not in 3 days.
Try it out on His Royal Roundness.
No. Way.
War crimes are fine but standing up for your men is not. Unbelievable.
Oh boy you're a white guy in Colorado... complaining about the name of a virus and where it came from and was covered up by destroyed evidence in and made people go missing... and are re quarantining as you type out your next dumb fuck answer. P Sorry... calling out the CCP makes me a racist is that what you're getting at P
I fail to see how that keep it s from being a beautiful day.
E were or. Such petulance. It s Obama s fault That s your response Are you a high school graduate. Have you served the country in any way. If so I m letting you go. If not you should be ashamed of yourself. Racists don t belong in the party of Lincoln.
People were eating Tide Pods not that long ago so even at 2 people that's impressively low lol
Whenever they can they will play us for saps. When caught they will play the sympathetic me Chinese. Me no understand game.
Yep
But this spreads so much easier than the flu and it's more deadly
I don't think Hitler is a fair comparison. I think that Isreal is a bad actor but I haven't seen evidence that they are mass killing anyone or anything near the scale of the atrocities committed by nazi germany. I just really hate when people make accusations of anti semitism when they are just making valid criticisms of the state of Israel. Anti semitism exists on both the right and the left. We get nowhere by smearing everyone on one side of the aisle with the anti semitic label.
True... but now he's even more blatant
He was referring to the federal oligarchy he thought those supplies were reserved for federal politicians and their families.
We need baby steps but good to know.
As a republican yourself seeing what a flaming pile of excrement trump is convince your republicans compatriots. It s fine to hate the Democrats but not worth destroying the country. Good on you for seeing the danger he is.
People like this often think that their moral cause is so absolute so righteous that they see the other side as being completely evil and incapable of good or reasoning and so they deem that hatred and violence are the only means of interaction and are just in their view. This from what I've seen has only become worse over the past five years as Democrats and the left in general have pushed propaganda and sensationalism countless times that portray anyone on the right as being radical racist and wanting nothing more than to bring harm to everyone. Its really disturbing.
This was a disturbing thing to hear last night on Tucker Carlson. I hope people will remember this lack of ethics when purchasing certain products from 3M now. Not selling to the US because other countries are willing and ready to pay more and pay in cash So that's what it's about for this manufacturer of masks Could you be more uncaring about a contagion that is killing people.
Could you imagine just one tenth of Chinese manufacturing being done in Central American coutries This entire hemisphere would have an economic boon and our southern neighbors would benefit immensely from it.
uh...New York is part of this nation yeah
I can't believe in the year 2020 that anyone tolerates this. His act and agenda is so damn obvious. And other journalists don't speak out because they side with his goal of hurting Trump. This is the sort of shit you should only see in movies not real life. If CNN had integrity he'd be reassigned
Your freedoms stop at the point where you harm others I don't know why some are forgetting this. All of the classical thinkers knew this and laid it out. If you don't want to acknowledge that others exist in your society you will have to find another ideology.
Because that quote is completely taken out of context And the word liberty didn't even mean the same thing in the 17 1800s This quote essentially means the exact opposite of what people understand it to mean today.
Bad genes.
Remove Obama from the name and replace it by Trump and he'll be all for it.
How is it essential if God is everywhere
How is it shameless You do realize misinformation can cost people their lives when it comes to disease. This is no shit the same man who touted being antivax until he started promising a Coronavirus vaccine in a few months as a solution.
Why the hell does a governor need to order masks from BJ's Wholesale and pick them up from China using an NFL teams plane This whole thing is so bizarre and embarrassing but also eye opening to how poorly organized America really is.
Shanghai hasn't been hit tho
I know that this was exactly the reason of Cpt. Crozier but you could at least try as most as you can. The crew's point and attitude is awesome.
America was built on freedom and a feetus life is just important as a person s.
You could sue civilly. But yeah to be criminal battery in the United States intent is a required component. Negligence is actually a very specific legal term so I'm not going to get into the fine details but essentially negligence only applies when you failed to act in a situation where you were legally obligated to and it resulted in an injury or property damage. It's not just as simple as a failure to act in any situation and it's not just carelessness. You could maybe try and work it in under unintentional tort but you're probably not going to get anywhere without being able to prove the sick person knew they were sick and accidentally passed it onto you. You'd also need to actually be able to prove it was that specific person you're suing that got you sick which you wouldn't know for weeks until you showed symptoms. And then you'd actually have to have damages to be suing for. You don't just get free money. It'd have to be for lost wages or hospital bills. The only way your punching example is equivalent is if the person KNEW they were sick and intentionally went out with no precautions and for no good reason. And again you'd have to prove they were the ones that got you sick. Again it still wouldn't be criminal unless they knew they were sick and got right in your face and intentionally tried to get you specifically sick.
Response youtu.be
Poor Bernie and his multiple multi million dollar houses.
Vote Bernie. He's the only one who gives a shit about you.
Its interesting that their hospitalizations predictions are significantly higher than the reality well outside the 95 UI but that they have slightly increased their prediction on total deaths in their model. A few speculative reasons why this MAY be the case... The number of actual hospitalizations reported across the US is drastically wrong Their model is more than 10 days off the timeline but the general curve will still be correct Their model has a major deviation from the current established relationship between hospitalization and deaths Their model has some other major flaw and is compounding that error in deaths as a result of their hospitalization numbers being wrong and they have not corrected for it
Which third pile sir. There appears to be 92 of them.
No those nice men will escort yo to the courthouse for a few questions. They'll give you a very nice pair of bracelets to wear only the best. s I WISH
You wont have the disease if you arent gay
Why aren t they using the drug in New York
Bullshit
Pretty sure they were referring to the disputes we ve had on water rights in the Great Lakes. Thanks to some heated debate there s now a treaty moderating the amount of water each side can pump from the lakes
All of their BS about the other important services' they provide is just that BS. And this proves it indisputably.
Obama's campaign messaging was extremely progressive. People voted for hope and change while Biden tells people privately that they should vote for him so that nothing will fundamentally change. I do agree that Obama actually was a centrist even though he ran a progressive campaign. His centrism is not what drove people to vote for him.
Christian News Satire
America you are fucked and alot of you will die unnecessarily. Good luck.
I've yet to hear of any need for these guns to protect someone from Coronavirus related issues
Voting won t even help. Trump lost last election but the system got him in anyway. Move to Canada or Northern Europe they re the only civilized places left.
She's also admitting employers are illegally employing illegals by that same logic right
Okay but... what s your argument here Like what are you trying to say
Great Then why don t you stay the fuck inside Why do you require government to convince you otherwise Why didn t people immediately research this important topic and take it upon themselves and their dire sense of self responsibility to not put people in danger Why didn t they conduct a cost benefit analysis correctly Any rational actor would come to the conclusion that it is best to stay inside during a time of a pandemic. Yet that didn t happen. Quarantining is humanities response to discovering a widespread deadly illness. That s what always happens during a pandemic. Take a look at history. It most certainly does have the right to suspend elements of the constitution. Look up marshal law. Hence why it s doing exactly that. In every single natural disaster war or crisis the government has suspended rights of citizens in favor of the collective.
Those first two links provide no evidence of any democrats calling COVID 19 a hoax. amp x200B The first link describes Pelosi walking around a city at the end of February trying to quell anxiety about the outbreak. Actually she was following Trump's lead on this since he told us that very day that The Coronavirus is very much under control in the USA Feb. 24 and in fact would say with a straight face It's going to disappear. One day it's like a miracle it will disappear just days later Feb. 27 amp x200B The second describes De Blasio being a moron per usual but not calling it a hoax. He is a fool and seriously dropped the ball w r t COVID 19 but still didn't call it a hoax. amp x200B Are there any real sources documenting your accusation that democrats at any point called COVID 19 a hoax
it s called Easter. Not a lot of people know that it s called Easter. This was seriously funny.
Naaaah we would NEVER do that s
Part of me hopes these guys are just fucking playing the game then fucking over the hacks who put them in.
Be careful using rationality round these parts. We only accept what's already a thing or what our cherrypicked leaders and biased media tells us is a new thing that's OK to accept.
He s a joke and he praises communist governments.
The Kushner roast is at the end of the video around 15 00
You're probably right but it's the federal government. Effectively they make the rules. Not saying they should or not let's be safe but if hydrochloroquin was able to have red tape slashed for it to be used then I'm sure thats the case for a vaccine. Right to try alone should suffice for people who are the worst off and can consent.
I love reading about Germany talking about modern piracy while they made BILLIONS off of Greece's debt crisis... France calling it modern piracy... sorry what was the Yellow vests movement about again France
The state should not be seizing resources from a private entity
gt personal responsibility BINGO You can t assume strangers will act in your or anyone else s best interest in fact it would be wildly foolish to do so. Just look at Florida. Every point you made will only serve to spread the pandemic.
Yeah I misread that. I just called a liberal but too many ignorant trumpers. What makes me a literalist
It s a huge attraction in DC. On a usual summers day the crowd watching the guards at the memorial in this particular picture is huge
Thank God that day is Today
Am I allowed too Sorry to the mods if this not allowed reddit.com utm source share amp utm medium ios app amp utm name iossmf
Your opinion isn't a source. Thanks for the easy win sport.
Can you really defy a voluntary action
oz is such a fraud
I'd love to be Canadian. I would not resist.
Statistically yes he has.
Liberal tolerance 101.. So glad that 90 of liberals are gunless pussies. We dont ever have to worry about anything but words...and legislation if they are allowed. Never have the balls to take action about their hate...unless it is 15 Antifa communists jumping on 1 or 2 unarmed folks who dont share their delusions or communist desires. BTW... we have allowed them to dictate the terms of their position democratic socialist or just plain socialist is what they call themselves. They are neither. Socialism calls for the PEOPLE at large such as unions to have all the power and resources...the property... What they want is COMMUNISM. Last step before a dictatorship. COMMUNISM wants the STATE to control your RESOURCES own your BUSINESSES AND EVEN HOMES provide State funded university education...state controlled HEALTHCARE.... They are COMMUNISTS. THEY LIE. They know that they cannot run as COMMUNISTS by name right now...because all the Boomers who spent their entire lives FIGHTING COMMUNISM in a COLD WAR and PROXY WARS in korea and Vietnam would never ever vote for COMMUNISM. That is EXACTLY what they are already proposing as laws though...green new deal... free college...free healthcare... free...free free.. But they never say WHO is supposed to pay for all that free shit....WHO is supposed to surrender their properties and private companies to the state...WHO is gonna have to pay 2x or 3x as much taxes... ALL LIBERAL COMMUNIST LIES. ROT.
GFY How about you stop playing China s boy toy
Good news Alabama isn't on lockdown No stay at home order as of yet.
remember to revolt more likely
Dude has dead eyes also why is he in this position Has he been vested at all Son In law giving briefings What the fuk
gt i was told that wearing by wearing a mask Told by whom
Yeah thats what it looks like to me. Also poison is one of the most common killing methods for women killers and suicides for that matter
I really like your digital persona very thoughtful amp caring. Somehing about your reply has been bothering me though. Imagine a bunch of purchased people in congress pass laws for war because the corporations need more wealth.Imagine the wars are started through the use of lies. Is it more honorable to kill innocents for corporate profit or get court marshaled I have a son in law who just joined the National Guard because he needed the training to get a better job. I am concerned that our military would call him up because the corporations need more profit or because POTUS thinks it will help his re election. Especially because those same corporations shipped all the jobs overseas to increase their profits and POTUS is nuts. Something here seems dreadfully wrong about they way our country uses the first lines of defense. Soldiers in war and Nurses in the Covid 19 war with in adequate protection and paid less. Remember when we sent soldiers to Iraq without armor I guess it was too expensive until people started talking up. Nurses should quit if they don't have enough mask can't court marshal them for leaders mistakes. I wonder who got fire fore talking up about the crappy armor
When you live paycheck to paycheck you don't have anything in the bank. Nowadays they just come for your 401k.
The modelers were incredibly wrong for H1N1 and also for SARS. They grossly overestimated the number of deaths. Every model for this outbreak has been off by 4x 10x. We are basing our public policy decisions not on science but educated guesses with bad track records. Just as people are skeptical of any treatments or cures they should also be skeptical of worst case scenarios that haven't been predictive. Edit I do have to give them a small amount of credit for including their uncertainty in that White House briefing. But if you look at how enormous that shaded area is you can see how much of a SWAG the model really is. I would give them more credit if they included a historical view of prediction and actuals.
Or have themselves pull themselves up by the bootstraps. I thought the goal was for each of us to elect ourselves to Congress then resign one by one so we get the sweet ass healthcare coverage they get for life.
What a fucking weasel...actually I don't want to insult weasels. He's just a piece of shit.
Agreed. I'm keeping that one in the bank bank. It's where I keep janky things like whips.
Fuck I wish. As long as assholes like the Kochs are doling out billions some dickslurper is going to take it.
WWLP is local news here in New England. I promise you the story is factual. The republican governor informed our commonwealth about this debacle.
Life is dangerous. You can't hide from it. I am sorry to hear your brother in that condition but the data indicates he and his wife are an exception to the norm. Global Quarantine and Everybody back to Work aren't the only two options there is a middle road that can and should be seriously considered not emotionally and anecdotally dismissed.
gt Well for starters...an estimated 160 million people are either overweight or obese. Well that's great news....and does it make you wonder why healthcare is so expensive when obese people all have multiple related health issues. And remember fat shaming the principle of being honest with an obese person and telling them that they need to change their lifestyle is now a SJW thought crime.
Paper bags are even better. The virus last less than a day on paper while it can last 3 or so days on plastic.
Where exactly do you think this massive surge is going to occur. Literally the largest city in this country by a factor of 2 is currently getting a massive surge. Where is a bigger one coming from
They must be thankful. Who wouldn't want to beg for change rather than support a trump Just start a go fund me before you work for a trump.
COVID19 out here redpilling TF out people
Thats a really fun project
12 18 months Dont believe everything you hear. That's delusional. Okay so there shouldn't be a police service forefoghters dog parks roads or schools. And none of them should come of you haven't paid them right. Cant get past this retarded outlook. You Harp on Venezuela and Cuba but leave out the places doing social programs well while still having capitalism. Finland Norway Canada and ALL civilised countries have some form of social programs. Where the states decides draws the limit on those is fucking retarded.
Lincoln s suspension was for between DC and Philadelphia later expanded to New York City. en.m.wikipedia.org 1863 I wonder if Barr s would be similarly regional. I don t actually wonder that.
I can see two ways of making it work. Either fill it with children books or the annals of the lawsiits agaonst trump.
Senator Susan Collins would say he'd learned his lesson.
No he's just an asshole.
The type of guy who slaps you and when you grab their shirt and punch them throw their hands up all appalled like whoa what's with the violence
This is why I fear for my officemate. Sweetheart of a guy but we re in the second worst state right now and he has labored breathing walking the 70 feet from the elevator to the office.
Homeboy is drowning lmfao
I thought this subreddit was about conservatism ya know like the good ol respectable kind of conservatism like Ron and the Bushes were about disagreeable but respectable I didn t realize how much it just seems to be The Donald Lite including the conspiracy theories and cult like following. SAD.
So the Massacre was just a little delayed. Did they think that would make anyone not notice
Assuming you get to vote. You might have to face a situation where you won't get to vote and have to consider how freedom is usually won.
except that in this case the woman who poisoned her husband and blamed it on Trump was a liberal. Go figure the one person out of 325 million to think ingesting fish tank cleaner because the President told them to was a good idea was a lefty. or she just murdered her husband and blamed it on the President.
Hell I have a job already and I wouldn t mind getting a part time job harvesting cucumbers for like 20 per hour. I know it will never happen but there are plenty of people that would do this.
I was a nuke EM. Signed up a month before 9 11 happened and went to boot camp a month after. And thats how i got 3 sea service ribbons from one ship lol. Still glad I did it though it's like having a diploma cast from gold without the crushing student debt that comes with it.
gt How many people have to die or become horriblly sick before you think the states should do something Do something Or end all of our freedoms. There's a difference you don't seem to have the emotional solemnity to understand.
This could be the title of Trump s autobiography
You know it. I know it. Everybody knows it.
Like with all those No Go Migrant Islam zones thelocal.se they could enforce it...
gt I have questions. First I think you are correct about one thing the national stockpile wasn't prepared for an emergency of this magnitude and that's not entirely Trump's fault. Which is why following the federal response plan developed by Bush and further cultivated by Obama was necessary to flatten the curve. Trump decided against taking that route so we are where we are. Don't start your comment off with a loaded statement like that. What the hell are you even talking about gt 1. What are the better ways of allocating supplies Making orders directly from suppliers. When states can't find the resources they need they can contact FEMA which will then use their resources to obtain supplies which can be sent directly to where it is needed from the manufacturers or suppliers. gt 2. Why havent we done that Done what gt 3. Why is the Fed competing with states to acquire these supplies Wouldn't it make sense for the Fed to act as the sole purchaser and then distribute supplies as needed Heck the states could reimburse the Fed if state autonomy is a big concern for you. No it doesn't make sense because it's not just states that are buying this equipment. You want the federal government to control the purchase and distribution of supplies you want everyone to compete with the Federal government and think that will somehow solve the problem. Each state has information that the federal government does not have. There are 50 states and 350 million people and you think the Federal government is going to do better It's not about the money it's about the people closest to the problem making decisions before it Feds step in. Those would be the states. gt 4. Why is the Fed feeding reserve supplies into the private sector where they are resold for profit in an ultra high demand marketplace They said this was happening during last night's briefing if you don't believe me I watched it live That's not what is happening. I watches it live as well.
All of them are all over the country. Unless and until there s widespread testing assume the official numbers are wrong.
Liberals need to stockpile guns more then ever before.
Because if we had an open borders President we'd all be better off when pandemics hit. s
Yes you are technically right. Also TIL about Tynwald Court.
Question How goes a Jew not see this
I don't know that smell...
Im not saying it wont be a disaster but expecting something this big to come together this quickly and run smoothly on day 1 is unrealistic.
Your comment made us just a little bit more likely to become an authoritarian dictatorship which would kill millions of people. How dare your exercise your freedom of speech when you are putting us all at risk
r noshitsherlock
Because that s not how our system works. Get a clue.
And that s why the US is doing so well in this crisis lmao
That would seriously have tricked me. CNN says something I just listen for what they implied but avoided explicitly saying and I immediately know the opposite is true.
Sweden is about to get hit. Still too early man
I agree generally with your post in that racism shouldn t just be ignored like it ll go away on its own if we sweep it under the rug. It needs to be confronted and dealt with. I don t think you ll ever stop everyone from being racist so my primary concern is systemic racism that is ingrained in institutions. My issue though is on the idea that racism is learned. I guess I just try to think if racism is learned who taught the first racist to be racist I know it seems like a silly question but that s what I think is the logical conclusion to the idea that racism is completely learned. Realistic Conflict Theory en.m.wikipedia.org is an interesting take on what may cause friction between different groups. The Robbers Cave experiment may also be of interest to you. Not saying these things are definitive but it may help add a new angle to the subject.
and that conclusion would be accurate...
Wasn t the issue that it was being recommending as a treatment when there weren t any studies or trials to back it up at that point Shouldn t we only be recommended drugs to hundreds of millions of people if the drugs are proven safe and effective first
It s cool. The Matrix will just reboot back to 1999.
This is an article about Trump firing Michael Atkinson and not his response to the coronavirus and its relation to the impeachment trial.
Trump took measured concrete steps informed by experts. Meanwhile the entire democrat media i.redd.it was calling him a racist xenophobe for doing anything. I'm glad he didn't listen to their advice i.redd.it but instead listened to his experts.
I'm saying he helped grow the insurance industry so that prices would rise people would blame capitalism and then the whole thing devolves into single payer. It was never meant to help anyone it was meant to start the collapse of the healthcare system via popular opinion and blaming the market instead of giving sticking their corrupt grubby hands in it.
Donald Trump is a traitor. He's also a crook a cheat a liar and a con man but I feel like being a traitor is the worse crime. He may very well be the worst human being the United States of America has ever produced.
Not sure you solved his problem though why would Americans pay 6 for grape when imported it costs 2. 50
Oh boy. You poor buggers are in so much trouble. Trumps doesn't seem to care if you all die. Shocking.
So what is your proposition that is more effective than multiple countries epidemiologists and economists working together.
Hello Fitness and Finance thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Fitness and Finance amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. cnn.com context 10000
They always take the statistics on legal immigrants and apply them to illegal aliens.
Yeah. Navient charged my student loans with interest just the other day so......
What are you putting in them that gets them that dirty Literal shit Dirty dishes Compost Stop making it out to be some big deal that it isn't
Would be miserable. Could you imagine the stench in the conference room
His cultists are so blind
C'mon now even Snopes debunked snopes.com the Trump called the virus a hoax talking point. Trump was referring to the democrats politicizing something else in an attempt to throw mud at Trump. Trump is balancing the very real issue that you can't expect people to sit unemployed at home indefinitely. We have at least 10 million unemployed maybe 20 million. NY's unemployment fund will be gone in 2 weeks. He never said things were going to be lifted by Easter he said he would like to but wasn't definitive. The reality is we can't continue much longer or there will be civil unrest. I agree some Governors are not doing very well. It seems many think the federal government will bail out their bad decisions but it should be abundantly clear as big and expensive as the federal government is it can not fix every state or even a small number of them. I hope he's tempering his Twitter because he needs to work with the governors and tamp down a panic. Maybe those conversations are happening in private. But I agree afterwards we need a very thorough and public analysis so we learn and improve from this like many Asian countries did from SARS and or H1N1. Edit We're probably going to be wearing masks every flu season now. That's just my hot take on this but it seems to be the biggest thing that's allowed Japan and South Korea to retain some normalcy.
I do not remember that Completely believe it though. With this guy I can't remember last week.
I don't really give a fuck what Melanie does. Do u
It s double speak word salad. He is just up there talking for a long time but you still walk away not knowing more than you did before he started talking.
source for what support for DPA Schumer urges Trump to invoke Defense Production Act politico.com Biden calls for widespread application of Defense Production Act vox.com Nancy Pelosi President Trump Must Use Defense Production Act realclearpolitics.com Sanders Mr. Trump Enforce the Defense Production Act sanders.senate.gov
Or how it started out as 75
gt As heinous as this is he was not fired. He was relieved of duty which is the civilian equivalent of being fired. It was only after the media reported the story that he suddenly became reassigned which still doesn t negate the fact he was relieved of duty. gt He will retain his rank in the Navy and reassigned elsewhere. Relieved of duty is not an article 15 or court martial where your rank is at risk. It can mean one of the two are included but by default is not.
He is probably selling the supplies through one of his shell companies. Nothing to see here folks the warehouse was empty when I got here.
Hahaha noooo not exactly. Why do you assume so much
It is hard to stay away. This reddit keeps reminding me why Trump will win re election and how hateful and intolerant the left really is.
They will say If the Chinese got the virus there s no way it could be a weapon that was released there. China wouldn t do that.
Depends on the war really. I know plenty of jaded vets.
Don t forget to blame Obama
It's been that way since Trump started doing we in the primaries.
Dude. 538 has Bernie's chances are 0. 0 it's done. I'm sorry. Unless something insane happens like Biden dying it's over.
His specific requirements of restricting export and prioritizing American demand seems well within the bounds of regulation to me. And regarding the goal posts if it is unlawful theres a system of recourse where 3M or any other company that feels the regulations impinge on their rights can fight it in court all the way Having these checks and balances in place is a VERY FAR step from a communist country where you have no recourse against regime intervention. Misuses of the patriot act and the national security act to infringe on citizen rights have been debated in the past and fought in court
Who was the dumb ass that upvoted this I want to slap them in the throat right quick
How They re united in their hatred.
I appreciate and thank you and all your colleagues for their sacrifice and service to the nation. I haven't experienced any of the struggles you mentioned and haven't done research on most of those. The point I was getting at in my previous comment that might not have been clear was that it seemed like you were acting as if simply serving in the military meant that your opinions are always the correct one. Claiming yourself as a source for an opinionated statement is egotistical and is why I claimed that it is a disgrace to those who serve the nation. Sorry if I led you to believe otherwise.
Another bullshit propaganda piece this one touting the efficacy of hydroxychloroquine. This is the kind of dangerous hogwash that ought to be shut down before it kills its audience.
Wait...
Thats where I worked in 2003 04 but I don't remember masks.
You were defending the OP. The mental gymnastics in this sub are insane.
gt This idea basically never survives pointing out a specific area in which Bernie and another candidate had the same policy. No one other candidate stuck with M4A.
All this talk about dead people models reminds me about the teenage models I can get. Ivanka grade young pussy believe me.
Texas needs an Eastern wall. I've been though Mexico and the South. I'll take Mexicans over deep South denizens any day. Hell most of the South is as bad as a lot of Mexico. At least Mexico vaccinates more.
Bruh one of the most infectious diseases currently going on infecting more than a million world wide and 200 thousand in the us compared to sun rays. And absolutely the government can declare martial law and send the military in whenever they really want Edit to the guy who replied saying it s not that infectious during the incubation period it has 1000x more viral vectors in the throat than SARS. Don t come at me with fake news
These ships are only taking non covid patients correct
Man his tone may be less somber after he finds this out.
Nevermind the fact that an O 6 in the back l Navy never would have released a letter to the media unless he had already asked his superiors for help three or four times first. Anyone who had ever been in the military KNOWS that his letter was NOT the first.
isnt this insider trading already
Huh
She doesn t give a shit.
Kushner you're not fooling anyone
COVID 19. Co rona vi rus 20 19 In case he doesn t get it.
Are we going to ignore the rallies Trump went forward with in North and South Carolina What she did was wrong but she s not the only one to fault.
Free education respect from the nation retirement benefits paid vacation travel opportunities high job security etc. What more could you need that isn't already provided I feel like you are just acting as if you are entitled to everything simply because you served which is a disgrace to our military.
Dear buddehs in the north Massachusetts is not on that dipshits side just avoid us when you invade
Not true. We stagger terms for a reason. There would be a House and a Senate with a shitload of vacancies. Dems hold the majority and can appoint the president basically.
There's been a TON of that sort of brigading lately. It's amazing...if you check the comment histories of 90 of the fear mongers in here lately they never showed up on this sub until the Wu Tang Flu started. I can't help but feel we're being manipulated in an extremely dark manner.
This may be me but nowhere does it actually say they are creating a bidding war. It says that they will go to NY Connecticut etc. Infact I didn t see them ever saying that they were selling. If you could tell me where you got this information from that would be great Thanks
Some states do have their own state defense forces answerable only to the governor of the state
What'd you expect from a bunch of robber barons
That's an insult to the national enquirer.
And what an outstanding job job hes doing.
Did you not read that John Bolton called it streamlining but the team was clearly disbanded. Your own article states this. It s like you don t understand your own proof. Trump and co have bungled the response. Deal with it.
Well I mean it wasn't the Catholic Church who came up with the theory of relativity.
What a useless conspiracy theory. Even if it were true it would have no effect on any of your lives. What s the point of being such huge heartless assholes Does it make you all feel better about yourselves to say these things
We're in a strange land far far away.
gt Cool didn t take me long to find a racist on this sub. Cool cool cool. You are so fucking clueless that you can't even see the satire and irony of not allowing anyone to get on a plane without a valid ID.....while at the same time saying minorities are too stupid to get a voter ID....and therefore it is voter suppression.
To Progressives it is a bad thing. Only the group matters.
Conservatives aren't going to value democracy more than conservatism.
Ah I see thanks.
Well I've always suspected they secretly think if other people didn't get assistance they'd get more just because. They believe there isn't enough money in these programs because of welfare queens and not because they keep voting for people who refuse to fund them.
That s the point
Thanks. I was responding in kind to his cursing. I'll edit.
How's that news Almost everything he says is a lie sometimes he accidently tells the truth
Just a bit northeast of you work in Harris County. Ditto first two weeks of March I was sick as hell we were not really talking about Covid much yet we knew about it and were keeping an eye on things in WA but no one was worried. Dr. said it was an upper respiratory infection gave me an inhaler and benzonatate said to take Mucinex to loosen things up. A few days later I was feverish for about a day then slowly started getting better dry cough turned wet energy crept back up onset to recovery was about 3 weeks. I honestly wrote it off as a bad cold during the pollen bomb which was miserable this year A lot of people I know were sick with similar from late February to late March all of us just assumed the same thing bad cold pollen misery. I'm on the fence maybe I got it Knowing what we know now I'd be real curious to take the antibody test when it becomes available though.
They disappeared. Smh this story has so many holes in it and I think Trump is mostly behind it.
Acosta is always trying to start shit. Always. What a clown
That s too much strategy for that man to comprehend. He simply want people in blue states to die.
Been hearing that for years now...
When have laws been a hindrance
Lol. I cant with with anyone on CNN.
Spoiler it was never contained.
Good for the old woman. She's cautious and will be fine. I hope that having a gun and learning to use it will reinforce the self confidence that led her into the gun store.
I would like to know what that stupid bitch has done for the state of NY especially when everyone NOW needs help with the pandemic. However she does do an exemplary job of criticizing others.
Kakistocracy the Dunning Kruger administration is running the show.
I found season 1 very interesting but I'm holding of on 2 because I'm not sure I can take it right now.
dont use Wikipedia. its leftwing propoganda use infogalactic
Sounds like you just defined deflection.
no they just said you would be better off worrying about the flu.
Kushner is a waxwork dummy with pull string answers to real world questions You d be better off getting a tube of Marmite to help out it would honestly do a better job by simply not getting in the fucking way with it s ego amp idiocy
No
Free N95 masks for Canada Fuck USA
Gender is kind of a free for all because it s a social construct and what it means to be a man or woman varies wildly between cultures. In those regards there could be a dozen different definitions on what it means to be a specific gender. Sex is a lot more clearly defined and although most species have two dominant sexes it would be naive to say there are only two. I m humans this is very easily seen in intersex people and arguably in genetic conditions in which there are abnormal sex chromosomes. The link has a better explanation and offers some better examples. Not pushing my opinion just the science. ho.int
Who really thinks Breitbart.com https Breitbart.com is a valid source for anything but propaganda This site should be permanently banned from being used as a source.
Other than being hot what else should I know about her
The DNC doesn't have to pressure anyone. They just give people no choice except for the candidate they've chosen to coronate.
Your standards have to be very low if you find her hot...
I dunno we have to use approved music ear protection at my work. 3M is the only approved brand. And they last like a week before the audio cuts out and crackles to just being shot. Oh and they re 89 dollars. Thanks 3M keep your masks and fuck off.
You people are so fucking retarded it s amazing
Or abortions
This exact same blogspam was posted one day ago. reddit.com Except this new' article has a different URL.
Prediction... several memebers of congress come out of the current crisis much wealthier then before the chinese virus pandemic.
Donald Trump is a cancer on our society
What has become of us that we pay a couple bucks for a bottle of water... crazy. Not sure if it s true but a Mexican guy told me Canada has half the fresh water in North America.
Guess it's a good thing so many people didn't apply themselves so we still have grocery employees delivery workers etc..keeping this shitshow running right now don't you think
gt But I think the major reason he is unwrinkled is an unearned confidence. He s reportedly been calm cool collected and convinced this pandemic is more about public psychology than a health reality. nytimes.com As Vanity Fair s Gabriel Sherman wrote vanityfair.com Wednesday he told White House staff in confidence that he believes the state of New York which currently has 102 863 confirmed coronavirus cases and nearly 3 000 dead nytimes.com at the time of writing is overestimating its need for ventilators. I have all this data about ICU capacity. I m doing my own projections and I ve gotten a lot smarter about this. New York doesn t need all the ventilators he said. All optics and ego while it's likely that hundred's of thousand of real human beings die potentially magnitudes greater than they would have should our leadership have been competent.
I love how they just assume trump doesn t work that hard because the msm tells them so. Like how tf would you even know how much trump works or doesn t work
Well there are going to be a whole lot more people with no money before long now that we've shut most people out of work.
It is not FDA approved for use against Covid. It's FDA approved for Malaria and Lupus.
They can try but their window of opportunity will not be long. There will be an inevitable anti Chinese backlash and resulting economic contraction for these bat meat eating clowns
How manly
That guy is a fucking legend here in Illinois. He's awesome.
What she was getting at was If he just wanted to make Germany great. But he wanted to kill millions of innocent people because of an insane evil ideology. That is where she was getting at when people were trying to throw nationalism in her face to compare nationalism to the nazism. Pretty much saying it wasn't nationalism that made Hitler and the nazi party what they became. It went well beyond nationalism and that was her point. There's your context.
It s a loan...do you understand this
Geez that s brutal.
Guess we'll have to wait and see. If the narrative from the MSM changes then this might just be what we've been hoping for. MSM won't let this be a win for Trump no matter what.
Difference is he himself would probably eat the cake...
So the CDC the most qualified organization for this type of thing is wrong Seems dubious to me.
cruel and selfish for the status quo bros
I guess you didn't notice that I said that is what they call us IN THE STATES... I'm in the same boat as you. Grandparents all came from Scotland Ireland and had nothing to do with slavery at all.
If things do or don t. It does not matter. 3M is saying supply lines cross so many countries shutting part down leaves you open to retribution elsewhere. America needs more than just this one mask. So I think they are saying don t open Pandora s box.
Yeah crazier things have happened. I ll vote the nom.
do you not think it s unfair to look at biden s lies but completely ignore trumps
I know some Sanders supporters will be mad and spin this as a bad thing. But I actually think it was a stand up thing to speak to Sanders directly and inform him he feels he has to start vetting.
Liberal passing through here. It s not the ID itself. It s charging for it and restricting access to it. While using a driver s license or state ID makes sense on the surface you have to pay for them and the office isn t open during hours that everyone can visit. You may say they can take a day off but most people live pay check to pay check and even if it is their fault they are in the situation voting is a right same as free speech or the right to bear arms. Voting needs to be accessible by everyone.
Another example of why he can't fight coronavirus effectively those damn Democrats made him fire another official because of impeachment. s
No she didn't That is why I just said office
That s where I m at. I can t rage anymore it won t help. But I can vote.
Idiots will still vote for trump. Stupid is as stupid does
Unless you know... the post office gets shut down. Which could happen by June.
I mean. I don't know what to say to that. Yeah he could get into office and dismiss everything he offered up. But... That's not likely. On the other hand we have Trump who was elected as an unknown and has proven exactly what he will do. I'll take the guy with the progressive platform and a chance to pass some of it over the one who has proven to dismantle progressive gains and democracy itself.
Absolutely rape is disqualifying and the accusation should be investigated.
10 years after this Pandemic over FDA study confirms that Hydroxychloroquine is useful in treating the now extinct virus COVID19.
The only reason they didn't recommend masks from the start was to save PPE for medical professionals. Everyone with half a brain knew they were lying when they said masks don't do anything because the next thing they said was that we need masks to save the lives of healthcare workers. Everyone in Asia knows that wearing any kind of mask during a pandemic is common sense. Somehow the West never got the memo.
He s lying. Imagine our surprise.
What do you mean I haven t heard any Republican Senators accuse Biden of being a rapist.
You're very far off with the several thousand I'm afraid.
This is how government works. If you believe everything Obama or hell any other president did that didn't look to change how things are done then go ahead and tell me I can straw man you if you like.
Weapons aren t always used for war. Weapons can be used to prevent war.
Holy shit Vermont
The only time anyone needs to call that nerd is if they need assistance buying Mon jeans.
I can't even believe how stupid the god dam Democrats are to actually continue to call it Obama care. You really expect these people to stop being petty these are the same people that do shit like the gov of Florida. Dude turned down 2. 3 billion dollars for the state high speed rail like a bullet train and the reason he said in record was because he didn't want to take a hand out from Obama. He blocked his state from being given alot of money for something that would greatly benefit them because they didn't want people to be thankful. And Nancy and all of them know this. If we would just call it trump care then we would all have healthcare. but we all stood by pelosi when she kept the government shut down so she could act tough and tell the muppet no It's very clear that the Democrats can do whatever they fucking want as long as they let trump get credit for it. Kim Kardashian is the only one that has taken advantage of this.
Aight boss. Pleasure talking to you too.
This is one of the most coherent and reasonable responses to this crisis on this sub that I ve read. It s a refreshing break from the I don t care if people die I wanna go to chilies
The memory has been corrupted since 2015. You can still tell where you are but none of it makes any sense. Guess someone pulled a buffer overflow on us.
Honestly the whole of the Trump cabinet is a joke. They ll go down as one of the worst cabinets in the history of the US.
Oh so you're a Bernie supporter mad that biden won.
It takes even more cake when you remember that wealthy New York helps subsidize several decrepit red states and yet is getting the shaft on this rare occasion when it's requesting something in return.
That happened I m sure.
Oh you bet your ass it was and still prolly is. Where else would your tax dollars go. Just leave it to a room full of govt employees to get nothing done.
Cool.
this this this. 1 000 times this please post this wherever you can. and thank you.
Expiration dates of 2010 Weird that Trump would spend money on useless gear. Or maybe be lied about the stock piles being empty because this is shit he should be maintaining and didn't while he's been in office. This is like every initiative of his. He wants it off the ground the second be screams it into his phone to post on Twitter. They me never bothered checking any of the equipment before sending it out. So many people are going to die unnecessarily because Trump can't seem incapable of caring.
gt If you oppose stopping 3M you have to oppose the lockdown as well to be consistent. I was gonna disagree but you aren't wrong. Rights mean nothing anymore the government can at least be consistent about that fact.
The only thing the military is very effective at is syphoning public money into private purses. It's a bunch of teenagers playing dress up with guns with a few psychopaths at the top who weren't smart enough or enjoyed killing to much to get out early.
gt The current data shows its closer to 1 of infected dying as a result so factually it's vastly lower than 1 20 It's not 1 for a person with asthma you silly goose. Even still would you take a plane trip if you knew it had a 1 chance of crashing gt Getting a new job may not be your choice. Been at a public sector job for a decade. Very very safe. Unlikely to be fired from it. But even if so them's the breaks. gt Maybe your furnace breaks or a sewage line under your house. Not on sewage. In the country so on septic. If the furnace breaks I can probably fix it. Even if not them's the breaks you know. gt or have to get supplies to fix something eventually. Lots of which can be mail ordered. gt But I get it you're fearful like lots of people are. You can't outrun a virus that's why they've been so successful. You keep presenting these scenarios that are all maybes Yeah maybe something like that happens. But they probably won't Not in 18 months anyway. I don't need to outrun the virus. I just need to outlast the pandemic. Ie once the pandemic has run its course or until a vaccine is available.
gt Which reiterates that calling it the Chinese Virus is just inaccurate. Nope. It's possible that the Spanish flu isn't from Spain but we know the Chinese flu is from China. They've even tracked it down to a particular wet market IIRC. gt Then you try to argue from the standpoint of omg they say its racist durrrr Here are the ethnicities of China Chinese isn't a race. Uh yeah. Han is a race. It's other people saying that this is all about Chinese people and how it's racist. I don't think that it's racist to call something from China Chinese Talk to those people. gt So you proved yourself wrong that the left has the argument of race. Leftists in this very thread have called it racist. Media types all over TV have called it racist. Your gaslighting attempts aren't going to work. gt And you proved yourself wrong by linking that comment that shows it may not have even originated in China. That was for the Spanish flu. Hahahahahaha. You thought that their conversation about the Spanish flu on wikipedia was about the Chinese flu Keep on trucking indeed.
That's ridiculous everyone knows his species lays eggs
It was a Republican governor who set it up they sold the mobile hospitals also.
Usually I am one for thinking our president should be more presidential. In this particular case though I think the letter is spot on.
Oh yeah that's what I'm saying Gov. Gretchen Whitmer. If it was all about politics his childish tiffs with Democratic govenors shouldnt He needs purple states like MI no matter what.
The lead isn't great enough that it can't easily be the other way around. Why doesn't Biden realize that we need Bernie's policies now more than ever and shift his campaign over to Bernie If it's life or death go with the candidate that has a focus on saving lives of everybody.
Imagine posting Charlie Kirk unironically. All this boy does is post memes and fake facts
Pence may not be the best person but he is at least competent and I think he s also ethical. At least compared to Trump.
Mushmouthing LMAO
I heard Joe thought the whole stimulus package was just one big check like when you win the lottery. And then it was driven to the bank to be deposited. Then Trump signed each check as it was written from the White House check book.
But what if its mexican children can do it better
Right so you re fine with just saying fuck 42 of the country According to the CDC they say that 42 of Americans are obese. There is obviously a cultural problem in America that has lead to this statistic but in the meantime don t you think that the worlds greatest country should take preventative actions to protect a large portion of its tax paying citizens I respectfully do not agree with your statement.
Petition to remove Trump from office by invoking the 25th Amendment change.org recruiter 1070699099 amp utm source share petition amp utm medium twitter amp utm campaign share petition amp recruited by id 45554310 7623 11ea 8b1d 1d7a70865254
what we re talking about abortion here not murder
Stfu and get me a screwdriver.
It is just so damn sad how Trump treats America s friends and allies like its worst enemies and its worst enemies as treasured friends
Yep because patriotism is only for conservatives because your politicians co opted it for votes
Hi GaryHartman Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted and Already Submitted I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u GaryHartman amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
Mine says Cthulhu 2020 why vote for a lesser evil But I m having second thought about Drumpf being the lesser evil.
My president said it's not that serious Off to the megachurch
If they become US citizens first I don't see a problem with that and I can already fill out an absentee ballot and vote via mail in my state which is a red state so idk why he thinks this would hurt republicans
Oh ya I forgot Americans can't do anything without foreign workers... my bad. P
If she still possessed a clitoris it would be getting hard as fuck seeing all the infidels dying.
I think you need a prescription for it. I don't think is over the counter so yea not for home use.
Orange Man Bad Orange friends too
They did and then they got banned from future briefings.
Absolutely not. Medical and economic problems only please. Political bullshit right now Get out.
maybe he'll get the virus chopped up and thrown away too
Disagree. We should increase the increase the standards on which we let people into this country i.e prevent tech companies from exploiting H1B visas but stopping skilled immigration is a very very bad idea. The CEOs of many of the most valuable tech companies are Indian for example. Hell the founder of Instacart which is an 8 billion dollar company that helps grocery stores deliver food is Indian. There are many other entrepreneurial people from other countries in Asia and Europe that should be welcomes here with open arms. Some of the people coming here to the US came here to take advantage of the free market entrepreneurial spirit of this country. They're better here then somewhere else.
We aren't a free democracy anymore. It's over.
No you re wrong. Stop making stupid claims.
Like I said read replies before commenting please.
Schools are paid for largely by property taxes and while illegal folks might not own a lot of property they do rent and the folks that rent to illegals do pay property takes. Roads are paid for largely by gas taxes.
No it doesn't seem irrelevant.
There is no point in arguing with these morons. To them it's Bernie and everyone else is the same. They completely ignore any sort of nuance because they are butt hurt that their candidate fucking lost.
The sun hurts people the government needs to lock us all up so we don't have the choice to put ourselves in danger.
Holy shit dude that is one of the most naive views on mental illness I ve seen. Just because someone takes their medication doesn t mean they don t still have to deal with aspects of their mental illness. Not only that there are also mental illness that can t be treated by just giving them some pills to pop.
The 1900s is wrong. It wasn t the Spanish Flu the most infectious disease was Socialism.
So my question in all of this is whether this is simply bad for Loeffler and good for Collins or if it gives any benefit to the Democratic challenger. I bet Kemp is kicking himself in the ass right now though. He defined Trump to nominate Loeffler because he thought she would appeal to suburban women a crucial demographic that was a big part of the 2018 sweep of the House. Based on recent polling she now has no chance against Collins so Kemp essentially made the choice for no gain because apparently no Republican can be trusted I've only heard of one case of a Democrat's Husband trading on COVID related stocks but she was in the process of telling everyone the sky was falling so it's a little different though I still thing members of the House Senate and Cabinet should be required to have any holdings and stock in bling trusts but that's a different issue
Im not a huge fan of his love for ones government. Personally Americanism is the ideals that make us a free country and the rights that are protected by our constitution. One of those rights is the ability to criticize the government and vote people out of it if I so choose. Therefore to me an American is somebody who does not feel obligated to love ones government but instead love ones rights.
Conservatives don't like facts also they don't fact check anything lmao
I want a commission on the people bitching that intentionally causing Great Depression II is somehow not responsive enough.
It would be a good idea if we resolved the crisis before the Demodummies engaged in more witch hunts.
Member when news was unbiased Shit neither do I.
18 an hour doesn't go very far today. There also likely isn't health insurance tied to the job. The work is also only for a few months so how can people find stable work People arent lazy they just arent getting enough to make it sustainable so desperate people like foreign workers are the only people who will do these jobs and that is how the industry is setup. Raise wages protect workers and maybe you'll see more people interested in this kind of work.
Gotta love the delicious irony of these conservatives downvoting you for saying the exact shit they parrot all the time. Pulling yourself up by your bootstraps only applies to other people.
What about the roof Seems like even more room.
I moved from Massachusetts to Tennessee because I was tired of fighting against the liberal mindset and system. I love New England and the history that my ancestors were a part of but that s just not a place that I m willing to raise my family in. We love it down here. Our Sheriff made a formal statement about the steps to prevent the spread of the Corona Virus and in it he cited Philippians 4. I was so impressed. I m grateful to live in a place where the Word of God is still a part of the culture and traditional conservative values are still honored.
They only stand guard 40 hours a week. They do take shelter if needed from bad weather. I think it s far less stressful and demanding than what most of our military does.
We were off a little but orange man still bad.
She'd be easier to ignore if she was deported.
Don't believe it. He likes attention and if he was truly that sick he wouldn't be on TV all day
Rape allegations moved the goal posts before it was yeah he isn't extreme enough but hopefully he'll have a proper healthcare plan.
Exactly what I was saying
Matt Walsh is underrated
I'll never understand why gop decide to close their eyes and let this nightmare become bigger and uncontrollable.
You are a horrible human being.
Cuba is and often is sending doctors to help other countries aljazeera.com Now they need help and we're blocking it from getting to them.
Disinvestment. Laws preventing them from buying up property in the west. tightening up visa requirements. Exposing their infiltration into our political process. Needs no wars.
There s also the whole federal government stepping in and either outbidding seizing shipments to Massachusetts thing. So the patriots flew in masks from China on a jet. That s the the state of our country right now.
None in Wisconsin either.
As a journalism student I don t think that I should ever be making public policy unless elected by my constituents. How can you have the constitutional conservative flair and disregard elections
16 lbs is 7. 26 kg
Trump has an amazing talent for finding a way to be a dirtbag in every situation.
It used to be pretty good. There was also shop class auto class and home ec. Guess people didn t want to pay as much in taxes and they got cut.
Because biologically a baby that has just started to grow is the same as one about to come out. That's the whole point and that's why the belief that it's murder exists. Once the baby begins to grow it has its own DNA and is indistinguishable genetically from when it is about to be born. Killing it early doesn't make it not killing it. There's no timer for when it isn't human.
At a death rate of 1 24 million people would have to be infected. At 20 000 new cases a day it would take 1200 days. Too many variables
I hate mean testing that doesn't take into account cost of living
There is a higher incidence of hurricanes in Florida than in any other US state. There is also a higher concentration of Cuban Americans in Florida than in any other US state. This means that Cuban Americans are at a greater risk of being hit by a hurricane than any other ethnicity and all Cuban Americans should be given extra protection against hurricanes. That is your exact argument except the names are different. The etiological and clinical linkages are only between underlying conditions and bad outcomes from COVID 19. We can sit here and do Three Degrees of Bacon with correlation all we want.
It's been a bullshit feedback loop for years.
America can't have...
There's a subreddit for coronavirus news... it's called r coronavirus. Also politics has historically been a mix of opinion and news so you'll never not see opinions here
That woman looks like she was wanting to divorce her husband since 2012. She s also a Democrat who hates Trump. She likely murdered her husband.
As soon as I kept hearing Zoom I knew it had to be seriously flawed. I hadn t really heard of it until the lockdown. I kept telling people that Skype and FaceTime are still things that work. Hell Google has like 3 4 apps. Why the need to start mass using another app that wasn t well established
And reopening it would be tantamount to admitting it was wrong to close it in the first place.
They say it will enable voter fraud. Of course...
Ah yes great words of hope right there.
Silver lining...
This is so dumb. Of the models are extrapolations of infection rates when everyone is walking around. Please stop politicizing the hell out of this.
Great the president sees a pandemic and decides hey im not getting enough attention right now and retaliates against another impeachment person
Well obviously farmers are essential. Maybe I'm reading between the lines a little too much here but I don't really think that's the question you're asking because the answer is obvious farmers make the food that we need so of course they're essential. What I think you're trying to ask is since you mentioned illegal aliens is do we think that the illegal aliens working on these farms are essential. For the time being they probably are simply because they're not going away tomorrow and we're in the middle of a viral pandemic this means that they wouldn't be so easily replaced in the immediate future. So I guess the answer to that question is yes too. However it's not essential to have illegal aliens working on these farms as a general solution in the long term. What I find a little ironic from the left is that they'll simultaneously make the argument that we need a 15 hour minimum wage because people need to be able to afford to live while also making the claim that we need to allow illegal immigrants working jobs like these to stay. What are illegal immigrants not good enough to earn a decent living Why do we accept unlivable wages for illegal immigrants They have families and bills too. That's not even the worst of it so now in addition to pricing people out of the job market due to the fact that their labor isn't worth the amount that employers would be required to pay under minimum wage laws you create a scenario where you bring in a bunch of people who you don't have to pay as much. You've left employers with no choice but to hire illegal labor in these cases. They've screwed everyone from people here legally who could have negotiated a wage from farmers to the farmers themselves for having to hire illegal labor in order to keep labor costs low enough to keep the price of their goods in a reasonable range to the illegal worker themselves for being the only option in a black labor market in order to get work. What kind of workers' rights and protections do you think they'll have In the here and now yes. They're essential due to a peculiar circumstance. In the long term farmers are obviously still essential but illegal labor is not especially if you look to reform restrictive laws with regards to hiring legal labor.
I think that's why Ruth Ginsburg is making such a show of working out in the supreme court gym. She's saying I'm not scared. I'm here. Let's do this. Robert's is a joke. He's a partisan hack trying to act like a middle of the road kinda guy. The problem is he is a terrible actor. I keep hearing Robert's cares about the legacy of the court But he clearly doesnt. He wants the court to fail just like every republican wants the government to be small enough to drown in a bathtub great choice of imagery for the party of life by the way They dont want the judiciary to work because if it did it would prove that it could. They dont want the legislature to work because if it did it would prove that it could work. They dont want the executive to be competent because if he was it would prove that it could work. The people who thump the bible the hardest are the ones who havent read it and the ones who hug the flag the most are the ones that dont understand what it means.
gt I suspect if we had ranked choice Bernie supporters would make Trump their second choice out of spite. Are you basing this on something or just talking out of your ass
Man I'm real sorry I don't know how I missed the meat of what you showed me in this reply. To much to pay attention too and on too many devices. I completely missed the part where it wasn't the Captain who went to press with this. My bad mea culpa.
Thanks man
it's super early stages of trials and in every trial done so far there's increased mortality and issues with the fact that it's an immunosuppressant even at mild dosages. I took it for 18 months and ended up in the ER with a fever six times.
They're actually starting trials to see if hydroxychloroquine can prevent COVID 19 in first responders. If it works it works. Why the two minutes hate
This is exactly how the average American feels. Thank you.
There is another factor.. America is very agriculturally independent. We don't rely on any other country for food that's a big deal. We shouldn't allow our farmers to fail and become dependent on other nations for food.
Correct. It has very weak evidence that it does anything at all but since we have nothing else we use it in desperation. It s not a cure I have patients who are on the drug and die anyway including today.
What kind of title is that.... Threatens
Is Chris Cuomo exaggerating Haha good one as if does anything else
The CDC always has about 2 000 less deaths than this site does. Don t know who is correct just noting the fact.
It's a difficult balance. It's like trying to play the stock market where's the peak Where's the low We need to open up the economy again ASAP but the peak in my state isn't estimated until early May and in most cases it's not til the end of April. If we go back to work too early we'll have to do this all over again if it's too late the economy is dead.
What too much bottled up rage
Yes. What kind of silly question is that
Thx
Sorta looks like Truman
While paying state sales tax right Is that the point the libtards are trying to say
I heard that they did this
gt She is only called anti semetic because she supports BDS and doesn't support Isreal. Oh no. She hates Jews period. She sometimes uses anti Zionism as an excuse but she's made it exceedingly clear she hates all Jews everywhere.
Yeah just watch the videos in Italy all the critical patients are obese. It's not going to look pretty in the USA. What I'm wondering with all the private hospitals how many deaths are being hidden so as not to tarnish their image and bottom line
Hitler was attempting to save lives of non jews also
Unfortunately Politics mods say they do produce real news even it biased
It s not comparable to HIV AIDS. Both are completely different diseases they spread differently have different symptoms strain healthcare govt resources in different ways etc. And Reagan s handling of HIV AIDS was abismal.
Let's see.. I can't picture Shapiro using a grill for anything promoting human trafficking defending nazis or communists.. That leaves watching catgirl porn. Are we sure he's not libleft edit this was a joke guys
They are ineffective.
Yeah it s not like I still have to FUCKING WORK from home while also watching an 18 month old. I actually have less time.
Buuuuuut weren t they harassing first I m not saying an eye for an eye is necessarily an OK thing but you know actions have consequences. If you mess with people eventually they re going to retaliate even if it s wrong to do so. Right Or am I wrong here
Not sure where you're data is coming from. lol the majority of trump voters are non college educated whites. amp x200B https www.people press.org 2018 08 09 an examination of the 2016 electorate based on validated voters https www.people press.org 2018 08 09 an examination of the 2016 electorate based on validated voters
Thankfully we already have a good leader.
I listened to the feedback I've been getting that none of my facts were actually fun.
No way. Portland police don't arrest leftists. I think the mayor made that illegal.
God damn there are a lot of stupid ignorant shits on this sub
This was my favorite part. gt They were gray. They were metal like a ship or something military. And the truth is mankind cannot survive long term in such a Spartan bleak environment.
It is not legal nor okay to knowingly give someone HIV. What are you talking about The punishment was recently downgraded because HIV is no longer considered a deadly disease. It is no longer terminal so it is no longer akin to murder. The punishment must match the crime. Thats how our wonderful legal system works. futurism.com nbcnews.com
Another Friday night massacre. How many of his firings has been on Friday night end of news cycle Mind boggling
Nope
Get this conspiracy theory shit the fuck out of here you're making us look retarded.
Yet Floridians will elect these same corrupt and or incompetent politicians again next time.
The White House instead rejected the prospect of allowing new sign ups across the 38 Affordable Care Act marketplaces it controls
They re not sending them to MS. We can t afford them.
He won according to rules that were considered archaic when Bush 2 won. He won sure enough we are reminded every hour that he sits in the oval office. But the reason he obsesses over his victory is because it wasnt real. He didnt have that mandate of the people that he needed. He shoved his foot into the glass slipper but everyone can clearly see that it doesnt fit. Then he lost the house. The heel on that slipper has some cracks in it.
Surprise Its gonna do this over and over again until people stop being arrogant idiots.. looking at you murica
Sure he has a point but this man tried to steel our porn That is all we have in these tough times
We don't need to drill our own oil. There's plenty of other countries that would gladly sell us theirs. I'm not sure I follow your line of thought.
Lmao and he had to go out of his way too it s not like Reddit is a conservative based site lol
It's not a No True Scotsman fallacy it's more like Why is that Scotsman flying a Saint George's Cross truism. Many things Evangelicals believe in were dismissed as heresies during the Council of Hippo the Nicene Council and other church councils.
Doesn't seem like a fascist move at all.
Well she should go talk to the Chinese Government then and see what their response will be.
What he means is expanded mail in voting... essentially federally mandated and allows for ballot harvesting en.wikipedia.org First off the Federal Government should have no business dictating to the states on how to run their elections unless the State is doing something constitutionally prohibited Second off Ballot Harvesting has HUGE HUGE potential for fraud.
Bezos is taking over the world. Monopoly needs to be broken up.
gt You're comparing 3 games to a whole season. That's some idiot level shit stop doing it. I'll spoon feed it to you again. I'm trying to be helpful but you're proving my point about the argument for me.
His voter registration wouldnt change.
They've been disapproving of his job performance for almost 4 years and not a dma thing has been done.
gt I didn't mention the media or congress or anything. No but the original post did. Try to keep up. gt Cuomo or NYC or anything You mentioned ventilators. Cuomo and NYC are the ones requesting the ventilators you mentioned. gt Let's stop with this left right fighting because it s not doing anyone any good. I'm just correcting your bullshit. If you don't want to be confronted regarding your partisan bullshit stop spewing it. Nothing you have said here has been in anyway productive. You should take your own advice.
I believe that Schiff will also be leading an inquiry into the coronavirus response. That will be some horrible and fascinating shit.
Dude. You are repeatedly spamming this same submission. For that reason we are not going to approve it. Submit something ONCE... the mods will take a look and see if it's okay. Don't submit something FOUR or more times
I know there's a danger in that complacency but at a certain point I can only get outraged so many times. Agreed I can will vote.
He is such a joke as big a joke if not bigger than his brother
I m not talking about Putin. I m talking about how he gets all goofy in love with the Kim Jong Uns and Dutertes of the world. He acts like a total Bitchass fanboy when he gets around dictators we ve all seen it. I believe there s def something going on w him and Russia by it the Dems have lost their minds about it and it s lost any meaning. I ve been called VLAD more times than I can count for not supporting Biden.
I don t want to sound inhumane this crisis is horrific and barring any benefit I wish it had never happened however Trump has a distinct advantage here because he s a leader in a time of crisis. If the crisis is still going on in November a lot of swing voters will look for steady leadership and that won t come from a transition of power. If it s not then Trump can say he helped save the country which itself is great optics.
Shoot the legislature and Bondi. And Scott.
Academic navel gazing is nonessential luckily. Sweatpants and naps and only slightly more homebody asocial behavior than normal
This is in the conservatives subreddit For as much as the Republicans like to call themselves The Party of Lincoln they don't really know much about what he's done. He suspended the Bill of Rights during the Civil War. People were held without charge for undisclosed amounts of time.
I'm surprised we haven't seen bank runs.
When you realise conservatives in other countries support Universal healthcare and there are conservative Americans fighting to keep healthcare expensive during a pandemic.
First off most people in NYC dont live 18 miles from their job. In fact it's only about 18 miles wide. Second for those people that work in the city but live on say long island well that's what the Long Island Express is for.
Worse they've sunk to Weekly World News levels of dishonesty.
I'd be fine with that That's when a kick ass movie called the matrix came out
Impeach. Now. Before it s too late. Then impeach again.
gt Gimme some ideas big boy Quaking in your boots like a bitch seems to be working fine for you. Why bother
gt A full rollback of the limit on the state and local tax deduction or SALT would provide a quick cash infusion in the form of increased tax rebates to an estimated 13 million American households nearly all of which earn at least 100 000 a year. nytimes.com
The difference between this and the danger of everyday life is that it is a guarantee that people breaking quarantine will lead to more people dying. And China has every vested interest in not shutting down their cities even moreso than any other nation I can think of. If even they are doing it it is clear that not doing so would have drastic consequences.
Trump Haters Are Claiming a Huge I Told You So' Moment With the Coronavirus Outbreak
The US is not a democracy it s a constitutional republic. Why should anyone have to pay taxes for another government program. Just have people bring in an ID DL and a piece of mail with the same address.
As a VP Biden had more impact then a senator from Vermont. What is it Biden would have accomplished if Obama had not picked him we know what Bernie has done since 2008 but it's unclear without being hand picked by Obama if Biden would have had an impact. Are you trying to argue that if Bernie was Obama's VP he wouldn't have pushed for or accomplished anything Your arguments are all based on getting things done without acknowledging to get things done you need to have the power to do them or a following.
Funny how that era in Obama s legacy isn t mentioned much.
Who would've thought The Corona virus is racist.
Sorry for the C word for those sensitive to it. AOC Arrogant Obstinate Cunt
A cloth mask is the bare minimum of better than nothing They wear masks in Asia for a multitude of reasons and normal bugs aren t nearly as insidiously communicable as this virus is. By all means do whatever makes you feel better but like I pointed out it can last in the air for 3 hours and you could walk through a cloud of it with zero people around and it s going to be on your clothes skin and get in your eyes. Simply put it is only going to increase your protection minimally. Yes it will block the coughs of someone who has it but that sick person is still touching stuff and it still comes out of the mask just not 6ft I m just saying if this government would have actually acted as if they cared and got production going 2 months ago there would be better masks for retail. To actually beat this thing back the public is going to need the medical masks and eye protection in the long run
It just works Dodd Toward
They absolutely do not pay the same as we do or more. They put as many dependents as they can on the W 4 form so they can have the absolute minimum of taxes withheld from their paycheck. Then they don't file income tax in April because they are using a stolen SSN. They pay as little as possible on income taxes.
Have you actually listened to this guy He sounds like the wanker that always tells other people to do shit and then slinks away.
youtu.be Watch the whole thing. Trump wasn t the one telling people to go outside when he enacted the travel ban.
You act as if I have said that this isn't a serious situation that should be taken very seriously. I totally agree it is. Does that give the government the legal and moral right to do whatever
I m on board with fuck China too but also fuck the slow response and early denials from this administration. Even fucking Dubya would have done better.
KAG 2020 loser
Habeas
I ve heard some people think Oregon tastes like dog food
As an American I too have a very low opinion of America. And to all of those nuts who love saying love it or leave don't worry I'm working on it.
Name 3.
People need to stop comparing this to the flu. The type of symptoms you get is the only similarity. This virus is much more lethal because you can go from fine to deal in a sweet shitty period and the rate it spreads is nearly exponential compared to influenza. Please stop spreading this. Nobody has immunities to it. It can cause you to develop acute pneumonia and you will probably die because of ventilator shortage and the extreme overload of our healthcare system.
My grandfather served in WWII I asked his thoughts on joining the military when I was graduating high school in the early 2000's He said the military during war time can be a good cause the military during peace time is a whole different thing and not in a good way.
How about 600 maybe 300 per week
Eh for those taking it seriously this is what you call a straw man argument
Note people defending Feinstein but not Loeffler even though they both claim to have a blind trust. They need to send better shills.
an asshole has a use. this man has no use.
These headlines aren t even click bait anymore. He won t resign. This isn t a question of human decency. Ration thought does not govern this decision making process.
Thank you I love finding little bits of unity between our two sides like absolutely hating Joe Biden XD
You don t have to take them back show them the moderate Democrat party they want to take there guns and silence there speech but where the nazis
Given that Vancouver Island is a major producer of the fibre needed to make masks and other surgical equipment I ve seen sole producer but haven t confirmed that I would imagine we have some clout here. So it probably wouldn t be a good move for Trump to act rashly which means of course that he likely will.
Didn't do anything is a complete lie fabricated by mainstream media and the democrats. Trump established the task force and assigned 2. 5B USD to combat the coronavirus by the end of January. He closed the border to the most affected countries in early February. The local outbreaks are a result of democrat mayors and governors continuing to virtue signal and talking about racism The CDC advised social distancing in early February. On the federal level everything was done correctly.
You're not the boss no matter how much you want to be.
Yeah. He has a floor of 40. When it gets below that. That s when his people are pissed Or they died because of the trump pandemic.
They sure stole mine for employment. Nothing like having to wait on hold for hours to clear that shit up.
So maybe Tom Cotton s crazy conspiracy story is right. Not only did China develop and leak a bioweapon the Trump administration helped them do it.
Trump is a dangerous fascist dictator who can be removed just by beating him in an election.
Bro im sorry to break it to you but this oath doesn't exist
So true. Media only reports when story or Virus affects a republican.
gt There are millions of Americans who only go to the doctor once a year for their completely covered checkup. There are also millions of Americans that are healthy and opted to pay the fine under the ACA than pay for health insurance because it was cheaper than coverage. Elimination of premiums means fuck all to those people because they aren t a problem. all of those people pay into medicare to cover the elderly already and eventually will need to see the doctor more. this is an investment in their futures everyone will be better off when their healthcare isn't tied to their jobs we'll have more ability to switch jobs and employers will have less leverage over their employees. not to mention it will save the lives of 70k people every year. i am unconvinced that this will hurt any working class people i'll have to ask you to site that study. how can we pay more than every other developed country and get worse results and still have people think that we're the ones doing it right that's insanity. everyone is doing healthcare better than us we need to follow their example and institute universal healthcare
So only 10 women in NYC area had babies only 10 heart attacks None of this makes any sense to me.
Just an FYI for anyone visiting this I got a trojan alert from Avast due to one of the ads served on this page when I clicked the link. The name had Card stealer in it.
A few people are asymptomatic. gt This virus is not and has never been a death sentence. For the majority of people of all ages Could be if hospitals literally run out of beds to treat one
This is sort of ironic considering the main comment of this thread is a guy calling this sub a bunch of heartless assholes
Wasted taxpayer dollars to cheat at golf. FTFY
I hate Idaho a resident sadly
And again that isn t creating the crisis.
Because it's the same stuff that every other late night host says and most of the time it is based on false premises
Have you even looked at his vacation home It's a small cottage that he inherited. He owns a small department in DC like every politician and that has one other mid sized home that is his own. That's it that's all. Compared to most politicians it's nothing.
Troll
vdare.com
Nope CNN never lies.
It is if you kill somebody and spreading the virus is killing people so therefore it s kind of illegal to be an asshole who can t just watch Netflix like everybody else.
gt At least if you choose to interpret it as neither candidate won the Electoral College And how do you think AG Barr and the SC will choose to interpret that
Asking trump not to fuck something up is like asking a scotsman not to fight while drunk
Your sources are hilarious.
It would be good to get Fox News lawyers to say we don't warrant anything we are just entertainment then cut that into 30 second ads and but spots on Fox News to run it and if they refuse sue again.
Imagine if you knew what right now meant
And yet zero crimes were included in impeachment... Sorry you guys failed miserably at overturning democracy.
gt his supporters not sure if you noticed but in real life he doesn't seem to have very many supporters. seems like a lot online because you can't filter out the foreigners and kids that can't vote.
I m not really meaning to bash him either people seem to think he should make al the decisions and I m just pointing out he s not omniscient.
That s Madam House Speaker Pelosi to you.
To be fair....I don't think they know for sure yet. I'm reading some things that are saying that possibly you can just get it from BREATHING around someone who has it who is also breathing.
Why are you being so hostile I was responding to someone saying illegal immigrants dont pay anything towards taxes. From what I ve found out they may be a net drain but the cost needed to enforce immigration laws is far more of a drain and isnt even guaranteed to work. If you have any information that show otherwise I d be happy to learn. Like I said I m interested in facts. I pledge allegiance to this country not any political affiliation no I m not a liberal
Not doing that at all That is literally exactly what Biden is doing He's already adopted Bernies tuition free college for students of families making under 125K AND he's adopted Warren's bankruptcy policy. That's literally what you're asking for and he's coming through with it. Bernie and Warren are already pushing him more left.
Yeah and those broken CoronaVirus tests right s
It is good to know what their priorities are.
1200 isn't enough for Podunk Mississippi. Minimum wage should be a living wage. Fight me.
Someone should do a study of what workers who get paid under the table would need to earn legally to get the same post tax income.
Not an issue the free market will put an end to that
Same here in Brazil all media is super pro CCP.....
I don't think you understand what he's saying.
of what you telling me you can't see the bias in Wikipedia Why is it that the far left can't think for themselves They need som far leftt source to tell them what to believe it doesn't matter what they're seeing They need somebody to TELL them what they're supposed to believe
That basically boils down to well he doesn't know what he said but Donald appointed him
Sanders intellectually and morally bankrupt This coming from some little twit who voluntarily had sex with Mark Wahlberg.
It's not our fault that no one wants to work in bumfuck nowhere except for the foreign workers you complain about. At least they see your shitty as town as a beacon of hope for their new lives in a great country. But wait no you just go and shit on the people who are actively trying to save your life.
s from my browser history from my Google search Why did you refer to the transcripts plural when speaking about one transcript Is it because you have a go to line you spew instead of debating with brains Brainpower takes effort to use I know obesity is a burden.
I honestly can't believe a post calling minorities too fucking stupid has upvotes.
Right. So can we mandate one term only for senators and lessen the power of McConnell's position We cannot do much about the idiots.
Why do you love that
Still the primary. Maybe spend your energy on getting Bernie elected if thats truly what you think rather than forcing a surrender now.
Trickle up disobedience
Too bad our employer is forced to take our taxes out before we get paid.
Democrat here like legit nobody hates plastic bags. This is such a ridiculous strawman.
Where did they get the tests When was the first infection. I may have missed it in the article.
Right. Like they never know the rundown of their entire scripted show from minute to minute.
Sorry I m not in the US. Just going by what I read
Apparantley Biden thinks it
Massachusetts Is Not Happy' Warren Condemns Trump for Outbidding States Seizing Key Medical Supplies March 31 President Trump declares major disaster in Massachusetts over coronavirus March 28 Why Does This Administration Have Its Grubby Fingerprints on a Casino Controversy in Massachusetts March 30 Trump administration revokes tribe s reservation status in power grab March 30 Trump says hes working to get protective supplies to Massachusetts March 29
Don't worry it's only 2. 5 9 11s
None. A doctor urging the President asking all no problem. The governor ordering is a violation of my right to freely assemble my right of association and my 9th amendment right to do whatever the fuck I please.
He's such an idiot he doesn't even begin to comprehend the question argument any reasonable defense. He's an idiot people. It's sad. Sad for our country. I gave you a perfect answer you know it. What a cretin.
has there been any increases in crime because of the virus
Right are you familiar with the BCCI scandal You need to be if you think you are informed enough to go around trying to tell people what s what especially concerning situations involving the CIA Stefan Halper and Robert Mueller. Here s a good start. You should probably actually do some research on that PROMIS scandal too btw as it is in fact all related. fas.org
Drinking and jacking off same as before the lockdown.
All of them assuming you have the right opinions
Democrat priorities. What planet are they living on
hOw ArE wE gOnNa pAy FoR tHaT
I highly suggest watching south park the movie
hey believe what you want pal you're going to hell for supporting a dementia addled rapist at the cost of everyone that needs medicare for all to live. I'm not a democrat and i never was despite voting for one in every election so it'll be a cold day in hell before i accept this lesser of two evils garbage from you or anyone else again.
Oh you mean Obama Ouch oh shit ouch Someone please help me my eyes rolled so hard I think they broke loose from the stem. I hope my insurance covers sarcasm related injuries
Smacks of proto fascism I agree.
Currently we re at 2. 5 of total cases. If what Dr. Fauci suggested the other day happens and 85 95 of the country gets the virus... 2018 estimated population 327. 2M 90 of that 294. 48M 2. 5 of those people 7 362 000 Fuck. I suppose in this circle of hell 240 000 is a good outcome.
This isn't business. This is pandemic
Hilarious article
I would even go further than that. I would think you should have to pass a basic civics test before you should be allowed to vote.. if you don't know anything about the candidates you're voting for then why exactly should you be allowed to vote for them The whole point of voting is that you're making a decision about the future of the country. but if you didn't bother to educate yourself on what you're even deciding then maybe you shouldn't be allowed to..
The way to make change right now is to elect Biden and then fight like hell to make that change happen. If public pressure primarily emanating from the left could stop the Republicans from repealing Obamacare which had been a rallying cry for them for years then surely we can apply that same pressure to a Biden administration and achieve some good results.
Yes but it's how we collapse that's important giving out 2000 checks sounds great till you remember that those checks have to come from someplace. Money isn't magical. If you burn it all up you've got nothing to work with in the future. Lots and lots of bubbles are bursting right now with more to come free money isn't the answer it's the issue. It's just keeping the bubbles that would pop from poping making it harder to deal with.
Well said.
Back to the drawing board.
gt He's holding on to them so when the red states start being affected he can step in like a hero and be their savior. That actually makes some sense and won't be surprised if he does exactly that.
I think firearms safety is the key point there. So many gun deaths are totally preventable. A huge portion wouldn't exist if every gun owner had their guns properly locked in safes and had been forced to undergo a training course. And yeah the people panic buying now are not going to be prioritizing safety and training.
Interesting. Do you know what tier plan she s on and what s covered I d assume it s super basic so heavier things like ICU would have something like a 60 40 out of pocket. Not trying to be dismissive I d just really like to know.
Half of us see it and are terrified. The other half are literally members of a cult and he's the leader.
holy shit didn't know yall had it so bad. how is that even possible
gt Also how come the government is allowed to lie to us but someone may legitimately misremember or omit something and the FBI throws the book at them Because the organization responsible for throwing the book at them is part of the same organization committing the crimes the DOJ. The bureaucracy in the DOJ is as corrupt as they day is long and they don't prosecute their own unless one of them tries to become a whistleblower
She should have decided to not be born in America lol does she even have personal responsibility.
The articles I'm reading don't dig back this far into the past so I'm unfamiliar with both PROMIS and BCCI. Are you implying that Barr is corrupt and just attempting another CYA cover up
They could probably get out of it. Closed cemetery amp pandemic. But they do not stop. The Tomb of the Unknowns have been guarded continuously since April 6 1948. abcnews.go.com
Yeah lmao
Right arm extended 45 degrees hand flat.
America failed long before trump took over. Country is fucked beyond repair in our life time.
I m not getting on the nuclear holocaust bandwagon but there is a very real potential of global economic destabilization which could indeed lead to wars as well as a million other horrifying things which you seem to be highly dismissive of here.
realDonaldTrump
My wife lost 18 lbs in 2 weeks in the first trimester of her pregnancy literally eating nothing. No way this ass hat lost 13 lbs in 3 days unless he cut off one of his legs.
I like how snopes says it s a mixture of true and false but then says he didn t say it was a hoax.
Well as long as only around 100 000 or so people die he's doing a good job. I mean what more could you really ask for It's not like he had time to prepare or anything. No one ever saw this coming. One day the world was turning the next everything was on fire.
If you really believe people think like this I am sad for you. No one wishes disease and death on anyone regardless of political affiliation.
They suck at this one why should they get a new one lol
So this basically means he s being replaced with someone who won t snitch on Trump when he commits felonies on an international level. Nice. s
I'm not. Anything else little fella
I have no problem with this
Someone coughing on you is much different than someone being outside. It's also different from someone coughing in public.
If the virus doesn't get them the mold will
Can confirm. Three gremlins and three dogs in a 1300 sq ft house... I know it s not a tiny space but it s sure starting to feel like it.
A kidnapping is also temporary. Doesn't make it good.
gt We are in the midst of a crisis with the coronavirus. We need to lead the way with science not Donald Trump s record of hysteria xenophobia and fear mongering. He is the worst possible person to lead our country through a global health emergency. gt gt Joe Biden JoeBiden February 1 2020 twitter.com ref src twsrc 5Etfw It appears that Joe was right on the money. Small wonder Breitbart is so butthurt.
Everything a man could want Is that what you want Where do you base your decision that everyone wants slavery
Why does the public need to know the names of the drugs
Didn't the official dr dispute this treatment method
A little event mentioned in the article gt The breathing assistance machines tended to be bulky expensive and limited in number. The plan was to build a large fleet of inexpensive portable devices to deploy in a flu pandemic or another crisis. gt Money was budgeted. A federal contract was signed. Work got underway. gt And then things suddenly veered off course. A multibillion dollar maker of medical devices bought the small California company that had been hired to design the new machines. The project ultimately produced zero ventilators. gt That failure delayed the development of an affordable ventilator by at least half a decade depriving hospitals states and the federal government of the ability to stock up. The federal government started over with another company in 2014 whose ventilator was approved only last year and whose products have not yet been delivered. Free market hard at work for you Big fish eat the little fish...
And since they have no reportable wages they qualify for all the state benefits.
Agreed and watching the video now.
You don t pay attention to politics then. They campaign on legislating your 2nd amendment away and to say they don t is completely ignorant. They attack gun rights constantly
Then the government should not be bailing out big businesses then. If we follow true free market then we should let them fail.
r MyCorona19
Yep because for some reason he thinks that projects strength when he slurs his words and can't stand still.
Poll majority of Romans now disapprove of Nero's fire response
No the system isn t broken. Go away. Your trolling is stupid. Find a sub that is accepting of economically illiterate lefties. You ll fit right in.
Lmao.
He's going to bring peace to the Middle East solve the opioid epidemic and save the world from Covid 19.
Well most landlords use rent money to pay off mortgages and things like that and since this will stop mortgages then there s no worry to the landlord. Also the landlords will also get the 2000. This isn t money to keep you afloat this is money so when America s wheels start turning again after the pandemic we will be in a more comfortable position to spend and get the economy rolling. It s called a stimulus package for a reason to stimulate the economy.
Bingo back in the 1700s everyone had a gun and you weren't hassled for it. Nowadays between overencroaching government and socially manipulated idiots you're looked at like some sort of monster for having a firearm. For God's sake it's a part of our cultural heritage.
Tanglewood sell quite decent full sized guitard for 80 100 new. So that's just not true.
If this was the law in the US it'd be fine. I think most liberals feel that way but don't trust the government here similarly how conservatives don't trust the government with healthcare etc.
gt The Republican Party has 3 wings. gt gt Establishment Mitch McConnell gt gt Libertarian Rand Paul gt gt 4chan Trump
So basically they turned into the hoarders that cops have been raiding for the past month or so Makes sense coming from this family
Why the s I've been downvoted and attacked in this very sub for suggesting that we shouldn't give up our rights for this.
Biden still thinks in person voting would be fine. They re happy sending you to your deaths to win the nomination.
Forget poker. He'd make a bad Old Maid player.
Talk about hyperbole. That s not happening in our country. Don t be an asshole. People that make arguments are why conservatives don t get taken seriously.
How the fuck is this not closer to zero
Well if we are gonna whataboutism if you support the government stepping in to shut down abortion clinics to save lives why not support a mandated stay at home policy in order to save lives
Its crazy to me that there are people in this world who think like this
I demand blue districts who had appropriate responses share 0 of the burden. Fuck them
Wouldn't have formed Civilizations were it not for farmers no Bronze Age no Iron Age ect.. at all. We can go back as far into ancient history as you want and cities are still shitpot incubators for pestilence and stupidity but do go on about how stacking millions of people on top of each other is a good thing for disease propagation and a cleaner environment.
gt I have not lost my job Then count your blessings and save your counsel for people you can actually help.
Fox News I am busy here building airports out of bamboo and dirt performing all the meaningless rituals. You are the problem for saying it won t work
I don't think it's inherently a bad choice. However it is certainly something that should be known. Oversight is a good thing.
Because Trump never did anything purely for the sake of revenge ever.
Why do that when someone from another country who can also pass the interview can do it for less
She s a piece of shit.
Come on man the endless Russia crap is just insane. There's tons of shady shit coming from them but trying to blame Putin for everything just waters down all the legitimate issues going on there.
Wuhan Virology Lab was experimenting on Horshoe Bats which are not native to the area COVID 19 is a man made virus China is covering it up.
I mean I d you ve got 24 chromosomes and loud noises make you feel better keep voting for these people who are happy to fuck you your family and your entire country to death. Be sure to shoot some rounds off in memory of your grandparents who will die drowning with their lungs full of fluids because republicans side with one single viewpoint you have and fuck you in every other way possible.
I'm seriously split as a Canadian. On one hand I don't like that a division between Canada and US will leave us both worse off and I'm friends with tons of Americans. But on the other hand I can't comprehend how Trump's favourability numbers in regards to COVID19 are still above water. Which says to me that Americans are fine with actions like these. Hell I actually follow quite a bit of American news and even the left winger channels are pissed that 3M won't bend the knee to the DPA. I'd love for our countries to heal after this is all over. It's a shame I was really hoping you guys were going to elect Sanders he was doing so well until that one day so he could drag Trudeau to the left on climate change.
I think at this point MSM and the CCP are pretty much on lockstep.
Trumps crimes are what damaged Americas reputation over seas. Not him getting impeached for them.
Huge this needs to be higher up
Don't worry. Trump is stealing masks back Whole shipments of thousands of masks that were bought by countries like Germany Canada and France where stolen on the way from the factories in Asia to there to be send to America instead.
Jesus Christ.. did you just compare the sun to a virus What kind of weak ass argument is that..
it s always something Or in Trumps case it s always somebody else
Is this the reference m.youtube.com v PwDU9aQNo5k
That quote has nothing to do with this situation as liberty had a completely different meaning in the 17 1800s. Probably the single most misused quote outside of the bible tbh.
Then there should be a mutiny if that can happen on land. I'm sure the Military is loving Trump right now.
They also have an overpopulated country smaller than the USA which has 1. 2 billion people. We have people living in this country where if we had that standard of 1. 25 miles to vote they'd be voting from home.
An A man can always choose to be a B man but a B man can only dream of being an A man. I just made it up in an attempt to play off your wife's wordplay ink but failed.
Well aren't sailors on average young and fit Most shouldn't even show symptoms and of the rest most should only have light ones. Hence theoretically that ship should remain somewhat operational. That said Captain Crozier is right here. There's no war. Not doing anything about this outbreak would be like not reversing a the ships course and doing a rescue mission when someone went overboard in the middle of the ocean because it's only one life at stake. That might be acceptable when you're avoiding an airstrike but definitely not under normal conditions.
Flies Or creeps
Hope it works out and doesn't turn into another bubble that crashes us into a depression.
Yes it is ours you dumb fuck. If it s not then maybe we should stop paying the fuckers.
And this is AFTER Trump has been warned that the Tribal nations are being hit hard. abcnews.go.com id 69884997
Well then it s probably a good thing that I hate Bill de Blasio lol. He s an idiot.
Name any example in history where power is given to the government bc of something and then is given back later...
They are requiring that you bank with them and have a loan from them already. They have no intention of handing out many loans. I bet few banks will be issuing many loans for this program. This is not going to work like some hope.
other subs have a lot of fascinating studies being published where determining fatality worldwide is probably between 0. 5 0. 8 overall. Under 1 at least.
A Task Force was formed on January 29th 2020 hitehouse.gov hitehouse.gov
Oh of course 100 and people are doing stuff like that all over the place. My point is that we re encouraged to stay away from each other and stay home. Lots of people want to help others and certainly are. So we re doing plenty as a community and I don t know of many people who have a fuck you got mine attitude
We are all fighting this disease together as humans. Isn't the best approach to ask 3M how to increase production ASAP and save lives while making their brand a rock star This is a huge missed opportunity.
From the article you linked gt During the presidency of Barack Obama the national stockpile was seriously taxed as the administration addressed multiple crises over eight years. About 75 percent of N95 respirators and 25 percent of face masks contained in the CDC's Strategic National Stockpile 100 million products were deployed for use in health care settings over the course of the 2009 H1N1 pandemic response according to a 2017 study doi.org in the journal Health Security. gt gt Again according to NIH the stockpile's resources were also used during hurricanes Alex Irene Isaac and Sandy. Flooding in 2010 in North Dakota also called for stockpile funds to be deployed. The 2014 outbreaks of the ebola virus and botulism as well as the 2016 outbreak of the zika virus continued to significantly tax the stockpile with no serious effort from the Obama administration to replenish the fund. gt gt During the presidency of Donald Trump analysts have warned the United States is not prepared for a serious pandemic. This idea that the Trump administration didn't know how many masks should have been in the stockpile is really reaching. Yes Obama should have restocked them and if this happened in 2017 we could be blaming him. However this is 2020 and Trump had 3 years to restock the shelves.
5 years till its under water
Correct
I am hotly anticipating this. eventually he's going to get into it for real with one of the reporters.
WHY ONLY DEMOCRATIC SENATORS Can someone explain to me when partisanship means you don t give a shit about ANYONE Last I checked there s LOADS of republicans living in democratic states why would republicans senators NOT care to look into this farce I get you don t want to cross Trump in certain issues but this is their constituents being impacted as well
I am not lying. He literally said he would veto a medicare for all bill if it made it to his desk. youtube.com v hTJnP0VctWY He has no interest in medicare for all at all.
You re completely wrong. He didn t lose weight in the sense that he lost muscle or fat. He lost water weight. One cup of water is half a pound. The average amount of water in a human body is about 65 of the persons weight. Assuming he weighs 200lbs and using well below that percentage at 52 then that means his body has 103lbs of water. Losing 15 lbs of that over three days due to a fever is not unreasonable. Hell you can go on a keto diet and lose 15 lbs of water weight in the first week ask me how I know.
No.
Do you realize how many carriers we have IN POSITION at any time Do you realize HOW LONG it takes to get another one on station I hope you realize the people responding to you are current or former military. We know of what we speak. Respecting the military also means educating people and yourself. This is actually a very cut and dried situation. The Navy can no longer trust him to do the hard right versus the easy wrong so he was relieved. And this has absolutely nothing to do with Trump. Trump wasn't involved in any part of it. But thanks for letting us know your ulterior motive for posting.
Trump has individual states bidding against each other and against fema. It s unfathomable. Deplorable fucking traitor.
Did the 9 11 Commission happen in the middle of the attacks Was it led by a partisan hack No and no. Case closed. Schiff can grandstand later. Fuck him.
Meh... I don't know.
We could have that but a lot of people here voted for Biden for some reason
Because the republicans are responsible for this. The democrats have very little power right now.
Now if only conservatives actually voted for people that helped soldiers veterans that's be nice. Source am a Vet.
Accounts have been banned for less.
You're painting with very broad strokes.
I've seen more elegant writing in r roastme
Diseases don't care about your legal status. Protecting everyone from this virus here legally or not keeps us all safer.
I believe rarely believe the Republicans yet I believe them when the say they can't win an election if we all vote. Impeach him Impeach him again Get those voters to get out there and vote
For one it helps when you've been watching this thing your entire life and making commentary on it. Back in often help you make better commentary later on due to experience. Also you don't have to be a professional at something to know when someone else is unqualified.
Everyones distracted by Covid including the media.
Trump is mentally troubled This is news to me
gt What rights are we losing by being told to stay in our own homes Um nearly everything. Voluntary self isolation is awesome. The government enforcing it via threat of violence or fine is not. I'm so glad to see that your freedom is only worth 1200 to you. When the government someday tries to take them permanently I know what your mentality will be Please sir Anything anything so long as you keep me safe And promise me some stuff Sure I'll give up my guns my freedom of speech anything Benjamin Franklin and Thomas Jefferson would be ashamed of what people have become. They rebelled because of unacceptable taxes... and now we have people begging pleading to have the government restrict our rights. Fuck that man.
Or they should be shut down due to social distancing requirments If they're not gonna help us.
This kids gonna run for president some day and the us is dumb enough to elect him lol. Think about that r politics while you are self isolating.
He will be a doctor of the church one day. His writings can be incredibly deep but so informative.
Proof
No it isn t. You don t understand the nature of viruses. It s different. Idk how else to tell you. You being around people simply just doing that puts people in an exorbitant amount of danger. More danger than just about any other possible variable. It s very different from your day to day life. I understand that. Now understand that this invisible threat is a different kind of enemy. Now adjust your behavior for 30 days. Suck it up.
Yes I absolutely do. Have you really not seen their headlines
And this after Trudeau kissed trump s big disgusting ass
Agreed you had me at goddamn idiot.
Biden hasn't won yet. Lol
Luckily when the economy comes back Kentucky will have a really fucking rough ride in comparison to the modern economies run by Democrats. Keep voting for that asshole. Enjoy the third world state you live in
All sounds correct to me as a start and it should be mandatory or else I'm done fucking around with the CCP. I will be writing my congressmen about placing sanctions on them to the level of Cuba Iran NK and the USSR When those were applied They should no longer be apart of world politics seeing as they effectively just launched a bioterrorist attack on the entire world after it ravaged their citizens.
Never mind the fact that he has no meetings with foreign dignitaries scheduled and when they happen eventually other leaders will be following extant guidelines. Thus even that excuse is bullshit for him it's all about his looks. And his delusion is that he looks good and projects a strongman image aping his favorite dictators past and present.
Yes but that's irrelevent to the conversation so I'm not sure why you asked.
Wait the same Glenn Beck that used to cry over conspiracy theories and quit his show after he incited an act of right wing violence
Genocide does not cover political affiliation though.
Hey dude relax we are apparently in violent agreement. It sounded to me in the previous posting that I responded to that you were saying you had chosen to become an atheist because it makes you a better person paraphrasing And not because you no longer believe in god.. If I misinterpreted your point I apologize.
gt Is it in our best interest to push a drug that is showing neutral results at best thereby causing a premature shortage to the people with chronic illnesses that the drug is proven to treat gt Good news is that the office of president has access to the best medical advisors in the country so he should listen to them on how to word things on this topic. Sooo...which is it Should Trump talk or let the doctors talk What in your opinion would change if say Fauci came out and said we're having promising results from Chloroquine Or in your mind would he just not say the name and journalists wouldn't press him for the name of the drug Better yet what is your way to tell people there's a promising drug to combat this without causing a shortage
His home is Florida
Making America Great Again You feeling me bro Man this country is getting robbed coming and going
Name calling is not answering the question. Continue with your cognitive dissonance. Im sure it will work out great for your country
Ronny Cheing has a standup on Netflix that kind of addresses this issue and it s pretty on point right now
only if any fees that I would have to pay to own a gun r also free owning a gun is a constitutional right. And it was part of the original Constitution. voting wasn't if the far left want to make it easy for uneducated people and illegal immigrants to vote for free then we also have to make any gun licenses free..
I would be crazy that after this Bernie get the presidency and stblish a socialistic government equal to Venezuela. Tell me the name of that movie falllout
Time to dredge the Mississippi.
Thanks Obama
Except it was bought BEFORE the meeting took place. And it wasn t her it was her husband. And she reported it through the normal channels. Also the price at which they bought it is way below the current price so they were likely just exercising something they purchased a long time ago.
Pissing if taped
Such a nasty goblin.
M8 you realize the transgender females they are talking are post op so they have vaginas. You are transphobic if you wont have sex with someone because they are transgender but would have sex with them if say there is a other person who has close to the same looks even under clothes and personality but isnt trans
But who is their VP
Too bad Pelosi sold stock too and so did some other Democrats. And made a bill that had a bunch of democratic goodies that weren t relevant to the virus
I don t know man. I literally only follow sports stuff on twitter and I still see left politics. I can t escape it. Even here people from r politics keep showing up.
A weapon to surpass Metal Gear.
Really port of New York confiscating our masks We needed those and we were supposed to get them.
It s because the republicans would lose elections. The argument against is a flimsy vote tampering as if rigging hundreds of thousands of votes by mail is an easy thing to both do and conceal.
But muh third party
Drop the selfish kill other people for personal gain shit it s getting old. LMAO whose boot am I even licking Authority wants us to keep working as much as you do The critical thinking disconnect is genuinely fascinating.
Yep you know what else is abhorrent Voting for representatives that are completely fucking shit leaders than boo hooing when they treat you like shit. It's problem that solves itself.
Spoken as if you've never experienced it yourself. And I don't mean your parent s I don't mean your cousin. I don't mean your brother. I mean you. As for your question How about my buddy's legs and not an elephant's dick long byzantine process to get disability or preventative treatment That'd be a nice start. How about actually funding the VA instead of using it as a bargaining chip How about my other buddy's life forever gone due to a completely bullshit war How about my friend that blew his brains out after being home for 2 years I'm sure they were glad for all those benefits Yeah they knew what they signed up for but they also signed up for a promise that wasn't kept and the people voting to rescind those promises were usually but not always Republicans. The GI Bill and VA Loan sure but everything else is like pulling teeth. It's like saying you are going to give me a Christmas present but the present is underneath a landmine and I have to figure out a way to diffuse the mine before I can dig the thing up. I may die in the process and many people do. And it's a constant battle which was supposed to end when you got back. Also those benefits you mention are pretty much the standard for all of our Allies' citizens and many consider themselves conservative. If the military has done anything it showed me that actions speak louder than words and that's all I heard from the R eps that shook our hand and looked at us in the eye just words. They made all those benefits really hard to get. All that other crap you mentioned goes right out the window.
This isn't the Wapo with John Podesta. Google search his brother and his artwork and tell me who's the pedo. Tony Podesta artwork. Google it.
Your comment added nothing of value to the discussion.
Why even attack them on a point like ignorance when it's so much easier to show how completely unqualified he is when we have experts that we have cast aside
No see if you think the government doesn't have to suspend rights then you are personally advocating that we all meet up at your grandma's house and have sneeze parties. Those are the options. Complete government authority or we all do the achoo choo dance at grandma's Why do you hate grandma
It's fucking insane. The first thing China shutdown is publictransit. Worse social distancing isn't going to help on a bus or train. It's too small and confined with too many people breathing in water droplets form others. You need masks on everyone at a minimum but in reality it needs to be shutdown for the duration of any shutdown period.
I'm a realist. You think the government Democrats especially are giving back this power they've taken
Corona isn't the only dangerous virus. At any time you could be the carrier of any number of viruses or bacterias that could kill other people. That is not to say we shouldn't take precautions at all.
Yes. Any other really cool questions
Biden isn't in a position of power or making all the wrong decisions costing thousands eventually hundreds of thousands of Americans their lives. You attempt at whatabout is utter bullshit.
It s a little premature to say that now but if they lock everything down for months then yes that will happen. Which is a strong argument for finding a middle ground between business as usual and months long house arrest.
Tallboys are on me.
The difference is that the blue States generally have the resources to take care of themselves at least they are better positioned than most red states.
I stopped forgiving ignorance a while back. We live in the Internet age. There's no excuse for being low info anymore.
True we haven't but I still have faith we will recover. We've been through worse. I also stated that we haven't even scratched the surface yet considering how many good things are still working and running in the country and this will not continue for very long. April 30th at the moment and it may increase after that but at some point the country will go back to normal especially with the medicine healthcare system rapidly catching up to COVID 19. Also the being young is a 2020 concept had nothing to do with what is going on it was more of a statement on young people having to go through troubles and problems. Even with as bad as it looks now we still have a lot going for us that people just overlook because we've been babysat for so long. We will recover from this.
Brando has those Electrolytes
There is no science behind this drug to treat Covid 19. Smdh.
It was a beautiful perfect transcript The only thing more beautiful and perfect than our COVID 19 tests.
Seeing as we could possibly lose more lives from this crisis than the civil war or at the very least a comparable number of lives it probably should have been declared weeks ago when flights to China were stopped. America should have gone full isolationist mode with strict quarantines and reporting. Then we could have kept our cases in the hundreds less than a million people would have lost their jobs and the economy would have barely been touched. Now because of a failure of leadership to act quickly and consistently ie shutting down flights to china but not flights to countries that still allowed flights to china we are faced with hundreds of thousands of deaths as a best case scenario and what they aren't telling you on the news is that the crisis for America won't end until next Spring regardless of what happens.
Much of the money made by illegals is often not spent here in the US. US workers will keep the money circulating. Rise in food costs to the consumer would be minimal.
Okay maybe I was exaggerating a little but how much money does the average American spend on automobiles and related expenses over a 35 year period Whatever the number is that's how much money I've saved by walking and cycling instead. To say nothing of the fact that I'd surely be at least 30 pounds heavier if I drove everywhere.
the idea is that in blue cities more people would get laid off under blue mayors and thus rage at how they arent getting any help when a blue governor comes in and the whole house of cards finally crashes down. yes some red will die starve but no where near the level blue would.
We don't do anything manually in software. Sure it could potentially be manipulated. Potentially. If the system were made by some know nothing worthless contractor yeah it might be garbage like that. If it were a proper piece of enterprise software with true controls amp compliance throughout heh there would be no way for some corrupt liberals to get their tentacles into it. Any do gooder Soyboy Bernie Bro who decided to make a difference would be caught before he could say soy latte
Potentially correct. But most should still receive by April 17th. Thousands out of 200 million is still most by a long shot.
Do you have any connection to the artist with your same username on other platforms
Who s on first
They can set the date of the election to whatever they want. His term ends on January 20 2021 unless he is re elected. A constitutional amendment would be required to change that.
same with Hogan in Maryland wasn t a fan but i m impressed
Feinstein's trust made bad trades though she sold out of medical lab stocks which went up later. Contrarily ALL of the moves Loeffler made were positive. She batted 1000 on like 5 million worth of stock. Yeah she didn't have help of course not her trust is just that good.
Even if it isn t a threat and to most people it isn t any more threatening than the flu they can either use it again as a scapegoat or find some other virus to use as an excuse. We no longer are threatened by the boogeyman of terrorists around every corner out to get us cuz of our freedoms now we obey on command due to an invisible enemy that won t actually kill more than seasonal flus.
That was the plan. Dont want people to actually apply for assistance when they need it.
gt Since the Republican Senate decided he was innocent Actually it's much worse. Most of the Republican Senate admitted that they believed he did what he was accused of which is why they didn't need to hear from more witnesses. Based on their statements and subsequent vote they believe he is guilty but should not be punished for it.
Sounds like you might be living in your betters basement
He s a cardinal in the picture I think or at least a bishop. I had quite a choice of pictures of him drinking beer haha.
Would you rather live in an authoritarian dictatorship if that meant covid19 death rate was halved
De Blasio said ON MARCH 10 ON MSNBC that Americans don't need to worry about Coronavirus and they should live their lives as normal. RIGHT HERE youtube.com v KxWQywIuhhA amp feature youtu.be
More likely Breitbart extremists spin a straw man out of Biden's comments. mediabiasfactcheck.com mediabiasfactcheck.com Regardless I am not going to click on their site to peruse their latest claims because I do not contribute pay per click revenue to ass holes like the extremists at Breitbart.
Are you against capitalism
I have opinions on this family that I am probably legally obligated to not voice.
AAAAAAHHHHHHHHHH
Quebexican finally a dialect I can understand
Thats the spirit. Careful getting up there it'd be a damn shame if you fell before you got a chance to jump.
I m not being a quibble head all respect and value to our fallen heroes I was just wondering I think it s one soldier and some years back his identity was determined by DNA profiling I could be wrong But thanks to all of our amazing soldiers for sure
clustertrump is the term.
Because the claim is that they said they needed more ventilators but the money was spent on an illegal Ed program. That s the claim that s false.
Using a national crisis global pandemic as a platform to push your own bullshit agenda not shady at all. Someone needs to shut this bitch up.
Also you And now I'm rich.
Well when choosing between 2 tragedies I always prefer the one where it doesn t involve killing innocent humans.
I don t understand the hate around wearing a mask. It helps you stay protected from breathing in the virus and people infected are coughing sneezing in their own mask so it s not spreading all around you. What s the downside
a decision that shocked the health care industry triggered widespread criticism and prompted a scramble within the administration to find a new way to care for the growing population left exposed to the pandemic.
TIL that trying to prevent the deaths hundreds of thousands of people is a little temporary safety. I thought dying was permanent but what do I know It's rather pathetic that pandemic response has become a partisan issue.
It describes the behavior gratification and the bonding over it but I think it leaves out something foundational A fundamental personality disorder kind of character deficient. It sadistic to feel good about participating in such horrific behaviors.
About 45 of our population will vote against their own best interests to own the libs and will happily do so again in 2020 best all that Trump has done to ruin ou standing with the rest of the world.
I read the top few responses. They were from articulate people with a very strange perspective. The poster who said I trust Trump s decision making and then went on to justify Kushner s charge because Trump can trust him in a familial way was... interesting. It s like many of the Trump supporters I know. Eloquent words absolutely fuck all when it comes to facts supporting their claims. What line of performance evaluations can anyone provide to justify trusting Kushner with this The administration s lag time on responding to the outbreak alone signifies deep organization issues. Just holy fuck what a mess.
Fearful that trump is propping up war criminals and firing actual military leaders
What's the alernative solution
He s completely lost his ability to cope and function normally.
so the economy is more important to you than people dying i disagree friend.
I ve been saying this for months. Liberals seriously underestimate how violent Trump supporters. They re going to lash out if Donald Trump loses the election. Hell they ll lash out if he WINS.
I'm waiting to see the 65 reduction in my property tax bill because the schools are closed.
Nuremberg trials. That s how we move forward.
Does anyone have statistics on what percentage of low risk populations who get the virus still end up needing hospital care Or who get sick enough that they can't go to work Let's say one asymptomatic low risk person goes to work they spread it to everyone else at work. Then what Assuming they're all low risk and none of them actually die how many still need hospital care and how many can't work until they recover How many businesses could this happen to Total shut down sucks but until we have enough protective equipment and tests for literally everyone I dont see how your alternative solves anything. You're just kicking the economic impact down the road a couple weeks.
Annnnddddd we got somebody posting pebble yeets nazi comics add a point to the board Matt
And how many millions of poor and minorities would die in the meantime
We have ten times as many people.
Kush reminds me of Montgomery Burns You know Smithers I think I'll donate a million dollars to the local orphanage. When pigs fly.
He compromised readiness and safety by announcing their vulnerability
Also isn't it interesting that prior to this there were Dems looking to decrease the penalty for knowingly giving someone HIV Don't hear any of that here.
Everything is chaos and there's no structured response God damn regulations
I feel you but... is anything on the internet really productive
13 50
Not just regular riots but race riots
Not to say that s what you get but really.. that s what you get idiots.
Back then we made things. Now we are the middle man and history is not kind to the middle man.
False premises or things you don t like hearing Because there s nothing here that is false
Now this is really scary and the strangest thing I ever seen in any country in the world. Think Putin is playing some sort of drinking game Son comes on that s a shot Trump says Virus a hoax that s a shot
yeah there isnt much we can do You cant stay in a fallout shelter for forever no matter how bad the outside conditions are. Eventually you have to roll that dice and take a chance. Even my hazmat suit respirator wearing fucking ass knows that. I wish you best of luck in all this
Well it's an opinion so you're not required to. Apparently tens of millions of Americans think sounding presidential means sounding like a drunk guy in a dive bar 5 minutes before last call. I'm being hyperbolic but seriously his speaking abilities are the opposite of coherent and sophisticated. How someone speaks is often a reflection of how they think. I have no confidence in his intellect.
Well fuck
Yeah and they happen to have enough masks for everyone on that plane... That comparison is 100 false. Also every country has shortages and in fact Canada provides materials to make the masks so would you rather we all end up with no masks
Let me know if you need help comprehending that chart.
Create the crisis. Exaggerate the crisis. Exploit the crisis. Blame Trump. Yup.
Negative Ghostrider. The pattern is full.
Wasn t he arrested for selling them back to doctors at a few hundred percent markup in a time of crisis
Red Dawn
If Trump suspends the election doesn't House Speaker become president
Can it be halved Doubt it. This thing's already everywhere. Quarantines have failed largely because you're contagious before ever showing symptoms.
That s a Texas sized 10 4 on that one.
Or what Mittens You ll continue to support everything he does when it actually matters
Bullshit the fact that we have restrictions now on things like full autos and bump stocks does not equate to nukes or tanks which I believe should be legal to own by a responsible organization organized local militia if not an individual Every Democrat goes on about wanting to take away guns full stop. How many more sacrifices of liberty are you willing to accept for the sake of that's just how society is. Are you willing to be denied the right to expression because you might panic people The right to practice your religion because it makes some people uncomfortable The right to keep your property because someone says they need it more The right to assemble The right to choose your own food foods and services Sorry I'm not willing to give up my rights as a human being to make people feel better.
The Padishah Emperor he is not.
If these lockdowns get extended much longer everywhere else will be looking like San Diego with homeless people everywhere.
I linked to the two key transcripts that spurred the stories about chloroquine. I had recently read after reading and skimming various transcripts from the whitehouse searching every official statement I could find for comments about chloroquine. It's crazy how quickly we went from me pointing out that no Trump didn't call it the wonder drug to now I'm apparently obese with a tiny dick.
How does communism have anything to do with a corrupt government If the virus started in any plethora of corrupt countries capitalistic or not the same things would be happening.
Spot on
You re not wrong. You re just and asshole. Calmer than you are dude.
gt What do we mean when we say that first of all we seek liberty I often wonder whether we do not rest our hopes too much upon constitutions upon laws and upon courts. These are false hopes believe me these are false hopes. Liberty lies in the hearts of men and women when it dies there no constitution no law no court can save it no constitution no law no court can even do much to help it What is this liberty that must lie in the hearts of men and women It is not the ruthless the unbridled will it is not the freedom to do as one likes. That is the denial of liberty and leads straight to its overthrow. A society in which men recognize no check on their freedom soon becomes a society where freedom is the possession of only a savage few as we have learned to our sorrow. What then is the spirit of liberty I cannot define it I can only tell you my own faith. The spirit of liberty is the spirit which is not too sure that it is right the spirit of liberty is the spirit which seeks to understand the minds of other men and women the spirit of liberty is the spirit which weighs their interests alongside its own without bias the spirit of liberty remembers that not even a sparrow falls to earth unheeded the spirit of liberty is the spirit of Him who near two thousand years ago taught mankind that lesson it has never learned but has never quite forgotten that there may be a kingdom where the least shall be heard and considered side by side with the greatest. Judge Learned Hand The Spirit of Liberty speech at I Am an American Day ceremony Central Park New York City 21 May 1944
my guess is that you ve never seen the military in action. Shit s both exhilarating and terrifying to behold.
I always imaging Trump in PJ's wearing an American flag as a cope running through the halls at night.
I mean trying to hide the truth is what an innocent person would do right s
He's running the entire circus
Do you have any links to any reporting that says which it is One the other or both Anything other than speculation
Please watch. Let me know what parts don t make sense. youtu.be
Eh. A lot of us fucking hate Donald Trump far more than you could ever imagine. If he'd have done his job in January he wouldn't feel the need to resort to this bullshit now.
fRaUd Republicans
Gives valuable data. It's helpful to try and gauge how many might be neutral carriers. Also fun is that I had all the symptoms for a week and a half but wasn't allowed to test due to limited tests I didn't require hospitalization and wasn't around anyone infected or both risk. Strict quarantine for me ended today btw
The virtual Fireside chat with Joe was a 2800 per ticket event. At no point did he address the credible sexual assault allegations by Tara Reade or explain why he would veto Medicare for All why he supported cutting Medicaid Medicare and Social Security why he supported the Hyde Amendment until last year why he continually fabricates events like getting arrested in South Africa why he supported people going to polling stations to stand in line for hours to vote during a pandemic. Joe is having 2800 a ticket fundraisers and disappearing for days while Bernie is raising millions for COVID 19 charities directly.
That idea is part of the problem though. The thought that you have to vote one of two way to count. The reasons it s that way is because so many people live that way creating that narrative.
Yah but the main thing is that she downplayed the pandemic even knowing the truth.
Wasn't racialized data considered racist when being used for crime statistics Why is it not considered racist now
No not really. Just because you don't have symptoms does not mean you can not transmit the virus. It's even worse if you don't even show mild symptoms because you are more likely to spread it unknowingly.
Obama did not just hand Trump the keys and walk out there was a transitional period in which Trump's administration was filled in on what they should expect. One of the transitional events they did was a mock pandemic test for the new administration. gt The briefing was intended to hammer home a new terrifying reality facing the Trump administration and the incoming president s responsibility to protect Americans amid a crisis. But unlike the coronavirus pandemic currently ravaging the globe this 2017 crisis didn t really happen it was among a handful of scenarios presented to Trump s top aides as part of a legally required transition exercise with members of the outgoing administration of Barack Obama. gt gt And in the words of several attendees the atmosphere was weird at best chilly at worst. gt gt POLITICO obtained documents politico.com id 00000170 e50c d588 ab77 ed5ff3310000 from the meeting and spoke with more than a dozen attendees to help provide the most detailed reconstruction of the closed door session yet. It was perhaps the most concrete and visible transition exercise that dealt with the possibility of pandemics and top officials from both sides whether they wanted to be there or not were forced to confront a whole of government response to a crisis. The Trump team was told it could face specific challenges such as shortages of ventilators anti viral drugs and other medical essentials and that having a coordinated unified national response was paramount warnings that seem eerily prescient given the ongoing coronavirus crisis. politico.com politico.com So the Trump administration had plenty of knowledge of our nation's pandemic response abilities but like a former administration official put it gt He was never interested in things that might happen. He s totally focused on the stock market the economy and always bashing his predecessor and giving him no credit the person said. The possibility things were things he didn t spend much time on or show much interest in.
More people die
Oh that s true. Same here.
Leading disease forecasters whose research the White House used to conclude 100 000 to 240 000 people will die nationwide from the coronavirus were mystified when they saw the administration s projection this week. The experts said they don t challenge the numbers validity but that they don t know how the White House arrived at them. White House officials have refused to explain how they generated the figure a death toll bigger than the United States suffered in the Vietnam War or the 9 11 terrorist attacks. They have not provided the underlying data so others can assess its reliability or provided long term strategies to lower that death count. Some of President Trump s top advisers have expressed doubts about the estimate according to three White House officials who spoke on the condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to speak publicly. There have been fierce debates inside the White House about its accuracy. At a task force meeting this week according to two officials with direct knowledge of it Anthony S. Fauci director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases told others there are too many variables at play in the pandemic to make the models reliable I ve looked at all the models. I ve spent a lot of time on the models. They don t tell you anything. You can t really rely upon models. Robert Redfield director of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the vice president s office have similarly voiced doubts about the projections accuracy the three officials said. Sign up for our Coronavirus Updates newsletter to track the outbreak. All stories linked in the newsletter are free to access. Jeffrey Shaman a Columbia University epidemiologist whose models were cited by the White House said his own work on the pandemic doesn t go far enough into the future to make predictions akin to the White House fatality forecast. We don t have a sense of what s going on in the here and now and we don t know what people will do in the future he said. We don t know if the virus is seasonal as well. The estimate appeared to be a rushed affair said Marc Lipsitch a leading epidemiologist and director of Harvard University s Center for Communicable Disease Dynamics. They contacted us I think on a Tuesday a week ago and asked for answers and feedback by Thursday basically 24 hours he said. My initial response was we can t do it that fast. But we ended up providing them some numbers responding to very specific scenarios. Other experts noted that the White House didn t even explain the time period the death estimate supposedly captures just the coming few months or the year plus it will take to deploy a vaccine. Almost the entirety of what the public knows about the death projection was presented on a single slide at a briefing Tuesday from the White House coronavirus task force. A White House representative said the task force has not publicly released the models it drew from out of respect for the confidentiality of the modelers many of whom approached the White House unsolicited and simply want to continue their work without publicity. A representative for Fauci did not respond to a request for comment. A spokeswoman for Vice President Pence declined to comment. On a Thursday call with conservative leaders Pence said it was difficult to view the models but the president thought it was important to share with the American people. Among epidemiologists the estimate raised more questions than it answered not just about methodology and accuracy but perhaps more importantly about purpose. The primary goal of such models amid an outbreak is to allow authorities to game out scenarios foresee challenges and create a coherent long term strategy something some experts worry doesn t exist within the White House. I wish there were more of a concerted national plan. I wish it had started a month and a half ago maybe two months ago Shaman said. Natalie Dean a biostatistician who was not involved in the White House effort but is working on coronavirus vaccine evaluation with the World Health Organization pointed out that the whole reason you create models is to help you make decisions. But you have to actually act on those projections and answers. Otherwise the models are useless. At Tuesday s briefing Trump unveiled the government s projected death count saying it was based on data that has been I think brilliantly put together. The coordinator of Trump s coronavirus task force Deborah Birx then projected a slide with a high arcing mountain showing the worst case scenario 1. 5 million to 2. 2 million deaths if Americans and the government did absolutely nothing to stop the virus. And a smaller but still imposing hill with 100 000 to 240 000 deaths if measures such as social distancing are taken. Birx said the projection was based on five or six modelers including from Imperial College in Britain and Harvard Columbia and Northeastern universities. It was their models that created the ability to see what these mitigations could do how steeply they could depress the curve Birx said. But two models appeared to have been particularly influential the one by Imperial College and one from the Institute for Health Metrics and Evaluation at the University of Washington IHME At a news briefing Sunday Birx explained the process this way Her task force initially reviewed the work of 12 models. Then we went back to the drawing board over the last week or two and worked from the ground up utilizing actual reporting of cases Birx said. It s the way we built the HIV model the TB model the malaria model. And when we finished the other group that was working in parallel which we didn t know about referring to the IHME group. The IHME model initially estimated deaths through this summer would total 38 000 to 162 000 a lower projection than many others and beneath the White House s own estimate. But because of its lower figure and Birx s comments experts believe it to be a main source for the White House s best case scenario of 100 000 to 240 000 deaths. Meanwhile the White House appeared to rely on Imperial College for its worst case scenario. That study estimated as many as 2. 2 million U.S deaths if no action was taken 1. 1 million deaths if moderate mitigation strategies were adopted and an unspecified number if drastic measures were taken. But as a common mathematician s refrain goes A model is only as good as the assumptions it is built on. Knowing the assumptions built into the White House officials projected number could tell us a lot exactly how contagious and deadly they believe the virus to be. It also would reflect their beliefs on how the federal government and states will behave in coming months and whether they will do enough to make a difference. The IHME model assumes every state will quickly impose stay at home orders which some states including Alabama and Missouri have yet to do. It also assumes the entire country will maintain these restrictions until summer. But Trump has extended the White House s restrictions until only April 30 and made clear he wants to reopen the country as soon as possible. Another key question is what time period the White House s 100 000 to 240 000 projection covers. Imperial College s worst case scenario calculated the toll exacted by the virus over a couple of years. But if the White House s projection covers only the next few months like the IHME model does the true death toll will almost certainly be larger because the United States will probably see additional waves of covid 19 until a vaccine is deployed. And it is important to note experts say that the IHME model differs from many epidemiological models another reason its death estimate may be lower experts say. Epidemiological projections are often based on what is called the Susceptible Infectious Recovered model SIR It is a mathematical way to represent three different populations in an outbreak those vulnerable to infection those who are infectious and those gradually removed from the equation by death or recovery. IHME however took an entirely different approach. It is a statistical model that takes the trending curve of deaths from China for example and fits that curve to emerging death data from cities and counties to predict what might come next. It s a valuable tool providing updated state by state projections but it is inherently optimistic because it assumes that all states respond as swiftly as China said Dean a biostatistician at University of Florida. In an interview earlier this week the head of the IHME group Christopher Murray said his model was created for a different purpose from Imperial College s. The reason we created our model is to help hospitals plan. How many beds you ll need how many ventilators when the peak is likely coming Murray said. The purpose of Imperial s model is to make people realize government intervention is crucial and what would happen without that. continued
Whites won t be a minority In the US for a long time. What other group would overtake There can be many minorities but only one majority
Barely a majority Christ that's depressing. The Trump cult mentality is truly astonishing.
Totally agree which is why she reported it. I personally think they shouldn t be able to have stocks at all but that is not the case unfortunately so I don t think Nancy did anything illegal in this particular case.
Nah he is right. You're cherry picking. Dem hoax was out of context and is false. snopes.com Im sure Trump does a lot of things during his waking hours but the focus on the golf thing is a good talking point. Blaming Trump when the Chinese govt lied about the virus and spread misinformation causing almost everyone to be slow to react leading to a global economic shutdown the likes of which have never been seen before. Your focus is on the wrong area due to what seems to be personal feelings toward Trump. Not really useful to anyone
Drama queen.
That sounds like a pornstar.
Getting downvoted for speaking the truth lol. I know where I am and plenty of other places doctors are using these drugs. I get it people blame trump but this drug being used wasn t caused by him.
gt And you know most major health orgs agree that not all trans have gender dysphoria Whoomp...there it is.
Yes. Because the government is the one that suggested it be allowed in the first place. So until states change that at the government level then girls will continue to be pushed aside and lose opportunities for the sake of trans people.
oh no this country is fucked i know i'm talking about a sovereign california
Donald Trump wants to be impeached right now. He prays for it. It would be his dream to be impeached. Then he can blame Democrats for everything.
You guys are taking this way out of context and way too seriously. Jeez you don t have listen or agree with him just respect and understand him.
I just mean to say that we shouldn't be content with the fact that 6 000 people died from this just because it's in line with the projections from other countries. EDIT I'd like to add for what it's worth that I do think this whole thing is largely the fault of the Chinese government. and there should be compensation for literally the rest of the world for what they have caused.
I don't care if you take me seriously I know I'm right the rich will get richer poor will get poorer he'll put the country on cruise control and coast out 1 2 terms if he's lucky then we'll be in the same boat just with more wasted years he'll do some feel good legislation yeah the environment would be marginally better and some social issues wouldn't be up for debate but he wouldn't go as far as we need to. we literally need to go a mile and he would only go a hundred feet trump would go back 10 feet
broad coalition my ass. A dwindling collection of ignorant upper middle class old people. Pelosi is a symbol of faux liberal opulence. Hard pass.
Hey man I voted against him but I agree. Bunch of Evangelicals and racists down here.
I'm in a state with a stay at home. People still are going for morning walks jogs only real difference is the traffic has died
Making them say it only gets straw man defenses from his consituebts
Maybe. There's a few hundred contenders for first place.
Obamacare was a horrible mees. Been there done that I would rather the government does not steal any more than they already do ty. Literally got jack shit for the thousands of dollars I spent. Paid for a vouole operations out of pocket because paying cash to a trusted doctor cost me less than the deductible I would have had to pay to go to the shitty few doctors who accepted the insurance. Stop selling that damn snake oil b.s We need something functional Obamacare was anything but that.
National vote by mail please.
That doesn t sound quarantine friendly
I'm pretty well known to no one in particular Wanna know what I endorse s
Absolutley anyone who has been in the military knows how ineffecient goverent spending. Hell I shouldn't really complain I was able to start my own business making money hand over fist through government contracting.
Please dont let this guy win
It's not just the ones in the tomb. Its the act if honoring all those whose bodies never been found or remain unidentified. Believe it or not symbols like this are important. Quit being a nipplehead.
but wuhan has and wuhan is a decently sized econ hub in china
You seem to be assuming that poor people automatically vote for Trump. Many poor people are smarter than that.
It seems a non political background actually leads to results.
Have you actually looked into Trump s business though He sold the Trump Taj Mahal for 50 million when it cost 1. 2 billion to build
Wrong drug. Chloroquine and hydroxychloroquine are different drugs. medicinenet.com what is chloroquine what is hydroxychloroquine
Guess they haven t seen the New York Times up until a week ago
Hopefully the lack of turnout blends with the natural evolution towards moderate or even right of center positions most people make as they get older pay taxes and try to support a family.
100 chance no American will listen to a uk website
reddit.com
That is a fucking stupid question considering that she recently worked hard to pass a bipartisan deal that helps those afflicted by this pandemic.
I remember learning that this is a strategy s a lot of big company s do. There s a law that states you can t have an attorney who has worked for your client in the past X amount of time. So company s retain the services of many many lawyers to make it harder for the person trying to sue to find a lawyer
Don t worry these are same stupid fucks that can t figure out how to stay home and not catch the corona virus and that is why 50 of all cases are in NY. Stupidity is taking a toll. A brutal sad truth.
As do I since a ton of people on this thread have failed to see this is satire.....
gt If it's temporary it's okay. Just like after 9 11 when the PATRIOT Act and all of its stipulations magically disappeared right
I had totally forgot that the Who's Getting Fired Next pool was still going on...
Abortion's not a right.
Ah I see you don t have any friends or family in the military
Fauci IS a CCP agent
To be fair to them this isn't directly politically related. The same way I'm sick of r coronavirus being turned into a 2nd version of r politics I'm sure they don't want their subreddit turning into a 2nd coronavirus subreddit
Wtf are you talking about I seriously doubt there is much if anything respectable about him. He's great at racing down the highway while shitfaced maybe... But who said anything about him dying We don't believe he's sick. You're one demented moron to immediately jump to the extreme bs. This isn't r politics we don't wish being sick or dying on anyone but you can take the idiocy back to that sub.
If you read your own source you would see the Patriot Foundation delivered a portion of the masks to New York City themselves after bringing them from China. Stop trying to fuel the fire.
Freedom of religion means freedom to hold an opinion or belief but not to take action in violation of social duties or subversive to good order.
That s because he was price gouging and selling the masks for over a 700 markup
Hahaha Have a good evening sir
We vote by mail in CO. In 16 we had a single case of voter fraud a county GOP official forged his soon to be ex wifes signature. He was tried and found guilty.
What a beautiful question. Who do you work for OLN trump probably
I accept your resignation from the conversation now please fuck off. amp x200B Please enjoy you Cuomo cock somewhere else thanks.
What's happening is that people are home they're bored but worried so they watch the covid19 press briefings. Many for the first time are seeing a live stream version of a guy they've only seen post production edits of. There's no out of context rearrangement of sound bytes to totally change the narrative and they're hearing the stupidity and attempted manipulation by the press corps that Trump calls out live. This is the media's worse nightmare. The reason the dems are freaking out is the the carefully crafted fake persona the press has crafted is getting totally destroyed and many more voters are now realizing the extent of this disinformation campaign. I suspect many are really fucking pissed. Now the dems are playing their only card impeachment 3. 0 but their narrative is shot to hell by recent videos like pelosi saying on camera on February 24th that New Yorkers should go to China Town restaurants to support them instead of being RACIST like Trump paraphrase Many of those who followed her urgings are now deathly I'll or worse. That was almost a month after Trump banned travel to from china on January 29th. Now dems want to blame Trump.
My birth month has been completely overshadowed by a month that shouldn t exist
Woot woot Biden train coming. Prepare for nothing to fundamentally change.
Why waste it on education when he could have bought some golf carts.
Hey I hear ya and good for you for supporting causes you think are important.
gt NO ONES FIEST AMENDMENT RIGHT IS BEING INFRINGED YOU IMBECILE. Yes it is. Again you really don't understand the fundamental purpose of the First Amendment. gt Congress shall make no law respecting an establishment of religion or prohibiting the free exercise thereof or abridging the freedom of speech or of the press or the right of the people peaceably to assemble and to petition the Government for a redress of grievances. Let's see... we'll go through is piece by piece no law respecting an establishment of religion Okay good so far. prohibiting the free exercise thereof Ooh oops. Some churches may require a gathering a of believers in person. abridging the freedom of speech Still good here or of the press Yep still good right of the people peaceably to assemble Oooh ouch Nope declaring groups of 10 people unlawful seems like a pretty damn big violation here. petition the Government for a redress of grievances. Time will tell. Nope looks like Stay at Home orders violate a couple of these... thusly... yes my... how did you put it gt NO ONES FIEST AMENDMENT RIGHT IS BEING INFRINGED YOU IMBECILE. Oh yeah. Fucking wrong. When the government spits in your face and tries to tell you it's raining they're full of shit.
No thanks forcing me to to sign up to Obamacare and add another bill a month for me when it's hard enough paying off my bills as is just let Obamacare die and lets get that Medicare for All.
Is it cheaper labor though for the IT field I work in the IT field and all employees base get paid the same whether they are sponsored or not.
Thanks for your comment. My comment above is factual but is getting downvoted by the BlueMAGA crowd some paid some unpaid but brainwashed. It's quite sad.
This is literally Russian propaganda.
Great scenario. How many of those businesses would be successful with only the America market and how would they get their raw materials You think China would be willing to part with their rare earth minerals I assume we'd starve to death before we'd have to worry about a new iPhone model though.
Somebody else on here is positive they've been sold and this is why. It's fucking circular logic. Trump wouldn't see it but even Kushner would have to. This is literally too stupid an action for there not to have been some other malfeasance.
well michiganders are pissed that he s being a piece of shit and starting shit with the governor for no fucking reason while people die and hospitals are in dire shortage.
You're goddamn right
gt I didn't think I could despise Trump Trump and every fucker who voted for him in spite of loud and clear evidence that he was in no way prepared for the role.
gt No genius. I said that because you like to mention in your comments that you're a historian without a shed of sanctimony I'm sure. You want me to be sanctimonious. You need me to be sanctimonious. I'm not. As stated I'm nowhere near an expert. I only mentioned it in those comments to convey that I had spent some time seriously studying the subject of discussion not as a don't question my authority type of statement. gt Also genius I used the phrase I think which clearly indicates that it is my opinion and I didn't even suggest that there was any objective analysis involved. It is purely subjective and entirely conjecture. It's an admission of my bias. Something not all of us are able or willing to do Ya your opinion was a massive strawman based on dubious evidence. That's a step beyond bias. I'm quite aware of my own bias and am comfortable admitting it. gt Finally genius you think you're the first self professed intellectual that's come here with comments dripping with condescension pretending to be even keeled and offering objective reasoning for your concussions Well you're not. We get one like you a couple times a month or so trying so hard to pretend to be neutral but having his liberal sensibilities betray the facade. Ya I admit I was a little condescending however I never pretended to be offering objective reasoning. I consider myself an intellectual because I spend everday learning to be an intellectual. Doesn't mean I'm more intelligent than everyone. I'm wrong a lot. A lot. I wasn't pretending to be neutral. I very clearly criticized Trump harshly. I was interested in the type of response I'd get because interacting with people who hold different opinions is what we're supposed to do right One guy gave me some good points to think about and we had a well mannered back and forth. It was fruitful. You reinvented me as a trope then struck out to vanquish me with your cleverness. Not fruitful. And with that best of luck to you and your battle with the fantasy liberals in your head. Don't forget to keep score.
Trumpster fire is also acceptable.
gt If
Can we just get the article on this stickied Then they would even dumber.
All the points you've made are true but I think the only missing aspect that isn't considered is the belief that the people getting into governmental positions would be operating in good faith There have been countless incidents that have occurred that people have complained about but the unfortunate reality is that the some of the decisions have been made were just egregious but not illegal. Combined with a methodical approach to dismantle anything in their way that would only benefit themselves and an apathetic appeal to anyone that isn't in that club and we wind up where we are currently.
cap i tal ism kap dl iz m Learn to pronounce google.com rlz 1C1CHBF enUS730US730 amp sxsrf ALeKk038ktKQPc8OF6muYCP42nhLmjM0Ag 1585932180541 amp q how to pronounce capitalism amp stick H4sIAAAAAAAAAOMIfcRowy3w8sc9YSnjSWtOXmPU5eINKMrPK81LzkwsyczPExLjYglJLcoV4pPi4eJKTizILEnMySzOtWJRYkrN41nEKp2RX65Qkq9QANSVD9SWqoBQBABtpicHXwAAAA amp pron lang en amp pron country us amp sa X amp ved 2ahUKEwiZ6Iji2czoAhViknIEHXg3DiUQ3eEDMAB6BAgGEAg noun 1. an economic and political system in which a country's trade and industry are controlled by private owners for profit Looks like they are only doing exactly what our society expects of them any other day of the year to make a profit. Making a profit is literally the entire goal of every single business in the US at all times. If what they are currently doing is considered immoral then maybe we need to rethink why our society values profit over human lives because it has for a long time now and I think this crisis is allowing people to see that.
Dangerous detachment to reality Sounds just like this sub.
Acting Sec Navy a civilian No word yet from all the Admirals in the chain of command bewtween Crozier and the Acting Sec.
Can time pause for a few days so this man can take a long deserved nap
Largest shit storm since WWII I think you need to read up on your history a bit more.
I don't think it makes me cool not to vote but I like in Illinois so we're guaranteed to vote Democrat and the winning party gets all the electoral votes it's not like it's proportional. I know Chicago will do my job for me. gt You want a single election to fix all of our problems and you're right that is impossible. This is all I was saying to the guy I replied to. He insinuated that you can change the system by voting I'm saying that in the system we have set up nobody will be nominated for the presidency who wants to change the system.
Also it s not like everyone can run out and buy a guitar even a relatively lousy acoustic will run you 300 used.
He did got a head start on life with daddy's money though.
well since the checks haven't gone out yet maybe you should wait until you get the cash in hand for your next purchase lmao
From u The Autarkh Excellent thread by fmr. US Attorney Barbara McQuade twitter.com s 19 disposing of Banana Republicans' ridiculous attempted defenses of Donald one by one. gt Here are the GOP defenses I have heard so far to articles of impeachment along with the knee jerk responses I have been shouting at my television. gt Defense 1 Trump did nothing wrong. gt Response Trump hit the trifecta of impeachable conduct by subverting an election seeking foreign influence and putting personal interest ahead of national interest. And he obstructed Congress by refusing to produce any witnesses or documents gt Defense 2 No harm occurred because the military aid went through. gt Response The aid went through only after Trump was caught. In the meantime months of delay cost Ukraine lives in its war with Russia. US credibility was harmed and moral authority to fight corruption was eroded. gt Defense 3 Because aid went through no misconduct was committed. gt Response Bribery occurs upon demand for a personal favor in exchange for performance of an official act. If you offer a cop 20 to get out of a traffic ticket even if he declines you have still committed bribery gt Defense 4 Abuse of power is not even a crime. gt Response Impeachable conduct may be criminal conduct but need not be. A president could be impeached if he watched TV all day and failed to fulfill his constitutional duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed. gt Defense 5 There s nothing wrong with asking for an investigation. gt Response If this were legitimate investigation you wouldn t need to send your personal lawyer and his henchmen to do it. Witnesses say Trump didn t want investigation just announcement of investigation. gt Defense 6 There was no quid pro quo. gt Response Read the transcript Trump s request for a favor is strong evidence corroborated by witness testimony of months long scheme to get Zelensky to go to the mic and announce Biden probe. Aid was leverage. gt Defense 7 As VP Biden held up aid as leverage to get rid of the Ukrainian public prosecutor. gt Response It is appropriate for a president or VP to take action to advance the interests of the nation. Trump was advancing his personal interests. gt Defense 8 Testimony is hearsay. gt Response Rules of Evidence don t apply. Also call summary Sondland testimony are non hearsay. Trump has barred direct witnesses. You can t have it both ways. If they had information favorable to Trump you can bet we would have heard from them. gt Defense 9 It happens all the time. Get over it. gt Response Trump sought foreign influence in our election and harmed national security by delaying aid designed to fight Russia our adversary. We don t have to accept it. We deserve better. gt Defense 10 Impeachment would un do an election. gt Response All impeachments un do elections. Constitution permits impeachment if president is unfit to serve. When rigging an election is involved elections are ineffective for removal. Impeachment is not to punish but to protect. gt Defense 11 Impeachment proceedings are moving too fast. gt Response This impeachment has moved slower than Bill Clinton s and on pace with Richard Nixon s. For a president who presents a clear and present danger to national security removal is urgent and can t come soon enough gt Defense 12 We need to hear from the whistleblower. gt Response The whistleblower was a tipster whose tip led to the investigation. Tipsters do not testify at trial the witnesses do. We have a duty to protect whistleblowers to encourage them to use proper channels to report abuse
Lol thought Is was obvious. Might need to drop a s next time.
Isn t that the normal recovery rate but worst Sorry but even for seniors about 90 recover so I don t see what is so special about that. 7 out of 8 people in most instances will recover with enough time.
I began writing a response and it only grew and looked more snarky as it went. So I'll settle for saying without any doubt that no one will starve and no one will be denied medical treatment at any emergency room. Any consequences will be the result of THEIR actions or inactions and theirs alone. I feel perfectly fine reserving this aid and any other benefits or aid for Americans citizens.
Hi there. I lived in Taiwan for 5 years and have visited more countries than you ever will. Travelled all over Asia and Europe and have seen some of the biggest shitholes in the world. I'll never forget the time a kid in Vietnam came to me with his younger sister. He was barely clothed and his ribcage showed obvious evidence that he was extremely malnourished and he was asking for food not money food. And I will never forget that I was not the first person in line to give him food because my cynicism led me to believe that he and his sister were conning us and I hate how reluctantly I pooled my money with the group I was travelling with to help these clearly starving children. That's a harsh lesson I learned abroad and I discovered the importance of stifling my cynicism. So before you get all high and mighty and act like I don't know what the rest of the world is like shut the fuck up and sit the fuck down you assuming ass wipe with a superiority complex. Do you know what happens when you assume It makes an ASS out of U and ME. I don't care how smart you are the minute you assume I don't know what I'm talking about you are not a smart person. I'm also very knowledgeable of history and George Washington is personal hero of mine not the same time period you're talking about obviously but his life is a passion of mine and worth noting in this discussion I know lots of trivia about that time period and that of the Civil War. Find another 20 something guy like me who knows as much about American history as I do I dare you. Maybe you'll find we just have a difference of opinion that isn't attributed to not picking up a book and you won't look like a retarded dickface.
Maybe you should take the time to read the BIDING SCOTUS opinions on the 2A to see how wrong you are.
It s time to boogaloo
Literally nobody gives a shit about Ted Cruz. White supremacists exist among conservatives but the ones hiding xenophobia islamophobia and racism behind nationalism are probably worse because you act like your nationalism wouldn't harm anybody. Meanwhile you put children in cages and go about your daily way like nothing happened.
More like too smart for you
is like anything Obama to Trump like garlic to a Vampire
I m honestly very content that he fucked off back to Texas. I ll give him credit for disappearing better than the clintons and Obama did. Presidents should stay gone unless they decide to build some houses or some shit like carter. But yeah let s pretend that that didn t happen. The Bush presidency was disturbing enough to witness.
Intentional willful ignorance.
Y'all must not have heard about the 55 000 bonus that congress gave themselves in the last stimulus.
1 20 gay people are in shows but only as side characters and never trans or any LGBT main characters bc thats political the LGBT whats shows to truely show acceptance not just by staying safe but by legitimately support the LGBT even on topics that arent as popular yet and that goes the same for companies showing pride during june all the LGBT knows they are doing it to seem progressive but still staying safe and thats not helping anything saying safe or neutral on topics isnt helping change for the LGBT community which is what they want
Relatable.
The White House instead rejected the prospect of allowing new sign ups across the 38 Affordable Care Act marketplaces it controls a decision that shocked the health care industry triggered widespread criticism and prompted a scramble within the administration to find a new way to care for the growing population left exposed to the pandemic. You have a perfectly good answer in front of you and instead you re going to make another one up said one Republican close to the administration. It s purely ideological.
I agree that her story needs more coverage but honestly what do you expect when basically every conservative accused like this never seems to be held accountable. Everyone here was perfectly happy discrediting Kavanaugh's accusers or hand waving Trump's sketchy history as non issues. I have no idea if this person's story has any weight to it but we all need to be advocating for this stuff even when it's politically inconvenient not just when it might score some political points.
No one gives a shit that you're from Michigan...
I mean most governors are doing what s in the best interest of their own state. I don t think most dems or republicans care about NYC outside of being glad they aren t in as bad of a spot.
Temporary means as long as this pandemic lasts and then some time. The stimulus bill can be called socialist the Trump administration cannot be called socialist. The stimulus bill is a redistribution of capital by the government. On the other hand an administration cannot be said to be socialist based on an emergency aid bill. A deficit doesn't matter if it contributes to productivity See Modern Monetary Theory and is within a manageable range. 5 10 Debt isn't a good indicator of economy Venezuela only had a debt 23 of its GDP and it's economy has been in turmoil for a long time. Similarly Belgium has a GDP of around 500B and a debt of 1. 2tn yet nothing happened to them. I'm not particularly sure about what you meant to say in your last question but I assume you meant that I as a capitalist by flair actually a Free Market Corporatist would be mad about this stimulus bill However it is I'm not opposed to a degree of democratic socialism. I'm in support of M4A with a private option and such. And I'm also in support of a UBI as it's beneficial to every type of economy with monetization.
Let's not allow facts to interfere with the hysteria
And the many masks he wears in public
Oh Downvoted Hi Top Minds
If you ever move to Iceland my warmest welcome And I hope testing will become more widely available in the US up here it's been really helpful to quarantine potential carriers.
Man I hate the concept of praying. It literally accomplishes nothing except to make the prayer feel better and that they did something when in fact they have done nothing.
I do as they're my buddies. The hours they work are kind of crazy with 48 hour long shifts but they have a bunch of guys that take turns. Impossible to maintain any type of regular sleep schedule.
You have to burn down mar a lago as well.
gt gt gt Another problem though is then that to fund M4A Bernie's list in his source current Out of Pocket Spending counts as 11 of funding gt gt So those bankruptcies don't get avoided Can you clarify this statement Are you suggesting that a payroll tax of 4 is going to bankrupt people
Hilariously enough we think the same about you but go ahead and think your team is open minded and smart. Elitism worked so well for you in 2016
They were given to Kentucky oh the irony.
That's just not true. I live in NJ where we produce the densest blueberry harvest in the country. Back in 2010 I tried to get work harvesting blueberries. They refesused to let me becuase they strictly use migrant workers used to be Mexicans now Africans possibly They're super dark skinned I desperately needed work and you can make 100 cash daily every day during the season and youre done by 2pm. They wouldnt let me work. I talked to some Mexicans who work at a local lawn business and they said they work picking as they please a come and go type situation.
I shared my thoughts in another comment but I think you'll appreciate this as well. gt Matthew 7 21 23 gt 21 Not everyone who says to me Lord Lord will enter the kingdom of heaven but the one who does the will of my Father who is in heaven. 22 On that day many will say to me Lord Lord did we not prophesy in your name and cast out demons in your name and do many mighty works in your name 23 And then will I declare to them I never knew you depart from me you workers of lawlessness. Jesus knew this would happen and warned us in his teachings and instructed us to continually self reflect to keep our sinners nature in check and to continue to measure ourselves against his teachings. The path was never going to be easy and that includes being judged by other Christians' but it's what we're called to do. Unfortunately these people can be the hardest to minister to but remember to not lose yourself in the process. I hope this finds you well. Praying for you too brother.
A church in Florida has filed a lawsuit against the county because if people can buy scratchers and chips at the corner store they can worship Jesus.
Shreveport is a shit hole no wonder it produces these types of posts.
I thought Pence was in charge.
source
I believe the study said 37 of doctors said it was the most effective treatment available which does not mean it is an effective treatment by current medical standards.
Very nice that I hit M instead of K and suddenly that makes me guilty of intentionally spreading misinformation. Even yet I posted a link that anyone could use to verify what I claimed and see the typo. I sure hope you've never made a typo in your life lest others call you a liar. How about you stop trying to score cheap points be civil and contribute to the conversation Not that hard to do.
We did sort of. businessinsider.com gt In 2018 the Trump administration rolled back the Affordable Care Act regulations and allowed junk plans in the market. Some consumers mistakenly think plans with lower monthly costs will be better than no insurance at all but often the plans aren't much different from going without insurance altogether the Herald reported. What those plans look like inquirer.com gt When his health plan premium shot up to almost 1 000 a month he d gone online to search for a more affordable option. The Golden Rule Insurance plan he found seemed to cover his needs at about 300 a month. gt I remember being tickled to death getting that LaFrance said. gt Brokers are required to tell their clients when they re buying a plan that isn t comprehensive health insurance but crafty sales pitches often gloss over those details. Plans are supposed to detail what they do and don t cover in plan documents though members may not receive this information until they ve already enrolled. gt Even though he had just been diagnosed heart failure and diabetes according to his plan were preexisting conditions. gt LaFrance hired a lawyer to help him appeal arguing that something he didn t know about couldn t possibly be a preexisting condition. gt He was denied again. gt LaFrance s plan defined a preexisting condition as one for which a customer received care within 24 months of enrolling in the policy or that caused symptoms that an ordinarily prudent person would have gotten checked out in the last 12 months according to the June 2017 denial letter he received. Given the duration of symptoms and severity an ordinarily prudent individual would have sought medical care advice or treatment the insurer wrote in its denial letter. Don't worry Trump is still working at it. gt Millions more people could one day find themselves in LaFrance s position. A lawsuit seeking to overturn the ACA would among other things eliminate preexisting condition protections for people who buy individual health plans and weaken protections for the nearly half of people who get insurance through an employer.
gt He said The models show hundreds of thousands of people are going to die and you know what I want to do I want to come way under the model. The professionals did the models and I was never involved in a model. At least this kind of a model. twitter.com twitter.com
Good Bot
I'm not sure if this is sarcastic or not since we are on reddit. Not offense.
Get this guy a fiddle no toga.
Unfortunately for us Biden would staff his cabinet with the same Reagan Democrats that dominated the Obama administration. Just about everyone on that list sucks. axios.com
I'm glad to see enough reasonably concerned conservatives who are rational enough to take the perspective of medical professionals more seriously than radio personalities that all broadcast from private bunkers. This will pass the economy will recover there is no comparison between people suffering between unemployment or loss of business and serious illness and death it is absurd and insulting to insinuate it. This is a novel virus meaning the professionals are learning in progress we don't know how serious this could get. Hopefully they'll develop vaccines or other medications in the near term. But I prefer to trust the guidance of trained career epidemiologist to armchair economists. No we're not going to loose our freedom or liberty. In fact if Trump and the admin. didn't act in an aggressive manner this situation might have been much worse and like in the 30's with Hoover people are seduced by democrat promises they'd control the levers of government and push through more of their statist agenda and we would loose more freedom. These kinds of crisis are why government exists have faith in our values our country and our President.
I know I spend a lot of time in the US because of my job I like Americans. It's not your fault and TBH you need the masks more than we do but we probably ordered these when your government was calling the virus a hoax.
People within the Republican Party have actual disagreements that are being overlooked who says they can't debate each other
We are civil. We always take the high road. They take advantage of that. That s cool though. We ll remember and silently we ll fill the ballot box with Trumps name. Then In 2024 Mike Pence s.
He s stockpiling babies. Those babies aren t for the states they re for Jared.
Jared honey Face masks and facial masques Not the same thing.
Yeah what kind of government says they want to get people back to work right away to shore up the economy even though all the scientific evidence points to a need to delay that further
All you have to do is find your local Registrar of Voters and it sets forth there and also in the state's election code how ballots are handled. It's a very regulated procedure that can vary from state to state and county to county but it's set forth specifically for every voter's jurisdiction. Voter fraud in the way you describe would not be easy based solely on those factors alone. If you want to learn specifically about what happens to a ballot in your state you should go learn.
We don t have a functioning federal government so that s why we re in such dire straits. Look to Germany and see the benefits of competent federal governance.
Startin to think this guy might not be good for us.
Should go out and send some motherfuckers home too
how much do you think you can bring in from a clubhouse spa and resaurants in one day
If I was your friend and I told you I was ill and because of that illness I had lost 15 pounds had hallucinations and had broken a tooth because I was shivering so badly and I showed up to your house looking perfectly normal you might have questions.
He did create the wealth gap we see now...
Unacceptable More like sheer fucking madness
Fuck off with that shit. Ol' Donnie slobbers up and gets down on his knees for those people at worst Trudeau deals with em in a case of realpolitik.
feel that. she looked mad dumb on rogan when it came to the environment
If you could afford to. It's not the ticket out of poverty and small towns for nothing.
It is mind blowing. Lost the popular vote impeached fumbling the virus response and tanking the economy. How is his support so high How has he not broken the 24 floor
They do it ALL the time. During Hurricane Sandy they were given permission to stand down. They did not. They feel it is an Honor to guard the Unknowns This is an example of that fealty to duty. abcnews.go.com
I wonder if Trump is concerned that new whistleblower reports may come to light with some of the current unusual circumstances regarding emergency medical supplies. The timing is interesting.
All it takes is one crazy guy with nothing to lose to walk up to a rally and take a well aimed shot.
Omg if I had an award it would be yours For now you will have to settle for my Absolutely True Comment with a Perfect Snark Twist award
Based and covid19 pilled
Yeah Physics was the only class left to take my senior year. And holy crap was I lost. I had a great teacher though and I squeaked through it.
JBE has the distinction of being perhaps the only Southern governor that has taken this seriously. The reason Louisiana is so bad is because people in New Orleans can t stop second lining and people to the west can t stop going to their megachurches. I would not equate Louisiana s poor outcomes with a governor that s pretty much a Republican because by no means has JBE resembled anything like what these other guys are doing. He has actually tried and we d see way worse outcomes had he not started locking things down weeks ago.
I read that in Phillip Fry's voice.
She wasn't but mere facts aren't enough to dissuade some people.
Your question indicates that you're just trolling here. Have a nice day.
Homelessness has been a problem for a while and this seems more like a short term solution.
Does Trump
Journalism is mostly a dead profession.... killed by CNN and MSNBC.
I have my first weekend off in over a year this weekend due to the shit down and honestly I am stir crazy just at the thought of not doing something work related everyday. I think I have a problem.
Yeah my main objection is that neither man should be spending TIME on this kind of bullshit. I work in disability insurance claims and right now with this crisis I certainly couldn't imagine having time in my day to exchange nasty letters with a rival. So how the minority leader of the US Senate and the President of the United States find time to have a snail mail pissing contest in the middle of a pandemic is beyond me.
There are two sides to it. Why do we only put one at fault It is naive and juvenile. We see an establishment candidate pushed by moderates and the media every election. Then we are given a false dichotomy of a choice saying fall in line or get insert Republican here This is exactly what the establishment dems want. Progressives have no power in this neverending cycle. The majority will still vote blue but we cant ignore the major party sharing fault who is able to make changes to their platform even minor ones We arent asking for them to kiss our feet we are asking them to just acknowledge us. But they wont and we wonder why some do sit out. How about they get some respect and a seat at the table instead of showing them the boot and then bitching they arent getting up and following
Should the government have the ability to suspend regular order to defend the nation from a public health threat Yes Can we trust the government as it exists today not to abuse this power No How can anyone agree to further erode our rights liberty when it s all but certain that doing so will undoubtedly serve as a precedent to justify even greater erosions in the future
What a loser.
Relativism is dumb but my supernatural claims totally unsupported by evidence are so true that they are the standard by which all truth be measured is not dumb Man thanks for that. Clears up a lot.
gt If Hitler just wanted to make Germany great and have things run well OK fine She is literally saying that if Hitler just stayed in Germany with his plans that's fine the reason he fucked up was because he wanted to push that agenda on others through globalism.'
What actually happened is this guy wanted to grandstand for his moron supporters and waste everyone's time. Mission accomplished.
We are the Florida of the world
The Canadian Liberation of 2020
gt FedEx and larger rival United Parcel Service UPS.N have asked the U.S Treasury to move quickly to release billions of dollars in government grants and loans to support the sector amid falling demand. Falling demand Everyone is buying everything off of Amazon way fair target.com Walmart.com etc. What falling demand for delivery services
nicely said
It's a weak pussy of a man move
Now corona only controled by God Also read Complete God Kabir Sahib had raised a dead boy alive in the midst of millions of people. People said that Kabir Ji did wonders so Kabir Saheb named that boy kammal More knowledge read this link jagatgururampalji.org
She has a higher chance of winning the nomination right now than Bernie simply because the only way Biden is not the nominee is if he withdraws for health reasons. In that situation the only person we can be certain wont be picked is Bernie.
Cult45.
its ridiculous I agree
HaHAhAha PrIdE mOnTh BaD BeCaUsE iT nAmEd AfTeR rElIgOuS sIn that is what you sound like. Disregarding your horrid argument you know damn well pride month is a month about celebrating gay rights but you prefer to say that it is about pride and that pride is a sin just so you can say that it shouldnt exist but when you get called out for homophobia you can say ItS iRoNy BrO
No shit Cuomo should be running for president
Trump is being held accountable by the sleazebag media. Obama gets away blame free as always. That s the difference.
He s not bragging he just lets out a never ending stream of bullshit that he doesn t understand what he s saying but it happens to be what s going through his at the time or ass depending on where you think his brains are located
They won t be able to acquire the supplies they need to continue making masks if they don t continue trade....
No one wanted to tackle this one I see
Gotta say visiting the tomb of the unknown soldier when I was 18 was one of the most profound moments I've ever had. Truly brought me new perspective.
With all due respect Mr. president what the fuck
Turdle liddle turdle late.
He's the inspector general that backed up the whistleblower complaints.
LOL. Try harder propagandist.
and we all get 1200 bucks wtf I'm pissed at all of them for this. They should have to send a nation wide vote for EVERY pay raise.
Arent the materials needed to make those masks coming from British colombia in canada
There wasn't a rush to leave until the announcement. Unless they're talking about people leaving for the Chinese holidays but at that point they would have been out of the city for a long while where it isn't as much of a problem.
Totally with you on corporation but remember EU countries are like US states in size...
I'll do it for 100 hr
A possible rape apologist like yourself.
I believe she's talking about sales tax. Not income tax.
Pro funny That s a funny way of saying edgelords.
All the constitution can do for us is set the rules of the game. It can't stop half the voters deciding that failure is not failure and truth isn't truth.
Did Israel send the drugs or no
Yep its all political BS at this point. She just wants to look like she is fighting Trump because her base eats that up.
As a future dead guy I support this.
Yesterday I got downvoted into oblivion because I dared to argue that it wasn't good that the government confiscated a guy's legally purchased private property when they confiscated his N95 masks. People are perfectly content to be dictated to and ruled over. They're happy to throw away their rights if they think they'll be taken care of like infants.
Just keep repeating buzzwords like WINNING and dumbasses will follow
Stand up girl. They're terribly afraid of you even though they may not act like it. They are and you know it. Terrified white men.
What did he do during that trial Open his mouth more and not under a second oath
Yeah it's called dementia...
If it's voluntary you are correct. If I owned a business it is not.
The whole electability pitch of Sanders was that he could afford to lose the center as he obviously would because the media would do him dirty just like they did Corbyn because he would bring in hordes of independents and young voters. Except young voters didn't show up and independents broke for Biden. So how is he able to beat Trump then There's a reason Biden is beating Trump in Wisconsin while Sanders is losing. And that's even before the propaganda onslaught that would come.
The only thing Trump cares about is himself don't kid yourself.
gt Isreal has racist and exclusionary policies Nah. It has anti terrorist policies. Go figure. gt and is currently fighting a war of aggression... ROFL. No it isn't If it were there wouldn't be any Palestinians in Israel a month from now.
My guess is they'll get the media gnats to televise their investigation' in hopes of luring viewers away from the covid briefings. It's going to be hard for the dems to convince people of any wrong doing done when there's video footage of them telling people don't worry be happy go out to eat... go to the Chinese new years festival. Pretty bad advice it appears.
HE S BURIED UNDER THE SEPTIC TANK
He looks like the guy who had Voldemort glued to the back of his head. Anyone got a picture of the back of Jared s head Are we sure there s not a little orange Trump face sticking out back there
Tax imports subsidize farmers. That clears up both your concerns no
Be a real shame if some nurses from Windsor couldn't travel to the US every day eh hoser
Don t start shit with the Supreme Court. Done.
This dudes been doing this same type of thing to every comment in this sub. He s 100 a mental midget and possibly even a troll.
We re sorry Canada Please accept us back after we shitcan this clown in November Vote blue no matter who.
He s like an even shittier Patrick Bateman
Cardiothoracic surgery. It's the only thing he's good at.
No
Yes I said that.
he might as well call it the biden apprentice he said he could pick someone in 15 minutes if he had to so he knows who he wants just pick them and be done. the vp slot won't do that much anyways
I think all travels should be restricted right now.
I like how all the sycophants have taken up Trump speak. Remember every object action or process is a thing' and that everything that happens is always unprecedented.
Right. They didn t exhibit symptoms at the time of testing but that doesn t mean they didn t develop them later. Nowhere does it say they followed up to check. Very misleading stats.
Congratulations If you were going for totally vile for this comment you've succeeded. What a horrible thing to say.
You are entrenching on others right to life you dumb fuck. If you read any of these biographies you would know that Benjamin Franklin Friedman and Adam Smith would have a very different stance if they their society or their loved one were faced with distributing ventilators. Pandemics are a unique case. Your life and rights are putting my life and the life s of my loved ones at risk. You want to make it into free market exchange of bullets Happy to deposit a few led fill holes in exchange for you to just sit the fuck inside for a little bit. You want all these rights but I guarantee you wouldn t be the one surviving the libertarian nightmare you wish existed. why doesn t everyone research the virus and come to the very rational conclusion to stay inside It s almost like not everyone is a rational actor and doesn t take self responsibility into account. Even if government forced you to stay inside you should still be coming to this same conclusion. They are only pressing these Quarantining policies because people are idiots.
Hawley is basically bargain bin Paul Ryan. He likes to flex his pet ideas while basically being a rubber stamp for the Republican establishment.
The fact that you wrote jobs first before people speaks volumes about you.
Oh no guys. I m scared now
There are places out there that desperately need people. Most of those however you need skills for. Makes me glad I m in that category. A popular grocery chain in my area is looking for drivers and I just applied since I m currently furloughed. I just got a call to confirm my resume so hopefully I get an interview next week.
Because he has no sense of history or culture because he and his family are white trash
How is this a productive comment
People are desperate. If they want it they will get it and take it. Is that clear enough
gt We've had recessions and bad times that economically DWARF what is going on right now 10s of millions just went on unemployment. We haven't even begun to see how badly this could devastate the economy.
As long as you have something intelligent to say you won't have any trouble. Very rarely do leftists come in here and do anything other than start yelling you can't trust Trump with the nuclear codes
There a are tons of people who just scrape by and strain the system. Stop talking like some sort of communist.
Not gonna be the least bit surprised if we don't get a Coronavirus briefing over the weekend or if we do Trump doesn't show up. He obviously wants this to get as little attention as possible and he'll get bombarded with questions on his next appearance.
I wonder how leftists are going to feel about border security when the third world shithole to our south starts to unravel when coronavirus destroys their already crumbling infrastructure The open borders crowd has been awfully quiet lately...
Another desperate plea from Trump for more foreign help with his 2020 campaign. This firing is a clear signal to Putin and others that he is open for the business of foreign intervention in the election again.
What Happened to the ADL gatestoneinstitute.org The new National Director and CEO of the ADL Jonathan Greenblatt previously directed an initiative at a George Soros financed far left institute and he worked for the Obama administration just prior to joining the ADL. Source archive.today www.breitbart com middle east 2016 11 20 adl chief smeared steve bannon directed project soros funded institute
I mean we re mad about it but even at the highest levels your healthcare is usually tied to your job. Companies expect a lot out of people so it s hard to complain or spend too much time as an activist knowing if you lose your job you lose everything.
First of all even if the former administration didn't replenish the stockpile the Trump administration had 3 years of managing it to fill it up if they wanted. Second someone may have filled it because somehow we had 17. 8 tons of PPE to send to China in February. state.gov state.gov
gt Government takeover of corporation I didn't say it was a good thing. I know the sort of damage done by the goverment seizing companies and factories both in terms of production and general damage to the econmey. It's unfortunately necessary when a company is taking bribes that's effectively killing Americans. But the sooner the 3M board of directors CEO etc is replaced by people not selling Americans out the sooner they can get back to normal business.
I mean whatever Trump does is going to be criticized lol.
I mean we Canadians have already burned the White House down once before maybe its time to do it again. Not so much retaliation but more of a refresher. We ll obviously apologize while watching it burn.
I have learned that whenever someone uses the word Nazi the truth is the exact opposite of whatever they are trying to say.
Optimism is admirable. Unfounded. But admirable.
Such as congress trying to get rid of end to end encryption for websites. Goodbye privacy
They have an answer and twist the language to write the explanation for why their previously decided answer is right.
I'm just amazed you asked a question and got downvoted. I just dont understand why all american citizens csnt be given some form of code number such as SS and a way to check If their vote has been received online. With physical copies stored and requiring information that not just anyone should know about each person. Much better than people risking getting sick going out to vote. Though I hope the situation is not as bad in that future
Not accused guilty.
If he s against it then it s probably a good idea.
What happened to their life is more important than your comfort
Remember when Manafort got a right wing Putin loving politician elected to office by driving a huge wedge right in the middle of the country then at some point everyone just got mad at him so there was a massive uprising to remove him from office which eventually led to him fleeing to Russia What Did Ex Trump Aide Paul Manafort Really Do in Ukraine nbcnews.com gt Critics of Manafort however insist his gameplan for the 2006 election was to drive a wedge into the electorate. Chornovil Serhiy Leshchenko a Ukrainian lawmaker and former investigative journalist and Taras Berezovets who advised one of Yanukovych's main political foes all say Manafort's strategy was based on polarizing the voting public. They say he wanted to set Russian speakers against Ukrainian speakers and supporters of Moscow against supporters of NATO
I sure as shit was NOT genuinely accusing you of being a communist. The act of seizing a business is a communist idea to some degree as you are saying But participating in an act of communism does not make one a communist
I never understood as to why a dead guy needs 24 hour security. Who s gonna kill him he s already dead
This. Unless you can't distinguish the two cognitively then it does no harm to analyze data that is based on totals. Its possible to be worse off by one metric and better off by another. You can't argue that one negates the significance of the other.
Hear hear. On top of that. Foreign workers are CHEAP. Which helps keep our food affordable. If you pay Americans as pickers you pay more at the table too
Jared himself wrote the new text nobody with half a brain could write that garbage
It s not that easy though. Having worked government in another life there are pretty effective measures in place that prevent something like you re referencing occurring.
It's about rights and using this moment to advance an agenda of taking them away. Unless red states closing abortion clinics is about money too.
I think this article is confused. Americans are not obsessed with work. Our 1 overlords are obsessed with workers working.
He thought this youtu.be was a tutorial.
Being a bootlicker and endangering the lives of everyone a twofer.
Okay. I think the US will be just fine with 264 million people.
Another post from the TOLERANT LEFT.
gt If you didn't want to talk about it but I do and I did though..
Definition of patriotism
Do you know what bugs me more than the lack of bars and bbq I couldn't legally protest this or anything by peacefully marching together in a rally with like minded individuals. That's a dead canary in our metaphorical coalmine right there
Yeah that's true but I bet there are some people that go to only here and no where else. Same with people who go to only r politics and no where else
The media the senate Hollywood our major corporations. The Chinese have sunk their claws deep into our land.
Currently the biggest dick in the US first time that Jared back channel Kushner has relinquished the title in over 3 years
I thought this was a Babylonbee article....
You are right contagious was not the right choice of words. Perhaps I should have said that it spreads easier
Infrastructure jobs during social distancing sounds counterproductive
Ur a good troll
she's some dumb formerly ESPN reporter who takes any opportunity she can to bash trump. The liberals are really upset about Trump but most of them admittedly haven't gotten so bitter and petty that they will start complaining about Trump supporters giving out masks. It's a good deed. It has no political intent. Don't try to stir one.
Its not about celebrating a couple percent of the population its about the community finally having rights like a human should have. Your religion has no part nor say in this matter America was built on democratic values and a constitution not on the bible.
Are you really saying covid is an imaginary illness
This guy is never going to die. He and Kieth Richards will watch the red giant Sun engulf the Earth.
As was Obama and every president from now to infinity... and beyond.
gt Who is this our' he is referring to He's just using the royal our
Of course
It s hard to hear what you re saying. Maybe if you take trumps dick out of your mouth we could understand better. All I hear is this gaggy more daddy noise coming from your cum dumpster.
Seriously got a link for that moment.
Nobody is taking your rights away with a stay at home order.
Forget the lives How much money has he cost his handlers And the billionaires The Clown was meant to be a diversion while the other hand was sneaking money out of the til Now everyone's mad that Trump is still playing the circus monkey act but everyone is yelling at him Even his handlers I was going somewhere cynical and sarcastic with this to convey my bitterness and frustration with all the evil Trump has committed and gotten away with but with the virus it really is about the lives. So many people are about to die because Trump and his circus masters don't want to rule the country really. They just want to be rich and be in charge without working for either.
What's a trump Is that still a thing
People are scared and desperate. If they want it and think it works they will find away to get it. It s a commonly prescribed drug for other illnesses. Hope that clears up some of your confusion.
I thought this was satire but then I read the link
Hello Bloodbath McGrath thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Bloodbath McGrath amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. ashingtonpost.com context 10000
They were both members of the navy. One committed heinous crimes and was pardoned. One sent and email and was fired.
Most of the people who brought in coronavirus entered legally through airports and cruise lines from traveling abroad and were citizens.
rollingstone.com fbclid IwAR0fUYG45iV4wRzpk TzrZLqhM1eeo41Ds2RI9P8P Y2Tp9HT0cmoimQyNE
Well you see what you call an emergency is what the business community calls Christmas.
More unqualified fuckwads
It s about the government knowing that the sickness was loose and covering it up and letting people leave long before any official announcement. They knew for quite a while and did nothing but hinder people from finding out.
Some places tried revoking the 2nd Amendment in the name of the pandemic. The rest of the country seems to be revoking the 1st. Oh you can still speak out...online Using services owned by corporations who like to silence dissent Can t go to church anymore. Can t have a rally. Can t peaceably assemble against your government now. Can t even whisper in someone s ear due to the 6 foot rule And most of us are just sitting back and taking it.
Yup it's called narrative building they are applying the same talking point to Trump.
Susan Collins Lesson learned
Careers and full time jobs are what get cut during a depression. Gig jobs are what are on the rise because of how little the company has to commit not paying for health car insurance etc. And how little they lay compared to a salary or full time position. The jobs being lost right now are definitely not the easy gig jobs. Career offering jobs also go on hold and stop hiring during a depression. So how is one supposed to get a career job if the businesses aren't hiring
Sounds like socialism 2me
I m a chiefs fan myself so I can t imagine if Mahomes turns out like Cam. But I wish you guys the best.
Failed to have a Republican Congress approve a spending bill which would have allowed its replenishment. propublica.org
Trump Sexually Assaults Entire CNN Staff Attempting to Infect Them With COVID 19 Best not.
Ivanka is an idiot of epic proportions.
The point is that it s obviously not a conservative dream to have US companies selling much needed supplies to other countries. The president will force 3M to keep their supplies in the US with the defense act. But Americans who run American companies should have been doing that anyway.
Congratulations you are the peak of human stupidity
In total Or just federal
She turned me into a newt
I just looked. They're still butthurt AOC won't send them feet pics. Every third post is about her. I mean I'm upset too but come on man. Move on.
Can't forget their enablers on cable news... There will be a great disturbance in the media as if millions of voices suddenly cried out SOMBER TONE and suddenly were silent on all the lies.
The anti christ is going to be born in Israel according to Revelations.
They were asked and they did increase output greatly. They've decided to start playing games though so they lost their privilege to be asked. Crazy times.
Yeah good luck with that. Seriously America these guys don t give a shit about your laws or constitution. The sooner everyone acknowledges that the better.
It s entirely possible
That's why I have an entire room lined with TP in my house
I understand that most denominations do believe homosexuality is a sin but most of the people here are using it as a front to be completely homophobic and I feel it's my right to call them out on their bullshit. Being drunk is considered a sin but nobody here is calling for alchohol to be banned. Yes I'm familiar with the bee and I understand that its satire but again people use satire as a front for their hate I'm sure you remember r frenworld
Yes
Murderer.
Removed Rule 6 Submission headlines must match the article headline or quote the article. You can delete it and resubmit with the correct title.
Dude I m a white guy in Colorado not everybody that thinks you re a racist is CCP. Also isn t CCP super anti democratic which am I CCP or Democrat Also you didn t answer my question. Nobody calls it Wuhan Flu why are you
list of progressives running for congress in 2020 reddit.com utm source share amp utm medium ios app amp utm name iossmf
Didnt realize your comment was sarcastic. I dont know if student loans should be forgiven entirely. I turned down a chance to go to a prestigious university and went thr community college route instead. I'd rather student loan debt just have a cap on interest rates. If banks can lend at close to 0 students should be able to.
gt Is that ok Yes....because it is my choice. Thinking for yourself is hard work but it beats trusting government experts
He's just a rat carrying the disease that is the CCP's lies. I have full faith in Trump to launch new economic sanctions against the CCP after the coronavirus is contained until the CCP agrees to regulate the standards of any Chinese products.
Hello soccerburn55 thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u soccerburn55 amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. npr.org utm source dlvr.it amp utm medium twitter context 10000
gt will wake these fucking people up and ask more questions and finally see what the fuck they've been supporting. lol no they won t dude. take a look around you. if nothing in the last four years has done that then this won t either. people do not vote and many of the people who do vote are seriously dumb as fuck and vote against their own interests. this country is fucked to a point of no return.
Orange bag of dicks lied people die. Jared the king dingleberry is an embarrassment to clingons.
They have abandoned everything for a few silver pieces. And they now have their living golden idol to lead them and preach. It does not matter that every single word he speaks is a lie it is what they want to hear.
gt Frankly Trump is on firmer ground considering he s using the Defense Production Act Does that give him the authority to stop them from selling products to other countries So much for free markets.
I understand why there's a process but I'm actually glad to see us bypassing red tape and bureaucratic hoops during emergency.
gt And you re fine with letting your fellow Americans be at risk You missed the point. Let's presume you are an adult. You listen to the experts. They tell you if you have existing medial issues that the virus Might affect you differently than healthy people. Healthy people regardless of their age. So YOU make your own decision. Stay home. Have we not yet learned that we do not want a government that treats us as idiots and so therefore has to impose restrictions.
Honest question Why do we still guard the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier if it's empty The last remains in there were identified years ago then given proper burials. Was the memorial repurposed I don't mean any disrespect to the fallen whatsoever and I apologize if this is coming off as such.
Imagine whining about deluded leftists when you take your policy cues from a 2000 year old work of fiction.
Don't ask us for things when you don't know what you have in your own state. Just because you're scared you ask your medical professionals and they don't know Imagine your a governor and this is the little shithead you have to call for more medical supplies.
Hoped he fathered alot of children we need whatever he has in the gene pool
You don t know that. I m not interacting with illegals during the quarantine are you
Okay I read that. I didn't see any quotes from Barr or any links to actual documents. Given the claim is that it is secret I'm just gonna sit pat with I don't believe that kinda claim any more than I do any other extravagant claim without any actual empirical evidence which I come across on the Internet. If you want to believe in fairy tales that is up to you or if there is actual proof of the claims I'm open to seeing it. But it does not appear to be in that particular article. How many times over the past 4 years have we been told that someone has daming proof or that an anonymous source has testimony that is a smoking gun etc. etc. etc. and it has never materialized One has to be either a in cahoots with the movement i.e a traitor to the American way of life or b mentally defective to buy such claims without solid evidence. Especially given there is an ongoing psychological war between the White House and the New Totalitarian Tribalist movement of which Rolling Stone is an agent. The Democratic Party have been on display incessantly for four years demonstrating that they have ZERO concern for the rule of law due process honesty ethics individual rights or the welfare of the country as a whole Anyone who is aware of the events in this country for the past four years who is not diagnosed as mentally deficient or permanently high has no excuse you vote Democrat this election cycle NO MATTER WHOM THAT CANDIDATE IS AT THIS POINT and no matter which race congressional Presidential local you are in fact acting to further forces which seek to destroy the United States of America in sum a TRAITOR. I am NOT a partisan person. I detest partisanism. I voted for Billy and I even voted for Barack once My convictions have to do with America and the preservation of its core values and founding principles. The Democratic Party has demonstrated during the past four years that they care NOTHING For America or the preservation of its core values and founding principles. We need them to suffer at the ballot box like never before and slink away in defeat and reconsider their self destructive agenda reform or split off a new party that doesn't rest on the destruction of core American values as its primary means to exert its influence. I'm talking about the efforts by the Democratic party to overthrow the results of the 2016 election by myriad means all of them duplicitous and unethical if not also illegal. I'm talking about a party which cares more about its grip on power than on the core values and principles which are the bedrock of our American society. I'm talking about a movement intent on denying Americans due process under guise of hate crimes progressive values and political correctness. I'm talking about Communist totalitarian values disguised as benign social welfare and intended as a means to pander to the disadvantaged. I'm talking about a scheme to shift the demographics of as many states as possible so as to reconfigure the distribution of seats in the House and rig legislative processes for generations. I'm talking about a party which regards minorities as either useful idiots who can be bought with bread and circuses or even worse actually believes the nonsense about them being deficient incapable individuals in need of extra protection from the Nanny State on which so much of their rhetoric hinges. That is what I'm talking about for starters but it certainly is not the full extent of the un American traitorous despicable egregiously malfeasant agendas behaviors and habits of the so called Democratic party by a long shot. A full accounting of the wrongs they have engaged in these past 4 years nay these past 20 years would fill volumes. If you are not familiar with these patterns of behavior in the so called Democratic party these past few years then you are either delusional mentally incapacitated or part of the problem.
Where does the Canadian PM get his news reddit popular page This has been proven to be false. Fedex even weighed in.
It can be said in any state. A state of happiness fear shock amazement panic marvel etc. Do people not think for themselves anymore and use their own brains Just believing anything they read
Have you seen the Bernie or Bust bros on here They are often delusional dicks to anyone that isn't of their exact same mindset.
You are pretty stupid if you think that
List of trump's dangerous lies reddit.com These lies and misinformation made people believe there was no serious threat. We should have been more cautious and started social distancing in January when the cdc warned of the threat. Dates of Trump's golf rounds doing nothing and cult rallies endangering the health of the entire country for political gains reddit.com Even if you don't believe his lies affected anything these cult rallies went on through the end of February. There was no excuse for this. Gathering thousands of people close together. If a few people had it atone rally it could have easily spread to dozens who then each spread it to dozens more and so on. We should have been social distancing. He was rallying his cult.
terrible photoshop job
Oof... lets see how this plays out during the pandemic.
Sure pardoning war criminals wasn't his fault as well. s
I m no law expert but I m pretty sure there a law about knowingly endangering people s life
Lol the blaze
Senator Dianne Feinstein D China
The Imperial System is Awesome. starecat.com
Why is that Shouldn t businesses be making decisions best for them Afterall H1Bs are paying the same taxes as you.
Ex IG Atikson will become a liberal darling and write a book in 4... 3... 2... 1...
Yes well trump never called it a hoax so at least theres that.
Plenty of Bernie supporters have been calling out Biden like myself. And if Sanders had the kinds of allegations Biden Trump or Kavanaugh have against them you can bet I would be supporting someone else.
She liked him change my mind.
The French revolution started over less.
Damn this is perfect.
How many millions are you hiring and do your promise 15 min per hour and full healthcare benefits If not take a stadium full of seats and we ll get back to you.
Well WW2 literally had a higher mortality rate than the coronavirus so if he could go through that and come out alive...
Now that... I could get into.
Do nothing Experts are saying that eating food with the Virus on it doesn't transmit the virus. If you're really worried cook all your food.
Thanks. The first one makes sense and reads well the second no sense whatsoever in addition to sounding like it was written by a middle schooler.
can disconfirm have never run into schoolwork like this. Brother is a teacher idk what the hell this is
Every economy in the entire damn world is hit hard from Coronavirus. Dont sit here and pretend like the economic hit is on Trump or his administration. Thats absolutely crazy talk and I wont stand to listen to it jesus.
That last sentence was written as a stopgap buffer against immediate competence since none was immediately available.
Jemele is trying to play partisan lines in a time where we are not democrat or republican but AMERICAN. Shut up and quit trying to bring politics into it. I don't like Trump I'm not a conservative but I respect what Robert Kraft is doing. If you don't have anything nice to say don't say anything at all. Don't just voice some dumb opinion to get attention because most of us forgot who you were after you were let go from ESPN.
Greek epics What she's reading Nick Kyrgios' professional tennis biography Fuck off Ivanka
America is not the only country suffering. We as a global community need to tackle this virus instead of letting our selfishness get the best of us.
So all those MSM stories about America cruelty stealing supplies from the airport runways of other countries were actually stories about America retrieving its own ill sold supplies How am I not surprised
Except price gauging is a crime. In most states 39 specifically including where this particular guy was price gauging price gouging during a time of emergency is considered a violation of unfair or deceptive trade practices law. Being a greedy dick during pandemic is a crime. consumer.findlaw.com
I honestly feel really treaded on right now.
It s called professionalism it exists in any successful workplace. He is wasting his time on petty crap. Stuff like this and his ratings talk is going to lose him the election.
gt Don't blame people for reacting to poor planning. We had months to prepare for this and you know it. Never said we didn't But don't act like everyone saw it coming back in January because you'll lose that battle.
Flush her down the toilet already. I've heard better suggestions from Mr. Hanky.
Cuomo literally said he had a fever.
It's literally a Jewish state though. Even if ethnostate wasn't an accurate description Isreal has racist and exclusionary policies and is currently fighting a war of aggression. I'm not sure this is the horse you want to be backing if you are against state power and want freedom and human rights for all.
We serve the people of the United States. They are our responsibility first and foremost. Cruise lines should ve pulled in as soon as ports started closing.
I have never looked at moving to another country so often. It's like a monthly thing I plan out.
Trump really is a dictator. This country is sick.
Every partisan shit show is an annoying waste of tax dollars. What does that have to do with this OP
gt Too much weight is given to the words of celebrities. Lol right I mean that's how we ended up with a reality TV show host as president.
If you didn t want the the congress to perform oversight duties you shouldn t have vetoed the agreed oversight in the bill. Dumbass brought this upon himself.
You're an average citizen and you damn well know that....so does he. That's why I'm worried about the lengths he'll go to in order to get a second term.
Fuck this soft lets vote shit.. people are dying
Is the new test a suppository
As I explained to someone else there is this thing called the GDP to Debt ratio which basically shows how well we're doing and as an example right after World War II ended we had a ratio of 121 Prior to this we had a ratio of 107 so we were doing better than we should have been and as of March 2020 we are at 91 As an example of how bad things have been in our country during the big crisis in the 1970s that ratio dropped down to 31 at it's lowest and 40 at it's highest so technically we're still doing quite well. Also in 2019 most economists were estimating that we would be entering a recession because of how well our economy has been doing and the guess was between 2020 and 2021 so once again technically we would could have been facing these economy issues regardless of the Wuhan Flu or not. I have not lost my job but I do remember what happened in the 70s and it sucked. A few of my family members have lost their jobs in the past week or two and I've helped them get replacement jobs doing the jobs that are risky but necessary during this crisis such as delivery and the like. Sorry if I sound a little too logical no empathy about this but like someone pointed out that no one takes notice of how many people die from cars or alcohol etc. in the same beat very few people worry about people losing jobs going bankrupt during a recession.
Fair enough. I'm a cloud architect and a dyslexic so I get your point
Doubt
He seems pretty clear cut on who's to blame... Leadership Whatever happens you're responsible. If it doesn't happen you're responsible. twitter.com ref src twsrc 5Etfw 7Ctwcamp 5Etweetembed 7Ctwterm 5E398887965302091776 amp ref url https 3A 2F 2Farchive.thinkprogress org 2Ftrump trumpcare health care personal responsibility awkward tweets d8a97ebfd094 2F
Idol worship is not helpful to anyone.
Karma is a bitch his day is coming.
nah kids will definitely be mad and screaming why did you even fucking give birth to me at their very much alive parents in 20 30 years
Whether you call it the deep state or just corruption of people who work there it's still legitimate. It's utterly shameful what these people did and yet way too many Democrats still stick to it.
I just saw Farmers offering 18 to pick fruit. Tough job but I've done worse.
His handlers are socialists. It's debatable whether Biden himself can remember what his public positions are supposed to be.
Dude you can t argue for shit lol
Op smells like shit.
Turns out when you decide to run the government like a business the workers end up getting screwed.
You don t always run a fever when you have the flu dude.
Anyone looking for a diversion Fun facts Of the 5 341 academic.oup.com classified species of mammals there are 1 240 orldatlas.com recognized species of bat. Thus the proportion of mammalian species capable of flight is 23 google.com q 1240 2F5341 The US expected average daily mortality rate is 8 000 google.com q 331 2C000 2C000 288. 880 2F1000 29 2F365 deaths per day. This is a normal amount of dead Americans. population orldometers.info per capita macrotrends.net 365 COVID 19 was responsible for 1 321 orldometers.info countries deaths in the US yesterday almost double the daily peak of 508 usatoday.com deaths from the flu. Therefore COVID 19 is increasing the normal daily mortality rate of Americans above the expected by 16 google.com q 1321 2F8000 On 04 01 20 COVID 19 was the 3rd highest nymag.com daily cause of death in the US after heart disease and cancer. The US contains only 4. 25 orldometers.info of the world population but approximately 25 orldometers.info countries of worldwide confirmed cases of COVID 19 are within the US. The combined populations of New York and New Jersey simple.m.wikipedia.org is approximately one half the population of Italy orldometers.info but they have more confirmed cases combined than Italy to date. 133 000 orldometers.info vs 119 000 orldometers.info This is with Italy testing npr.org at a higher rate than either NY or NJ is testing forbes.com NYC's expected average daily mortality rate is 330 google.com q 18 2C800 2C000 286. 40 2F1000 29 2F365 This is a normal amount of dead NYC residents. population macrotrends.net per capita baruch.cuny.edu 365 On April 2nd 180 nypost.com NYC residents died of COVID 19 a 55 google.com q 180 2F330 increase over normal The projected 2 640 single day deaths at the peak of the curve covid19.healthdata.org on April 15th is projected to be 33 google.com q 2640 2F8000 above normal due to COVID 19.
No thanks I don't need any pedo anything... and it's weird that you're advertising it as though that's better pedo stuff than Brietbart's pedo blog. Breibart is a pedo blog. Downvoted.
Oversight needs to compile the tracking of purchases and sales of critically needed medical equipment and have dated images videos of every supposed shipment that is likely being manipulated by Kushner and crony shell companies. Rinse and Repeat and again we find even more humans devoid of any humanity still feeding at the very top.
Bingo. I voted Bernie in the WA Primary but if Biden gets the nomination I'll vote for him with a fucking song in my heart.
There's been 300 plus years of capitalism and there has yet to be a version that doesn't structurally over reward greedy or psychopathic actors. It's time to try something different.
Trump finds new ways to embarrass himself every day so its comparable.
Take an NFL players used jock and use it as a mask. Now you know.
How could you not want this man as president
Liberals It's Trump's fault we don't have enough medical supplies stockpiled in the U.S Also liberals How dare Trump block our supplies being sent to Canada What a monster
gt Greg Burel who was the director of the Strategic National Stockpile for more than 12 years until he retired in January recently told CBS News We didn t receive funds to replace those masks protective gear and the anti virals that we used for H1N1. gt He told Vice News that he decided to use the program s limited funding to instead purchase vaccines flu medications and other pharmaceuticals. gt We had to trade off those funds that we had and we chose to invest in those lifesaving drugs that would not be available from any other source in the quantity needed and in time. I definitely want to see my healthcare workers protected that s very important. But if I m thinking Do I buy this many masks to protect this many workers or do I buy this many medicines to keep people safe that we can t get elsewhere there s no easy answer here Burel said.
Yea all the people who got laid off are dumb people who didn t make the right choice in what industry to work in s
gt The rule against issuing an indictment against the POTUS is antidemocratic. Not at all. The people's representatives the house decide whether to charge them and what to charge them with and the state's representatives senate hear the case and decide the verdict and punishment. It's very democratic. We just happen to have some very undemocratic state representatives...
Yet he's outsmarting the Dems at every turn... Why is that Maybe you're wrong. Maybe you shouldn't accept all of the liberal spin about him at face value. I'm not saying he's perfect he's just not nearly as bad as you libs like to scream at the sky about. Obama is an eloquent and articulate speaker... Yet he was a mediocre President at best.
amymcgrath.com She seems like a good alternative Kentucky.
Why do we fund the IRS to police tax evaders and cheats Why do we fund local police to enforce laws The benefit is larger than the cost fairus.org which for illegal immigration is estimated at 116 billion for just 2017.
That idea is part of the problem sort of. The real root of the problem is the FPTP system itself and the voting behaviours it incentivizes. We won t be able to fundamentally change how FPTP works and what kind of strategic 2 party voting it encourages by changing people s attitudes alone. Voting third party really is like throwing your vote away and as much as that sucks people know it s true hence why the incentive not to vote third party is so strong. There are many better systems out there that are able to function fairly and democratically with more than 2 parties. Only about a third of the world uses FPTP most countries use a system with proportional representation. If you dislike the current 2 party system your energy is best directed toward electoral reform and scrapping FPTP not the overwhelming majority of people who are unwilling to vote third party.
I disagree otherwise you wouldn t have commented
Yeah functionally those were instances of a failed state. But in those cases the Senate did not vote to declare the failure of the state. They just did nothing. In the vote on witnesses they put it on the permanent record.
Only if you are brainless heartless and are willing to kiss Trump's ass. I'd rather risk getting Coronavirus by working at a grocery store.
I think you need flair here. It will help discussion if we know where you are starting from
He has no ability to do so. Inauguration and term expiration dates are explicitly in the Constitution.
facepalm
I agree with your argument but what I don't agree with is the shitty argument of Look at the flu death numbers from 3 years ago We aren't halfway through the coronavirus pandemic. You'd be an idiot to believe that because the numbers haven't surpassed the flu of 2017 that it can't be worse. That's a really dumb argument. It's like saying to a guy who hit 10 HR's in his first 10 at bats of an MLB season that he isn't as good as Barry Bonds because Bonds hit 73 HR's in an entire season. You're comparing 3 games to a whole season. That's some idiot level shit stop doing it.
I think Schumer is going to need the D.C Fire Department for that burn.
That fucking pillow guy is going to end up somewhere in his kingdom.
Not being facetious but how As a left leaning guy looking in I don t think Obama would ve botched this either.
Yep. We can subdivide into 5 states but knowing our cronies it ll be to increase their power in the federal senate by gerrymandering as much as possible. Fortunately sorta voters are fairly prideful of their national state identity this is Texas so it makes sense to word it that way so subdividing isn t exactly a popular idea.
All this aside this is the United States right now and for the foreseable future. This is our reality.
His campaign has addressed the the Tara Reade issue multiple times. Read this article which explains the whole situation really clearly and fairly salon.com
Now wait a damn minute that all depends on the following 1 will the future president be black or a female 2 will they wear tan suits 3 will they put mustard on their burger If they the answer to any one of those is yes then count me out I'd rather see this country burn to the fucking ground and own those libs No s I'm done with that shit
we're so fucked
Hi PharmerDerek Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission r politics comments fum7ar rogan says trump over biden has been removed for the following reason s Your headline must be comprised only of the exact copied and pasted headline of the article see our rule here. reddit.com wiki do not create your own title We recommend not using the Reddit suggest a title' as it may not give the exact title of the article. The ALL CAPS and Breaking' rule is applied even when the actual title of the article is in all caps or contains the word Breaking' This rule may be applied to other single word declarative and or sensational expressions such as EXCLUSIVE or HOT click here for more details r politics wiki index wiki do not create your own title If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u PharmerDerek amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission 28 r politics comments fum7ar rogan says trump over biden context 3D10000 29
The problem is no one fact checks him that matters. The GOP allows him to run free. His supporters dont google anything he says. we are fucked.
My man How s Nola hanging in there with the virus lately
The article linked says that the bill provides relief to people without ITINs but the link within the article to Rep. Correa's page says that the bill amends the CARES act to provide relief to people with ITINs. Not the best journalism.
Hey a reasonable comment I've edited my original post a couple times you may wish to read it. The brunt of it is I was merely trying to explain why people have different opinions. I wasn't trying to advocate or back either position more or less government authority That said gt Perhaps I should have said that it spreads easier I'll elucidate even further on my original point then explain why this part is relevant People have a more visceral reaction to something like Ebola partly because it's deadlier but also because the concept is more readily visible. Get into as much detail as you want about Covid it's not going to imprint as much on that section of the lizard brain ie the instinctual avoidance mechanisms No mass graves no piles of bodies with the flesh eaten away etc etc. It spreads as easy as it does because it's not as visible literally or figuratively. Long carry times non severe early symptoms low mortality rate and less conceptual social stigma. It remains an abstract and as such doesn't trigger anything similar to terror like with other diseases. Cognitively it is more difficult to take seriously. In the end people are going to think what they're going to think without some form of visceral connection. It doesn't help that the press and the government are wishy washy on the subject. I can't even blame them as many are attempting to allay fears and avoid hysteria. This makes the situation into a veritable sea of conflicting information at which point people again are going to think in random directions based on whatever predilections or proprieties or priorities they have. Again I'm not taking a position. It's not my decision to make. I'm just saying why there are diverse opinions.
After he had everything a man could want risking nothing. And as you say he lived in a society different to ours so his others thoughts should be as dubious in the present and he surely didn't mean the same thing with essential liberty or temporary safety as you do in your presentism but different rules for you and me is classic conservatism. Edit also liberty and safety aren't gods though you often get all your false deities mixed up.
I mean we have cities with millions in literal deserts. I just don t see us running out of fresh water enough to start a war. We have technology to desalinate water also. So I don t see it becoming scarce enough to start a war. This is something I ve heard for a long time but just don t see it happening.
The senate
i have fired the horsecatcher
We need to organize and take care if 2 things ourselves.
Be a lot easier for me to link on mobile. Ignorant He called it a hoax etc. Here ya go. Check my post history. I'm trying to do my part. I hot a young person to admit they were being lied to a few weeks ago. But only by PM.
Can t people join and train with the military if they want to use military weaponry Enter law enforcement if they want to use law enforcement level weaponry Pass hunter safety courses to shoot at animals Maintain a record of responsible and lawful conduct to own and carry basic weaponry Do you support any regulations
bUt iT's oNlY 3 oF wHaT wE do
Does that fact checker not have enough intelligence to know that money is fungible
Im talking about your comment about having sex with transgenders And you know most major health orgs agree that not all trans have gender dysphoria
Didn't a guy die from ingesting this How isn't it dangerous
Correct
First of all how He is no where near qualified to run a fast food joint let alone a massive task force that is in charge of securing our nation's response to this horrible pandemic. Second of all why Why in the flying fuck did everyone in earshot of this clusterfuck of an idea think that this was the right decision.
That s because they re mostly christians and they re still getting what they think need which is religious provisions expanded religious liberties and religious judges. You just feel like your getting shafted because you re not religious enough Or you care about economics or political stability or public health or really anything but your concept of your relationship to the Christian god If you would just focus on the religious political progress that s been made you d be absolutely ecstatic. You d be glorifying trump and willing to overlook everything else.
I agree. Nixon and Kissinger opened the china door which could never be shut introducing and propagating the idea that as they became richer they'd become more western.
metro.co.uk If you'll accept China 17 years ago as an approximation of the old days irishtimes.com
Bc they re celebrities
I agree. All this stuff scares the crap out of me. 3M can do what they like but they should be utterly destroyed by lack of any future gov usage and the public should also shun them for this outrageous lack of morals.
Fucking Boomers.
Don t sugar coat it. Just call it lying. Pathologically lying at that
Racist bitch.
Well we know her father... tree gt apple.
We re aware thanks.
Alyssa Milano is the actress that basically started the entire MeToo thing and was a constant pundit during the whole Kavanaugh trial and a person that the Democrats decided to put on full display in the audience the entire time due to her work at getting that whole thing to go viral. She was outspoken that we have to believe women that we should investigate claims thoroughly and that we should call into question the character of men who would even be accused looking at things so trivial as social calendars their completely typical levels of love for alcohol and high school antics to paint a backdrop upon which to judge the unproven and un provable claims. A few days ago she posted a twitter thread twitter.com strongly supporting Biden and urging Bernie supporters to do the same. She has never even mentioned his accuser. If you need more proof of double standards and Democrat privilege I have no hope for you.
Good Delay it and move it to a date that will allow the state to implement a system for citizens to vote by mail if this is still hammering away us
It's almost enough to make you want to be test case isn't it If this shit isn't shot down by the courts I don't know a better way to demonstrate that you don't actually have the rights enumerated in our constitution
Glad to know people are reading multiple news sources. that's how it should be. I am a liberal but I have found some Shapiro's videos where I felt his arguments were very reasonable. Is there like a YouTube series that I can watch to follow him more or reading dailywire is better
It's definitely a Trumpsterfire for sure
Yup. And some high percentage of doctors in Spain have been using it. Doesn't seem to be affecting their abysmal death rate.
As in fuck the rest of the state.
To quote Stan Pines But this... this is beautiful
Yeah I see that now thank you
I believe that behind all this is Russia. Who now divides the federal government from the local government. Who has us divided as a people. Who has us divided from our global allies. This makes us weaker...remember the Soviet Union
Except it won t because I don t come from one of the hand full of nations that are responsible for 95 of all the ocean borne plastic. Neither do I live in one of the 27 countries that stupidly imposed a landfill tax without imposing a waste exportation ban and then saw all their plastic waste shipp half way round the world just to be dumped in rivers and the sea. There is a couple of reason that despite evermore stringent regulation more plastic than ever is in the sea.the biggest one is environmental regulations. In this case the path to hell was quite literally littered with good intentions.
The potential for an equitable election would be astounding.
It's surreal to see it from the inside but be powerless to stop it.
Better go tell the doctors they are murdering babies instead of simply removing an underdeveloped fetus. They seem to have that mixed up. Also you're not being brigated. I assume not all conservatives go along with the idea that abortion is wrong in any way.
Starbucks and amazon grocery stores are two completely different things retard first of all Starbucks doesn t provide shit and isn t essential while on the other hand those two things you just listed are essential for people so maybe think before you comment next time.....
What is wrong with her
passive voice doing a lot of work in this headline
Lol u timcast
Alabama got 5k dry rotted masks. Not even red states can rely on this administration.
You forgot this also shows how the dems in Congress do nothing but complain about how evil the orange man is. Instead of their jobs of helping the American people. I wonder if the new impeachment is going to help the president and GOP like the last one did
It s not the conservatives going on spring break and traveling to mexico. It s young college students who generally are an extremely left leaning demographic. Nice try though.
Lol the guy cant make a complete sentence. He and Trump might as well be twins.
Only a complete piece of shit like her would think to ask that question during this time
Dr Oz is a fucking crank but I hope this is true.
Most definitely. It's only possible for Trump to make the very worst choices. Consequently he and the nation is trapped in a perpetual cascade of abject failures. There is no end in sight.
Sure. Apply the same logic. Is she considering the potential of a quarter million people dead a good job She makes one bad statement and you re trying to say it s the same caliber as Trump purposely misleading the entire country and really the world By your logic if anyone downplayed it even for a moment it s the same as what Trump has been doing.
He doesn't get reelected if he shuts down the post office. They're a vital institution with greater than 90 approval.
SSDD Dems do a bad job blame Trump.
i just want to thank the president and the american people.... 15 days to slow the spread.... 30 days to slow the spread....
Yikes imagine not wanting this to be the case just because you disagree with someone politically...
Sounds efficient.
Oh no I don't think this story will make it to Monday let alone the ge. My post was just a friendly reminder. I'm excited for you guys
I can't help you with that. I know nothing about cocaine. I was just attempting to be a little bit funny. P
Do not comply. No government no king no despot no nazi tells you what you may or may not wear.
My free speech does contribute to kids getting murdered in schools. Or churches getting shot up. And even with freedom of expression there are still restrictions. Can't slander or liable someone can't tell fire in a crowded place I'm all for responsible gun ownership but the fact is most Americans are dumb and want guns to feel powerful. That why you should have to go to the equivalent of drivers ed and have to pass an equivalent test. At least then we would have a better understanding of whose a risk.
Be bester er
Fear of what
transit workers really need the protection. they face johnny Q public every day. small things can help them like free transit so no front door entry. everybody enters and exits from the back door. keep the driver away from the public. this would really help them.
so he spins what he means
Not everyone is fortunate enough to save.
Quick Let s all rush at Trump and Pence so we can get tested
Pretty much all of 3M production happens in their asian subs so what They are not bound by american law. Simple as that.
This is so sad. I'm so sorry your going through this. Try and be strong internet stranger.
Right and Seth Meyers is anybody fucking special fuck Hollywood Fuck anyone that supports it. Fuck you
I am really waiting for our Lizard overlords to rewind the simulation to 2015.
Venezuela has well over double Alabama's GDP six times its population about 10x the armed forces.
He's a competent advocate as opposed to the he replaced.
3M is out of my house Just as soon as my last N95 mask is used anyway...... I bought several sleeves of them in January before the surge. I won t let them go to waste
Also I should mention I once did an IQ test and it came back a solid 99. So I'm defiantly on something lmao
Insider trading when your husband is head of the market is insider insider trading. Put her in prison like they did Martha.
gt Capitalism. Other countries are willing to pay more than our states Capitalism isn't immoral. People hiding behind the term capitalism are. American companies should be looking after America first.
Lol Some of them Im starting to think I'd like to see it
I am amazed at how much news programs always manage to go above and beyond at dragging out every possible story of some major event. They've really brought their A game lately. It does not take 30 minutes to update you on the status of the pandemic. There are still other things going on in the world but you wouldn't know from television news.
That literally does not matter. His term is over in November whether the election is cancelled delayed or continues as usual. And he no longer has any authority until or if he is re elected president
And no tracks
Maybe it helps to think of it as voting for an alleged rapist versus someone who has over a dozen rape allegations and bragged on tape about sexually assaulting women.
What rights are we losing by being told to stay in our own homes The government is literally giving us money so we can survive comfortably. Get off your high horse.
The same media who was hating on him for not taking a test before when he also wasn't showing symptoms
1. What have you that idea The Stone Age ended at least 2000 years before Christ was born. 2. Even if there was any historical fact in that what does that have to do with what I said. I said Christians aren t the most victimized group in America by a long shot. I never said they were cavemen.
Thanks russiabot1776
Where am I shitting on them What is this Crybaby Friday or something in Conservative. Like I always say if they want a great country and they are coming to ours they are letting their country down in the long run. It benefits us but it does nothing for the country they are still trying to support.
If voting gave you a voice they would make it illegal.
You mean like a Logger or Fisher Nah they should still be allowed to work.
And they don't even have aby aptitude for the careers they do have. Just born into wealth and shady connections.
Biden and everything he represents is why we have Trump in the first place.
Same giy that wrote that article wrote other fictional articles in past like Russia collusion
Personally my guess was Defies Trump
Can t keep politics out of anything can they.
still people will learn Fox is being sued. at least that would hurt their reputation a bit.
I can just imagine how the conversation started I'm I am going...I will start you know the thing. Leave it to the DNC to find someone who actually makes Trump look like an eloquent speaker in comparison.
Because we can take it out of your fantasy world and into reality and realize that if more than 50 of the legislators vote for it they have a consensus.
I look forward to the awards I will get when I steal this comment for the next time he says something ridiculous.
Resign
Remember when Republicans would lose their shit anytime Michelle Obama did or said anything progressive What right does she have to say or do anything She's just his wife Yeah.
So he bought 10 year expired PPE then
gt Roll tide Doase that mean my sisters is done ovulatin'
Ready to rock ready to be stoned if anything
what small businesses
The herd will be thinned out I suppose.
Yeah they did a 180 on Cuba. Pretty much the total opposite of Obama's position as usual. Trump's presidency has been eight years of ctrl z.
Almost 50 of closed cases in Italy end in death. So basically means if you're bad enough to be hospitalized it's not looking good.
It's like you guys collectively come up with the dumbest take on something and then make a hard stance on it. Then just call anyone who disagrees with your shitty an idiot.
Damn sorry to hear that
You should see AT amp T s building in Dallas. It s so ugly they sponsor an opera house and a football stadium here in town to distract you from looking at it.
Well it's certainly not the military because he's firing then for saying we need help'
Fuck i forgot about the meth here. Thanks for reminding me. They call it Jib around here and smoking it out of lightbulbs for some reason.
It's gonna get bad down there and if we're still in the shit the amount of vents wont matter. They don't have the staff for 1 10th of what NY has.
They don't that's like bring exposed to say 100 people in one day if you're grocery shopping to 1000s of people in one week if the economy is reopened. It is exceedingly more transmissible if more people are out and about. There are options like curbside pickup that could reduce your exposure to people to practically 0 as well as reduce the risk for exposure if you're an essential worker but opening up the economy would change that entirely. I speak passionately on this because one of my friends has severe asthma I wouldn't even think about risking his life in this kind of situation.
Raise wages to a price that attracts employees. It isn't rocket science.
All these people copy paste the same 5 or so Trump misquotes and if you correct them they just do it again later.
I had a friend a few days after fox and trump first flipped their stance about 2. 5 weeks ago who was talking about Covid. She expressed disbelief when I people will die because of overwhelming the hospital system. She asked if that s true then why didn t it happen with the Spanish flu. So I buried her in links about this exact thing.
Vote IN THE PRIMARY'S Nothing is going to change if we always let our parents decide who the candidates are going to be.
Yes and intentionally is a human construct. It is something that has to be proven and can be proven even if the person under investigation insists there wasn't an intention. You understand basic math. You understand how a virus works. You understand death. You know what a hospitals is right You are able to see how dangerous the virus is. The nature of a virus is that you simple being around people puts others and yourself in a higher degree of danger higher than any other short term threat that person is exposed to.
Meanwhile you rely on Imported medicine food etc. So how about all those countries look after themselves instead of sending it to America.
Greta...
No two ways about it just about snuffs out the match of any discussion on the matter
Just vote. Impeachment would just tie up Congress in another stalemate. Light a candle and go vote. New York though would sure like a word with private citizen Trump and it won t be about bygones.
This this isn t true. Many Indian citizens do not have any form of ID like those in the poor rural areas. To get around this issue they use silver nitrate to mark voter s fingers after voting to prevent double voting. Reference en.m.wikipedia.org
Are you not seeing the posts on this thread sating that we are losing our liberties due to corona quarantine policies Do you understand I m not one of them
I swear the Coronavirus is a Russian plant. Remember Mnunchin met with the Russian ambassador on Monday March 9 and according to Russia gt The two sides discussed the current state and future prospects of Russia U.S relations implementation of the arrangements reached by Russian President Vladimir Putin and U.S President Donald Trump during the summits in Helsinki in 2018 and Osaka in 2019 dailymail.co.uk
They arent people. They are corporations.
This is a misleading headline. If you click the Politico link it takes you to a headline that reads gt Chinese county goes into coronavirus lockdown amid fear of second wave It's not China and it's not mass quarantines...
I LL REVEAL YOUR TRUE FORM
I can't escape it ANYWHERE on reddit. No matter the sub even completely unrelated hobby subs some people just have to bring Trump in to some entirely unrelated conversation and half the time the mods allow it because the vast majority of them have internet activist' types on the team that collect subreddits like stamps.
He would just have the same ineffective healthcare same foreign policy same drug laws same disrespect of women not good enough action on climate change.. well at least he would act nice on TV. Then we can pretend like everything is okay
Totally agree. The liberals have already fallen into the same quasi religious fervor over this that they do with climate change. Any questions or discussion is forbidden. You must obey because they just know better. This cannot go on past April if we want to keep our country intact.
Do what has been proven countless time to work social distancing for higher risk groups let our citizens go back to work
We use both up here Canada Mostly metric though.
O o One of those is very much not like the others.
DeEp STatE neVEr tRuMPer
This is not a debate sub. Fuck yourself.
Good job Donnie you dumb fucking jackhole. Yeah let's just start a war with our allies and closest neighbors sharing one of the longest unguarded borders in the world btw over some cheap paper masks in the middle of a global pandemic. Could you possibly get any fucking dumber In fact don't fucking answer that. In word or deed. Oh and stealing masks from your own citizens is pretty goddamn low too unless there's a damn good reason to divert supplies. And I like these people more isn't a very good reason. Dear Canada Please don't make American citizens pay for the actions of this shameless tool. Most of the intelligent people over here don't want him to be in charge of anything more serious than a game of checkers anyway. And sorry that our corrupt political system's sham of an election has affected you.
They know. It's on purpose. They don't want people with dignity and a moral compass.
Narrator It is
No one ever knew that pandemics were so complicated.
Well please understand that your political acceptance acknowledgment is of a rare breed.. while I can appreciate you for being courteous and understanding toward beliefs that challenge your own especially in today s society of stark hatred toward opposition it s difficult to really view liberal ideology anymore without really feeling bogged down by absolute hate disgust aggression.. And I mean none of that toward you and of course it exists on both sides of the line. But it s nearly impossible to voice anything semi moderate in any other political board without getting hate mail and downvoted into oblivion. Your last line is 100 true but that also is found few and far between these days. Unfortunately politics is too hotly contested for there to be actual fruitful debate without all the quick hateful attacks that destroy the comment and instead we all reside back into our echo chambers in order to maintain some sanity.
Shitting himself as well
Pretty sure Aus has had pre poll early voting for years
Trump was too busy betraying our allies and golfing to defend the nation. Sad
Well at least a red state is getting crap from the feds too which would mean it's not a blue state red state thing.
This actually makes sense. More ventilators are being made daily NYC needs them right now like as you read this. So long as they aren't talking about taking every other ventilator in the state collecting a few hundred of them across multiple places that aren't hit just makes sense. Especially if more stocks are coming in. If anyone has evidence that they are going to take them from hospitals that have cases and do need them right now I'll take up the pitchfork with you. Otherwise this seems standard fare for state governance in an emergency.
Kushner the national stockpile is our stockpile Not the states get your own
No's knows A play on words
gt It's the way that the free market goes. It's too bad that those on the front lines in American are going to be the ones who have to suffer. Shut them down. Fuck the free market. Hang the free market. Real conservatives are willing to put the national interest ahead of profit or economic liberty Only market fundamentalists and lolbertarians think that they shouldn't put the country ahead of themselves.
Do you know of any specific theories he currently promotes Any specific products that are harmful Not smart enough to know he doesnt know huh
I mean I m NYC most people live a lot closer than 18 miles to their work though.
Obama could have handled this. Bush too. There's plenty of blame to go around.
There are 3 Unknowns one each for WW I WW II and the Korean War. There was 1 for the Vietnam War but that one was eventually Identified removed and reburied. That empty tomb has Honoring and Keeping Faith with America's Missing Servicemen 1958 1975. inscribed on it. arlingtoncemetery.mil
Hyperbole much
The original claim was that illegals dont pay taxes I provided a source refuting that Now you re dismissing my source The onus is on you to either provide a valid source or proof that mine is invalid
Not here. All the bumfuck idiotic republicans are screaming about freedoms and equating the quarantine to living in Germany in 1941. Every business is claiming itself essential and going around the stay home order whatever the fuck that is. Grocery stores packed liquor stores packed people playing in parks. Everyone going to drive through es because restaurants are closed. Going to Home Depot to work on home projects since most people aren t working. All the while the working poor has to brave the streets and hope that Karen who has no business outside her home coughs on them. We are beyond fucking fucked.
I have to agree with you. We found the middle ground.
Democrats lied people died.
Cross post from r libertarianmeme.
I wonder if they are of voting age and an American citizen A question we should ask before discussion.
Let them play golf I guess January 2021 can't get here fast enough.
gt Your rights stop when they interfere with the rights of others. This. However I think the contention comes from the controversy over how dangerous Corona is. On the scale of Flu lt gt Ebola this is closer to the flu. We don't enact martial law for influenza. A lot more people wouldn't mind martial law if it were an Ebola outbreak. The issue is one where people's outlook depends on their perspective where needs of others may or may not outweigh the needs of the individual. In more common terms this is far more subjective a grey area if you will.
The US military is one of the finest examples of socialism in the world. Entirely funded on the backs of every man woman and child.
And look what happened he got Erik
Trust me nothings been torn down This virus has hurt everywhere but he has turned this place around
Is everyone on this sub ignorant Did you read Sander's healthcare proposal It was fiscally impossible. Even with the taxes he was proposing there was like a 20 trillion dollar hole in it. Don't comment on things you haven't read up. And the fact that it would pay off was a lie. He was claiming there would be less health costs even though there would be no reason for that. The cost would only be higher because more people would have access to healthcare. Or the quality would have gotten worse. Like it does in every western country that has a central healthcare system. Calling something a right doesn't make it immune to scarcity and it doesn't make it free to build and maintain. On the one hand you don't trust the government with stuff on the other hand you want them to have complete control of the healthcare of every citizen. If you want to get taxed more and you don't like your money make a fund with your berniebros and give your own money to those that aren't insured. Don't try to take mine. Let people spend it how they want. The only people that should be in favor of this plan is people that don't want to work ever and are basically parasites. And idiots obviously. I am not arguing in favor of bailouts I think they are stupid and basically dirty money to their friends. Obama did it. Trump will do it. I just don't like taxes. I think people should choose where their money goes. If you don't intend to be productive in the society sucks to suck. There should be a safety net and basic coverage for those unable to work not talking about bums just people that have physical or mental problems that prevents them from working. Even those people could be used in a society though in order to be productive. Definitely not for everyone.
Maybe it s time to lock it down like China did Wuhan
I m confused why this surprises people Obamacare has Obama which in Trump world is bad.
The Friday night massacres continue.
Source
This is why I stopped watching reading and listening to....every pontificator prognosticator and pundit. Try it. Just vanquish the entire concept. Go about your day. It is quite liberating and has greatly reduced stress.
Ok now show how much they take out. It s way more to the tune of tens of billions more. So don t give me this shit they are a net drain on our society
Id love to see the source with evidence saying Trump ignored his advisers in 2019 about this lol All I can seem to remember are the clowns on the Left calling him racist for shutting down travel to and from China... hmm
It s only a matter of time til they re making patriotic arguments about how the nation isn t going in the right direction and that suppressing the vote is both necessary and a just thing to do. It s what s best for the country. Even if they can t see it now they ll say. Republicans can t possibly keep getting away with doing it so blatantly and basically admitting to it without at least having to admit it s what they ve been doing the whole time. Same with suspending the election indefinitely. And things will get ugly and I mean ugly when they do suspend that election. I just don t see Donald going gently into that good night if his numbers don t look good come election time.
American companies were doing just fine before globalization and there is a big difference between the success of American companies and the average American. This is why I said globalization has had devastating effects for the average American. It s been highly profitable for the companies and its executives.
Holy shit. This is a safe haven from the lunacy in r Minneapolis. I brought up a passenger limit windows down for ventilation enforcement of masks and distanced seating as bare minimum measures to enforce on our public transport. Also brought up biking walking carpooling or getting rides from close family friends... Instead of seeing my points as valid arguments I was called stupid and low IQ when in reality I'm a healthcare professional. Had to block people because the harassment got so bad.
What went wrong Some people in China ate some animals they shouldn't have. The animal virus jumped to humans and mutated. The rest is history.
Oil is tanking on Saudi and Russian conflicts to ramp up production that just happens to be at the same time. The lack of knowledge in the average Redditor is simply mind blowing.
I m with Mike you know the one that fucks his mother. Mike Pence.
We we ll see. I am annoyed that we killed the economy. I bet you Sweden will be just fine.
Yep
That is unfortunately it. We are also the most armed country out there and the guys who bought all the guns because they would need them if the government needed to be reset are all home watching Netflix's Tiger King...
Except he isn't Obama has more Facebook followers.
Surely he hasn't golfed that much Opens https trumpgolfcount.com Wow you think he'd be better at golf with all that practice.
Thing is you can't infect someone with obesity. The government should make programs to improve cardiovascular health of its citizens like parks where they can exercise requiring factual and relevant information on nutritional labels so people can make informed decisions and spreading awareness. But in the end if you live on a diet of Doritos and Mountain Dew you are only affecting yourself. Every person that catches COVID 19 will spread it to an average of around three people who will go on to do the same until the healthcare system is saturated and the death rate goes through the roof or until it kills half the people in a nursing home. If there was a magical thunderstorm that killed 1 of people who ignored suggestions to stay at home I would say go for it risk yourself if you so wish. But this is a virus. It's like being an alcoholic and drunk driving. Two very different things. Yeah you might accept the risk to your life when drunk driving but the other people on the road people who can't stay home like doctors nurses delivery drivers policemen etc or those buying groceries they need for the quarantine didn't
This evidence is detrimental to my case.
Yeah no thanks. There's far more relevant and appropriate steps before we start shooting each other. But that would be great to add to a world health crisis. Thanks for the suggestion.
He likes hamberders too much
It will be reality. Trump is gonna eat Biden alive. If Biden makes it he s not looking well.
I'm scared to see may 1st. 8 weeks of payroll but some states are showing surges in early to mid may. This isnt a 1 1 2 month shutdown. It's gone to a 3 4 month meltdown. Fuck I hate being young in this hellscape
Well there goes that supposed surge lmao
I hope so. It would be richly deserved.
Or Joe Biden the guy who's getting more votes than me and spending less money to do it.
More or less to show respect for our fallen who don't have a tombstone. Or even a name. Also being a Tomb Sentinel is probably the highest honor in the US Army. It is extremely prestigious.
When you die you ve lost all of your rights
You got that right And I won't be voting for a rapist
I think we look back at our earlier presidents with almost hero like propaganda. We had so many horrible people and fights that it was just hidden without tv radio. Internet allows us to see all the fights and in fact its used more to raise money for your side. Its also what is allowing the hate on the left to blossom its almost expected from their side.
Lots of concerned people and armchair doctors in this thread...weird
Yeah well that just isn't going to happen. Bernie lost it is over his ideas won't take hold in time for him to see them through. The boomers have to die first.
You're bitter tonight.
Never seen that but it wouldn't surprise me. The guards are hardcore.
I didn t care for most of Obama s 8 yrs but I didn t take out my frustrations on dems on social media.
Couldn't I just say I am uninsured so I don't need to pay any copays or deductibles since Trump said he would pay for it
We have multiple options here and there are some things and brands missing. Obviously the milk bread eggs and meat sections get hit but there is usually stuff here.Wonder if this will be the new normal we did get lucky we have a vegetable stand that finally opened back up today and they have a good selection fairly priced too the tomatoes were excellent. But we can live off beans cornbread and vegetables for a long time if we have too. I started watching the dollar stores you can find good deals there if you aren't too picky
Well it's a good thing that the federal government doesn't control the election process and it's held up by the states. Obviously the more red states will fall in line with what trump says.
Becayse raising their wages isnt the same PR or tax writeoff
That's certainly some words you just typed alright
How does someone having a voter ID prevent them from voting
You mean the big tourist spots The ones that offer things like shipping and passenger ports major airports world famous museums landmarks restaurants night clubs plays parks sports cultural centers the homes working places of celebrities etc
Hey has the Nuke codes I thought they gave every president the fake ones and told them they were real.
Exactly.
I m a 30 white male veteran. Fuck off
But are they wrong No they are not.
I don't know that he calls himself a libertarian. In this video he distances himself from libertarianism a bit. youtube.com v gcxvFj3ye4U I guess that is beside the point though. His reaction to this test was pretty much the same as mine youtube.com v gcxvFj3ye4U which was this was obviously written by a communist.
Send him 0. 5 ETH he'll send you 2 ETH in return.
This is exactly what I think happened.
To quote W. that s some weird shit As for me this criminal syndicate must be removed at once and in a manner that leaves no doubt why.
That's the annoying part. Everything started to hit the fan in mid march which was only a couple of weeks ago. There are quotes and examples from all over the place right up until then of people downplaying this which are now being ignored. America doesn't even have any examples I am aware of of big stuff ups like Australia. Where they decided to unload a cruise ship in Sydney that had known cases oboard without quarantine or testing. Which is then responsibly for a sizable amount of cases.
This virus is a symptom. The problem is the condition that allows for such a virus to develop and the lies that were done to cover it. If you don t see it like this then you re missing the larger picture.
Probably could convince some people of that. But there's a fair amount of people who are intelligent enough to see the glass in the current system.
Some keyboard wanna be warrior claiming he's smarter than someone else on the internet Definitely an insecure little shit. No one cares.
It s not even that he s so blatantly biased as much as he s just a dick about it.
I am very frightened for what's to come.
They do still pay local sales taxes when they spend in the community but yeah it doesn t really help her argument.
Maybe they are worried about the country going to shit and a lack of law and order. How long I'll this last and can people not works for months while being unsure thing will get better Think about all th people that will be out of work people are going to start getting desperate. Crime may increase. Police officers are already getting sick and not responding to all call.
Ironic they didn't cover this
Statically no it doesn't have a 20 chance of killing her. You and everyone else won't be able to hid for this. Give it a few days half the globe will have the virus.
Yeah but Biden won t surround himself with complete yes men morons that will only be half his people.
1 percent gets them
What is he a teenage girl from 2008
Easy there Stalin... I get the liberty argument but damn that s dark.
Uhh... she's going to kill her family too.
Wut
The beatings will continue until polls improve
I think it s a way to celebrate the cultural contributions people from different cultures have contributed to the American culture. With that train of thought we should also have Italian month German month and China month for building the railroads and shit Obviously there aren t enough months in the year. At this point I m thinking they either pick groups that have been either most oppressed or most recently oppressed.
It's boogaloo time Bois.
That comment makes you sound like you have a very shortsighted view in a lot of ways. Hopefully it's just a knee jerk statement and you don't actually believe that. If you do though much like the people who are backing Trump and his dumb ideas that extreme way of thinking is harmful to Canadians. 1 You can't produce the masks without US materials or you would be already. Read one of the many articles on it business.financialpost.com and you'll see that it's more than just pulp. It's specialized material that the US has factories to make while Canada does not. Canada has been trying to find their own factories that could produce the material to scale and they can't The other countries with major production of the materials are China who you won't be buying from and South Korea who has an export halt on the material. 2 If Canada decided to get into a trade war with the US tens of thousands or maybe even millions of innocent people who don't support that trade war would die as collateral damage. These people are more than just a political idea they are people with families who may have likely done nothing to support the trade war. 3 Canada's national economy would not survive a trade embargo with the US on no notice. Full stop your economy would collapse. Canada receives nearly 60 of all their imported goods from the US. The next closest partner would be the EU who Canadian's import about 8 of their materials from. The US imports about 13 of our materials from Canada making Canada only our fourth highest import partner and only 7 ahead of our fifth highest import partner. While it would be impactful to both economies it would much more negatively impact the Canadian economy.
Yes it does. So why lie
She is pure evil
The biggest thing I noticed Weekends are gone in the blink of an eye. What used to be barely enough time to recharge has for whatever reason become part of the never ending monotony.
Damn G you ignored what I said and just went on your own little tirade. You even lumped me into a category with no basis. Go Drain that Swamp my dude Make America Great Again MAGA MAGA MAGA MAGA MAGA MAGA WOOO AMERICA GO TRUMP
Does that make him a trustworthy individual Can't listen to his words just gotta wait to see what he does but then it's already done
We have a right to life but don t forget about our right to liberty and the pursuit of happiness which have both been forcefully violated.
You re better off getting a dog. A 70lb or bigger dog. Nobody goes into a house knowing there is a huge dog in there. Gun or not.
gt Trump is an poor immoral person's idea of how a rich person should act.
One of us One of us One of us
That's it Let's start another war with the British That will solve all of our problems just like it did last time
FUNNY COINCIDENCE The collapse of the Soviet regime was greatly sped up by their mishandled propaganda based response to the hazards posed by Chernobyl.
No the reason it is that way is because of our first past the post election rules.
You keep using that word and I don t think you know what it means.
Probably care more about those words than your motives for posting this hit piece. Don't use people suffering to shield yourself from criticism.
So you have to use the migrant labor. You can t pay Americans those wages without social welfare programs.
You mean the Obama cages
Solid summary
That was my takeaway too. How can anyone watch this and be ok with this Also doesn't everyone except Trump understand that it's nearly impossible for US deaths to be under hundreds of thousands at this point.
Republicans believe mail in voting would lead to massive cheating and electoral losses.
Is willful ignorance forgivable That's what you have here it's one thing to be uninformed it's another thing to ignore evidence.
Lead the resistance
We're sorry
Maybe we should all go back to life instead of hiding from a disease that s got jack shit in numbers. Everyone is so goddamned paralyzed with fear over this bullshit that we re all going to get anyway. Maybe we shouldn t collapse the fucking economy while we re at it
I thought all embargos against Cuba were lifted towards the end of the Obama administration Was it not all embargos Or did the Trump administration reinstate them Either way this is definitely a dick move.
Don't be stupid. 13 lbs in 3 days especially for someone over 200lbs is a cakewalk if you're cutting water and not really eating. When I'm cutting for a tournament I usually stick to about 10lbs but that's in a single evening before weigh in. There are fighters out there who will drop over 20lbs 48 hours before a fight to make weight. They aren't losing 20lbs of tissue but that's not what anybody is saying.
It's like when people say Am I the only one who doesn't find jay Leno funny It's like yea dude you're the only one
Good point. This virus has a lot more chance of killing you than even a thousandfold increase in terrorism
No one gives a single fuck about what she thinks.
Only a dumbass would think a revolution would happened in America. The one person running that offers close to that vant even get people to get off of reddit to vote. There will be no revolution. People are to lazy.
This article is much better than the title suggests.
Actively misinforming the public is all fun and games until theres a pandemic. I watched fox downplay this for the first month and it absolutely infuriated me. We all saw this coming. The govt had intelligence reports warning us. Right now we are paying the price. I try to keep my perspective wide and i even follow the most nut job fb group in my area that labels itself as the realest group of X town and watching them parrot all the republican talking points followed by the memes followed by silence and then finally followed by a complete backtracking of previous statements while blaming the other side is whats currently wrong with this country.
No but people act irrational and families need something they can use to protect themselves from them because the wheels of justice turn way too slowly
Typical a sign of mild brain damage.
You are punks
Hate mail I received this month some are PM's slit your wrist fascist...All christians should be burned alive and priests hanged from their church tower. Hey man I get it. I totally understand you. I m really sorry that your tiny dick makes you feel threatened by women having rights and that you were never loved as a child so you take it out on teenagers who know more about climate change than you do. I also want to welcome you with open arms to the LGBTQ community because your repulsion to women and absolute dick worship of Trump DEFINITELY make you gay. You're a dog rat.
That is 100 the narrative you ll be spoon fed. Remember that shit.
I m not. Trump has failed in a lot of it as well. He downplayed the seriousness yes but so did a lot of others including the CDC and WHO.
Holy shit. Yes the word slavery is not mentioned sure. The institution of slavery is enshrined in the constitution you dolt. WTF kind of school did you attend Further reading for pedantic idiots Article I Section. 2 Slaves are 3 5 persons Article I Section. 9 clause 1. No power to ban slavery until 1808 Article IV Section. 2. Fugitive Slave Protection Article V No Constitutional Amendment to Ban Slavery Until 1808 Btw GUNS aren t mentioned in the document either but I m sure you aren t taking anyone to task on that stupid detail either...
Let's see what Obama did during his pandemic.
Dr Fauci debunked this already
gt The Odyssey that book from Greek and Roman mythology. Isn't The Odyssey entirely Greek in origin
I did not realize that the virus takes weekends off.
Wait so it's racist to name something based on its proven point of origin but name naming a disease based on who it killed the most of is ok Hmm. Seems like bullshit.
Liar
Hijacking this comment to say that it is probably decency more then market recognition. I worked for a landscaping company that took care of the family s properties in JH that owns 3m and they seemed like kind people. Always treated us working class people well. Plus they have cute dogs.
He doesn t just talk like a child he actually thinks and writes like one too.
Voluntary self isolation was plan A and reasonable people were generally playing along. There were enough people who refused to do that though so now the government is going with plan B.
Next he insists he never was president after Nov
Right. Being sick does not interfere with others rights. If someone wants to stay home nobody is violating their right to decide that.
From one Mississippian to another stay safe stay strong. We ll get through this and maybe in a few years we ll get to elect a real governor.
You recall what happened to Milton in Office Space
So trump too
If you re an M.D who swore a Hippocratic oath your first goal to save the most lives is to remove the Trump family from power.
Sweden is following the original British strategy the one Boris Johnson was planning to implement before the Imperial College s model of the contagion convinced him that up to 500 000 people might die if the country didn t start following aggressive social distancing measures. Initially Johnson s plan was to encourage older and ailing Brits to quarantine themselves as thoroughly as possible while the younger healthier part of the population went on more or less as usual. Infection would spread rapidly many would get sick to various degrees and some would die but at the end of this relatively quick mega storm of disease the country would have acquired something like herd immunity. Then the old and infirm could reemerge. Sweden s infection and death rates are accelerating faster than other nations That s the point They re not really trying to flatten the curve. They re going to get this over with as quickly as possible whatever that means for Swedish hospitals over the next month. Sweden s also expecting its unemployment rate to rise this year despite its willingness to remain open for business although only from seven to nine percent. Whether you like the strategy may depend on how you feel about raw numbers. Assuming a case fatality rate of 0. 2 percent infecting every last person in Sweden s population of 10 million should produce some 20 000 deaths. That s a big number in the abstract but it ll be dwarfed by death tolls around the world. Maybe Sweden feels it can absorb 20 000 deaths in the interest of avoiding economic ruin. But they re gambling a lot on that fatality rate. If the rate is more like one percent then suddenly they re staring at 100 000 dead the equivalent of three million in the United States. That s a big number for a small country.
It s a sad situation
This is why Christie didn t get a plum job in Trump s cabinet.
Mid July Trump tells his Chief of Staff ashingtonpost.com to withhold 400 million in military aid for Ukraine. July 24 Mueller's last testimony nytimes.com July 25 Ukraine phonecall apnews.com July 26 Trump personally asked U.K s Boris Johnson for help discrediting the Mueller report marketwatch.com link MW latest news July 28 Dan Coats Director of National Intelligence resigns nytimes.com because he feels his duties are at odds with Trump. July 28 Trump announces Ratcliffe abcnews.go.com id 64738532 as his pick. Aug. 2 Ratcliffe nomination withdrawn npr.org less than a week later amidst criticisms of partisan loyalty and resume padding. Aug. 8 Trump picks Maguire. usatoday.com Aug. 8 Dan Coats interrupts a meeting cnn.com to urge his deputy Sue Gordon to resign. She announces her resignation. Aug. 12 Whistleblower complaint is filed. sj.com Aug. 15 Coats and Gordon depart nypost.com Aug. 26 Intelligence IG forwards complaint to the acting DNI. ashingtonpost.com Aug. 28 First reporting politico.com that Ukraine military aid is being withheld. Sep. 2 Deadline passes for complaint submission. cbsnews.com Sep. 9 Intel IG notifies House Intelligence Chairman Adam Schiff of an credible urgent concern ashingtonpost.com that DNI has overruled. Sep. 10 Schiff demands DNI submit complaint. npr.org Sep. 9 10 John Bolton resigns is fired. sj.com Sep. 12 Trump finally releases Ukraine military aid. reuters.com Sep. 13 Schiff subpoenas Maguire. intelligence.house.gov DocumentID 688 Sep. 17 Maguire refuses to testify nytimes.com suspicions of WH DOJ stonewalling. Sep. 18 Media revelations of the promise made to foreign nation. ashingtonpost.com Sep. 19 Media revelations that Ukraine is involved. ashingtonexaminer.com Sep. 19 The Intelligence inspector general gives a classified briefing latimes.com to the House Intelligence Committee. Sep. 20 It's reported that Trump pressed Zelensky to investigate Biden's son nytimes.com during a call on July 25. Sep. 22 Trump acknowledges that he discussed Joe Biden in a July call with Zelensky nytimes.com Sep. 24 White House releases Ukraine transcript hitehouse.gov Sep. 24 Pelosi announces impeachment inquiry sj.com
Got any evidence to back up that claim
gt The instructors are required to express their faith through their teaching which translates to most classes beginning and sometimes ending with a prayer. Preach the Gospel. Use words if necessary. I show my faith by helping my colleagues at work being a network engineer at a hospital so I know medical staff can get the data they need to help patients telling my kids and my wife I love them doing things for them even though I might not be in the mood helping my neighbors with little tasks around the house etc. I've never felt the only way to express my faith with anyone was through prayer. And quite frankly I feel a sense of hypocrisy just writing this post.
Freedom is messy. Live with it or go live somewhere there's no freedom.
Wow that is a really good article.
Ironic considering how much a mask would improve his aesthetics.
You said gt It's like you want 4 more years of Trump more than anything else. then I said gt Nope. I will hold my nose and vote for a DNC puppet over Drumpf. Then explained why. What am I missing here Maybe I need to post more facts politico.com
Can you imagine how bad OP smells
And if the media can do that to the president of the United states then they wouldn't think twice about destroying joe blogs life for a story.
It divides us into separate groups when we should all just be Americans
gt How about concentrating on the fact that your countrymen are dying Yeah I bet you're saving lives with your reddit activity. gt Hang your fucking heads in shame Unfortunately we must. If only I could be like you and go to bed every night proud because I spent all day shitting on Trump on an internet forum.
gt Trump added that he would be submitting a new nominee for the position to the Senate at a later date. Ah yes another Acting Head for an indefinite period see forever
Ok there s good people on both sides
Plus there s no herd immunity or vaccine
I would gladly pay more for quality made non chinese products. I would first look to American made but if that alternative doesn't exist then broaden the net to other counties. It would likely mean my purchases would have to be more deliberate but that's not a bad thing. Fewer frivolous purchases less waste.
gt I can quibble personhood. A fetus is not a person with the rights thereof. Based on what You haven't provided any reasons to consider fetuses differently than other humans you've merely asserted your position. gt It is not legally a human in my view. Who cares about what the law says now There have been many evil laws throughout history and this is no different. gt It is NOT clearly evil that is why it s a debatable question. I said that it's clearly evil if you accept the premise that human life lies in its essence rather than its function. Most people implicitly accept this premise but deny the conclusion because they haven't logically thought through the issue. If the pro choice mindset is taken to its logical conclusions then you arrive at where Peter Singer is where killing newborns and infants is perfectly moral. gt What it definitely is not is a scientific fact that we ought to give rights to non persons. I never argued that any should question is scientific in nature it's obviously a moral question. But once again you're asserting your position i.e fetuses aren't persons without any arguments besides an appeal to the current legal standard. Frankly it's very unconvincing.
America should put America first. There s a reason they say for adults to put oxygen masks on before they help their children on an airplane. 3M shouldn t be allowed to abscond on a contract with Florida because France is offering cash.
Fat fucking chance of that happening
Pretty sure it's called COVID 19 and or coronavirus for layman's terms. The fuck is a wuhan virus Questionable source at best. mediabiasfactcheck.com mediabiasfactcheck.com
Where and when did these political organizations figure out Friday was a good day to fire people Is there any info on this strategy
doesn't really matter what my political ideology is if most large corporations favors assured short term gain over speculated long term gains
Lol people. Stop downvoting this guy. It's clearly a joke.
Holy cow Kissinger is still alive Wow. Also what a great article. gt The U.S administration has done a solid job in avoiding immediate catastrophe. The ultimate test will be whether the virus s spread can be arrested and then reversed in a manner and at a scale that maintains public confidence in Americans ability to govern themselves. The crisis effort however vast and necessary must not crowd out the urgent task of launching a parallel enterprise for the transition to the post coronavirus order. Exactly right. gt Drawing lessons from the development of the Marshall Plan and the Manhattan Project the U.S is obliged to undertake a major effort in three domains. First shore up global resilience to infectious disease. Triumphs of medical science like the polio vaccine and the eradication of smallpox or the emerging statistical technical marvel of medical diagnosis through artificial intelligence have lulled us into a dangerous complacency. We need to develop new techniques and technologies for infection control and commensurate vaccines across large populations. Cities states and regions must consistently prepare to protect their people from pandemics through stockpiling cooperative planning and exploration at the frontiers of science. gt Third safeguard the principles of the liberal world order. The founding legend of modern government is a walled city protected by powerful rulers sometimes despotic other times benevolent yet always strong enough to protect the people from an external enemy. Enlightenment thinkers reframed this concept arguing that the purpose of the legitimate state is to provide for the fundamental needs of the people security order economic well being and justice. Individuals cannot secure these things on their own. The pandemic has prompted an anachronism a revival of the walled city in an age when prosperity depends on global trade and movement of people. I disagree. Globalism is death. It's the whole world increasingly fragile and susceptible to disruptions. One major failure is likely to take everyone else down with it. Trade is necessary and good. Reliance on that trade for basic supplies is not good. We need balanced trade not free trade. You can try to rely on governments stock piling for bad times but typically governments are not very responsible about such things. We're much better off making sure that we have enough industry at home to support this nation in times of crisis.
He doesn't like confrontation. Most of his firings have been either tweeting They happily resigned without the person knowing or sending someone else to fire the person. Trump only knows how to punch down.
I was just about to say it took me 2 weeks to lose about 15 20lbs when I was not eating and throwing up in my first trimester. Unless it s just straight up water weight from sweating like crazy. But even then that a lot.
Yea get out there and work I m specifically talking to you south and mid west USA
HARRUMPH
I think you're probably right but not in a good sort of way. She's as vile as the rest of them just appears to bit a tad smarter. So it's more of a rat fleeing a sinking ship situation.
The underlying meaning remains mostly unchanged but especially the parts Kushner was talking about. Vox deceptively edited the original text to make it look like the parts Kushner was talking about were not present in the original text. If that doesn't qualify as fake news I wonder what possibly could.
Pulp isn t used to make N95 masks. The hyperbole and outrage all over reddit especially r Canada is pathetic much in part because it s so incredible misinformed.
For a country that goes on and on about American Exceptionalism we are fucking stupid.
Are you seriously in r Conservative suggesting that the government seize a private sector business for the common good of the American people Try r Accidentallycommunist As for the second part isn t that how a free market works
I thought for a hot minute that within the last couple of days they were coming around to a data driven approach. But then Jared said he did his own math and the states were wrong about what they needed. That's disregarding expert data. Other examples include Trump saying on multiple occasions that it's just going to go away. Completely ignored expert models to keep from crashing the economy. This article has a graph showing the data versus Trump's public statements https www independent co uk.cdn ampproject.org v s www.independent co.uk news world americas us politics trump coronavirus quotes graph covid 19 stats reddit a9415576.html amp js v a2 amp amp gsa 1 amp amp amp usqp mq331AQFKAGwASA 3D aoh 15859629203178 amp referrer https 3A 2F 2Fwww.google com amp amp tf From 20 251 24s amp ampshare https 3A 2F 2Fwww.independent co.uk 2Fnews 2Fworld 2Famericas 2Fus politics 2Ftrump coronavirus quotes graph covid 19 stats reddit a9415576.html Doesn't sound very data driven. And ya even in context those statements don't make sense. The epidemiologist in my family was sounding the alarm 2 months ago saying we needed to prepare then. She said this because that's what the data indicated. We did nothing other than ban Chinese from entering the country but not restricting American travel to from China We could have had a federally coordinated response plan in place. We didn't I mean the Bush adminstration drafted one but we didn't follow it.
Actually with everyone likely to be infected and all the unemployment you all have no reason to not finally do that march down multi million person protest to get him out of office.
yeah that's fine.
I do not know just asking suggesting You got anything
Not expedited. Put into commercial markets for sale. Hospitals literally bidding like they are on eBay. Def not the best intent from this administration. Bet they have stock holdings in this.
A thousand people in the US are dying each day.
I hope all the liberals and people supporting authoritarianism are cool with restaurants and parks getting shut down every flu season. The flu will kill 1 20 of the people that Covid did That s a small percentage but a lot of people I ve already had a few non life threatening medical stuff get canceled because it s not worth the risk to elderly patients for me to come in and get my testosterone checked which is critical for me being able to sleep focus etc. Can t wait for that universal health care to tell me it s not worth the social cost in the future.
I am watching Dark a German dystopian film. It is a bit convoluted and takes paying lots of attention.
No. That is selfish nihilistic bullshit. Every effort must be made to get him out of office because I and presumably most parents care about giving kids a chance to make something good of the world we leave them. It sounds like kumbaya shit but it s true. The people who support him today are selfish shits who don t give a damn about anything but themselves and think he s their messiah who will deliver upon them their wildest dreams. I honestly never fucking understand what these horrible people think he s actually done FOR them but they re brainwashed lost causes. What you suggest is giving them exactly what they want a big middle finger to the rest of the world for caring about things beyond themselves. Don t succumb to that attitude. It is toxic to you and everyone else too.
At this point it doesn't matter. I'm voting against Trump and all Republicans regardless of what scummy acts they try to pull to reduce voting.
Your lord is taking fire quick deflect to Biden
PACs have to report their donors.
constitution.congress.gov
What about Beto s Bandmate What should his role be here
Again population adjusted. MISSISSIPPI NOW HAS THE HIGHEST RATE OF CORONAVIRUS HOSPITALIZATIONS IN THE UNITED STATES newsweek.com 21 dead over 1 500 confirmed cases of COVID 19 in Alabama sfa.com 3 067 coronavirus cases 37 deaths in Tennessee Tennessee Department of Health ate.com For example State Population 2018 Total Cases of Pop New York 19. 54 million 103 476 0. 00529 New Jersey 8. 909 million 29 895 0. 00335 Mississippi 2. 987 million 1 358 4. 54636 Alabama 4. 888 million 1 515 3. 09942 Tennessee 6. 77 million 3 194 4. 71787
gt The delivery system is not one injection but in a fingertip sized patch containing 400 microneedles For some reason that sounds more complicated and painful.
The difference is that a majority of the world is Christian
Cause he don t give a shot what the Republicans to to the judiciary. Loaded it with under rated pliable lap dogs.
It has to be about 100 degrees Fahrenheit for a while for that to happen. Being just the end of March we re in a nice 55 75 range right now but when August rolls around those of us left are gonna deep fry this fucking thing like everything else in the South.
This sub is shizen.
We pardon that shitty SEAL that victimized Americans yet we dismiss this captain for doing what he needed to to protect Americans. Also today the whistleblower intelligence operative related to the impeachment was also fired. We are fucking ourselves up TRALLY REALLY badly right now.... I dont know what this creates but it isn t good.
I mean all along it was described as an overflow hospital not for general use.
Link for the 3 hour study Lab conditions and real life are two different things. Any building with an HVAC system moves air well enough that there are no clouds of particles undisturbed for hours at a time. And even if there were clouds of viruses there would be far less of them if everyone wore a mask outside their homes. Even if this lowers the death rate by 01 that would be worth everyone taking two seconds to put a mask on.
Apparently I ve gotten enough attention for Sharia Blue to show up...
Hey. I'm a liberal and I'm admittedly only here because I was curious about what goes on in this subreddit and normally I would never blow my cover like this but those comments just make me sick. Politics aside this person is completely and totally in the wrong. You are completely justified in removing that comment and banning that person. He should honestly be banned from all of reddit permanently for that behavior. Who someone votes for should never be grounds for wishing death upon them.
gt They pick our food. This is gonna get a lot worse before it gets better Yes because selfish people aren't willing to pay a bit more and employ a citizen over an Illegal Alien
I believe states can waive fees. I certainly know my state can issue vouchers to make it even cheaper and may have mobile options. I'm all for free too. Simple state ID.
Does this make him the 4ty person he's fired for the impeachment
I am amused at family coming in 3rd in those of what is missed most so far lower than friends. I sure don't miss my family thats in the cult. Got over that a few years ago.
gt Here's what a campaign committee is allowed to do with any lingering cash it can donate the funds to charities or political parties it can contribute 2000 per election to other candidates and it can save the money in case the candidate chooses to run again. However those regulations don't apply to the relatively new super PACs Political Action Committees this is only the third election where they have played a role and there are currently no rules to stipulate what happens to that money beyond that it cannot go to fund another federal candidate. Much of that money tends to be returned to its original donors used to wrap up the failed campaign or donated to back a state level candidate. The goal however is always to spend all of that money.
Good. Micheal Atkinson was an incompetent fool completely unprepared for this pandemic. Thank you Trump for ensuring we get only the best of the best in the doors of the White House. I know you ll be receiving my vote this upcoming election. MAGA
If we don t do more to protect whistle blowers you will have no whistle blowers Email your congressman woman
I hope so. I really do.
Holy shit. I forgot that vampire is still alive.
I initially though the fake news was a joke type thing. But i've come to realize that trump is in fact correct. The media bias against the president is ridiculous.
There was no explanation except Raoult did a study and here is the graphs with the data of the study The thing is if Raoult meant to fake results of his study he couldn't have done more than the methodology he followed. He didn't randomize and he cherry picked results to show something. And what is it sposed to show With hydroxychloroquine patients are less contagious It's not a cure. At all.
Yes. Yes she seriously can be.
basement dwellers have stirred from their mountain dew induced coma reddit.com
I got a lot of respect for Romney. People may not agree with his policies or whatever but certainly the guy has guts and will stand up for what he believes in even if that means he's going to have nothing but shit talking in return. I got a feeling at the end of this Romney will be coming out the winner just give it til November.
Schwarzenegger started the program yes but it was his democrat successors that got rid of them.
It's like someone was bored and set a simulation to create a dystopian novel where false is true and we're currently experiencing evolution of that simulation.
they both suck donkey balls my dude
Hey there were just getting ahead of the curve preparing for 2020.
snopes.com Back to r politics buddy.
Dear Donnie... people are nasty with you because you don't show any of the respect or compassion for others that most people view as basic humanity and common decency and furthermore you are a pathological liar.
Rumor is he got caught lying under oath so the Dems never released it. It's probably been shredded by now.
Met a kid once in high school who completely bought into it because his parents told him. I would ve tried to convert him but it was my last hear and unfortunately there wasn t enough time. May he see the light someday.
LOL. To be fair we had Lawn Darts back then. P Oh man denied... have to go outside. P Like I said man just gonna keep my mouth quiet at the hardships the younger people are experiencing. hehe. p.s We had the party line also... entertainment right there. P
Render unto Caesar's what is Caesar's that guy doesn't look like no Caesar to me.
Yeah no I agree with you but what she said didn't line up with what we assume she meant It's a bummer but righties are going to right
Feel bad for Americans who woke up to this guy they didn t vote for. Must be tough. I think Trump is going to have a real meltdown the guy is making panicked decisions everywhere. When he read that note about donning home made masks then seeing the word voluntary he went right into accordion hands.
Make America Sane Again
But if they were for Russia or NK... well they will be just a perfect normal beautiful order.
and maybe the NYT... amp x200B nytimes.com nytimes.com Malaria Drug Helps Virus Patients Improve in Small Study A group of moderately ill people were given hydroxychloroquine which appeared to ease their symptoms quickly but more research is needed.
Trump just donated his latest check to help the virus Pelosi packed the stimulus bill with a raise for her and her cronies That s all you need to know about who s working for the people
More than that actually put effort into unionising no individual will have the political clout of a company you gotta beat them at their own game
A kidnapping demands a randoms or some kind of sadistic pleasure. This is to save your life or the lives of those in your community all people that have a right to life. How is a kidnapping a relevant metaphor
There is a response What response I haven t seen anything
I am pretty sure I'm a moron but I do NOT understand that saying at all. How does that mean that
What a sad thing to believe
With that attitude
Ngl that s such a shamefully selfish line of thinking. The more people out potentially spreading it the more it s going to spread intentional or not The more people who ll end up in already struggling hospitals. But hey if you re not scared fuck everyone else.. I m sure the doctors and nurses risking their lives appreciate it..
I hate Trump but that's pretty fucking unprofessional dude.
Seems like this hurts one party more than the other.
Is this real
Nothing is stopping ANY doctor from prescribing Hydroxychloroquine. FDA has approved off script
As an American..... I have an ever lower opinion of America. These politicians are so literally the epitome of self sabotage and they think they're doing a great job And even worse PEOPLE STILL SUPPORT THEM I don't know how any person living in this country can have any sense of nationalism It sucks. For being the land of opportunity and one of the leading powers of the world it sure does suck.
If if if
The department of labor doesn t have a number close to 10 million. Go look for yourself. This article cites WaPo which actually has the source of information.
I never said I opposed it.
Want
I was surprised that people were using reusable cups at coffee shops...I mean forcing baristas to touch your dirty cup Jesus...
Shiiittt imagine if they managed to fit Obamacare before this hit
This article pretty much spells out that most companies aren't required to provide paid leave and that the Trump administration is ignoring the law. salon.com gt more than 75 of American workers are employed by companies not required to provide them with sick leave during the pandemic gt The Department of Labor issued a temporary rule Wednesday that effectively exempted businesses with fewer than 50 workers from being required to provide 12 weeks of paid leave for workers whose children are suddenly at home from school or child care under the coronavirus stimulus package signed by President Donald Trump. gt Democrats already agreed to exclude workers at large companies with more than 500 employees from being eligible for sick leave during negotiations with Republicans. gt Democrats called out the Labor Department for adding provisions not included in the original bill. The department's guidance allows companies to require workers to provide certification that they needed to take leave and that there needed to be work for the employee in order to be eligible thus exempting businesses that have been forced to shut down under stay at home guidelines. gt Sen. Patty Murray D Wash. and Rep. Rosa DeLauro D Conn. sent a letter to Labor Secretary Eugene Scalia accusing his department of issuing guidelines that violate congressional intent and contradict the plain language of the bill.
Trump is the reason you hate the game Monopoly. There you are with a bunch of useless property. You have 2 out of 3 of a couple of places but trump keeps buying the third before you get a chance. You buy a property you know he wants. He has 4 that you want. You offer a fair trade. 1 properties that he wants for 1 property you want. And he wont do it. You offer everything he wants in exchange for one rather unimportant property. He wont do it. You offer him a monopoly on the green spaces if he gives you what you want. He wont do it. You start offering absurd real life items just to prove a point heirloom watch tv DVD collection of Scrubs He wont do it. Of course. Later on when both of you are all but out of the game he turns to you and says you give me that watch that tv those DVDs... and let me fuck your wife... I'll give you that property... but you also have to throw in 3 properties.
Because of the Medical Electoral College. s
You stupid bitch You just mindlessly invested in a worthless education and now you ll spend the rest of your life regretting it as you drown in student debt. Mwahahaha Long live STEM degrees
Username does not check out.
So the challenge with that generally lies with the interpretation of impacting others liberties. For example the government should restrict your freedom of speech if it impacts other people. Like falsely shouting bomb on an airplane. The disagreements will come into play on wether other people are actually infringed on. If people negligently overwhelm healthcare resources because they are freely spreading coronavirus then someone else has a heart attack but can t get treatment is that an impact on other people
Man if we just keep making him snap that Aneurism will burst.
I would consider to find a more healthier girlfriend. Especially if you want children one day.
Never having a real job and recording Bernie playing his voting base like idiots for that next house doesn't make you a journalism student
Are you high
Your post literally says you sweat after you come down from a fever you stupid fuck
I voted against him and a lot of my troops did too. We make fun of him in a way that we never talked about Obama or Bush. He has lost a lot of military support the GOP just wont admit it to themselves.
I don't think they are ignorant. Watch an interview with any Trump supporter and listen to how human empathy just melts away. This is decades of Republican conditioning. Trump has tapped into the anger of rural whites and poured gasoline on the fire that is their perceived discrimination. They think because of opposing abortion that they are on the side of life. Republicans are simply pro fetus.
Good thing we already knew. I guess...
This is not gonna sound how I mean it but why It seems like you have it pretty good. I m not trying to be abrasive just curious.
It s hybrid since it s quasi private public oversight board governed by state and federal jurisdiction depending on where the ship is coming from. Since it s international from China it falls on the Fed. So Trump s hands are all over it but I m sure Cuomo is being shady and not giving the full timeline of events in his report to the commonwealth of Massachusetts. So in short it s private business monopoly with a federal oversight board and a state local board intermixed. Lots of people get paid off at the docks and lots of things are known to disappear when they get there...
So mysterious
How many illegal aliens are there really What is the cost to our society if we don't help them And what about us just being good people I don't know what this bill really says and it's probably not in language I'd understand. I do think mostly in terms of being a fiscal conservative. Sometimes though there are things you have to look at in a different light. I think the biggest point is health care. And of course even when people bring it on themselves you can't let them starve in the streets. Letting humans get sick and go hungry during a pandemic because they don't belong here just isn't right.
Your incapability of basic comprehension means you will never get what you want.
They are asking to be represented proportionally so say their is 100 romance movies about heterosexual love they are asking for like 4 of those movies to be about homosexual love but that isnt happening and it isnt an unreasonable ask
Such a traditional Georgian name there...
We need to Reset all settings on this planet.
Trump confirmed in his propaganda hour today that 3M as bound by the DPA cannot export N95 masks outside of the United States. It doesn't get much more clear than that.
an evil malicious maggot. and an idiot
that's interesting I really wish more people would be open to it in this country.
How do hold them accountable I guess that s the worst part. They ll never pay for what they ve done. Well maybe the worst part is everyone dying...
That is the shittiest take I've ever seen on Reddit.
And why would I give a shit about your opinion douche bag You seem pretty much worthless and incapable of bringing any actual dialogue to the conversation. But keep mouthing off on the internet if it helps you feel more like a man.
Yes. Out of X means operating within X and The States is indeed a slang term for the USA just like America but it makes a little more sense when it s being said in a different country that s also in North America
Romney said in 2012 Russia was the biggest threat. Everyone laughed. He was right. I voted for Romney in 2012. I am glad I did. I will likely never vote republican for president again. I didn t in 2016 I definitely won t in 2020 and with the way the gop is headed I doubt I will ever vote republican again. I didn t leave the Republican Party. The Republican Party left me.
deport that fraud
Please please please have her ask Drumpf what qualifications Jared has besides marrying his daughter...
It is bullshit because that isn t even why they called it Spanish flu
Yes mysteriously disappeared yet she is active on social media and attends press conferences
gt People want the DPA enacted It is enacted gt o that companies will produce these medical goods so that there would be more to go around for everyone when they otherwise wouldn't yes this is the point good job gt US can start stealing the already limited supplies around the world. 3M was orded by law to produce items for the United States. They instead produced them and tried to sell them to foreign customers. 3M is the one engaged in villainy not the United States government.
It's always a fucking Karen.
If we let his post through and don't remove it we can be accused of letting someone post harassing content on our subreddit. Even if it's harassing US. But this way you do not know WHO posted it and it's clear that we are trying to let you know the type of thing that your moderators deal with encountering a removing daily on this subreddit in order to keep things sane. That's not a private modmail. That person wanted that to show up on this subreddit for all of you to read.
I know that the majority of views expressed in the comments section of Fox News appall me does that make me liberal Lol
I for one welcome our new robot overlords
Trump was not elected into office for being a leader. He was elected because America loved reality tv.
In 1984 the Proles were the majority of the population. The inner party and outer party just had all the power
They're already in the process of switching a plant over.
I attribute to him not being a politician.
Not getting a demented president either way is a more and more distant hope.
No the original claim was gt A moron like her wouldn't understand that most are paid under the table The employer gets to pay them a shit wage and neither the Illegal Alien or the employer have to pay any taxation on the money. Therefore they are not paying tax on that money. YOU brought up the red herring' about sales tax.
Schumer doesn t get to be appalled This asshole has done nothing but complain and point fingers for the past three years. I haven t seen him do anything remotely productive for New York or America in general especially during the current crisis. He s squirming because he knows Trump is right. AOC is going to knock his old white ass out of office. That s probably an even worse outcome for the country but it will be amusing to watch him fall.
He's not right about everything and certainly has his faults but you could easily see the hate this website has for him from the beginning when everyone changed the narrative on things he supported. When Obama was in office the TPP was bad for consumers rights and everyone on reddit wanted it struck down. After Trump got in office and struck it down suddenly the TPP strengthens our influence in SE Asia or something and we just needed to work out the kinks This website will spin hay into Trump hating gold at every opportunity price be damned.
Jesus No shit corona isn t the only virus. The differences is we have a hospital system that is set up to take care of those other viruses. They were able to spread far before the creation of COVID. COVID is incredibly dangerous for the immune compromised old weak obese and various other demographics. It causes them to need hospitalization. It has a higher infection rate then just about any other basic disease and it s symptom escalation factor is dangerous. It causes hospitals to be overrun so a ton of people don t get the care they need even basic care. Then it causes a bunch of deaths for people that don t get care. Why the fuck do I have to explain this to you This has been going on since January. Why are you not up to speed on basic information You re supposed to be conservative which means you see it as a self responsibility to be well informed.
That is insane. During a national emergency From a billionaire President too who can chip in his own money to help his people. What an evil man.
One isn't leading the fucking united states in a fight against a dangerous pandemic that'll surely kill hundreds of thousands of Americans. Come on now...
This is a step too far
Well no shit every single voter vas a voter ID that's how you become a voter.
I think you may give the man too much credit for nuanced thought and understanding of history. He s an ignorant fool sprayed orange. He likes to dance for the cameras and get all of the attention. He is awkward and makes terrible jokes at awful times and is too ignorant to really understand why disadvantaged people deserve protection. I keep saying ignorant but the right word may very well be dumb. Malignantly dumb.
Keep the jokes coming You're hilarious
I wish I could shake her hand for not accepting his answer and still asking for a legitimate one.
Why should silicon valley be limited in deciding who gets a job and who doesn't Why not let the free market take care of it Those who are most capable of doing the job should get the job. That's how capitalism works.
No you don't need research to see him being incompetent is a straight fact.
Not really taxes would bring it down to around 920 if you get 40 hours. Source made 7. 25 multiple times.
As heinous as this is he was not fired. He was removed from that post because that s the law as it stands. His superiors had only glowing things to say about him during their announcement. He will retain his rank in the Navy and reassigned elsewhere.
That's some funny stuff right there. What unbelievable paranoia. They've got you so scared of democrats and their evil plan of trying to help people who are in the most vulnerable positions in society that you'll vote for a guy who wouldn't survive 25 minutes as a used car salesman he's so transparent and call him a god emporer. It's pathetic hilarious and terrifying all at the same time.
Yeah Is that a fucking excuse not to vote We're so fucked.
Not even not all Americans support him. A majority of Americans don t support him. I absolutely 100 agree that the American government is a raging dumpster fire right now but the majority of American citizens did not vote for him and don t deserve to be lumped in with him.
short term profit gt long term profit
We need to get back to work...we may not be quite there yet but this is great news and gets us closer to that goal.
No it's not in bad faith. If you say Wuhan flu everyone knows exactly what you're talking about just like you knew what he meant. And you immediately tried to paint him as a racist for saying it there's to your ulterior motive.
Anyone who thinks your vote doesn t count pay the fuck attention.
It s actually a really good strategy to expand coverage. People who ve been freeloading now have an incentive to buy insurance which will lower the cost for the rest of us
If you need to go a mile forward going forward a hundred feet is significantly more beneficial than going back ten. I just don t understand sitting by and letting the person who would take us ten feet backward stay in charge. I understand being upset because you don t get to go even remotely as far as you would like but at the end of the day 100 feet is still progress towards that end goal and letting the man who would take you back ten feet stay in charge makes reaching your goal even more difficult
I wonder if they realize that by caring about what he says they then empower his words rather than detract from their power. Trump ignores most attacks if he didn't he would lend validity to them. These people are obsessed about him in a way I've never seen from a supporter.
Bring all our manufacturing home. All of it
Yes duh
gt Leaving the house when you don't have to could Insert literally any dangerous activity here.
gt I'm glad the whistleblower and IG Atkinson were there to keep America honest. Huh If the liberal media was honest it wouldn't be certain this early that Biden was going to be the nominee. The constant disingenuous smearing of Bernie Sanders was very effective.
I REALLY don't care do u
How
What In your quote Fauci is talking about the flu not coronavirus. They are separate things. The article you linked to describes that. Any media downplaying the virus was dumb. But they don t call the shots or have the information Trump has. US intelligence concluded that China was lying about Coronavirus as early as in January and had been relaying this information to him trying to get him to act but he refused. businessinsider.com
gt then why don't you leave and go join them instead the majority of people who do actually line up the party doing so because their policies are somehow even less representative of my views duh my entire point is that i find the democrats to be too far to the right to represent my views how is voting to the right of them solving my issue gt so I guess you don't see climate change as an issue don't see immigration reform as important don't see a higher minimum wage or support for labor regulations as important don't see liberal justices on the Supreme Court or campaign finance reform as important don't see a public option for healthcare as an improvement over the status quo etc gt so I guess you don't see climate change as an issue don't see immigration reform as important don't see a higher minimum wage or support for labor regulations as important don't see liberal justices on the Supreme Court or campaign finance reform as important don't see a public option for healthcare as an improvement over the status quo e see the reason i hate the democratic party is because i do care about things except public option i think m4a is a no brainers and is my number one gripe with biden i'm sorry but you cant convince someone who has lived through obama's presidency that the democratic party will be effective at addressing climate change healthcare labor rights us foreign policy immigration or even the fucking supreme court. and biden's whole appeal as vp was that he was the centrist democratic. how the fuck am i supposed to get excited to vote for biden knowing that the democrats do not give a fuck about the working class. they are corrupt politicians beholden to millionaire and billionaire mega donors just like the gop. i am simply done enabling and supporting a party that is contributing to this problem. again i believe that the complete failure of the democratic party to improve the lives of the working class is what gave us trump. also biden is at best fucking weird with women. he genuinely seems to be getting senile as well. trump will eat him alive at the debates.
Nah all her attack ads are pure bullshit she bought her way into politics. Collins has been around for long time in a lot of positions and has consistently fought for our rights. I've never voted in any primaries before but god damn Loeffler is so shitty even without the backroom trading I'm gonna be proud to vote for Collins.
Not a fan of this take. Schumer tossed shit over his fence and was surprised when it came back and hit him in the face. Republicans need to do more of this not less because that is how you win elections.
That's really reaching. So funny. By the way what is the name of the doctor who examined him We are not stupid.
I don t understand what you re getting at with these numbers.. You re saying a small amount of people owned slaves That s because it was considered immoral and one major conflict away from being illegal... and yet a large portion of the country seceded to fight for that right You re also arguing 5 of people but conveniently ignoring 24. 9 of households... It s interesting that you tried to find a way to distract from the point I was making. Since you can t figure out where I was going with it I ll just lay it out for you. The founding fathers based their ideas on Christian views because that s all they knew just as they continued slavery because that s all they knew until people in the country began to realize it was unconstitutional and needed to be changed Likewise people in this country have begun to realize hey it s not right that Christians get to decide what my rights are based on their religions when maybe I m a Buddhist atheist etc. No this isn t the government saying be a Christian or be killed at least not blatantly so. But how many wars have been waged with justifications based in Christian values Because we were the good guys. How many laws are written with Christian beliefs as their backbones impeding on the rights of countless Americans Nowhere in the constitution does it say that religion in government is simply to keep the big bad feds from killing you for carrying a bible. To argue that this is the implication of certain pieces is taking words at face value... at best. If it were up to many Americans in this country they d never have the president standing behind a Christian leader telling them to read their bibles because it s the constant obvious symbol that although nobody is gonna come right out and say we re a Christian country and you ll follow Christian rules regardless it s pretty darned obvious what s going on. Religion after all is literally the ONLY reason there is a debate about burning topics like marriage equality and abortion after all. Keep telling yourself there isn t an established religion in this country just because you can t or won t read between the lines.
This isn't T D. Never has been.
I'm actually from the deep south here in America but I have a friend from the UK who gave me an idea of what was happening over there. The Tories did everything in their power to win. Labour did everything in their power to become irrelelvant. Truly fascinating.
Thanks for sharing. So gross
Anthropologist I see bones from a female others from a male.' Industry speak from that mystic science.
Huh Teh DoNalD says he doing more than anyone else has ever done in history.
Those who have never been held accountable consider being held accountable abuse.
I assure you there will never be monuments for Trump. Should fools build them anyway they will be destroyed in the future as confederate monuments have been.
I agree. I didn t mean to imply otherwise. I m pointing out that there are valid restrictions on the freedom of travel.
I've heard the same said about neutral as well.
The Blaze is so morally bankrupt that their founder was able to con millions from stupid right wingers who believed he could build their utopic town.
salon.com
Well yes intentionally.
gt Do you really think the US military or secret service is going to drag Trump from the white house Idk. The navy may be turning on him and this shitstorm has only just begun.
Thank you. I m still getting paid and will continue to get paid thanks to one of the largest American companies. But I just want people to realize that a lot of the things happening to them right now financially is due to our current system. It has failed the working class American.
Yes we know these fact checkers are anything but objective and logical. You don't need a scale measured by Pinocchios or with labels like True but Outdated if you're looking for unbiased truth. You need it if you're trying to disguise activist journalism as impartial logic. WaPo doesn't get credit just because Biden tells lies even they can't put a spin on.
This was after he told McGrath to stop airing commercials on tv too. This man is hypocrisy in it's true and living form.
The quote was about Franklin not wanting to trade away the liberty of the Pennsylvania state legislature to impose taxes on the Penn family in exchange for the temporary safety that would be provided by the Penn family paying one small lump sump for defence against the Indians. So if anything it's for expanded government power not the other way around.
I getcha im basically the same way. I dont want harm on anyone but fuk me people need to learn a lesson.
Oh noes what will Reddit do without it's mods
Trump supporter responses after the announcement elections are suspended on November 2nd Suck it up LIBTARDS Trump is right to suspend the elections or else we're gonna have a second coronavirus outbreak People can't go to the polls i done heard the coronavirus lives in polling places the longest Trump said it's only gonna be for four more years and that's fine cause here was gonna win anyway YOU SNOWFLAKES
Going outside and interacting with society is EXACTLY how you spread a virus you dumb fuck. Read a book. Don t you believe in self responsibility Educate yourself. If this were literally a libertarian world there s no way we would keep you around and allow you pollute the gene pool. I m saying that people should go inside because being outside means they will he be depriving others of life liberty and happiness. Have some patriotism for your fellow man and do 1 basic thing. Stay inside for a little bit.
I think I'll probably vote for Bernie that's doesn't sound like endorsement.
People are saying to vote but voting is suppressed by the establishment in both the DNC as well as the GOP. America is not a democracy and has never been there have only been illusions of choice not real choices. Which is why the DNC is plotting so hard against Bernie time and time again. Revolution is the only choice when all else fails. Every American needs to be ready.
Don t you need other identification to receive a registration card
Sadly there are people saying that without any sarcasm
California or Tennessee
He thought he could bury the lead with the COVID pandemic.
Well I don t see people as penguins maybe that s the problem D
No I compared an idiotic justification of government violating our rights to a different idiotic justification for the same thing.
gt Making a profit is literally the entire goal of every single business in the US at all times. That is not true
And even given all of that Hillary still won more states 11 more more votes over 3 million more and more delegates over 1 000 more When the rules were changed to be more favorable and produced an even wider field Bernie still couldn t win.
Pretty sure there has been nothing there for awhile.
How did his action save lives The Navy was already aware of the issue on his ship and was already working on offloading his crew and arranging accommodations. All he did was let the world know that that ship is compromised and vulnerable and it s a weak point in our military. The handled it incredibly wrong.
Oh come on nobody ever stepped up to defend the post turtle.
This is fake news. The exemption for businesses under 50 workers was in the law and the regulations say virtually the same thing.
They wouldn't want to disrupt the supply chain
How about we give them transport and not fucking everyone who's spreading the virus around. Why is that concept so fucking hard for you to understand
But Russia is all good lol
You re wrong. Depends on what type degree of shittiness we re talking about. Cheat on your significant other Whatever in the eyes of the law. Molest your nephew or niece Pound in the ass prison. Your freedom ends where it starts to affect the safety and health of other people.
It is. ashingtonpost.com
They re talking heads they are always in character on tv. Simply giving you the counter factual.
Hoping anyone but the scum who commit an extremely small number of offenses such as rape child abuse or murder is abhorrent.
The headline alone is just so god awful rude and disrespectful. It's nuts.
I will let you in on a little secret. The Democratic party would rather lose to Trump again than risk Bernie WINNING the presidency. Everything Bernie stands for and has fought for his whole life flies in the face of what the liberal elite in this country has built and wants to maintain. Why do you think we STILL don't have universal healthcare It's because the health insurance companies LITERALLY make the laws by donating obscene amounts of money to people who otherwise should be voting in their constituents best interests. The various institutions in this country have been built from the ground up by the rich to keep the rich rich and the poor poor. I think you would agree with me that in many European countries Bernie would be considered a moderate. His ideas are not radical. In fact resisting them still to this day IS radical.
Rise of the right wing idiocy and muh freedoms sorta people.
Whatever happened to a savings account
You re
Might as well go outside and die then
How much are they paying Reddit Must not be very much if this post is still up.
Congrats I m the first. The advances in medical tech will mean that while certainly detrimental this outbreak isn t apocalyptic IF WE TAKE IT SERIOUSLY. All we need is to prepare for the worst and hope for the best. However that doesn t mean we should let up on social distancing because surprise surprise clumps of people and a virus get along like an arsonist and a city block.
The whole idea is stupid. Like was he thinking that only government employees personnel would be using it People in DC Who exactly does he think the government is
She skipped the Jan 24th virus briefing.
If I recall correctly Trump literally said he wouldn't heed the recommendation to wear a mask because it basically would look ugly when meeting with world leaders and stuff. The guy is a fucking idiot I know it's been said often During a fucking pandemic he thinks it'll be bad aesthetics to wear a mask because of meetings like as if world leaders are actually considering to visit the US at this point in time.
I look forward to the Ride of the Mounties to epic LoTR music.
I m fucking waiting.
The Cheeto In Chief was just blaming Obama this evening again.
I think he is lying he lies every night on his crappy show he will do anything to bring down our President. Chris Cuomoinski.
gt Your example that voter ID isn't voter suppression.. You make an excellent point. For years I have been screaming about how it is fucking minority suppression to insist that they produce a valid ID to get on a plane. We both know that minorities are too fucking stupid to apply for and get their own Free voter ID. It is just a way to suppress their votes like we are screwing them out of being able to board a plane.
gt Acted late Compared to what And what steps should we have taken sooner Or what abuses of power should the president have done so they could then come back and say See We told you he was a dictator Imagine Trump enacting sweeping quarantine rules back in early or mid February when the media and everyone else was saying the seasonal flu was more worrisome. This is the dictator we tried to warn you about He's fear mongering People will panic buy all the food and toilet paper Ah the media. So predictable.
It s for your own safety you fucktards.
It would take a true miracle for trump to spin this and win the popular vote.
GJ fellow conservative smart thinking human you just made your wife walkaway...hopefully
How about this then U.S Now Leads the World in Confirmed Coronavirus Cases time.com Coronavirus US now has most cases in the world independent.co.uk United States Has the Most Coronavirus Cases in the World people.com
Gaslight Obstruct Project.
A black female conservative candidate in 2024 Liberals' heads would explode sign me up.
If you haven't read up on his father it might be worth your time. gt Charles Kushner hired a prostitute he knew to seduce his brother in law arranged to record an encounter between the two and had the tape sent to his sister.
There are A LOT of us on the left that are actively speaking out against this. It is amazing the censorship is SO BAD that often conservative places like the heritage foundation are the only places that will facilitate debates and discussions about these things and how they affect women girls. And then they use the fact that we dared to be seen with rightwing bigots as some kind of reason to invalidate our opinions further.
There s a good chunk of pay off when they get out. 100 PTSD TBI which is over 2000 month if they have a dependent. And a lot of times they can work so that s just an extra gun every month for them.
If the military forcibly overthrew Trump I wouldn't complain. Trump is basically a terrorist.
Russia will send us 10 000 experts that won't be anything like Crimea. They just tried this with the French and got kicked out.
And getting mad that you can t throw a party doesn t make you intelligent either bud Also I don t think you saw the guy I responded to who said false equivalency first
Til..... I never thought of our hospitals as private.
gt to completely ruin the NATION s economy in the name of saving lives is irresponsible. Dude what the fuck
So we pay em what 5 bucks an hour And ur talking about a 50 increase being 7. 50 an hour. I don t think Americans would do it for less than 20 an hour
My cashier called it back in early Jan. You know the problem with the reusable bags is they're not very sanitary. People are bringing in filthy bags that smell like cat pee. The thing is the environmentalist movement just needs to focus their energies on what free market barriers have led to our over reliance on non biodegradable plastics. Talk to the right in terms the right understands instead of more bans and regulations. Who remembers the most profitable and versatile crop in the farmer's arsenal Just as mechanized harvesting was developed for hemp the plant was banned across the country. Popular Mechanics 1938 books.google.com id e9sDAAAAMBAJ amp lpg PA87 amp pg PA238 v onepage amp q amp f false books.google.com id e9sDAAAAMBAJ amp lpg PA87 amp pg PA238 v onepage amp q amp f false If left and right could work together these plastic bags would be a non issue.
That happens in every primary everybody bad mouths every other candidate until one is chosen and they all fall all over each other to get behind the one who won. They aren't good people who want to do the right thing but are beholden to an evil organization. They are members of an evil organization because they are evil people and think this is the right thing.
They are too small. They prefer something larger from our own species. It's the Epstein Code.
Someone please tell me there's no simpson joke about a war with Canada.
Since when the fuck is he an expert on this subject
Yeah I'm thinking the response linked with the timing of it looking like Trump getting reelected might have something to do with the response. Not saying virus is anything other than what is. Just the response.
gt GOP already has a fake little scandal to beat Biden over the head with until November You can't hold that against Biden they'd have done the same thing with Bernie. All we would have heard about for months would be Castro and honeymooning in the USSR. They'll gin up fake scandals against every Democrat because that's what they do. They've done it to every single nominee for President since Bill Clinton and Whitewater.
If you're equating to pill heads getting opioids without a prescription to people drinking aquarium cleaner... I'm extremely confused. Pill heads don't get some non equivalent medication under the false pretense it's the same thing. Pill heads who are addicted to opioids get opioids. Either they get heroine or steal actual pills from people they know or get real medications from some other source. Pill heads dont go to Petco and get something thinking it's the same thing. So please elaborate
gt Err what loaded statement How is it loaded What exactly is unclear to you I'm not really sure how I could have been any clearer. You weren't clear at all. Start with that. gt I agree with this. I'm wondering why this process was delayed for so long. It was the process from the start. Delays occur during a pandemic with massive shortages on a global scale. gt If I want the federal government to control all purchasing then a priori I don't want competition. Yes the states have a better idea which is why they communicate their needs to the Fed and the Fed procures it. Simple. Having 50 states compete with each other the Fed and private international interests is unnecessarily complicated and doomed to fail. I already told you that it's not just states and the federal government. What's most complicated is expecting the federal government to buy up all of the supplies and then figure out what is needed across 50 states with private hospitals businesses and health care facilities that need PPE. Are you really that clueless to think your solution is less complicated gt Why haven't we done the thing you just elaborated. They are. Why havent you informed yourself on this issue Get back to me when you have.
This exactly. Its as if no one has studied logical fallacies. This is a classic false dichotomy wrapped in an ad hominem or appeal to emotion.
You dare question Dr. Trump
Melania is a birther. I do not respect birthers.
It's pretty fucking clear. Vote blue. NO MATTER WHO.
Right. I ve ridden Metro s blue line to National too. The Potomac is another open body of water. Houston has none of those that are appropriate to a solution like this.
You don't put anyone's life at risk when you go outside. The people outside have all made the conscious decision to go outside. Stay at home if you are scared and you will not have to worry about anyone else putting you down n danger.
If you do this then there goes this whole subs fettish on free market economy
That along with improving e verify is an incredibly effective way to turn the tide on illegal immigration. A wall is the other big game changer.
The current data shows its closer to 1 of infected dying as a result so factually it's vastly lower than 1 20 Getting a new job may not be your choice. Maybe your furnace breaks or a sewage line under your house. You'll need someone to fix something or have to get supplies to fix something eventually. But I get it you're fearful like lots of people are. You can't outrun a virus that's why they've been so successful.
Honest answer I would not support it. I'm essential services wealth management and if they asked me to stay home I would. But telling someone we are removing your rights I would not support. I would stay at home to try and help end this pandemic.
And Trump was calling COVId a hoax in March your point is
15 lbs is 6. 81 kg
The former woke caster from ESPN that was somehow able to make commentary over highlights boring. She got let go a long time ago during a layoff but she was suspended a couple of times for saying some pretty racist stuff on Twitter.
Ain t no way ain t now how. Back on up motha fuckas
And that 1200 will probably be taken out of your 2020 tax return.
Came straight from the horses mouth I knew it was a pandemic before it was ever called a pandemic. Trump should have acted earlier if he knew it all along.
It should have been an easy question to answer but Captain UnAmerica had to fuck up the answer anyway.
Name one way the country is irreversibly fucked due to Trump.
Yep. Nepotism.
It s because she is arguing in bad faith. They drain far more in resources than they give back. Technically people whose only income comes from welfare is taxed too but no honest person believes they are bringing added value economically.
The virus is racist and doesn t effect whites at all mmmmkkk. AOC.
Neither do you.
gt makes the administration look ridiculous There's a reason for that
This is a disingenuous point.
Yeah because any shakeup of the roster at all makes sense during a pandemic
What are you fucking on. The government isn't infringing upon anyone's 1st amendment. HE CAN STILL PRACTICE RELIGION HE CAN STILL PREACH HE JUST CANT DO IT IN A ROOM OF 10 OR MORE PEOPLE. And my guns aren't going to get taken away because I won't vote for take the guns first due process after Trump you dipshit
Someone Ohio got a good one. I think we are the only one.
Ask any Kentucky state government about him then they will tell you all his flaws.
Yeah the headline is intentionally misleading there is no rule against asking for help. But there are clear guidelines about the chain of command. Headlines like this are why I hate hate the media. It s an intentional misrepresentation of things.
Seems to me you'd be better off pointing out that they're probably less likely to be infected or infecting others marching through a mostly empty graveyard than pretending this is genuinely essential.
Thank you for answering. Didn t realize that was the context. I didn t watch that briefing so I didn t know how it was said
You should look up gullible in the dictionary and be sure to have a mirror handy.
Lmfao that face he is making in that pic.
2 Those are rookie numbers I received 2 as well. And I barely post anything
that is just part of the propaganda machine. I think Americans have largely become drones to the marketing and will continue to do what is easy now. Hundreds of thousands are going to die if we are lucky. It may be a lot more than that. Small businesses are going to go bankrupt. Big companies are going to continue to make more money for the few and the powerful. Something will need to change. People if they get scared enough or desperate enough will eventually do something although it will probably be the wrong things to do and not position us to move forward as a country.
But do we have to burn down the white house... again
Not unless you have the money to get groceries delivered. With no money comes no freedom and you have to go to the store and get infected by other people who are free to go outside as well.
The fact it was anything other than in the toilet is stupid. Newsflash for his supporters things like coronavirus don t check your party ID before infecting you. The same is true of lax environmental regs. Dems and republicans need clean air and clean water.
Yup emotional thinking tends to lean left and logical thinking tends to lean right but that s just my opinion.
They usually attack us with whatever insults would hurt them most.
Jfc. How is that not illegal How is he not being charged How does he have ANY supporters still
People check out.
by the looks of many many posts on here one need not be conservative nor an actual patriot to participate. most qualifications seem to fall around never trump or orange man bad or other such pseudo conservatism just an observation. don t deport the messenger...
CNN Armed forces ignore trumps orders to shelter in place army expected to forcefully dispose him at any time now
Young people staying at home and old people going out has nothing to do with the pandemic. You are right old people will go out despite the danger but young people just flat out don't vote pandemic or not. Don't give them us a fucking excuse lol
Fraudo stole that from twitter
Is this in reference to the quarantine Because I lowkey agree for the sake of stopping further contamination.
Pretty amazing isn t it These folks would criticize anything he says and ignore any advice he gives until they do something stupid. And then suddenly they're looking to him for advice The real reason is that they won t take responsibility for be a stupid sot.
Specifically what Are you referring to the peer reviewed studies
Are they buying assault rifles with expanded mags that they are opposed to or something
Don t you mean the idiocy of republicans with Donald trump and his family being able to do anything they want with the help of your good ol I m not racist BUT... conservitards
I joined a year and a few months a go then everyone hated the CCP for how everyone in hollywood and organuzations companies are bootlicking them and how they treat their citizens HK TW and everyone else.After the CCP managed to create a global pandemic all these left subs took a weird turn into believing everything comming from china calling everyone racist and worshiping WHO.i tought the main reason is bots but after seeing this pandemic showed us how many morons there are i am absolutely convinced they are just idiots.Their hate towards Trump clouds their judgement thinking he is wrong 100 of the time and believeing they are 100 right all the time.r coronavirus turned into r politics as soon as the first case hit them ignoring the rest of the world and spreading fake info.Reddit should be used just for memes now.
But Trump shut down travels from China very early. No one closes the country to China better than Trump. He's done a fantastic job so far and everyone who hates on him is a liberal snowflake. Trump is the best president in our nation's history.
Someone died by taking it straight up in a fish cleaner solution because he recommended it on live TV. Lot of dumb trump supporters out there.
Bro I understand the difference. You re just saying the number of Americans who die is irrelevant it s all about how many die compared to other nations. That is kind of weird.. There s nothing with using both metrics and understanding that both serve different purposes. Also weird how querying why total deaths is weird means I have an agenda.
Oddly enough. This is what germany did in the 30s to pull itself out of depression after losing WWI. They built the autobahns this way. Literally emptied the cities of unemployed men and gave them shovels.
When did he state that it most definitely does not work in that entire interview That's not even a misinterpretation he straight up didn't say that.
DF doesn t have a blind trust it s her husband who makes the investment sales and purchases.
To my friends and family who are ardent supporters of the president and his regime I ask you is there no shame ever in these despicable acts of obvious treachery I cry for our country.
He s right. There needs to be a discussion about it. Those people saying if we could only save one life don t understand reality. They don t realize how many people die from alcohol heart disease seasonal flu and so on. Those deaths are a tragedy however no one is suggesting we ban alcohol or stop driving in cars. It s time to put away purely ideological thinking and get back to reality. We can be cautious and take measures to limit this but to completely ruin the NATION s economy in the name of saving lives is irresponsible.
It's not an equivalency to begin with. Both are dangerous. I'm not saying they're equally dangerous. The point is that we knowingly put ourselves in situations with levels of danger greater than zero on a regular basis. Screaming about fallacies doesn't make you sound more intelligent.
gt He doesn't even run the election it's Congress's job top to bottom. gt gt e States organize their elections Congress sets the date of the election. So Trump does run the election then because nobody is willing to stop him.
No. She has suspended her campaign since the article was published.
Maybe if you hadn't pushed impeachment so hard the administration would be working on actual issues
Clearly none of you work in hospitals...Western Queens is a war zone right now. Paramedics and EMTs are putting their lives on the line getting people to the hospital because they re literally dying left and right this isn t even an exaggeration My friend s father just died. There aren t enough doctors and nurses and we ve had to call in retired healthcare workers. Hundreds of NYPD members are sick some have even died. Firefighters too. How come people cared so much when thousands of New Yorkers died on 9 11 Why did we bother going to war then Why did we put soldiers in harm s way spend trillions then My friend s father was a Vietnam vet. My other friend s stepdad who s in ICU on a ventilator is an Iraq vet. Guess what New York City does fuxking matter. You people are so fuxking delusional it s insane. There are over a hundred thousand people in NYC hurting real bad right now.
Might be a stable in crony capitalism but not the true definition of it
If you have to ask...
If it happens all the time does that speak for the left Are you keeping track of all the people who don t do this Or just the 100 that do If you re only keeping track of the 100 that do then I can understand how you could twist what I said to mean that average reasonable people wish death on people they disagree with all the time. What I m saying is that I don t think that s representative of the left. I m glad you don t go to those subreddits and say that kind of thing. But this is indeed the response I have. I certainly don t agree with what the person said I don t even share their political views in general. But I don t agree with taking the extreme example of a group and then saying that they re all like that. It s not logical it s bandwagoning. What if and this wouldn t be hard I found examples of people talking about how liberals should die or something like this And said you thought that Because here s a conservative saying it. What if someone says it here On this post Do you feel comfortable being represented by the worst examples in your party There s an easy joke to make here even the worst blah blah blah. But you d be surprised how similar the worst examples can look.
Ummmm... New York...
Why is this moronic trash on popular
Now they're still stuck doing air travel so they didn't have a choice
New England would like to secede as well we'll take the UKs spot in the EU just call us I don't know.. NEW England Ya that'll work.
Jesus. But yeah sounds about right.
I mean we don't even have to assume. They literally did that two weeks ago.
There's plenty of supply chain related labor out there that can't get enough help. They don't require anything..like literally.. Can't read No problem. Can't drive No problem. Felon No problem. etc
Queue the entire Reddit Admin staff having a nervous breakdown...
A voice of reason thank you.
I needed to see this. Thanks.
I mean she is right that poorer communities will be hit harder cause they have to work and are more likely to not have insurance. I just don't agree with the whole race angle.
god this administration is sickening
Why hasn't NYC locked down mass transit That's one of the first things the Chinese did.
Thanks for pushing through the talking points to what he actually said. That's rare. Do you have people contemporaneously criticizing him for doing too little The only thing I can find is admonishing him for doing too much calling his travel bans xenophobic. The House was still working to pass a bill to eliminate his ability to do them at all. I understand in hindsight everyone has a better way but even his experts were downplaying health.com things gt I can tell you all guaranteed that as we get into March and April the flu cases are going to go down. You could predict pretty accurately what the range of the mortality is and the hospitalizations will be Dr. Anthony Fauci director of the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases said in a White House press conference on Jan. 31.
Paywall.
And in the discussion I m reiterating why you should listen. It seems that people need to be reminded what the reality is. Your actions don t just affect you. You might be well and good going out and living your life but you are affecting everyone around you as well. This stuff only works if we all change our behavior together. When people are desperately asking you to do this for your community that s your time to consider your community.
So infect all the civilians
Hell yeah bring back the Matrix cosplay. youtube.com v gCyrKJg 1VM amp t 23
Goddamn why can't he have picked someone else to be the scapegoat for the coronavirus debacle. I much rather he had picked Stephen Miller or Jarrod Kushner who is much more deserving. Instead we're going to be bombarded with all these accusations why Atkinson failed to identify the coming pandemic.
Good point but how does the farmer get his workers then if 18 isn't enough Like is he supposed to give salary and benefits for picking fruit
Back then people could imagine Trump would be whatever they wanted. That's not the case anymore.
At the rate renewable energy is becoming cheaper by the time easily accessible fresh water is no longer common to most of the world energy production should be cheap enough to make large scale desalination viable. I honestly do not think that we are going to run out of water.
Exactly. Slavery was constitutional because is was written into the fucking Constitution. WTF was that dude smoking
As it relates to human rights we must distinguish between directly and indirectly impacting other people's rights. Me just leaving my home at any day constitutes an indirect threat to other people. This is exactly how we restrict freedom of speech. Claiming that something I say could potentially cause indirect harm is not enough to restrict my rights to speak. However direct threats are. So healthy people should not have their freedom of movement restricted.
Lot of idiotic posts here. The drug has very little indication of efficacy on a very small sample of tests. That is why Dr. Fauci recommends definitive testing prior to calling it a cure. Basically what is happening here is the believers think that since tRump said it it must be so IT IS NOT GOSPEL from your GOD.
You are a terrible reporter Seriously though isn t it because they were projecting and they wanted to do it
If only the conservative currently in charge had the same amount of respect for Capt. Crozier.
I don't care.
The only explanation for her being on ESPN in the first place is Affirmative Action. She's black and a woman. ESPN thought they could score some woke points with putting her on the air until she started hurting their bottom line with her idiocy. Money talks BS walks. Unfortunately for her she talked too much and her BS made ESPN tell her to walk.
In California it s okay to knowingly give someone HIV but not okay to go outside b c you might have the chinese Virus. clownworld
He is the most disgusting person.
Thank you mods
This dude is a fucking joke stop stroking trumps dick and maybe take a look around at the disaster that he had a huge part in.
A small death rate that's 50x deadlier than the flu
gt That's why we're all gonna fuckin die. Fuck this dumbass planet. lol... geez talk about an incredibly stupid overreaction
Well if we don't then the chain of succession kicks in come January 20th. That means President Pelosi speaker of the house
Republicans did the same exact thing with the corona bill it went back and forth multiple times. They are both crap dude.
Trump and kushner what a beautiful world
Boss
Non human testing lol.
gt dead people can t make or spend money. So ban tobacco motorcycles alcohol and McDonalds cheeseburgers. Since you are lying and pretending to want to save lives that will save lives too.
Got a source for that
Once again thinking of someone who is healthy and not under a severe systemic viral invader. The two are not equal
In my part of America it's always been that way. This happened with Reagan too. Uneducated poor workers were led astray.
I've been referring to it as a bizzare dystopic fever dream. Your description also perfectly encapsulates my feeling for the past month. It started slow. Every day it speeds up and I become a little more terrified.
trump bad bernie good
Then why don t they have weeks or days instead of months
It s fucking temporary you dumbass.
Baker has spent they past 4 years trying not to get on Trumps bad side without bowing down to him
States need to start sending armed guards to go get whatever was stolen and take it back.
Lol she is going to make the liberals heads explode. You go girl I ll be paying attention for the memes.
It's just dumb. Aliens are from outer space not Mexico Illegal immigrant sure whatever. Never got the alien thing. Always makes me think of MIB
One in London Ontario as well with the same capabilities
Nice
Yeah it's much better when its done behind closed doors after the exchange of money and favors. Let's keep doing it that way instead. s
He s hustling us they ve got plenty of ammo.
gt or Clinton crimes Did you miss it Trump's own state department americanindependent.com as well as department of justice ashingtonpost.com said she committed no crimes.
gt This means that Cuban Americans are at a greater risk of being hit by a hurricane than any other ethnicity and all Cuban Americans should be given extra protection against hurricanes. You're talking about risk which is still an important measure but talks about probability. I linked an article that pulled on data talking about prevalence which outlines a concrete problem based on reality. We're not talking about the same thing. But I'll bite. gt This means that Cuban Americans are at a greater risk of being hit by a hurricane than any other ethnicity and all Cuban Americans should be given extra protection against hurricanes. Why not If your goal is to prevent hurricane deaths and you know that this is a vulnerable group it would actually be a smart public health move to target interventions toward that group. It's a good probabilistic buy especially if you had no better data.
The US response has been in large equal to all the other large Western nations.
Swearing when the fever breaks is still sweating caused by the fever lmfao are you serious right now Is sweating not a symptom of the flu
Sponsored by the true working class citizens. Especially small business owners. Yay. It s free for some and extra tax for others.
Crazy how this isn't news on any site with actual credibility.
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r topmindsofreddit Pro life topminds say the economy is more important than the lives of people living in a liberal city. Wonder how they'll feel when red States catch up in the next few weeks reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
There can't be...the rest of the free world sees what they refuse to.
I'm glad Trump took the advice of his experts not the democrat media i.redd.it that was telling him to stop doing anything at all. i.redd.it Pelosi led people to congregate in Chinatown. Di Blasio encouraged people to go about their lives and attend his parade. New Orleans went ahead with Mardi Gras. It's amazing the federal government did anything given the cacophony of democrat voices in opposition.
Okay everybody let's take five and come back to this in a minute
Middle of the night on the east coast
It was total false hope it is not by current medical standards an effective treatment. Additionally it is extremely dangerous so implying that people could save themselves with it may not be so smart. After all people were dumb enough to hoard toilet paper for respiratory illness lol.
Yes
I'm not trying argu if he's detached or not. I'm only trying to explain why I think this article is deceiving. Nowhere in the article does it mention that the group revolves around Donald Trump. Anyone could form a group like this and have members with graduate degrees be behind some cause and then give it an official sounding name. The deceiving part was not making it clear who this group was.
What the fuck is Alabama doing on that list They should be getting the good shit for being favourable towards trump.
How she got into office is beyond me lol
Good for Robert Kraft. Also fuck Robert Kraft.
The military doesn t have a devotion towards any president.
No. Trump is no different than a figurehead on the front of a ship. He's the first thing you notice. Problem is no one ever looks past his cheeto complexion. Hs is neither smart enough or capable enough to do this much damage. The real masterminds stand around and most importantly behind Trump. All they have to do is point him.
I actually think the Iraq war was the blow that will be the death of the nation. A decade long unsuccessful war that drained the coffers while getting half the people to decide they were the only real Americans. There's never been any healing it's just a wound that's festered and grown and I no longer believe that healing is possible. In what universe will the GOP at this point admit to being wrong It's going to get worse and worse and I think that there are many that want it to because civil war is more conceivable than admitting failure or fault.
Would be hilarious. Tune in for chatting with the president every night at 2100 est
i.imgur.com
No you dont. amp x200B You cannot sweat while getting a Fever. Thats literally what your body stops doing to induce the fever. amp x200B mycarpe.com mycarpe.com gt Once a person s body initiates the fever process chemical messengers called pyrogens are released into the bloodstream. Pyrogens are part of the immune system response and through a complex chemical process cause a person s body to raise in temperature. Once a person has a fever they will often exhibit symptoms like headache malaise anorexia and other sickness behaviours. A person with a fever will also experience heat generating mechanisms like skin vasoconstriction which leads to chills and goosebumps muscle contractions shivering and a desire to be warm. Once a person s temperature reaches its new high setpoint and a fever runs its course the body lowers its setpoint and begins to employ body cooling processes. Due to the fact that sweating is the body s primary way to cool itself down people who are recovering from a fever often experience sweating as a part of that process. It is the body s natural way of cooling itself down and regaining its normal homeostasis. 2
I was simply pointing out who the actual Peco Media is. Downvoted
Like I said everyone who chooses to go outside are doing so of their own free will. Nobody is forcing them outside. Who said anything about being sick or implying that your sick It's not just sick people who are being forced in their homes. Even if it was that's a direct violation of their rights. I'm not overstepping anything when I chose to go outside. The government is overstepping my rights when they tell me I can't What tantrum is causing panic The people demanding that our rights be striped are the only ones causing any panic. The only person who should he held responsible for any injury is the person that directly caused that injury.
You can t just go around saying it def helped without hard evidence showing it definitely helped. Some people used it and recovered but no study has been done to prove that drug helped in the recovery. That s not hard evidence at all. More people didn t use the drug and recovered. I hope you and your wife are doing well during these times. Nurses are always essential to healthcare and during this crisis it is clear why
Here is what I saw Current solider is on guard duty Sergeant or chief of detail comes out and announces changing of guard sets wreaths etc. New guard emerges from side entrance and makes his way to chief for inspection. Chief conducts inspection. We could not exactly tell what failed but it was something on his uniform buttons or shoulder epaulets. New guard returns to barracks out of sight to remedy problem New guard returns to center for re inspection. I think he failed again if memory serves. New NEW guard backup emerges and is inspected. He passes and the changing officially happens. During this whole time maybe 10 minutes old guard never stops his 21 steps. I guess he would have stayed on duty until an acceptable relief was available. I would love to know how often inspection actually fails and if there are any ramifications to the solider who failed. It was surreal to watch especially knowing how dedicated these soldiers are to this duty one of the most sought after from what I've read I'm sure the guy who failed was embarrassed and humiliated although he shouldn't be.
this is some crazy right wing wet dream that will never ever happen
Hmmm and which other country should stop spending unnecessarily on military and start caring about their people
I completely understand the need for oversight in any aspect of government. I'm of the opinion that while it seems there's an oversight committee for everything and then oversight committees to oversee the oversight committees I don't really trust any of our current elected officials to do the right thing. To your point of Trump funneling the money he doesn't have a say in who gets the money. The title says he wants to spend the money but he can't He has no control over where it goes. His displeasure with the oversight committee is not because he wants to try and give money to his friends it's because the oversight committee is going to look into how this whole pandemic was handled. I'm not a Trump supporter and it pains me to listen him speak but I can admit that it's obvious no matter what he does there's a segment in the government and among the people that will always find fault. Some is warranted some is not.
We need a full military walk out that says fuck you to Trump or just takes over and instituted the next election with Trump behind bars.
Our Governor encouraged people to support local restaurants by ordering food for curbside pick up. He even said in his update he planned on supporting his local restaurants. I have been ordering food 1 2 times a week from our local restaurants.
There's a lot of bullshit in these comments about how Republicans are evil satanic and interested solely in enriching themselves and corporations at the expense of the working class. You're not wrong. In fact that is absolutely right. Except the Democrats are just as guilty. In fact both parties share the same neo liberal economic platform. Differences in constituencies are mostly cultural. For example everyone is giving these GOP senators shit for insider trading but Diane Feinstein of California a Democrat was also pulling the same shit and has been her entire career in politics. To say Trump is exceptional or to write off the blue collar whites who voted for him is wrong and to then blame Russia for rigging the election is just flat out bullshit. White working class people despise Hillary Clinton because her husband balanced the budget by raising taxes on the middle class and poor. NAFTA and other trade deals put the nail in the coffin on midwestern prosperity. In 2016 Clinton represented all the decadence and arrogance of the corporate class that outsourced their jobs to sweatshops in China and Mexico. Gee I wonder why they opted for Trump. Trump was an outsider. Granted he was every bit a political cynic as Clinton and a member of the same elitist corporate class that has been fucking America since FDR but many blue collar whites decided to roll the dice on him. Trump promised that he'd restore their lost manufacturing jobs and dignity. He lied and his presidency has been an unmitigated disaster of epic proportion. Instead of focusing on his false promises to the American working class Democrats opted to chase one russian conspiracy after the other. Now did Russia interfere Undisputedly. Did that have any significant effect on the outcome of the election No. As many comments point out Trump the populist candidate ironically lost the popular vote. I'm so fucking tired of seeing dems and neo libs crying Russia. America isn't in this mess because of Russia. We're in this mess because of your stupidass greedy and short sighted economic policy. And what do the dems nominate in order to address half a century of corruption Joe Biden. So you know what canadians I hope you have learned your lesson with America. So long as a Democrat or a Republican is at the helm don't trust a single thing we say or do.
Bunch of whiners
Come on. That is disgusting.
Again you re making stuff up for political reasons.
Coronavirus is 2 3x as contagious as the flu the average flu hospital stay is 3 days it's 2 3 weeks for coronavirus.
This is obviously laughable but I will give this person credit for at least having their own bracelet store. Shows a level of entrepreneurship that most libtards don t have. Also working at Starbucks is commendable as well. Much better than doing nothing. If this person is willing to work for a living and even have some entrepreneurial spirit then there may be hope for them
Chinese paid msm to distort reality and deflect American ire away from CCP and onto Russia. CCP involvement in misinformation during last 25 years is now just becoming realized.
The level of broken in US culture is fucking terrifying.
We are getting closer and closer to a dictatorship
Do it These are neo fascist sympathizers they deserve whatever they get.
Capitalism baby.
Nasty women are trumps kryptonite he loses his shit
Isn't it the job of Congress to provide funding for states to hold secure elections Isn't McConnell sitting on multiple election security bills
it could be rigged or it could just be standard modus operandi of underfunded sweet heart deals and pure negligence
Those at risk shouldn't go and shouldn't expose themselves to others thereby mitigating the risk for themselves. Those not at risk should be allowed to roll the dice if they care to. I am not responsible for those who choose risk for themselves. I am responsible for myself.
If you live in a Republican State you re fucked. The rest of us have Medicare or the equivalent.
Exactly
Lol how you gonna do that Cut business taxes to the point where we're paying them to operate here Aren't we already there in some cases
What the hell is approval rating like what even is that number
It's a comment on the precived influx of liberals by an annexation of California.
Sure. It's all a conspiracy. Hillary Clinton phoned China Spain and Italy to pretend there's a pandemic and is using her allies like Cuomo to spread those lies... s There's 3000 deaths in NY right now. That's a whole 11S. It's in some cases impossible to know if someone with a previous condition died because of coronavirus but often it's obvious it's coronavirus. If they had pancreatic cancer and died because of lung issues specifically pneumonia it's a Democrat hoax to classify it as a coronavirus death because muh preexisting conditions. Besides how many fucking people with deadly illnesses that can cause a death that can be mistaken for coronavirus while also testing positive for coronavirus do you think there are 100 would be a very optimistic estimate. But let's say it's 500 you still have 2500 deaths on NY alone and growing fast. What state do you live in if I may ask
It only does if no one stops it. Most Americans seem to want to give up their freedoms because they re scared.
gt I'm curious how he wants to come way under the model. Knowing him his plan is probably to start killing people in other ways so they don't die of COVID
Trump falsely claims x
See that's where you will never succeed. People with any bit of empathy and psychological retrospective will always want to give people a second chance no matter how much the other side fucks them over. This difference makes those with any rapport want to forgive and forget I personally know that I'm not the type that keeps beating on a dead horse to bring about the mistakes of the past. Because to truly become a better person you want to learn from your past and take actions in the future. But we don't push others around to forcibly change their way of thinking. Its the same goddamn story with every one of these idiots. 1. Never concede in an argument and pound the table if you can't pound the facts because you were never arguing in good faith in the first place. They want to win not learn. 2. Never empathize with those lowly creatures that you see fleeing war and terrorism they just came here to take your jobs away. Not the employers who import them illegally and pay them dirt cheap and threaten with deportation. Always remember Americans fought over toilet paper and Hand sanitizers. These few lines have been thrown around on Reddit so much that we may want to question their legitimacy but they hold true.
I can t believe how absolutely scatter brained these anchors reporters are. Jesus they can t even get a question out.
gt States should fend for themselves We all live in states though
Calls me frothing.... Looks at all the double replies and walls of text. Notes original comment was removed by mods... Yeah ok whatever you say.
What percent of Americans over the age of 45 do you think have a preexisting condition
Lot to unpack there. gt We control the government Outright lie. This has been demonstrated literally every day. Unless we means that you're a member the corporate elite rich and entrenched bureaucracy. gt WE want it to enforce stay at home laws See above. I want people to stay at home but I don't want the government to use force to take away people's rights. gt so that the people we love and even people we may not know don't die unnecessarily This would be a good outcome but it's happening anyway even in countries where the government is literally arresting everyone who leaves their homes. Also this argument can be applied to literally anything that causes death. gt I can't tell those idiot spring breakers to stay home Sure you can. Lots of people have. gt but the government sure as shit can Not under the constitution they don't but I'm sure you'd rather have temporary safety than actual liberty. gt you're damn right I want it to That's obvious. gt I love my parents. Me too. They're in their 70's and have pre existing conditions. Because they're vulnerable they're staying at home and only venturing forth under controlled conditions so they don't get infected. Tell your parents to do the same. That way they'll be safe no matter what the government does.
gt They absolutely do not pay the same as we do or more. They put as many dependents as they can on the W 4 form so they can have the absolute minimum of taxes withheld from their paycheck. Then they don't file income tax in April because they are using a stolen SSN. They pay as little as possible on income taxes. They absolutely do not pay the same as we do or more. They put as many dependents as they can on the W 4 form so they can have the absolute minimum of taxes withheld from their paycheck. Then they don't file income tax in April because they are using a stolen SSN. They pay as little as possible on income taxes.
Could be a positive sign that the contagion is loosening its grip on the nation. My TDS sufferer has started muting portions of MSNBC's Morning Joe.
I am home as you should be too unless your freedom to die in pandemic is greater than your belief in science
Yeah there s definitely no American mill that could supply them. Canada has the only one.
An acceptable loss for allegedly pro life Republicans.
gt Things like M4A will mean tax increases on the middle class as well it will also remove premium payments we see universal healthcare working in so many other countries. that it will somehow hurt the united states is hot garbage
gt Everyone I know is either being paid still working Lucky you. gt get a new job that will pay or will let you work So easy when entire industries are shut down. Let me guess your one of those people proclaiming themselves compassionate by stopping everyone else from being able to live as they want Or just a pothead glad they can smoke all day
Lol is canada gonna send mooses to invade the us.
Way to completely miss the point of the monument.
Psst r yougotstungbythebee
This is the guy who called the New York Times fake news because its Friday morning paper didn't mention a call he had had with President Xi Thursday night link mediaite.com
Never said they werent
250 000 dead his estimate isn't a witch hunt shit for brains. Donald Trump should be publicly flogged for incompetence.
Another witch hunt Really The media is reporting this dung Not worth reporting. Who cares what Trump thinks
It's clearly marked satire but don't worry lots of people miss that. Have a great weekend.
Biden spent 16 million on ads before Super Tuesday. Sanders spent 56 million. Bloomberg spent half a billion. I guess money can't buy elections after all.
It is he is growing a small Jared in his chest cavity.
Satire
I m pretty sure I had it 2 weeks ago. The fever dreams came at night along with pounding chest and chills. The rest of the day I was pretty lucid and only need to take naps. Its Not unbelievable.
That s why we need laws to be able to sue fake News organizations like Fox News for depraved heart murder en.m.wikipedia.org for intentionally spreading propaganda that gets people killed as they did with Covid 19 while taking steps internally to protect their own staff.
Did you forget the hostages in Iran Or do they not teach you that in your American school system You dumb fuck
Depressions drag on for years as supply chains even in a modern economy would take a long long time to rebuild.
Gerrymandering and voter suppression has historically been utilized by republicans lol. These aren t just claims.
Thank the writers I'm just relaying their message. gt By Noah Bierman Eli Stokols Chris Megerian
Most of us knew that and that's why we didn't join.
Can conservatives please answer me a question I hear from you guys a lot that the left loves China etc. yet the president made this tweet... mobile.twitter.com ref src twsrc 5Etfw 7Ctwcamp 5Etweetembed 7Ctwterm 5E1178986524630802432 amp ref url https 3A 2F 2Fwww.bloomberg com 2Fnews 2Farticles 2F2019 10 01 2Ftrump congrats china while republicans criticize communist rule How can you defend that
The hypocrisy in this sub is nauseating The post is literally here FOR NO REASON EXCEPT FOR THE ATTEMPT TO BLAME OBAMA There is NO OTHER REASON this post exists None At all
First of all no one can prevent us from being affected at all. Anyone who complains about that is being unreasonable. A global pandemic was going to get here regardless especially with China blatantly lying to protect their fragile ego. What the US needed to do and still needs to do is work to mitigate the damage as much as possible. Then we need to have better preventive measures in place for potential second and third waves. The most important thing that the US should have done is not have its president publicly downplay the risks of the crisis. What Fauci said above is a much better of example of how this could have been handled in its very early days. He stressed that this is a serious matter but he didn't urge the American public to panic at that time. That is a much better public statement than One day it s like a miracle it will disappear Another example of a terrible statement was And again when you have 15 people and the 15 within a couple of days is going to be down to close to zero that s a pretty good job we ve done. Why is this so important Because a large portion of the American public trusts what the President says and when the person they trusts downplays the severity of a global pandemic many people do not feel compelled to make changes to their behavior. By early March it was clear that things needed to shut down for multiple months. Three weeks ago we should have been locking down and mobilizing like we are now. Just like Trump did a good job of cutting off travel to China very quickly he should have been quick to shut off travel to the hot spots in Europe. Cutting off travel to China was quite effective and it's why we started flaring up later than Europe. But by failing to cut off international travel completely the virus still infiltrated from hotspots that developed after China. The biggest issue that has prevented us from mitigating the spread however has been the lack of testing available. ESPECIALLY CRUCIAL was the lack of testing kits available in the early days of the crisis. The lack of testing kits is a complex matter that resulted from a number of mistakes made by the CDC FDA and White House. One of the biggest problems was the often mentioned late start For a better look into the testing issue here's a really good article advisory.com While not a recent action taken in the outbreak calls to cut CDC funding and cutting the pandemic response team did not help when we found ourselves in an inevitable pandemic situation. Additionally I believe that CDC would have functioned more proactively and effectively with more competent leadership in charge. Dr. Robert Redfield Trump's appointed CDC director has had a very questionable history regarding his opinions on how to handle virus outbreaks. For example Dr. Redfield was against the use of condoms and free needles in handling the HIV AIDs epidemic. Today we still have things to worry about when it comes to handling this crisis. Namely there are still multiple states that haven't put together stay at home orders. These stay at home orders have been shown to significantly decrease the amount that residents in those areas move around and interact with others. The social distancing that results from this is one of our best weapons against this invisible enemy. It's a pity that other states did not take action early. Props to California Illinois and New York for being proactive on that front at least in comparison to other states
This was my favourite lmao
That s how you know he wasn t.
yes. Also idk why they re pouting so much racist propaganda. Honestly it s like an alternate universe where Hitler was Jewish
Newsom has to call Trump everytime his state lights itself on fire so I'm not surprised he knows to keep his mouth shut during the crisis time he'll talk shit once it's all over but that's fine
America is Canada's drunk friend that punches them when we help them into a cab.
Dr oz can say whatever he wants but there has been nothing to actually indicate that that s true. It might be but it s like saying people taking the drug didn t get eaten by tigers. That s technically true but correlation is not causation. Almost 80 of physicians in Italy are prescribing it source fox news interview with Dr. Fauci and they re still getting cases and fatalities. Prescribing it is great but it s not a proven prophylactic or curative treatment at this point.
Im Christian and people like him piss me off that s why i think God is mad too he is mad with humanity because we suck. Tell him to put a cork in his mouth
He's only rich because of family money. Not because of some business acumen
Stormy now there's a name I haven't heard in a while. i.ytimg.com
It's just so depressing that the party is run by Wall Street.
Yeah definitely better than blessing the peasants with a crappy rendition of Imagine.
But how else will we live our exploitation lifestyles where we buy cheap products internationally from underpaid workers.
The mayor in my city has shut down all private businesses other than medical facilities and restricted all non essential travel and said the police would be enforcing curfews. If that doesn't scare you that a middle sized city mayor has the authority to quarantine everyone in their homes and shut down private business then I don't know what should. What's even scarier is if you say anything to to anyone about it that isn't wholly supportive of the idea then you're castigated as someone who doesn't care about old people dying...
sTaY tHe FUCKKKK aT hOmE
Lol I love her look at 1 22 where she's clearly thinking you have to be the dumbest motherfucker I've ever met
Care to edit your other comment then
He d probably tell you that you re not a real christian then since you disagree with him and don t love Trump. I normally tell him to put a lot more than a cork in his mouth.
Can you imagine their reaction if 9 11 happened under Trump's presidency I'm disgusted just thinking about it.
Using a dated map doesn t help. The numbers have changed and the US death has dropped significantly since then. Closing the economy will slow the growth until summer when it warms up to 25 degrees Celsius the virus has a hard time surviving in heat. Then the economy opens back up and we have enough research to have a publicly available vaccine and mass produced treatments and masks. We are on the right path.
gt If Obama spent all his time bashing everyone and everything I'd be fine with people bashing Michelle too But you'd be gathering frustration from the actions of one person and then taking out that frustration on a completely different person. If Barack was trashing people why would you attack Michelle She's not the one doing it.
What a slime bag. Hes done nothing for his constituents and is appalled'trump dared point it out. Hes the poster boy for term limits because the people in his district are too stupid to vote him out.
That comment is incorrect. The senate picks the vice president the house picks the president
Imagine allowing large gatherings where the virus has been proven to spread lmao.
As you are aware This is the first time you're hearing this
He's using Kushner for this now.
Hi akornblatt Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u akornblatt amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
He wakes up next to Ivanka so he s probably doing something right with his life.
No kidding here's a thread where it was discovered. reddit.com
Apple doesn t fall far....
This is the type of stuff that s being said on Fox News which is the channel these trump supporters and republicans watch. Fox News has been saying this lately that this is not worth messing up the economy over. I saw someone on Facebook literally do the math on hypothetical death rates and how millions out of billions dying is not that bad. They argue more people will die of suicide because they will be broke. I wish this was made up. I can t believe this how these people think. But they re also applauding Trump seizing medical supplies to countries in need so can t expect much more from them.
How many lives should we sacrifice
Lmfaoo Well of you've actednin a reasonable time lets wait and see.
He already tried to interfere with a free and fair election. The GoP said they were fine with it.
gt He s such a pussy. He should grab himself.
It's worth noting that most modern corporations use the same brainwashing techniques used by cults and military psy ops to keep their workers complacent.
Seth Meyers is extremely well informed and is typically on the money with his info. He s just liberal so you don t like him.
You're missing the fact that the fiber that goes into these masks majority come from wait for it Canada so they can simply refuse to export the needed material and say have fun with your masks
On one hand...HELL YES it needed to be said. On the other hand does it make things better I both love and hate Trump and that letter felt great and maybe the gloves are off and it wont make a difference but wow what a zinger.
So making up stuff that you don t agree with is wrong but making stuff up that you agree with is right
Exactly. Even my Ph.D having uncle believes all the suppression lies. Amazing and painful.
Ritch people don t know how to run a country.
Race ya to the finish I bet I'll win
GroinPunch 2020. Beating trump the best way possible.
Well they knew they needed more ventilators in 2015 and they did spend the next 4 years funding illegal immigrant education with the Dream Act. So what exactly is false to you Sure no one said hey Andrew Dream Act or ventilators. But the way the budget is spent is a reflection of how he chose to spend it obviously.
That's Inslee in Washington. He's wondering why the government isn't seizing factories and forcing the production of supplies.
gt A subsidiary of a Russian company that has been sanctioned by the U.S manufactured ventilators that were transported from Moscow to New York this week to help tackle the coronavirus pandemic according to pictures of the delivery. gt The flight was the result of a phone call between Presidents Donald Trump and Vladimir Putin on Monday and was characterized by the Kremlin as a humanitarian aid flight implying the ventilators and masks aboard the flight were donated to the US.
Does it really matter that they were wrong or not when people are literally dying because the hospitals are full. I think once that happens the actual number doesn't matter. What matters is fixing the problem so people can stop dying
If you needed a fighting force to arm roadblocks where would you look Able bodied young men right So that's Democrats. We'll stop the shitbirds trying to escape just fine
haha what a libtard
It s a promising treatment when controlled and monitored by doctors. At the dosage needed to treat covid 19 the drug itself can be incredibly dangerous. Therefore it s best not to suggest it can be some sort if magical solution to a public stupid enough to hoard toilet paper. All that being said more research is needed.
What a waste of a pay check
If Trump was a Nazi you d be killed for making that comment.
It is terrible. That's why it really needs more studies because it would also be a shame if the supply was used up for other people who need it to treat lupus and rheumatoid arthritis if it has no effect in the treatment of covid 19. It's not without side effects in large doses either so there is a chance that it could make things a little worse for some patients which would also be terrible considering what they are already going through.
NOW you say this And then you voted Yes anyway Did Mama Bear approve this message Sellout. How's that net worth looking
Get em How High
if only there was some entity that could regulate how masks are distributed between the states
I'm not sure maybe not right at minimum wage of 7. 25 but the jobs that are certainly underpaid and taken advantage of are the ones workers are so upset about right now. People are being taken advantage of and when profits are so high I think workers should have some guaranteed minimum quality of life if they work. Part of that is better pay
It is only a matter of time until he publicly states that anyone who dislikes him should be punished. Still won t matter
These sorts of things are why I think it's ludicrous for any non Republican to abstain in this election and think that they're being principled.
Couldn't happen to a nicer President Prime Minister Dictator King or Queen.
gt They all already hanging out on the beach. Because they were cleared dumb fuck. Stfu. The infected are not in public. Get educated.
gt This means these families are likely paying about 6. 4 percent on average of their income in state and local taxes. so sales tax
Yeah but in Pence s mind straight people get covid 19 too.
I'll do you one better I'll give you Trump himself talking about how the Democrats were telling him that he needed to do more and that he wasn't doing enough but he ignored their criticism of his inaction as an attack against him. gt Now the Democrats are politicizing the coronavirus. You know that right Coronavirus. They re politicizing it. We did one of the great jobs. You say How s President Trump doing They go Oh not good not good. They have no clue. They don t have any clue. They can t even count their votes in Iowa they can t even count. No they can t. They can t count their votes. gt One of my people came up to me and said Mr. President they tried to beat you on Russia Russia Russia. That didn t work out too well. They couldn t do it. They tried the impeachment hoax. That was on a perfect conversation. They tried anything they tried it over and over they ve been doing it since you got in. It s all turning they lost it s all turning. Think of it. Think of it. And this is their new hoax. But you know we did something that s been pretty amazing. We re 15 people cases of coronavirus infection in this massive country. And because of the fact that we went early we went early we could have had a lot more than that. And now in his own words because he failed to follow through we have a lot more cases. He took the right actions initially but as soon as the problem wasn't coming form China he stopped seeming to give a shit. He didn't even bother criticizing Governors that were clearly failing. Out of all the times to call a politician an ass on Twitter for losing this would have been the time. It still is. Even recently Trump downplayed it saying we'd reopen by Easter. He still doesn't get it and has to be actively stopped from making things worse at this point. All of the governors need to be publicly addressed on how they are failing their states especially on the east coast. But Trump isn't doing the one thing he is good at he needs to start that now. He needs to call out states on not doing enough. Executive order travel restrictions between states. These are things that aren't hindsight they're now sight. They're now sight that's been needed for weeks.
C'mon now you know they can't read all those big words you just used.
Hey remember when Trump was saying it was looking positive and the media called him irresponsible and a liar and that he was exaggerating and then some moron drank fish tank cleaner and died and so the media blames Trump I remember.
What a great 5 minutes Now reflect on the reality that for the other 23 hours and 55 minutes in the day Fox News viewers didn't have someone cutting through the propaganda hatred and lies. And don't forget that Trump has spent 4 years telling his supporters that every other news source is the enemy of the people. The hatred and ignorance of these fuckers is going to get us all killed. We're all fucked.
Facts ARE facts. And the fact is if you aren t his doctor so you don t know any more shit than anyone else here. He isn t in the ICU and he s continued filming from home to where everyone can see him. He doesn t appear to be in the feverishly ill category that your patients were in for your anecdotal stories. Is it possible he s telling the truth Certainly... is it also possible he s full of shit and an attention seeking hack Also highly likely.
I remember catching a segment of The Five randomly a week or 2 ago and Jesse Watters straight up admitted he was a sociopath and he had no empathy for any other person as he downplayed the seriousness of the virus and whined about the stock market. I guess it's been completely normalizes at this point because I never saw a single article pick up on him saying the quiet part out loud.
Not for the last 161 years.
I'm not going to be surprised by a 7 figure death total in the USA. Unless I'm one of them. That'll be surprising. Can it be surprising but not unexpected
How is this so hard to understand People need to get to their essential jobs. Imagine if doctors and nurses couldn t get to work because their only form of transit isn t running.
You can even see the Botox trying to escape his face when he talks
I just want someone who understands how vaccines work to talk.
Exposing military weakness to China and Iran during a pandemic while he hasn't even heard back from the chain of command on the issue isn't the actions of a good officer. It's the actions of a media glory hound that has the potential to get a lot of Americans killed.
That s the risks you have to weigh. Do you risk being a carrier or do you risk not putting food on the table. I m going to take the risk of being a carrier because unemployment is not responding to either me and my wife. She applied a few weeks ago and haven t received anything. I just recently applied but I m worried I won t receive a response either. So I m looking for another job in trucking.
Farming and construction are officially considered essential.
He s lost almost all the job gains. He s lost almost all the stock market gains. When was the last time those things happened Another Republican President. I know that this isn t really Trumps fault but he shouldn t have been sucking his own dick for three years every time the job market or stock market went up. He s mishandled this so bad that he now gets all the blame for the job loses and the stock market. Fuck Trump
So you are free by being charged with a crime and put in a cage So if you go out against quarantine and a cop escorts you back into your home and tells you to stay there does that agree with your delusional worldview as well
Since his election I can't speak for other provinces but mine stopped schools from going to band athletic camps competitions and other trips to the states. Also his racist talk which half the americans still seem to ignore has influenced a lot of people not to visit. I personally haven't been back to the states since I graduated and have no plans to do so again in the future.
As someone who has lupus and recently had trouble getting the drug... Thank you Dr. Fauci.
The flu has killed more people this year than the Chinese flu.
MSNBC simply vanishes.
Who was sending the equipment to the subs' oh 3M...who is bound by american law simple as that
It isn't ironic you are incapable of self awareness. You are blinded by bias and hatred. And you've even allowed it to envelop your personality. Look at your username that's really what defines you Sucks. For. You.
gt Who cares what Schiff thinks. TRUMP 2020 Make them cry again gt Why is getting 30 days He should leave immediately gt Fire the rest of those clowns acting like their unbiased gt Schiff gets off on his comments sits in his closet and two fingers himself. gt POTUS what took you SOOO LONG. He is on our TEAM or he is FIRED. gt firing that little cockroach should be EFFECTIVE IMMEDIATELY and he should be firing these swamp rat motherfckres en masse each day ENOUGH IS DEFINITELY ENOUGH gt 9 out of 10 Democ RATS can not tell you why they hate the President The 10 that can give an answer base it on bogus info. aka fake news Yeah about what you'd expect youtube.com v rAnhTWWE6N8
He s the only one in the administration I like.
I rather have the virus go away and have healthy people then watch trump fall. Not a fan of trump but losing jobs and people is worse.
No. Regular Americans aren't rabid liberal Pro China Anti American.
Yeah I seen the block party pictures. We know why those people got sick. Just like those dumbass white kids who went down to South Beach to party. We know why they got sick. Some days I perversely want some kind of collapse so we can go back to the strong leading instead of the weak holding everyone down with this victimhood bullshit. Hard times make hard men and all that.
There s nothing rational about them.
gt capitalism has one master profit. And this is why real conservatives subordinate the market to the national interest.
I mean Americans elected a reality tv star as president so I don't see why a TV show host exposing how idiotic this unqualified chancer is is not relevant.
You're not going to be saved from the virus. A virus doesn't live. It's not something you can kill. It just infects. That's what it does. That's all it does. It needs hosts. It doesn't care which host. Could be human. Could be feline next time could be bovine. This is the galaxy that you live in.
Top 10 of Trump donors I thought Pay trumpie some money get some venti masks A part of me also hates saying as much sarcasm as I add to this i know I sort of feel like it's what Trump would do if he couldn't get shit for it enough that it'd make him genuinely miserable hearing people's shit.
I think he definitely learned his lesson. Just not the one we'd hoped he would.
I got the reference. I feel like such a nerd.
A boss firing an employee A dictator move Really
Burn it all down. That s the only thing that can fix this shitshow. Burn it to the ground and hold these criminals and their enablers accountable.
It s a shit sandwich and it was designed that way by Scott the unnamed adviser told Politico. It wasn t about saving money. It was about making it harder for people to get benefits or keep benefits so that the unemployment numbers were low to give the governor something to brag about. The adviser added Everyone we talk to in that office when we ask them what happened tells us The system was designed to fail. That s not a problem when unemployment is 2. 8 percent but it s a problem now.
gt it s their right to sell to whoever they want Which is why real conservatives prioritize the country over the free market.
That so cool we should still destroy the economy however
YOU don t piss people off THEY CHOOSE to write things. I m fucking abrasive one Redditor wrote to me but when you use facts gt feelings and refute central ideas most have a hard time... I believe it s due to multiple factors but I won t bore you with them unless you want me to.
You assume too much. I live in a place much like you. But unlike you I can see the benefits of civilization.
Can't help those who won't bootstrap themselves. That's what we have to remember. We aren't in this together. The economy healthcare viruses life we are all separate and on our own. Its me vs them. In no way are we all interconnected and affected by the faults or failures or struggling of others. It's me baby me. And I got mine. Fuck off.
Been playing hockey all my life in MD. I m ready.
But the corporate Biden democrats are just as bad as Trump amp x200B S
Absolutely. I've been on there since like 20k subscribers and the influx of lemmings from r politics has been pretty remarkable and annoying
If you watch the video she s telling people not to discriminate against Asian Americans because of the virus. That s it. I m just as irritated when people take Trumps hoax comments out of context. Don t do the same to Pelosi.
You could just change clothes when you get there. That s what I do when I bike in the summer.
Unless it's fucking. So Sue Me.
Except it isn t true
We re also not sure of where the Spanish Flu originated. One of the first cases documented was in Kansas but China is also another possibility.
Because that's what really matters whether or not she is a supporter...
gt True Libertarian FTFY
gt If you view the health of individual consumers as an investment it pays off in the long term for society. leftist talking points and good job at using the very same verbiage as all leftist politicians
We want Washington Oregon California Colorado and New York. Maybe Minnesota too but I mean we already have Manitoba..
6 must be the 6 that count. CNN and MSNBC combined don't have Fox's ratings. People can see thru CNN and MSNBC bullshit. Why can't you
Hi Lt 486 Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission r politics comments fum8v8 us tried to order lung ventilators before it all has been removed for the following reason s Your headline must be comprised only of the exact copied and pasted headline of the article see our rule here. reddit.com wiki do not create your own title We recommend not using the Reddit suggest a title' as it may not give the exact title of the article. The ALL CAPS and Breaking' rule is applied even when the actual title of the article is in all caps or contains the word Breaking' This rule may be applied to other single word declarative and or sensational expressions such as EXCLUSIVE or HOT click here for more details r politics wiki index wiki do not create your own title If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u Lt 486 amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission 28 r politics comments fum8v8 us tried to order lung ventilators before it all context 3D10000 29
Does anyone else think it's weird that this guy can be Governor of one state and then a Senator for another For years he's all about Massachusetts and then he's like oops I forgot I'm actually from Utah. Screw Massachusetts. Like seriously dude pick a state.
Exactly also wtf port of N.Y I live in Massachusetts and people are not happy.
Maybe not. I had some friends with it and some of them couldn't keep anything down. They came out of it fine but said it was basically like having the worst flu ever. course there were also others who just had a touch of fever and that was it...
I thought you were referring to U.S cases.
gt I hope Alabama manages to dodge the bullet. Which bullet That state is a firing range.
I pointed this out yesterday and the replies I got were basically so what he talked about it there was no action
Ah Kayuga senpai tries to hide behind someone
You too
Lmfao
Okay so this debate is shifting in a more theological direction. What evidence proves that God is real
True. This statement not only applies to illegals but also people who actively attack police officers members of BLM who then claim they were discriminated against.
She can t wait to spend more of our money.
He should annex Washington state that ll teach em... just saying...
The GOP Press release. Americans are busy and can t afford to take time away from work because they need to keep their jobs. So we the GOP the guardians of freedom and democracy are proposing to simply everyone s lives by removing the burden of voting for most of Americans by providing cash options to not vote. That s right in exchange for your right to vote the GOP is proposing legislation that will provide 2 000 to every voter who chooses not to vote. We think this change will streamline government and put much needed cash in the pockets of our citizen.
This isn't a super pac.
gt Executive orders expire at the end of an administration unless signed again by the incoming executive. Most are allowed to expire. 100 incorrect. All EO's require yearly re authorization which are published in the National Registry else the EO expires. Very few are ever allowed to expire which is why we still have EO's on the books from the Carter administration. gt Exactly 16 years ago Thursday President Bush signed Proclamation 7463 giving himself sweeping powers to mobilize the military in the days following terrorist attacks that crashed planes into the World Trade Center the Pentagon and a Pennsylvania field. It allowed him to call up National Guard and Reserve troops hire and fire military officers and bypass limits on the numbers of generals that could serve. gt Presidents Bush and Obama renewed that emergency each year. And on Wednesday Trump published a now routine notice in the Federal Register extending the emergency for the 16th time explaining simply that the terrorist threat continues. gt usatoday.com
My family of 3 growing up owned about 30 guns. 28 of them have never seen daylight in 30 years. 99. 9999999 of gun owners are responsible. There are already a lot of restrictive gun laws that arent enforced. Most mass shooters arent acquiring their guns legally anyways. We should try enforcing the laws we already have before trying new ones. I have a clean record and I have a hard time buying a gun. It always blows my mind how all these crazy felons and mental cases get them so easily. There are already a lot of laws in place that infringe on our rights they just arent enforced. The answer is not to take away our gun rights though and there is nothing wrong with having more guns than people. Most of those guns are owned by collectors and enthusiasts. It's a much smaller percentage of ths population that's actually armed and that's scary for all of us. I want you to be armed and defend yourself in a time of need. Especially in your own home. It's good for all of us.
Plan B violates the Constitution and is thus illegal. This is true no matter what the end justification is.
100 million dead and counting
As long at it's cat shit. They deserve 2nd hand Fancy Feast.
Unemployment numbers economy all that crap is kinda irrelevant right now...havent they learned yet that trying to bash Trump for shit that has nothing to do with him or his administration never works When all this is over with and the economy explodes again then what Trump finally got out of the way so the economy could breathe again Morons...every damn one of them
The night is still young...
Oooh an old fort knox misdirection.. haha
r NixonDidNothingWrong
I'm not saying term limits are a bad idea in fact it's likely a great idea. The problem is that if you open up the constitution to make a change it may not end with just one.
Sic semper tyrannus
Did you not notice when you were growing up that most of your Boomer peers are really really really fucking stupid This was always the inevitable conclusion of your generation of idiots and assholes being in charge of anything. It's not surprising to the rest of us.
Hey they have to remember how many steps to take before pausing and how many seconds to pause It's VERY rigorous for the kind of person who had no prospects in life other than enlisting
Ignoramus I can quibble personhood. A fetus is not a person with the rights thereof. It is not legally a human in my view. It s not an intelligence thing it s a worthy debate. There is no IQ answer. It is NOT clearly evil that is why it s a debatable question. What it definitely is not is a scientific fact that we ought to give rights to non persons.
I've yet to meet or hear a leftist who has downplayed this crisis or has had a hopefull outlook.
Another face palm was definitely warranted when they mentioned Dr. Oz.
There question I asked had absolutely nothing to do with Democrats or Republicans It was a simple ask of why voters wouldn't have voter ids
That should be a Universal measurement of time.
I work in a high risk of infection profession so I understand all the precautions. And I'm not inclined to believe any entity has the power to pull this off especially since the Democrats have fucked up every other attempt to discredit Trump as a hoax. Buuut if I'm gonna lose my livelihood I would like to come out of it knowing we all made a worthy sacrifice.
Biden isn't rich enough to pay 130k.
Why would you say that It's easy to remove both if people just fucking get up and vote. There's no decision like that to make.
You have taken that horribly out of context
It d be the hunger games.
gt Hyper American vocabulary Yes. The constitution. This doesn't affect my point at all. gt 10 million people have filed for unemployment in the last 2 weeks. This is a very American issue and has nothing to do with a stay at home order. gt The US is incurring more massive debt on the back of absolutely nothing bad debt that nobody will want to buy. We are running headlong into massive inflation. Absolutely nothing This is probably why America is the only developed country struggling with slowing down infection rate. gt Inmates are being released from Jail. Jails are no longer accepting booking for anything other than the most heinous felonies. Because America see's inmates as a source of income everyone dying will affect profits. gt I wish it was as simple as just stopping unnecessary social interaction This comment was obviously aimed at the people moaning about losing their liberty not a comment on every issue America has to deal with surrounding the virus nor their woeful attempt and lack of attempts at dealing with it.
Holy shit there s still some of you in this sub alive Cowards. Real believers would have succumb if only to prove their faith.
Lol I used to work in the honor guard. When there aren t people watching their just standing beside it in their camis with a rifle. No pimp and circumstance just chillin
Um did you just call me a peon If so eat a dick. If not idk how to respond to your response
Bingo back in the 1700s everyone had a slave and you weren't hassled for it. Nowadays between overencroaching government and socially manipulated idiots you're looked at like some sort of monster for having a slave. For God's sake it's a part of our cultural heritage.
Jared Kushner is like a cheesy Dr. No wanna be.
I would come in a second but I doubt your country would take me and my family. It sucks because this country is failing all of us.
Phew.
Respectfully do not agree. Personally on a side note states should be handling this better than most are
F5iday
Why do people comment on articles they didn't even bother to read
I totally get it bro. I'm just not ok with the fact that we are giving away water like it's unlimited. Managing and preserving natural resources should be planned over long term concerns not any kind of economic boost with short life span.
Thats whats fucking happening G.
If someone willing posts that why can't you unhide the name
What the fuck are you talking about Have you ever heard of gerrymandering Right now we are living in a country where the minority of people are making the rules. From the house to the Senate and on to the fucking White house the majority of voices are being ignored in favor of the minority. Trump just said a couple days ago that if voting were easier then Republicans would never be elected again. That's because they know that most people are against them and that's why they employ gerrymandering and voter suppression tactics at every level of our government. You sir are full of shit.
To keep you from dying I m gonna have to kill you
Calling the last scenario a stretch would be an understatement
We had a doc call in a total of 240 tablets several weeks ago as a preventative measure. He called them in from home and they were for his family of 6. We did not fill them for the same reasons we have regular patients that need it monthly. Approximately 2 days later OH dropped the hammer on that. Lol.
I legitimately hope that Trump voters start feeling shame at some point in their worthless fucking lives because just once before they die I d like them to feel what we ve had to feel ever since that orange bastard was elected.
So we are definitely being brigaded judging by the upvotes and downvotes here. The unborn child has a right to life. It is not a right to murder.
This is some dumb shit. It s been debunked a million times.
what about it
Yuppp. I'll try to take my kids and leave honestly. I'm terrified of what the grow up in and to. Though idk any better countries that would want to take us
It doesn t work.
No. That's not what happened. prageru.com nytimes.com r 0 powerlineblog.com amgreatness.com nationalreview.com
Witch Hunt Keeps Finding Witches film at 11.
gt it s the classic liberal way. These people are neoliberals.
I tell Biden Stop the Pettiness' and support Medicare for All.
So serious question.... Which is worse That or coercing ones own biological daughter into fucking... And getting plastic surgery... for her inheritance
Haven't found a city or state sub yet that hasn't been politics lite.
Isn t it manslaughter instead of murder if there is no intent
That would be ideal wouldn't it That's what I'm doing anyways. But what about all those who are bragging about still going to parties and coughing on stuff in supermarkets These laws aren't made to suppress your rights any more than laws against other crimes. If going out to foolish and unnecessary events presents a real danger to others then it infringes on other peoples' rights which is in many ways a basis for many of the laws that we live with every day. It's like following traffic laws. Do you get mad at the government for telling you how fast to drive Or do you appreciate getting to work in one piece every day I appreciate not getting sick and not losing my family members to a horrible respiratory illness so I want my government to tell those selfish fools to stay inside or punish them if they don't Not forever of course there should be an end tentatively planned.
What exactly do we need from Canada Any country that would deny us what we need would do so without us doing it first. We ve mostly relied on China and they already took our shit.
I would help them...
Thanks for the info. I guess we think alike
Social media is the great amplifier it can help spread knowledge but it also helps spread the stupid.
Yes we all must tithe to the church of globalism. s Why didn't I think this virus would bring out the worst ideas possible
2. 5 3 million people die every year in the United States. Comparing it to 9 11 without actually understanding why 9 11 was bad is extremely ignorant. It's like when Bernie went around claiming 9 11 X 10 people would die from repealing Obamacare. It shows a profound stupidity.
In a word China.
gt Do you not understand that there is no reasonable way to map the consequences of these actions Doesn't matter. gt No one is holding a gun to your head or threatening to cage you. Yes they are. They're discussing mandatory stay at home orders. That's exactly what's being discussed. gt They are telling you to sit on your couch for a couple months. As long as it's just a recommendation and a suggestion that's perfectly fine. The problem is that they've forced businesses to close and destroyed the livelihoods of millions of people. gt Get some perspective. Here's some perspective. This sickness is 100 preventable for 100 of the people. Even if it weren't it kills a tiny percentage of people who are diagnosed with it. A very small percentage who get sick are officially diagnosed with it. Of those who are officially diagnosed a very small percentage die. We're destroying the livelihoods of over a hundred million people for this very small percentage. Those people who aren't vulnerable should be able to continue their lives without being forced into destroying them.
2020 Does this shape identify as a rectangle
The moment anyone compares us to China to show how much better their country is than ours on anything not just this virus they lose any credibility they have.
Socialism doesn t belong in this earth
Every Republican voting old person in a care facility should go to bed shaking anf and in fear for their very lives at the shitheads they put in power. Death is going to burn through their demographic. Hope they get a moment to realize that they did this to themselves. Gotta keep those poors and darkies down right Boss Hogg
So here is the way I'm understanding it and I think a lot of people aren't understanding the situation properly. It's still complete bullshit but not quite as much bullshit as it first sounds. FEMA is paying supplying for the shipping for these supplies probably because these businesses can not get things shipped in currently due to the massive disruption in shipping flights currently. The goods being shipped belong to the businesses FEMA is not buying them the US governemnt isn't buying them and then reselling to private companies. Just helping to get them in to the country. They then are sold normally to the highest bidder. Now why is it bullshit Because this is obviously only in the best interest of the businesses and not the States people who need these goods. The federal government is saying the reason why they have the businesses deal with the goods is because they have the distribution chains already set up which okay yeah that kind of makes sense except why is the federal government not just buying the supplies from the businesses and having the supplies shipped through the businesses to where they are most needed. After all I'm pretty damn sure the US government is able to be contacted by governors who can clearly lay out what supplies they need. Instead they are going the cheapest shittiest route we foot the bill for the shipping for the goods then states are forced to bid for the necessary equipment. This is only looking out for businesses and not the citizens the government literally doesn't care if states can't get access to supplies that they need. They're being fucking cheapskates over peoples lives here all the burden is being placed on the States.
This letter should be hanging in the Smithsonian and immortalized for all time. Right next to Chuckie's photo showing his appalled face.
gt All medications need to follow a path of testing and retesting I honestly disagree in this environment. This thing is moving rapidly and we should be throwing shit at the wall until it sticks. Not spend months doing clinical trials while people die.
Every generation learns more than the previous one this is common knowledge
I might be misreading your comment but we absolutely have done as poor a job as the Australia disembarkment. In fact we did just that. We had hundreds of people return to the US after the travel ban where they had to wait more than six hours to pass through customs at multiple airports because no one beefed up homeland security s staffing ahead of time. So people with no protective gear got off planes with active cases and stood around with hundreds of people. theintercept.com We had cruise ships unloading in Miami after passengers on those ships had symptoms of COVID with no screenings of the passengers. miamiherald.com We had De Blasio tell people schools should remain open and people should stay home only if they didn t feel well even though he knew by then that most cases were asymptomatic for up to several weeks but still contagious. usnews.com We have multiple state governments refusing to pass stay at home orders despite evidence from epidemiologists that they re vital to slow the spread. Alabama started on April 3. Alaska Arizona March 30. Florida only extended to the whole state days ago. They did nothing to keep people from being on crowded beaches during spring break. Georgia s order took effect today. Iowa has not ordered any mandated stay at home. Kansas the 28th. Mississippi April 1. Nevada changed it to an order April 1. North Dakota has no mandate. Oklahoma only covers the elderly. South Carolina has no mandate. South Dakota does not have any mandate. Tennessee has recommendations but not mandate. Texas left it to municipal governments until March 31. Wyoming says it won t issue any orders. All of those are weeks later than other states. This haphazard approach has had the effect of allowing the virus to spread and now that people have been continuing to asymptomatically transmit the virus it will be harder to contain.
No shit.
I wish more reporters were like her.
South Korea is amazing. Top level stuff.
Why don't you just convince them to take the fish bowl cleaner miracle cure
All the more reason to bring manufacturing back home.
I thought only China suppresses bad news though
Well the option might come the execution fairness though...
gt If you spent less time on your ridiculous impeachment hoax which went haplessly on forever and ended up going nowhere except increasing my poll numbers and instead focused on helping the people of New York then New York would not have been so completely unprepared for the invisible enemy. No wonder AOC and others are thinking about running against you in the primary. If they did they would likely win. The madman
Thanks. I know that there are still mostly decent folks out there. I'm just very concerned at the tone of social media right now. I had my aunt who is about 70 visit me this fall and she said she has a ball cap that's red...it has the name of a beach or something on it and one day some guy scowled at her and started to stride up to her and then when he got close enough he realized that it was just a red cap and not a MAGA hat and he said... oooooh... and then sort of backed off and it really scared her. She didn't even think about it when she put her red cap on. And shit like that really CONCERNS me because even if it was a MAGA hat...she s a 70 year old great grandma and a wonderfully sweet person...
Gives them someone to hate by turning her into a socialist boogeyman. I have tons of apolitical friends who think she s an idiot and use her as an example for how Dems go too far or whatever. I always have the same response why do you know the name of a congresswoman from New York Do you even know who your congressperson is
And DOJ just filed a 485 count indictment Carole Baskin also known as That Bitch Carole Baskin. She was indicted for murder in the first degree as well as improper use of sardine oil among the extensive charges.
exactly. the good always underestimate political and even basic evil. i know i did until trump.
Trudeau raised the Carbon Tax on Canadians by 50 during the crisis. news.bloombergtax.com
gt PMCs Preventative maintenance checks
Uncooked spaghetti is more useful than that cunt
Fox News is basically unwatchable until 8pm. Every second of coverage is devoted to NY.
A really bad clusterfuck would be Clusterfuck 23 The first three were pretty good.
Gonna be Whitmer probably
Human life is valuable because of freedom. if you take away freedom like taking away the right to abortion what s the purpose of life just because you ban abortion doesn t mean it won t stop happening. women will still keep doing it it ll just become more dangerous.
they are the all around test i say hey do you know anybody with corona virus and you say... no. cool cause you know me mitch hedberg
Yeah...you have no idea what you re talking about. You don t make commanding O 6 of an aircraft carrier without knowing how to follow chain of command.
I was unaware of these disagreements. I no longer associate with hardly anyone I ve ever known who is a republican. They ve either died family or turned into giant dicks friends What kind of fissures are there
Every time he says a reporter is nasty you can bet the reporter is a person of color. Every time.
Ya you and everyone else eventually will be waiting for weeks for online deliveries. Oh that was a typo. Get a new job That's the funny thing you'll probably increase your chance of dying by avoiding health care. But yes you'll need stitches need your appendix taken out get an infection. Something will require medical treatment. Maybe you'll want to buy a house or something else that requires a bank visit. I hear you lots of people have irrational fears.
The Old Guard has guarded the tomb minute of every day since April 6 1948
I don't agree that immigration control is a restriction on basic human rights. Just like it's not a violation of freedom of movement that I don't want to let anyone into my home. UN says gt Article 13 of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights asserts that gt a citizen of a state in which that citizen is present has the liberty to travel reside in and or work in any part of the state where one pleases within the limits of respect for the liberty and rights of others and that a citizen also has the right to leave any country including his or her own and to return to his or her country at any time.
Cheers mate you and I think alike s
WHY is it that people assume just because you fundamentally disagree with something that you must be absolutely rebelling against it I'm happy to voluntarily self isolate. It's for the good of everyone. However I do not believe the government should have the ability to use violence or levy fines against people who continue to practice their Constitutional rights of freedom of assembly freedom of religion etc. If you can't comprehend the difference between those two things well perhaps you should slap your momma for not educating you properly. And I'm in my 30's thanks. My mother left the picture 15 years ago.
The 1 still definitely have a lot of voting power
Oh Lordy that last paragraph is some of the clumsiest prose I've ever read in an official document. I used to correct shitty writing like that for a living and it's immediately obvious that it was cobbled together in ten minutes by somebody who doesn't English so good. They might as well have just written Stockpiled products are products that have been stockpiled in a stockpile. Which is like a room somewhere.
This is why the world hates us
they are directly related. that's my point. adding anything above the line directly kicks other things below the line.
Murdered
I don't believe you.
When people have no good reply they just say you're toxic
Not here to argue just to learn. I was just originally contesting the notion that illegals dont pay taxes. They do From all the info I ve seen they re likely a net drain overall but it we lose far more money trying to enforce immigration laws. I think we need a better system to streamline immigration while also vetting properly. There are a lot of people who want to be here legally that get caught up on the system. And immigrants in general are very beneficial to our economy. That s just my take on it. If you have access to anymore studies or articles that contradict my view please feel free to share
A county in Alabama recurved a bunch of masks that were rotten
Please explain how our healthcare system now is killing people.
No law is a suicide pact.
It's not unusual in general. It's just done sooo much by Trump it's par for the course
looks at modern genetics and the Big Bang theory Yes yes. Those Catholics and their shuffles deck hatred of science.
Does a good picture of Pelosi exist
gt But what about all those who are bragging about still going to parties and coughing on stuff in supermarkets Let them. People are perfectly capable of protecting themselves from this by using basic principles that literally everybody knows now. gt These laws aren't made to suppress your rights any more than laws against other crimes. It's not a crime to exercise your RIGHTS. ANY laws or actions by the government that do so are UNCONSTITUTIONAL. FFS you can say the same thing about gun laws.
What the people who wrote this article that amounts to an opinion puff piece that even attempts to imply that the wife of the man that died from this stuff killed him to spite Trump Yeah it's surprising they call themselves journalists and that idiots like you lap this shit up. Absolutely shocking.
Nah the Baroness is Ivanka.
That's true. I was only replying to the Trump also said today he won't allow mail in ballots comment. He has no authority to do that. If states choose to allow mail in ballots he cannot stop them.
He s just an asshole.
It's because we have a complicit Senate. They could stop him and save the country right now. All they'd need to do is reach out to the House whip up some fresh Articles of Impeachment and agree to his removal. They could do it now. Hell they could fast track it and have it done before noon tomorrow. But they won't Because the problem is bigger than the presidency. The problem is that the Senate is controlled by the third of the country that actively wants a dictator.
and we're the racists for whatever reason they pull out of the air. I know my place.
Well the history books right now describe the Democrat party as the party of KKK Jim Crow and segregation clearly that doesn t matter.
r LGBDropTheT
Yeah its those people who read thst are misinformed.. those people who literally make shit up and spread it as fact are off the hook. Glad you're leaving and can now go out your energy back into your personal projects'
Unborn babies cheer
Nah actually you make a fair point but I think she was more talking about the pre genocide hitler That's not what she said though so your argument stands and I apologise for being a dense fool
so what exactly gonna happen when u can carry arms in a case where government dont give up the power of crisis time Whats your response to that my man and how is carrying is gonna change that celebrate please
How about the GD POTUS steps up takes some responsibility and runs something important
He actually said something like that. I'm the most humble guy I know. No one's more humble than me.
Which doesn't disprove my point. You're welcome for my doing the legwork you asked of me which is clearly neither appreciated or needed btw.
well he was appointed by Trump... that usually comes with the same person having the ability to remove you
In October it's going to be Biden's idea to use this drug
This person is young with no real world experience. I'm cutting them some slack for being ignorant to real world realities.
I literally just got a cold shiver because of that. Thanks
Not only will they not receive help the left media will continue to supply them with half truths that rile them up even further.
Even with the amount of money we send them I doubt Trump has that amount of influence.
A big pharma with a well established clinical infrastructure would license this from the University IF the pre clin data is strong. It would fly through in comparison to typical drug development timelines
It's more of a memorial to all soldiers who went MIA and were never found presumed dead. So people who cannot receive a proper burial.
lol ok. Glad it's a loan is enough for you to believe the thiefs.
Erm yeah that's still a thousand times better
I know she is dumb but this is like Gwyneth Paltrow level of clueless.
Well tbf caves don't really need air conditioning they're naturally cool. This is how we stored food for most of human history.
Congrats 3M you now have one less American that will buy your products. I hope your execs are arrested for refusing a lawful order or feel free to move overseas and out of the protection that the US provides.
If there is anyone left there when this is over...
Except there is doubt about that. If I recover from COVID while eating ice cream twice a day the ice cream hasn't helped me. There's a reason why medical studies are randomized controlled and double blind because that's how you ascertain a causal link. People saying I took hydroxichloroquine and it helped me means exactly nothing because those people don't actually know what helped them.
Except mostly everyone is stuck home.
I love dr Fauci and hate fandf...I didn't hear a quote we don't operate on how you feel did I miss it in the clip
Much of what was in the dossier has been directly corroborated.
No but in simpler terms. They had a chance when assigning budget dollars to allocate money to their healthcare programs and buy ventilators instead of allocating that money to the schools and provide funding for illegal immigrants for college. Yes it is more difficult to move from one bucket to the other but they made the conscious choice to put it in that bucket in the first place.
gt Ah great another person who doesn t understand exponential growth. Ah great another irrelevant and pedantic straw man. gt saying that it s much more contagious is absolutely correct Technically correct but still useless. Much is not a technical measurement. It doesn't necessarily mean exponentially more It's a vague term. My intial point still stands. It's closer to the flu than a many other diseases which is why I'm liking to actual charts with data rather than but acktuelly I used vague words so neener neener That you've brought to the table. Getting into how exponential growth works doesn't change that as others have have the same logic applied measels or chickenpox for example are exponentially more transmittable than Covid. Ergo Covid maintains it's place on the lower end of the spectrum at being closer to the flu. My point from the original post Covid is on the lower end of the spectrum in mortality rates and R0 rates in comparison to the contageous diseases that really imprint on people. In other words People at large aren't as concerned with it as they could be. I'm being descriptive of the reality. Your little exercise in diversion doesn't change that. I'm not saying people should be concerned with it at X Y or Z level. This is the argument that you people are putting forth how concerned people should be. It's almost like you''re extremely offended that I'm not parroting what you're saying verbatim. You're not giving this the Politically Correct spin You guys sound like a bunch of agitated activists with activated almonds that we hear so much from on the left. Not so much concerned with accurate descriptions or letting someone have a discussion about the psychology sociology behind people's perspectives but trying to be authoritative with how people should feel. I find it amusing that after so many posts and explanation people are still attempting to argue against things I didn't say or imply. Bunch of reactionary opportunists that feel desperate need to be Correct on the Internet TM without the ability to even find the appropriate target for their desired argument...Maybe breathing into a paper bag would help some of you people or have a seat on your fainting couch and wait for the spell to pass. Hell get out the vibrator and self treat your hysteria if that's what it's going to take to untwist your panties. At that have a great weekend guys. Try to relax and have some fun with all safety precautions of course instead of crushing your pearls.
Wtf is a trump Is that that guy still trying to be president No one cares what he says anymore.
That's funny. more informed than any of these hacks.'
Sports.
He never got past infrastructure week
What a selfish asshole Hope he s prosecuted for hoarding.
Americans do that bud. You can t just say the dems only so it because they re voting for people who aren t white. Lol
Exceptionally stupid.
I've never flown.
Will IS
laughs in infrastructure week.
Why would you hate him He's only robbing the country blind while taking a shit on every law he sees. s
If this simulation doesn't crash by then sure. Fuck whoever programmed this existence.
That is his new secret plan fewer dead people unbelievable market get involved with models. Why the hell didn't I think of that
gt If something happens on the ship no matter whose fault the commander will likely be relieved of duty. Especially if they go outside of the chain of command through insecure lines and intentionally bringing in a bunch of people who had no reason to be privy to the ship's state of readiness.
Link me yo
He seems to be doing pretty well without money or campaigning.
Time for trump to use his magic scissors and cut that red tape.
Hey they re getting what they voted for. Hope they enjoy it.
It was actually talked about in The West Wing a bit and it's from 1999.
Dumber than a bag of rocks...
Restaurants have insane food costs. They make little margins off the food. Then once you apply the cost of the labor to actually cook that food serve it it gets even smaller.
In the absence of evidence I give people the benefit of the doubt. And while I haven't watched the entire video he doesn't even sound like he has a sore throat or that he is coughing at all does he at some point in the video Does he mention it was confirmed by a test or is he just assuming it is COVID 19. Regardless of whether he is actually sick or not no one wishes Fredo any ill.
What do they test for No idea. Ok sounds legit to me.
You re going to want a super soaker. For a first time buyer I d recommend a xp100 it s a bit smaller than the soakzooka but has more balance and is easier to fire. For Ammo I prefer Clorox but it s a bit costly and I wouldn t use it at the range an off name brand would work well for that.
With a valid work visa you get a TIN irs.gov If you are here illegally you either find someone to pay you under the table or you steal a SSN from someone else.
titanium balled
Ok so when people start starving because 1200 in 2 months isn't going to get most through. I can't even contact unemployment here. Site is down and phones are busy. What happens then It won't be pretty
And yet conservatives are the literal nazis right
When you mentioned R I got painful flashbacks of my dissertation. I still don t know how to use it properly.
The irony is strong in this comment.
Yeah and if he does nothing and none of them go to prison what We say ah well at least they're not president anymore Man that's a shitty thing to swallow. Biden and Obama let the bankers go Scott free I have zero faith that they'll prosecute anyone in this fuckin cartel.
Yeah. So I guess I can't see a doctor for anything less than a dire emergency but I can get an abortion. Well I guess we don't want to infringe on anyone's rights now do we S
Nope. Just see my reply above. Simple mistake. Replied to the wrong comment.just here for respectful discord
You sound like a person that believes statewide offices are gerrymanderd. The left can lead the way if it doesn't like gerrymandering and get rid of it from left wing politics like getting rid of super delegates getting to decide who gets the Dems presidential nomination. But last I saw they like it as much as the right.
Damn nice research. Seems pretty simple to me that others infringing in my right to life is reason enough for government to step in.
Free money good one
People who provide IDs shouldn't be allowed to decide what's required to vote.
Agreed but there s illegals that ve grown up here. I m not saying border junkies that just crossed illegally deserve it but illegal is illegal...
Ayy based Japan
The GOP is rotten to the core and is perhaps the most dangerous organization in the world today. It must be thoroughly broken up if we are ever to move forward.
youtu.be
We did it's called get sick and die.
Every week is a new watergate
I think there are other manufacturing location options other than just China or just US
Takes a real incompetent little shit to keep picking fights with one of our main allies
I knew a guy in law school who threw away his roommates absentee ballot because he knew he was going to vote for Trump. That kid is now In law school. Mail in voting is a bad idea This stuff will absolutely happen.
Only about half of us are real racist pricks. And even some of the racist pricks can be nice occasionally.
amp.cnn.com
Least CA just fixed those.
Perhaps an un diagnosed brain aneurysm.
Of course he dies...also wants EVERY viter to have a photo ID...betters his chances in Nov
I didn't just FUCK the prom queen I married her.
Can you link it
Fuck China
Why does this guy I keep talking shit at think he has the right to talk shit back at me' Chuck Scumer probably.
Have fun going back to irrelevance after your 5 years of attention then.
gt I don't think you understand I think he does. He did say that Trump would bring us to ruin and destroy the country. He's trying to make a point in a way that I don't quite get but I think he understands.
Seems like he's backed off this narrative which is great. I thought it would work.
The Russians elected them for us.
gt America is a confusing outlier when we only look at the actual developed world in terms of health care. For such a rich country it's quite odd that you approaching healthcare in the way that you are especially considering the amount of taxes you pay on average. Thanks Canadian for explaining American conservatism to the rest of us. There is personal responsibility for people to not behave like idiots. This does not mean the government should be using force to keep people in their homes. Communicable diseases have always existed and will always exist. This does not give gov'ts the right to stop people from living their lives. If people are willing to take a risk it's just that. Not to mention that this disease does not effect all equally why then should the solution be applied equally
You mean Elizabeth Holmes.
She's clueless. Bordering on batshit crazy.
Active duty here. Never once have I voted for a Republican and I never will. Progressive till I die. Bernie isn t left liberal enough for my tastes but he s the only option I have.
Changing the website does not change the law that governs DHHS. Per 42 USC 247d 6d a 3 J gt The Secretary shall provide assistance including technical assistance to maintain and improve State and local public health preparedness capabilities to distribute and dispense medical countermeasures and products from the stockpile as appropriate. uscode.house.gov req granuleid USC prelim title42 section247d 6b amp num 0 amp edition prelim Two things 1. It specifically addresses that the stockpile s medical supplies are meant for the States. 2. This means the current Assistant Secretary for Preparedness and Response ASPR of the Department of Health and Human Services has the obligation to support States regardless of what an advisor Trump s SIL Kushner says or how a website tries to phrase it.
The real question is would Americans be willing to pay more for electronics and other China produced goods to reduce our dependence on China Or do people think being hard on China sounds nice but paying more for a new tv is out of the question I suspect it's the latter.
It's not I was just stating that they aren't the best places to live. Chill.
There are people who don't have hospitals. They have clinics. Native American people are suffering on reservations just as other Americans are. Reservations. Think about the different connotations of that word.
That number seems familiar so you might be correct. shrug It's still far below the bar of anything I'd call a democracy.
I recently discovered that you guys have private hospitals. I didn't know that. None of our hospitals are private. Totally different system. We also have no proivate banks or prisons.
Isn t the GOP s thing states are supposed to have the power not the federal government
gt Are you really going to sit here and say that you think the government or media should never mention any possible treatments that look like they could be promising Until they've been tested No. That's what tests are for. Once the tests are done you can say test of X under Y conditions show Z result' Until then you're doing no better than arguing try bloodletting. It's tradition look at the people we tried it on who are still alive
I'd echo your sentiment. I've known 3 or so illegal Mexicans in my life and they all worked under someone else's SSN. I have no idea what the other person is doing but it's usually some cousin or nibling born here presumably not working and waiting to collect those sweet Social Security benefits from their taxpaying relative who will get none. My friends in service type industries note that the illegals who work all do so with someone else's SSN. They're all hired the legitimate way and their taxes are taken out of their paychecks automatically. Owners all know this and turn a blind eye. Illegals tend to work a lot harder than their citizen children of legal working age anyway.
With my SSN number numbskull.
The current USA political landscape is fucked and at the wrong time... Mother earth doesn't wait on us to install the right leaders. That is why it is so important to vote and do your due diligence regarding politics.
Or rural areas when this hits later so they can maintain their voting base.
I tried just now can t go back further than 3 29
So if the usa did do bad in our preparation why do we only have 18 deaths per 1 million people versus the very high numbers we see across Europe. I personally don't give two fucks how many people get it. I worry about the deaths. You would think that the more people infected means more death. Italy has 100 000 less cases than the USA but twice the deaths. And the USA is the country botching this. Ok.
Capybara fucking
The triggered are upset because not everyone is doing what the government says concerning a virus that is serious but not to this extent. You cannot control 300 plus million people. In one foul swoop we added 10 to our national deficit 20 30 of small businesses are likely to file bankruptcy and all to slow the peak possibly save lives which may not even happen if freaking prisoners are exposed. I feel like we forgot to ask the question at what cost
I wonder if they're getting paid they seem so flat and one sided
Some of these comments are in poor taste. Have a bit of decency please
Which is why the stimulus packages are necessary and why you see countries around the world doing the same thing. Citizens are suffering through an event that they have little control over the government needs to help them through that. There is not a way to help the economy through a pandemic other than supporting the working people. You don t have an economy without workers and you definitely lose workers if you don t take a virus seriously. This country has survived many things. If you start trying to sacrifice people s lives to save the economy you ve got the wrong priorities. The economy is here because of the people not the other way around.
How
Didn t say India wasn t a flawed democracy
Been to Arlington and the unknown soldiers tomb it s an amazing story and can really change one s perspective much respect
Granted
Link to np.reddit com r whatever as the preferred method to limit brigading.
Read Kushner Inc. They're really worse then you think
His donations doesn't go to him anymore they go to people in need during the crisis.
Well he s American now
How fuct do you have to be to upset a Canadian God damn it if trump fucks our relation with Canada that will really be a disaster. Just imagine them stopping letting americans across the border we will be trapped in this country run by an orange skidmark..
Your spelling hurts my eyes more than your comment hurts my feelings.
and rightfully so. he is killing people by not allowing access to masks. hospitals and first responders are running out of masks and forced to reuse masks. people are extremely shitty and when they are doing things like this for greed the government needs to step in and stop it. These people should not only have their private property confiscated but should be imprisoned for a long time for manslaughter. amp x200B I am a first responder and i have to reuse ONE mask because we do not have enough yet these people hoard nearly one million of them to sell for a profit in times of emergencies.
How are you blaming the democrats for creating the crisis
Racist you already lost the argument. That s BS and you know it. The rest of this argument is null right there. And I m sure you mean figuratively not literally.
She's likely aiming being groomed by democrats for much higher office. Keeping her name in the news creates like a brand recognition so voters will recognize her on election day.
Will I still follow if I missed World War 3A 3L
Dr. Oz's basically Ben Carson if you exchange stupidity for malicious greed.
Who
gt Health experts have been warning about asymptomatic spread for months at this point. Warning yes having the data to back it up no. When leading a nation you have to decide between destroying people economically over what might be a false alarm or believing the numbers the WHO was telling us. East Asain nations knew the WHO was full of shit because they could see China's fingers up their asses telling them what to say. Western Nations unfortunately believed the UN the WHO and China because why would they lie China lied because China's the proverbial scorpion on the frog back crossing the river and it turns out the west is the overly trusting frog.
lt insert the usual but he hires the best people thing here gt
Let's make it 4000 comrade.
We don't endorse his actions and apologize on his behalf.
gt policy cues from a 2000 year old work of fiction. The Constitution.. lol
I imagine it'll suppress urban turnout which I guess will benefit Republicans.
Except some of us have to work as essential workers with people attending these rallies. They become bio weapons to the rest of us not just themselves.
Everyone should know that all Coronavirus related articles published by The Washington Post and The New York Times can be read free by everyone
Yes. That whole narrative needs to stop. When nobody is allowed to challenge you that gets to your head and eventually you use it to your advantage which she s done. She can play the role of voice for young minority women and they eat it up like dessert cake and she knows they do.
Right now I doubt that many soldiers out there would be willing to venture anywhere near Coronavirus hotbeds whether the president ordered it or not.
Maybe he knew already but it s was easier to ridicule him.
Spoiler alert they won't
You'll have to go out to get food eventually. Eventually you'll have to go to work beta new job go to the emergency room go to the doctors office go to a bank. This virus simply won't die off. That's what makes it so transmittable
Well good. The numbers we've been hearing are horrendous and if all the projections end up being way too high by the end of this thing i'll be falling on my knees and thanking the Lord. And then forever pointing to these numbers in any discussion on climate change
Capitalism should work for everyone its not crazy to set a minimum standard of wages conditions healthcare for US citizens while maintaining capitalism. Business owners and entrepreneurs should of course be able to amass wealth and become wealthy off their hard work but we see more and more that they don't care about the well being of their workers or their country. We actually see the opposite leaders and billionaires betting against the well being of average people and their economy while asking for bailouts its ridiculous. Right now we are seeing capitalism fail on such a huge scale in the US that hopefully people are able to see. I am positive Trump botched the response to coronavirus but I doubt it would have been much better under a different administration with the current healthcare system in place.
I love how there's a new head of this task force every week. Keep throwing your shitty friends at the wall Donnie something's gotta stick right
Easy. More people from low socio economic backgrounds will vote who typically are more likely to vote democrat
Well sports were canceled before anyway.
Georgia.
lol
The homeless are finally getting the housing they needed.
The means testing is not right. They send you a check in the mail if you didn't file your taxes recently and enter in a direct deposit account. You'll get your check just later. And it isn't going to come out of your tax return next year.
When the Soviet Union fell the military largely refused to attack civilians. There's a decent chance the U.S military will have to decide who to back in November 2020 and or January 20201.
Someone told the truth and Trump didn't like it. Ala Reddit. that's a ban. If you want to speak the truth you need to run it by the Trump Truthiness Squad first. They will then decide what it true for you and let the president decide if he wants it to be true.
The problem I see is what happens when the state steals these ventilators redistributes them to NYC and the need them increases in upstate New York Do you think NYC will happily return the stolen property No they will hide behind their need and give apologies to everyone else. This is New York liberalism with it's fangs bared. Skip past trying to buy new ventilators make deals with other hospitals to transfer patients or anything else and jump straight to sending state military to steal what you want. I sincerely hope upstate hospitals file immediate lawsuits against the state to block this or military units roll up to find hospital ventilators missing in a strange boating accident.
Like when bernie bros quote about yelling fire in a movie theater about hate speech. That quote was about not letting socialists spread their pamplets.
Your birthday doesn't unite the country. The fact that pride month is the same month as your birthday is a problem for you suggests you're really looking for absolutely anything to be upset by. Are you sure you're an adult
Are ventilators universal I mean I work with medical imaging and there s a big difference between Siemens GE toshiba and Philips machines. I understand that ventilators are less complex but I still
no they dont they arent voting and that is the only way to change the system young people dont care
It's a symbol of those still MIA.
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r atheism Not only are American Christians oppressed they also brought humanity out of the Stone Age. reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
It's okay hopefully at some point in toucan sam's life he she will realize that people are people despite where they're born. It's who they are that makes them better or worse than others. LMAO US or bust.
That s odd. I haven t met anyone over an O3 that thinks Trump is fit to order a dinner much less service members.
That would require Trump to acknowledge somebody knows more about something than him. There is a zero percent chance of that happening.
citation needed
That's just Trump speak. Best people' a lot of smart people' many people' some are saying' Vague and at this point completely devoid of comfort. There is no real competence behind those pimped out phrases.
All reasonable points. The fact that we do not understand the true virulence of the condition is a reason to study this in depth. But I defer to the infectious disease experts who have spent years studying this for recommendations. Its nice to think we know whats going on in such a complex topic but when the experts suggest an approach I give more merit to that. I dont assume they ve ignored the data you present. I anticipate the fear is the very real possibility that even with a low death rate there is a slightly higher overall hospitalization rate. If a large population gets infected even though the vast majority remain unaffected a significant minority will still require hospital services. I believe the narrative by the experts is that we are not equipped to handle the volume.
What a horrible thing to even say. My God
Wasn't that where he said the doctors and nurses came out and applauded him when he showed up or some shit
That s what a leader sounds like BTW. Getting shit to people instead of playing stupid games and politics.
Oh how the totes have tabled
Proof motherfucker
Or maybe the nature of this beast is that it's a week ahead of us and it's kind of pathetic how we seem to be reacting to the situation as if it's happening to us today. Wasn't it like a week ago that pence was saying to everybody on national TV that we were on day 6 of 15 Don't blame people for reacting to poor planning. We had months to prepare for this and you know it.
I wouldn't be too sure his base is still behind him.
I don't know any at this point with that attitude. We maybe except for Bett Midler
Yeah..and we can potentially infect people who won't be fine Like my parents and in laws Such a stupid attitude to take for something like this
If you want to raise wages you're in the wrong section. The migrant workers work for low wages with a shit eating grin. We need to do the fucking same. The left has been fighting to raise the minimum wage to just 15 for years and has been blocked by likes of McConell because government shouldn't force businesses I don't want to consider myself a leftist but we need to stop caring for large businesses. Everyone is supposed to have a rainy day fund but the big businesses are the first ones to get bailed out by the damn government every time some economic slow down happens.
Where is the proof of this
I ve never cut for sport but on an inverse I tried to gain weight one day for a weight loss challenge with my buddies. They all weighed in at night when I knew I was heavier so I pushed it the day before the initial weigh in. I was able to swing 14. 4 lbs in one day chugging milk and eating dry roasted peanuts all day. 180. 0 to 194. 4. I won the challenge but the cheap bastards never paid up either. I also did some some intermittent and keto before this and my very first week of doing it I lost 13 lbs. I was doing 16 8 fasting keto 96 oz of water and ZERO junk food and lost 35 lbs total 13 of that was my first week of 50 days like that. I was the best man at my twin brothers wedding and wasn t going to let him be the skinny twin on the beach in Cancun So back to Cuomo...count the fact that he has a fever is hopefully resting dehydrated from sweating during sleep without any additional hydration or eating and legit it s very possible. Sure I m just an internet stranger who could be lying but my weight in the last two years is something I ve been watching pretty close. I m still under 175 even being a pretty big lazy piece of shit during quarantine Not sure why ur getting downvoted...oh yeah politics.
Michael Blassie was the Vietnam Unknown en.wikipedia.org Arlington The Unknown of Vietnam he was identified via DNA tested after which his remains were exhumed and given to his family who had him buried at a military cemetery in St. Louis where he was from. There were multiple candidates for the Unknowns of WW1 WW2 and Korea. The tradition was to place all of their remains in identical caskets and a highly decorated service member picked one at random whose remains were the ones that went to Arlington. gt But now this a memorial to those who serve our country and fall in the line of duty who's actions and name are known only to God. If you've ever been to the Normandy American Cemetery and Memorial you'll notice the headstones that read HERE RESTS IN HONORED GLORY A COMRADE IN ARMS KNOWN BUT TO GOD There are 307 of them know according to a quick google but I think overtime they have identified some of these unknown remains As well as other buried in other cemeteries around Europe.
You do realize most of the lower level employees are the same no matter the administration right
Hilarious every comment on this is so short sighted that they think they will just be able to go to the grocery store through this entire thing like people are still going to work. You dont defend against the virus with guns You defend your home and yourself against desperate people that did not or could not prepare for 3 months of everything being closed yet gas is dirt cheap the internet is on and there's plenty of snaps of your fucking turkey dinner and the cupcakes you baked when bored.
Hello Shadymash thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news we are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. That said your submission has been selected to be featured in our megathread OP We thank you for your contribution to this subreddit it is very much appreciated. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u Shadymash amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. nytimes.com context 10000
I get cold chills when I have the flu and my body is constantly in a state of either sweating or being freezing. Not sure where you re getting this idea that no one sweats. Every body is different
Typical most doctors are liberals who would rather half a million Americans die than admit Trump understands medicine better than them.
I'm not just explaining American Conservationism. Rule of Law is a main principle of classical liberalism and conservatism in general. If the government is not there to protect the citizens and the nation's assets during a time of crisis then what role do you even want it to have On the American side of things your government does have the right during times such as this. It's in your constitution. In regards to the unequal symptoms question you carry out your legal right to demand an adjudicative process to prove you are able and fit. This is still in place. The blanket restrictions are because of the asymptomatic transmission of the virus that is possible. This situation is about prevention and mitigation. It's not arbitrary.
It s easy to forget that we re still fighting another pandemic right now besides the coronavirus HIV AIDS. Over half a million deaths this year and counting over ten times the death toll of the coronavirus to date though the numbers will likely get closer as the year goes by
What models in particular are you citing Typically the projection models are derived from standard contagion rates and death rates and do not incorporate intervention at all which would be a good support that intervention is necessary in pandemics.
I wish we could send these losers back to 1942 so they could see what a real Nazi is. Rational perspectives people. Get some.
Lol. Good luck with that.
Pence is still in charge of praying away the beervirus
gt Isn't this what a free market looks like Which is why some of us here don't like free markets.
gt Biden still thinks Doubt
that's not reassuring
You ll have to pardon the scent my dear our electorate seemed to have dragged something from the yard into the house.
Well I don t know squat about the people in the FDA but I do know that there are still a ton of Obama holdovers still in the government everywhere. Anytime there is some sort of stupid crap like this that s all I can think. I would understand if they were making something that may have a bit more liability or scrutiny but hand sanitizer Really That s just got Obama written all over it. That s the kind of little stupid crap that a former presidents cronies would pull. But trying to blame every little thing on Trump is just getting old. However it s just going to get worse the closer it gets to November. I wonder when suicide weekend is for all of the Obama cronies I m sure when they realize that things are about to go from bad to worse they would rather die than face the music.
Trump Owns Every Death.
Insurance is paying premium to potentially compensate you in case you suffer a fortuitous event. Health isn t a fortuitous event we re all going to get sick and we re all going to die. Health Assurance companies are leeches.
The data mostly comes from places where everyone has a high chance of being infected for instance a cruise ship or a small enough population that it's reasonable to test everyone.
WTF Nancy The bill that just passed has in addition to very specific oversight of multiple aspects of the recovery in Section 4020 details of a gt Congressional Oversight Commission gt gt a Establishment gt gt There is hereby established the Congressional Oversight Commission hereafter in this section referred to as the Oversight Commission as an establishment in the legislative branch. gt gt b Duties gt gt 1 In general The Oversight Commission shall gt gt A conduct oversight of the implementation of this subtitle by the Department of the Treasury and the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System including efforts of the Department and the Board to provide economic stability as a result of the coronavirus disease 2019 COVID 19 pandemic of 2020 gt gt B submit to Congress reports under paragraph 2 and gt gt C review the implementation of this subtitle by the Federal Government.
That s correct thank you.
What a coward. Libs have nothing but a craving for power and would gladly sacrifice anyone who gets in the way of that pursuit.
Amazing every word of what you just said was wrong
Aren't Southerners Republican Confused...
It was semi sarcastic but I'm not a big Santa guy. Also I see strong similarities in the over the top fabulousness and fanfare of both xmas and pride parades.
How long did it take her to recover
I don t think they are at odds either but we need laws that the majority of people will accept. A lot of very vocal people seem to think that personal safety takes a back seat to the second amendment. I can think of two reasons why a soldier should have more killing power than a civilian. They have professional training and certification for proper operation of those rifles. And they at least ideally have a plan for filtering out the mentally unstable and violent people from their ranks removing their access to that weaponry.
Was the proof and reassurance by Elizabeth Warren that the last elections dem primary was rigged
We need the name.
It comes from China shouldn't they be paying us RePaRaTiOnS
Haha true
It s possible he has no clue what he s talking about.
HELLO MR BREAKFAST
NO ONES FIEST AMENDMENT RIGHT IS BEING INFRINGED YOU IMBECILE. They didn't say that no religion was allowed that you couldn't preach or practice religion they said that you cant gather in groups of 10 or more. If Corona virus is so fine why don't you go infect yourself with it Seriously the mortality rate is low right It's not a big deal right Then go get it
If that were a realistic option I d be all for it but you seem to drastically underestimate how difficult it would be. Providing EVERY SINGLE metro rider who is an essential worker with transit is a huge undertaking.
Waste of resources
Emotionally I'm right there with you. Logically though if any state goes as badly as Alabama is heading for it's not going to be good for anyone. We're gonna have to hope we can save them from themselves for our own sake.
We have elected unqualified leaders who refuse to take things seriously.
Wow you're a real genius. When one is working toward a PhD one is an historian in training. I could be a public historian right now without a PhD and just a masters. You guessed my favorite sub based on the few comments I've ever posted on reddit in all the years I've had. Bullet proof analysis no way I could be more into other subs. Then your assumption that I indoctrinate myself with CNN and MSNBC total win. I would be willing to bet that you're quite pleased with yourself right now. But here's what's actually happening. I criticized Trump's ability to speak and you couldn't handle it so instead of trying to change my mind you turned me into a fantasy in your head then attacked me. I don't know you. I'm not assuming you're a bad person. You look at like 6 reddit posts I've made and decided you knew me. That's crazy.
Yeah being stuck at home with nothing to do and shortages in all the stores.
gt But in terms of contagion it is much more contagious than Ebola. Not really or rather much more is a bit of meaningless rhetoric. en.wikipedia.org Ebola 1. 5 2. 5 Covid19 1. 4 3. 9 For context perspective Measles 12 18 Chickenpox 10 12 Polio 5 7 Rubella 5 7 Mumps 4 7 Pertussis 5. 5 Smallpox 3. 5 6 And lastly Influenza Influenza 1918 pandemic strain 1. 4 2. 8 Influenza 2009 pandemic strain 1. 4 1. 6 Influenza seasonal strains 0. 9 2. 1 gt More lecturing advocating a position Again since you're slow on the uptake. I'm not advocating any position. I'm explaining why people have diverse opinions surrounding the topic. If you wish to argue I suggest you go to someone who IS advocating the position you disagree with.
What Trump wants to do
I used to until I got beaten nearly to death by a completely unarmed man. Then I realized that weapons don t create the possibility of violence they reshape it. And I believe the way they reshape it is by making it more egalitarian. He had about thirty pounds on me. He had the ability to kill me and not vice versa. But if you gave both me and him a gun I gain more than he does and our power dynamic goes from unbalanced to balanced.
Biden has corruption scandals and he s clearly deteriorating mentally. Trump is already running to the left of him proposing increases in healthcare coverage. He s going to get rolled.
You're looking at it in a totally lazy unscientific way. Listen to what Fauci said about it
And a troll. Ah well at least you fell for it and show your true colors now... peace. P
Are the counters being like Italy where if a person has preexisting conditions like heart disease cancer and they die with Corona then they only credit Corona with the death I hear this is why Italy has fewer deaths to heart disease cancer nowadays
Three days later Tim Morrison former senior director for counterproliferation and biodefense on the NSC wrote in another Washington Post Op Ed It is true that the Trump administration has seen fit to shrink the NSC staff. But the bloat that occurred under the previous administration clearly needed a correction. One such move at the NSC was to create the counterproliferation and biodefense directorate which was the result of consolidating three directorates into one given the obvious overlap between arms control and nonproliferation weapons of mass destruction terrorism and global health and biodefense. It is this reorganization that critics have misconstrued or intentionally misrepresented. If anything the combined directorate was stronger because related expertise could be commingled here
What happens in September
We apparently do have socialism in America. Everyone unemployed which the fed is predicting to be over 30 of the country is now getting 600 week on top of the standard benefits while we are sitting at home with decreased expenses and businesses are closed. To put that in another perspective a part time minimum wage worker who was laid off is now getting an additional wage equivalent to full time at 15 hr to sit at home and do nothing. What is all of this money for We don't even need Bernie Trump and congress all approved this in the bipartisan stimulus handout.
They were instructed under Obama not to replenish. There is nothing that said that they brought this low supply up the chain after 7 years of being told that this was the new normal In fact someone where could have just been following the policy that was in place when they started.
The Virus doesnt eat your fucking fat wtf hahaha
Yes it is and you know it. And concern trolling implies an ulterior motive what s mine
Please keep it civil even if others are not.
How Signatures are checked against on file records of same. It's not as if someone can just steal a mail in ballot and submit it.
Why are you getting downvoted It's a smart plan for Democrats since it keeps focus off their terrible candidate the allegations Dems are ignoring of him sexually assaulting a woman his mental confusion and his long list of non woke prior votes. I expect Democrats to hammer Trump exclusively with hate so people ignore the idiot they coronated.
I doubt you could. That s about as far as you would get. Biden and bathhouse Barry got extremely lucky Ebola and SARS didn t go any further than it did. But do tell us more about how it s the orange mans fault for everything.
Just how Republicans want it. Suppress voter turnout by any means necessary including lying about voter fraud that doesn t exist and believing in fraud when there s no empirical evidence to support such a belief. Republicans create voting policies like they manage pandemics without using scientific data.
The science actually shows quite clearly that there is an advantage. The studies show that around only 1 10 of their overall strength speed is lost after being on HRT at length. And any further studies that are tried by people who are not a part of the trans lobby are shut down. Where I live a researcher at the university hospital tried to do a study on this but was shut down with a protest and mass threats and cries of it can endanger trans people Now an athlete runner who just started HRT is doing a study on herself to prove that transwomen have no advantage and the local trans Activists are touting it as a groundbreaking scientific study.
That s essentially what electing any of the Dem candidates adds up to. We ll see how it goes.
Dude we have more than 500 dead in Canada and our estimates for Ontario alone are almost 2 000 by the end of April.
I know. Right. I6ts loony toons.
It isn't How so
This was a total strategic move on Trump s part I m trying not to laugh while typing that This way you tell him on a Friday and then he has the WHOLE weekend to be upset and return to work Monday ready to work... the job he was just publicly fired from... well no he wasn t fired fired. He still has to come in for 30 more days and then he s fired. So... you know... see you at work Monday Have a great weekend Only 30 more days
nope they are filing as a person who then tries to file and cant file. So they are basically taking tax money from someone who paid taxes.
Why doesn t Trump listen to him and get us back to work. Loosen restrictions and let America do its thing This is not sustainable. Trump will start to lose support if he doesn t start showing some strength and positivity.
Who was picked by Trump R
RIP gun industry competition. We tried this during the obama years panic buying of fire arms and ammo. And we see how that turned out.namely the entire industry hurting because everyone was so stocked up on everything that they couldn't make sales to support business.
more like good riddance
Yes it s been that way for a while. Announce there s a problem or some procedure is unacceptable and needs to be corrected and you re the problem.
Does your 6 year old sometimes have a Caucasian
I watched Jared speak and IIRC he was simply stating that states are making requests based upon what they project they will need NOT what they currently need. In that sense you can understand why the federal government would be prioritizing states like CA or NY that are hit the hardest right now. We pretty much shut it down It's going to be fine. There is nothing wrong with this statement. Instilling a sense of calm We're going very substantially down not up Again trying to instill a sense of calm but this is obviously false. One day it's like a miracle it will disappear I think any reasonable person could conclude that a virus wouldn't magically disappear It's clear he's trying to stop people from panicking. And this is their new hoax In context referring to the Democrats MSM hyping up the administration's response. Obviously not referring to the virus itself. I think we're doing a really good job in this country keeping it down. I would agree fully with this statement. Look at how many deaths per 1M people there are in other countries. We are doing very well especially considering the amount of cases we have had. orldometers.info utm campaign homeAdvegas1 I don't need to have the numbres double because of one ship I'm assuming this is referring to the cruise ships I don't know enough of the context to understand what was being said here but there doesn't seem to be anything alarming here to me. It will go away. Just stay calm He's not wrong. One day we will have a vaccine herd immunity and the danger will be gone. Hysteria and panic do NOTHING to help us. Look most of this stuff I can chalk up to trying to keep the public calm. I know it may be hard for you but at some point you have to be understanding of the situation. There isn't a single country out there who was well prepared for this. We didn't even know this could transfer human to human until mid January. Not to mention states could have been preparing this themselves. This is more of a failure from top to bottom federal to local and a failure by every single country. And if nearly every country is failing then I tend to believe that maybe we should be a little more understanding of our leaders. Hindsight is always 2020.
That is a man that is a new level of high T
Removed Rule 6 Submission headlines must match the article headline or quote the article. You can delete it and resubmit with the correct title.
Donald J Trump Acting Presidential...and doing a shit job of it.
I'm thinking he had 15 pounds of dick pulled out of him because of the 6 foot rule...
i m in the suburban philly area. my mother from CT is sending me masks. idk if they re N95 or not but i would be happy to share with you. i don t have a lot and i took a job at trader joe s through all this but i would be more than happy to give you some that my mom sends me.
That's the one. My bad. All the creepy journos just blend together these days.
gt TIL that trying to prevent the deaths hundreds of thousands of people is a little temporary safety. It literally is. More people die of heart disease caused by obesity but you don't see the government mandating that we all eat broccoli instead of ice cream.
It s an American company. In no way shape or form should they be sending anything anywhere when our country is in shortage. Trump should have used executive order on this.
Maybe so. Both my sisters are nurses and I d prefer that they get the masks they need instead.
remindme 8 months
Unfortunately he is and he is doing the job he was assigned to do.
Good for her
It s also possible to stay the fuck home and have a zero chance of spreading it. If you go outside you re going to spread it unless you re in a bubble. So if you don t want the government to force you to stay home ask them for a bubble.
The surreal atmosphere of the Covid 19 pandemic calls to mind how I felt as a young man in the 84th Infantry Division during the Battle of the Bulge. Now as in late 1944 there is a sense of inchoate danger aimed not at any particular person but striking randomly and with devastation. But there is an important difference between that faraway time and ours. American endurance then was fortified by an ultimate national purpose. Now in a divided country efficient and farsighted government is necessary to overcome obstacles unprecedented in magnitude and global scope. Sustaining the public trust is crucial to social solidarity to the relation of societies with each other and to international peace and stability. Nations cohere and flourish on the belief that their institutions can foresee calamity arrest its impact and restore stability. When the Covid 19 pandemic is over many countries institutions will be perceived as having failed. Whether this judgment is objectively fair is irrelevant. The reality is the world will never be the same after the coronavirus. To argue now about the past only makes it harder to do what has to be done. The coronavirus has struck with unprecedented scale and ferocity. Its spread is exponential U.S cases are doubling every fifth day. At this writing there is no cure. Medical supplies are insufficient to cope with the widening waves of cases. Intensive care units are on the verge and beyond of being overwhelmed. Testing is inadequate to the task of identifying the extent of infection much less reversing its spread. A successful vaccine could be 12 to 18 months away. The U.S administration has done a solid job in avoiding immediate catastrophe. The ultimate test will be whether the virus s spread can be arrested and then reversed in a manner and at a scale that maintains public confidence in Americans ability to govern themselves. The crisis effort however vast and necessary must not crowd out the urgent task of launching a parallel enterprise for the transition to the post coronavirus order. Leaders are dealing with the crisis on a largely national basis but the virus s society dissolving effects do not recognize borders. While the assault on human health will hopefully be temporary the political and economic upheaval it has unleashed could last for generations. No country not even the U.S can in a purely national effort overcome the virus. Addressing the necessities of the moment must ultimately be coupled with a global collaborative vision and program. If we cannot do both in tandem we will face the worst of each. Drawing lessons from the development of the Marshall Plan and the Manhattan Project the U.S is obliged to undertake a major effort in three domains. First shore up global resilience to infectious disease. Triumphs of medical science like the polio vaccine and the eradication of smallpox or the emerging statistical technical marvel of medical diagnosis through artificial intelligence have lulled us into a dangerous complacency. We need to develop new techniques and technologies for infection control and commensurate vaccines across large populations. Cities states and regions must consistently prepare to protect their people from pandemics through stockpiling cooperative planning and exploration at the frontiers of science. Second strive to heal the wounds to the world economy. Global leaders have learned important lessons from the 2008 financial crisis. The current economic crisis is more complex The contraction unleashed by the coronavirus is in its speed and global scale unlike anything ever known in history. And necessary public health measures such as social distancing and closing schools and businesses are contributing to the economic pain. Programs should also seek to ameliorate the effects of impending chaos on the world s most vulnerable populations. Third safeguard the principles of the liberal world order. The founding legend of modern government is a walled city protected by powerful rulers sometimes despotic other times benevolent yet always strong enough to protect the people from an external enemy. Enlightenment thinkers reframed this concept arguing that the purpose of the legitimate state is to provide for the fundamental needs of the people security order economic well being and justice. Individuals cannot secure these things on their own. The pandemic has prompted an anachronism a revival of the walled city in an age when prosperity depends on global trade and movement of people. The world s democracies need to defend and sustain their Enlightenment values. A global retreat from balancing power with legitimacy will cause the social contract to disintegrate both domestically and internationally. Yet this millennial issue of legitimacy and power cannot be settled simultaneously with the effort to overcome the Covid 19 plague. Restraint is necessary on all sides in both domestic politics and international diplomacy. Priorities must be established. We went on from the Battle of the Bulge into a world of growing prosperity and enhanced human dignity. Now we live an epochal period. The historic challenge for leaders is to manage the crisis while building the future. Failure could set the world on fire. Mr. Kissinger served as secretary of state and national security adviser in the Nixon and Ford administrations.
Hi freddyjohnson Thank you for participating in r Politics. However your submission has been removed for the following reason Already Submitted This article has been submitted to r politics within the last three days redd.it I'm a bot and sometimes I make mistakes. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding the removal of this submission by u freddyjohnson amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. reddit.com
ummmm didn't the last republican president not give the troops body armor Weren't families buying it and sending it to their loved ones
I believe he actually does have empathy. Competency and insight and intelligence meh.
I've thought the impeachment was a wasted opportunity for Democrats since the day it was suggested. The crime was too abstract and had zero impact on Americans so no one really had any reason to care about it. I promise you the only people outraged about that phone call were Democrats. Independents and Republicans saw it as hypocritical and childish. Looking back if it hadn't happened how much more do you think impeachment would be being talked about now
Shes not stupid. Shes lying through her buck teeth and she damn well knows it. She knows nobody of consequence is going to fact check her. Stop underestimating this woman. Shes dangerous as hell.
I think she was referring to the God of War Epic of Kratosq. If you can't do your half boy were going home
Is there a 25 tariff on those masks that the the U.S has to pay
gt If it happens all the time does that speak for the left Kind of yes. Because this is our subreddit. But also... the vitriol you see on the leftist subreddits speaks for the left too. gt But I don t agree with taking the extreme example of a group and then saying that they re all like that. It s not logical it s bandwagoning. It's my experience as a moderator on reddit. gt What if and this wouldn t be hard I found examples of people talking about how liberals should die or something like this Those subreddits would be quickly banned by the admins. gt And said you thought that I'm not saying that YOU want us to die. I'm saying that the comment featured here is COMMON. We see these things all the time. And you know what There aren't any news organizations coming to us asking about how we heal with the mental trauma of constantly seeing this kind of content aimed at us... BUT motherjones.com dailydot.com nytimes.com engadget.com Don't muh both sides me. This content we see day after day is getting obscene.
Look on the bright side soon it will be less than 300 plus million people.
yikes thats just
maybe water weight
gt I just have too much faith in the American voter you do
Private company. Don t like it Shop elsewhere
I'd look up the origins if that quote if I were you it often gets quoted where it is not exactly applicable or even where it goes against what the person quoting it is trying to say
I feel bad that your life is so empty you come here to troll
Okay sure. But the numbers don't lie.
Its not one dead guy its all the men and women who have fought and died for their country. Some the greatest heroes are not known by name.
Your right in that they only reported what other countries are doing. But the way in which they report things leads people to believe something that has only been implied not reported as fact. The way they report and interview is intentionally geared towards misleading people. For what reason I know not maybe they get their kicks this way but it results in damage to people's lives.
Title doesn't match
Why do you think nobody followed through I m sure some did. I m sure it wasn t everyone who said they would.
Technically they're not legally allowed to. And not disputing it's happened a friend of mine they treated for free was gay and a sex worker. Just saying I trust the Catholic hospitals over the secular ones in my area. Mind you they're run by Republican nutters themeselves. I live in Kentucky.
It s already functionally dead
Sadly I fear that western governments and companies love money too much to make this actually happen. I would love it if we punished China and gave them the North Korea treatment. Everybody sanctioning them refusing to deal with them banning their people from entering our countries. But that will cost money and I think we ll be back to business as usual bending over and letting them fuck us in exchange for cash.
They knew what they signed up for.
That's almost 10 000 people.
You must have a wonderful imagination
Clickbait. He wasn t shutting down the TV personalities. He wasn t referring to how the TV personalities feel.
Why don t they probe why Jared Kushner is in charge of a fucking pandemic that s killing everyone They should be screaming in every channel all day everyday
Lacks leadership Lol. Great euphemisim for Has the intelligence of a fencepost the insight of a rock and the moral character of a snail a smug and devious snail
It s been hilarious watching the assholes in Hollywood trying desperately to stay relevant
He said The notion of the federal stockpile was it's supposed to be our stockpile. It's not supposed to be states' stockpiles that they then use Kushner told reporters. So we're encouraging the states to make sure that they're assessing the needs they're getting the data from their local situations and then trying to fill it with the supplies that we've given them.
Those docs could help treat the sick or injured for the time being but nope gotta help the people who make the choice to screw without protection.
Toronto would roll over in a heart beat. They've always wanted to be American.
Cool thing about Democracy... We always get exactly what we deserve.
Because this is America and we re on our last legs before the empire collapses.
wait. Wouldn't FedEx be one of the few businesses that are going to see an increase in business due to the work at home rules
Duh
Except the cheating in other states affects everyone.
Also hard to vote when there are bad polling conditions like one fucking booth for a city.
gt Biden should probably answer why his administration depleted the national PPE stockpile and didn't replenish it. Good question. A better question why didn't you take inventory and replenish what we didn't You had 3 years to do so.
I forgot about that. Wow that last 3 years have sucked.
gt We had to. All you're doing is mass spreading the virus. The first thing China shutdown was mass transit. The city should have organized alternative ways to get essential workers to work which included mandatory temperature taking before they got onto the Bus Train Cab.
So T is not at fault for assuring the whole country this would be gone on its own by March Is this subreddit the upside down Lmao
I can not believe this man is the president. Still. I can't believe anyone trusts and follows him. Still. When he said I gave you a perfect answer you know it he sounded like a stubborn child. I've seen it unfold for years now and I still cant believe it. He's so clearly horrible.
I d like to say from Canada you dumb fucks elected them stop bitching
Propping up wat criminals should empower us I feel like you can t keep track of what you re even trying to say
She's an attractive woman in politics. You do the math.
100 of young people want a new system Then they need to beat them at the current system to do anything. Show the fuck up and vote. Nothing else matters until you do that one thing. News stories don't mean shit your opinions don't mean shit. Vote these narcissistic fucks out then pick the next thing. That's how it works right now. Change it to whatever the fuck you want bit until you can beat the occupying power your opinion means shit.
Preach. Conservatism doesn't mean confederacy.
Why do you assume I wish those things You re taking the actions words of a small percentage of people and projecting them onto the entire population of left leaning people. That s irresponsible.
Not a lot of ways to make a side income in Nationalist Socialist China.
youre right poor choice of words
Regardless of what Biden did or didn't say when the point here is that once a position is taken you must absolutely not change or adapt that position no matter how the existing situation changes or what new factors are added. Republican policy projection.
Idk if you are unsure don t link it
Compared to orangey mcorangeface pretty much everybody is.
I can see it now not enough mail in ballots for State
and racism. gotta pepper that in liberally...
Origin yes but I'm talking about proliferation which is what caused the wide spread. Mexico only had 50 000 cases where as US was at 55 million. I remember people blaming the US but not the same level of vitriol China gets now.
Imagine a lock down in the 70's Yup here are your 3 channels shared phone line and thed radio. Enjoy
I m sorry you re getting downvoted. This isn t r the donald and I d like to think the people here are a little more civil. You re not wrong about the fact that this shouldn t be a partisan issue. I had the privilege of interviewing Dr Jonathan Ringo the president of Sinai Hospital in Baltimore Maryland. He s an entrepreneur as well as an MD and he said if the drastic measures that we have taken hadn t been taken there would be bodies lining the streets in NY. The point this meme is trying to make is slightly missing the point but the core idea of liberty still stands. You re correct we shouldn t be going out and id like to think we re smart enough to not go out on our own accord. But some purple have their heads up their asses and don t understand public safety. This shouldn t be a partisan issue but people choose to make it one. In times of crisis we have to be flexible with our circumstances. Have a wonderful weekend and stay safe.
Are you going to find the proof that the dems and millions of dollars spent on an investigation but found nothing hmmm....
Obviously people aren't planning on shooting the virus. The fear is the threat of desperate people.
Right. I think that's what I was addressing.
It's not news that he said anything it's not a revelation from Seth Meyers either. You're not in a news sub you're in a politics sub political commentary from people is something you should expect to see here. One of the reasons why I like Seth Meyers is his closer look' segments aren't just about cheap shots because they're riding the bandwagon of hating Trump. It actually digs into what's actively happening a lot of times not incredibly in depth like other full investigative journalism but it lays out a number of things that have happened in the past few days and brings attention to them. Just because most people know someone is bad doesn't mean everyone should just start ignoring the bad things that person is doing. So really I don't get your argument there.
Saddest part is that there are people who will believe him and blame Obama for not having Covid 19 vaccines. The ignorance of so many people breaks my heart.
Fever and inflammation. Add on hypoxia and you're bound to see some shit
Case by case basis doesn't mean all cities. If there is an outbreak shutting down non essential traffic for a few weeks could be instituted.
gt Truth doesn t really matter as long as it fits your viewpoint. Amen. This clearly inaccurate thread is now 97 up voted at the time of me you writing this.
gt They cut our power I believe OP is saying it's their power not ours.
Doesn t matter. Some things are bigger than saving money. They should not be here
With reports of sales of supplies in late 2019 did they sell off the stockpile for profit and now they are trying to hid the fact that there is not us much in the stockpile as there should be Reason for all the push back
Please help. Hospitals are being overwhelmed. Doctors and nurses are dying trying to help. Please don t spread the virus. Protect your family.
Imagine hating mail in voting during a time when basically everyone has to stay home.
India s not a democracy anymore
I like your analysis. I didn't know she made that website. You are right about the DNC doing an excellent job of getting a hold on young people of color.
Wow I ask a question and you go to incest I m not even mad that s amazing.
Well until he broadcasts his porn preferences to the world I guess we'll never know.
Why not pence Thought he was going to
Hello GaryHartman thank you for participating on r politics. The topic of your submission is currently being discussed at length in our megathread. redd.it Given the large scale nature of this news We are temporarily removing all submissions concerning this topic so that the community has one easy to find place for discussion and news updates. Thank you for your understanding. If you have any questions about this removal please feel free to message the moderators. reddit.com to r politics amp subject Question regarding removal due to megathread by u GaryHartman amp message I have a question regarding the removal of this submission. npr.org context 10000
Our citizens did not in fact vote him in. He lost the popular vote. The majority of Americans did not vote for him and do not support him.
The RF signal people are nuts. don't go down that rabbit hole. there is no talking them off a ledge.
They're not for the states they're for the U.S s
Now that is an understatement
Fear of reality without whataboutism.
Here is their estimation update healthdata.org They have actually increased the number of predicted deaths. Their updated modeling still suggests 130 000 beds UI 95 106K 160K on April 2nd... That actual number yesterday was 32 649 covidtracking.com Something appears to be pretty off about the model
It s not even about that. Truthfully. How many times have you seen a liquor store with hundreds or thousands of occupants drinking from the same bottle Think of all those who gather at churches to drink from the same chalice or shaking hands to greet each other.
Literally in a massive recession Artificially created or not
If you comply voluntarily because it's the right thing to do it won't need to be compulsory. I get it and I agree with the sentiment but don't put other people in danger.
gt We've hit a new low. Don't worry. A new new low will be set tomorrow.
gt The counterpoint is the 10th amendment and the inherent powers of the states The first amendment lists Congress specifically but it has regularly been held up in court that it also applies to the states. Otherwise a State could declare an official religion ban Abortions regulate what the media says and or punish people for what they post on social media.
Laws don't matter anymore. Who's going to stop them
Okay Where can I go to find unbiased information
What does this have to do with the pandemic exactly
Purely talking aesthetics here.
Gitmo. Its why its there.
Satan s son More like Hitler s son.
Ahh the classic let s blame something that just a label and doesn t accurately describe the us or the world s economy. Yeah totally that labels fault. Everyone uses a hybrid system we ve used a hybrid system before we even decided to come up with labels such as socialism or capitalism. Accounting is used all around as well but it s never ohh we accounted wrong
I heard that president trump wants to bang his wife.
Has he recovered from it
General strike and boycotts money is all they care about
Don t you actually need some credentials for a role like that
I m fairly liberal LibCenter but this is 100 correct. That s part of what I love about Bill Maher. He s liberal but not afraid to call out liberals when they do shit which hurts the cause.
Pausing court proceedings in leu of a pandemic virus based on the judgement of individual judges across the country is what's happening. The bullshit your spewing is a lie.
Is DC powered by Quebec well...Labrador
I don't even know anyone infected by corona chan except for stupid celebrities on the news.
If it wasn t for Christians we d be living in the Stone Age.
It s a reasonable proposal that wasn t vetted by lobbyists.
Rather a life full of suffering than no life at all. Amen
I am in the exact same boat as you are and I'm glad you said this. I have called emailed and texted Bernie's staff asking him to negotiate a deal. All work together to get Biden elected every signal one. Put Bernie as Senate majority leader he'd be effective as shit there. Run a super ticket name your cabinet name your leaders get this done and quit bitching amongst reach other. At this point it is literally life or death. I said that 3 months ago and it was hyperbole it's not anymore.
That will be the day
They can. They are just tired and not never work rich just unappreciative lower upper class
People will not quarantine unless they are commanded by law. Why Because people suck.
A mistake typo. 850K is what I meant obviously and anything I claimed on apprehensions can easily be verified by the link I provided originally.
Absolutely In a class of his own.
Particularly when it comes to honoring those who perished in defense of our freedoms.
Oh you mean like calling everyone racists for disagreeing
I agree honestly even 1 million deaths is not worth the economy being destroyed. I was very sad when our president pulled back from his initial Easter timeline we need to open back up for the sake of our future
And Mike Flynn. To fer Tuesday The dude is going to have to come up with a distraction. He's going to try to divert attention from the pandemic to change the narrative. It's all he's got. But yeah at the same time he's going to do as much shady shit as possible because he can't help it.
gt they passed Obamacare but they needed to get it around the GOP to do so. This just a talking point Dems use to absolve themselves of blame for literally any vote they make. They had a supermajority and Dems chose to water the bill down to appease insurance lobbyists. They then spin what amounts to taking legal bribes from the insurance industry as a moderate position lmao what and make dubious claims that they would lose purple states if they didn't take insurance industry bribes as if the average voter is pro bribery and would be insulted if their elected officials didn't take insurance industry bribes. There's no logic in these reasonings from Dems just gaslighting. Sadly the gaslighting seems to work.
I wonder why CNN and MSNBC would want to stop airing these press conferences if they were so bad and filled with misinformation. Why not just let him make a fool of himself Ahh yes of course they hate that people approve of his handling and will stop at nothing to prevent him from being re elected. The left is so toxic they would rather the drug not work so they can blame Trump than hope their fellow Americans beat this illness.
Vote for my rapist not their rapist.
Clearly not the case it was a doomed effort that lead to the apathetic conclusion you just made. Just because double impeachment has never happened before doesn't make it flat out wrong to pursue. There has never been a rogue president like 45 even Nixon knew when to quit. Also if the American public didn't see the Senate trial as a sham then I guess they won't see a second impeachment as playing politics either. By doing nothing a dangerous precedent is being set. Also no one is saying to Democrats should pursue impeachment during covid 19 however they should pursue cleansing the Senate.
Impeachment and trial proceedings concluded in ample time for the Administration to react. it just...didn t react. The Administration failed in this aspect of leadership. Plain and simple. No sugar coating it. I m not in the mood to blame anyone and assigning blame is a disservice to everyone at this time. I just want this shit taken care of so we can move on
Oh it will reach here but end up not that big of a deal. We've had 2 deaths and both were extremely old. There is something to be said for being for living in a red city 110k where people aren't jammed on top of each other and proud of it like NYC.
Compare two rooms. I tell you in room 1 10 people died and in room 2 20 people died. Which room is better By total deaths you would say room 2. But if there were only 10 people in room 1 and 500 in room 2 clearly room 2 is performing better. Total deaths is nearly irrelevant in terms of comparisons. Unless of course you have an agenda to push which it appears many of you do.
The reality is getting illegals to admit that they re illegally here and whether they pay taxes or not is going to be next to impossible to do. They re not stupid they know who to cry to about being illegal.
Listen here fat Medicare for all doesn't prevent cancer I'm the guy that going to cure cancer by challenging it to a push up contest. Medicare for all doesn't do that.
There s a 100 chance someone will shoot him in the head
You have never been on an aircraft carrier or seen a movie if you think the crew can spread out anywhere and maintain social distance. That was the Captain's point.
Well what should he have done differently Not banned travel because it was racist Hoping things would be better isn't an action. No one understood how infectious this was because China misled everyone. I sort of saw it coming based on what China did not what they said. So I moved everything out of stocks and bonds into the money market in early February. What were you thinking about this in early February I went to Mardi Gras because I had important work to do but I used a lot of hand sanitizer and didn't touch my face. That is hard to do... I was concerned they might shut it down and thought they probably should. What was the governor of Louisiana thinking about No evidence he was thinking at all.
But it has not had a 7 million person triple blind study over a decade to prove it will work
If that's so then why are the democratic cities hit the hardest right now
Yeah. After further thought I think you're right.
Please proceed Mr. Sovereign Traveling Citizen of the world.
Good question Why does anyone even work non essential jobs We should all just stay home all the time to make sure there's absolutely no chance we could ever put someone in danger. I mean could you imagine how dangerous driving a car would be
Did Yoko Ono clone her husband in the womb Because that guy does not look half Asian.
But free market...
We asked Stormy Daniels and she said his wand was so magic he had to pay a woman 130k to willingly touch it.
Per my dad O5 you would be a traitor for speaking ill of the president. Even though he also trash talked Obama constantly and still talks about how Hillary Clinton is plotting to destroy the country.
Thing is Louisiana got hit hard because of Mardi Gras. But there actually been doing a great job of informing providing and taking action. It s night and day from how Texas is handling things.
The key word there is intentionally.
Yes and you can learn all about it at Trump University's new course. hurry before the courts shut it down due to gross fraud.
Believing there a vast injustice does not mean it is true. When people cloud their judgement because of their political beliefs they tend to not to have a rational thought process. Hence the term zealots.
It is the conservatives calling directors and officials Deep State Stooges and spreading misinformation about the severity of the virus as well as congregating in churches and complaining about enforced curfew.
Huh just looked into that never knew Pennsylvania's chief executive used to be titled president. en.wikipedia.org
Suspect 25th amendment would be more helpful if there were any vertebrate GOP s.
He is. The government should ask people to stay home but it shouldn't be allowed to force you to stay home
Got a long memory too
How do I delete the internet. r awefuleverything
I get what you re trying to say with the Flu Ebola scale. Corona is really nothing like Ebola but that s what makes it more dangerous really. Ebola leaves its victims basically immobile Corona has an incubation period where the person isn t feeling the sickness yet which allows the carrier to spread it even more which is even more dangerous considering how contagious it is as well as it s higher death rate compared to the flu. Corona may fall into the same category as the seasonal Flu similar to how dogs and wolves are of the same Genus canines but one is much more dangerous than the other. I d have to disagree that this pandemic and by extension the shelter in place orders given by states are not a matter of subjectivity.
Now do H1B.
Well. I have some bad news for mr Trump. Exponential curves always look like a flat line in their early stages... until suddenly they don't
Reporter you didn t answer my question Trump I gave you a perfect answer you know it Everyone
I accept your resignation from the conversation.
He looks like Tom Riddle without the talent or knowledge to back up his evil bullshirt.
Canada has fucked up a lot. Just we hid it well. Our main thing however is to focus on our own issues so Trump doing this has actually pushed a button.
Thank you
Ah yes the three worst things in the world thieves pedos and TEENS. People between the ages of 13 and 19 are the worst of them all. s
Different kind of pride. St. Paul in the Bible even talks about boasting. Michael Knowles has a good explanation of why it s fine to be proud of a good country like the US.
Thousands of people won t get it until September.
LOL this is hilarious.
Pence just seems so off to me. Like some robot. Or soul less demon. Always standing there silent and still
We ve all know this since the 80s and there is also no chance he will resign lol
He said he could pick a cabinet in 15 minutes. I'm not sure why you're seemingly upset by this article.
shuffling goalpost noises
Most congress people are getting wealthier over time in general. So to be precise the real question is whether they come out significantly wealthier than they would have been projected to be. Still I agree it's likely.
He thought we wouldn't pay attention because of the COVID situation. We need to vote him out and all his enablers in the Senate.
Mind blowing what this pos president gets away with. Fucking mind blowing.
That's an opinion and all but... I have a family member on facebook who just had their brother in law die from this. I'm sick of all the discussion and fights about it on reddit. I'm not going to any of the subreddits about it. I started one called r MyCorona19 where people can just post SANE articles and the comment sections automatically lock. So that while we are living this social distancing...etc we have a place to just read some informative things absent obvious Chinese trolls leftists trying to screech about Drumpf and people saying it's all bogus. Because we really do not know. And Trump Honestly...he s the best President to have right now when you think about it because there's NO WAY he wanted to shutter the economy. He's NOT the kind of dude to be testing us for socialism or martial law. So the conspiracists saying all that can kind of cram it. And he IS doing SOME things so the he's isn't doing enough he should have us all at home with masks on people can cram it too.
Before impeachment ended Trump had already closed our border to China created task forces around the country fast tracked vaccine treatment research started getting rid of red tape and had the CDC making tests which sadly ended up being defective He also warned the entire country about the virus during the SOTU...the one that Pelosi ripped up. If she learned her response from someone it wasn't the President. Also fair warning the President will most likely continue making hopeful predictions about this country and it's people. Try not to freak out about it.
I understand why people tell others to vote it's one of the only ways to make a difference. My question is why do we have to mill through candidates until we find someone with a scrap of decency and actual initiative to help the public Shouldn't all candidates bring prosperity to the populace I hate to say we are fucked but until something big happens and we do something about it we. are. fucked.
Churchill
Has martial law been declared due to a military conflict on US soil
I mean are you saying it's a conservative value Because the guy conservatives are rallying behind isn't exactly...
Just like I remember.. Disgustingly funny and easily dismissed by his supporters yet awful and completely inappropriate for the times.
There are no good republicans only dead ones at this point
Yup and I'm not putting anything past anyone at this point
gt But why does the media use the words death toll for coronavirus and not for other fatal phenomena That word choice is part of a narrative. I suppose it's part of a narrative if you choose to see it that way. They're using death toll because it's a toll of the dead bodies that are piling up as a result of COVID 19 tearing through the lungs of humanity. gt Sometimes that story is we all need to be under house arrest I suppose that's one way of looking at it. Feel free to frolic outside and socialize with whomever you wish if you believe your rights are being tread upon. Humanity has been experiencing first hand the ramifications of such actions but if this whole thing's just a media narrative then I suppose I can understand why you're saying the words you're saying. Anyway thanks for your response. It was illuminating.
Good thing history is written by the Winners and we now nothing but winning
Go away little girl
how did we go from talking about abortion in early pregnancy to murdering a baby that s about to come out
List of trump's dangerous lies reddit.com Dates of Trump's golf rounds doing nothing and cult rallies endangering the health of the entire country for political gains reddit.com
I read an article about 6 days ago about Durham. It explained that he should be finished some time in may or June. They originally hoped for completion in March. This is gonna be good I just feel it.
Right before the election.
In my opinion its because they cant shut down polling places to displace votes or minorities or poor. So everyone will truly have their vote counted
It s not even well written. Sad.
Yeah I don't care about your bitching. I have no problem with this letter on the other hand.
Learning what The Alphabet
One of the top replies says they know jared is not a perfect person but he's just about as qualified as anyone else.... Yea it's bad
Then how do local state police operate at all Almost their entire day is curtailing Constitutional rights. There is a body of law that supports police action and limited emergency action. All have limits and I think I'd meet you more than halfway in saying the response has been far more than what is actually justified. I had a wonderful professor that said the best and most infuriating answer was it depends. As much as we both wish our rights were hard lines in the sand sadly they really aren't
What a fucking asshole. She s claiming Trumpnis killing people while reporting on a story showing the exact opposite. It s fucking lunacy.
I live across the street from a course in VA and it s as busy as ever if not more so.
As usual the swamp will cover for its own and she will not face penalties.
As their attorney I have to advise them to stop lying.
I m not down with defending possibly illegality from either party the one I support or the other. Just me tho.
Nearly all Americans are running debt. It's been that way for decades small businesses are the same as individuals. But even if there were savings the stop in economic activity means wealth generation freezes. Wealth generation is what keeps the economy going and allows us to prosper. People not working and living off savings are not generating new wealth this is bad. Really really bad. The only organizations that can support endless shutdown are international corporations. gt No one has immunity to this virus because it is novel. A princess cruise liner had an outbreak. Communal eating entertainment etc. Worse possible situation. They also were quarantined together. They were tested and only 20 had Covid 19. This means 80 either had an immunity or they quickly passed the bug as in it was gone within a few days Not enough is understood about the bug to be making such claims. That is fearmongering. gt It doesn't just kill the elderly and those with weakened immune systems. Yes people who have other health conditions are at risk. But if you sift out other health conditions and 65 the death rate is lower than the Flu. gt If we experience something as bad as the Spanish Flu wouldn't this be a good trial run to ensure that each society has a refined response that can be both swift and effective You just nuked our economy with the current policies. That is government revenue that is charity that is progress that was just destroyed by idiocy. That means scientists won't have the money for research in the future based on this. Closing down the economy is not a temporary problem it has long lasting consequences that could last a decade or more. And even when the economy returns to normal you still have the loss in productivity and wealth growth. That is permanent. You have destroyed future prosperity of our children and grand children.
Yeah it's at best shoddy journalism for sure.
Ahahaha. You re exactly who the quote is aimed at. He s saying that there s more to this world including objective truth. He s also speaking against empiricists like you appear to be. There s more to the world than what can be proven in a lab.
People with integrity tend not to last long around Trump. I have to wonder what Jim Mattis and John Kelly are thinking now. It didn't seem like they had a lot of control but they were at least functional adults in the room. Are they kicking themselves for not being able to help the current disaster or are they more thankful that they are not in the middle of the shit storm
When will this end
I'm Canadian you dumb Yank. I'm also not a Liberal. I know your tiny American brain can only process binary especially since you treat politics like sports but just because I think you and your tribe are retards doesn't mean I'm part of your other' And your country is handling the crisis horribly your president is talking about hoarding the production of masks which is causing OUR Prime Minister to talk about retaliating. America is a joke Your president has single handedly ruined your reputation with him trying to corner the vaccine research and now with this mask production business. All of your rant has literally nothing to do with you bible thumping Right Wingers congregating and spreading the virus spreading misinfo about the severity of the virus and complaining about enforced quarantine. Moron.
I feel really patriotic when I get to vote and I m really concerned that my right to vote will be taken away during this pandemic.
This is actual leadership not the garbage dump we see on a daily basis.
Lol These are your arguments Oh my gosh good luck to you in life. Side note Seriously though I don t agree with you you don t have to agree with me but I still wish you safety and well my fellow redditor.
what fucking psycho sits next their napping kids as they try to learn how to play a C chord
You guys hear his comment about fucking models while talking about a model of 100 000 Americans dying Cool
Up there sure.... top I think there are plenty of autocratic leaders who have done worse. There's been a lot of genocide in the last few decades. Like purposeful killing of millions of people. Bush was responsible for a million civilians in Iraq. I would say that's much more tragic than the idiocy that's going on right now. But yeah I agree He's up there.
gt And if he is fuckin' impeach remove and get someone else in. Simple as that. Are you serious If the impeachment process can't get Trump out it's not going to get anybody out. That safeguard of democracy is clearly broken.
Better yet hack the GOP. Air everything for the world to see.
US citizen reporting Please do Our government is committing numerous crimes against humanity. The world needs to move on the US NOW...before something even worse happens.
Comments like hers are why I find my morning commutes increasingly filled with various conservative media. I m not a huge right versus left guy. I m a human being who knows everything is somewhere in between on most things That said though. Some of the shit like this I continue to hear is just bonkers and really causes me to pause with concern for the future of our country
Contributing factors. Perspective. Get some.
Aw Kushner s such a doll. A haunted Victorian doll modeled after the death portrait of a seven year old measles casualty.
YES I have three D's and all throw money at the MIC are against Medicare for All and won't support the real Green New Deal. You know the resolution AOC wrote. Bot Biden's term co opting version of some non existent green new deal of his.
The cost of enforcing border laws is a necessity letting illegal immigrants stay in the United States illegally is not. The point is this issue would be a lot less problematic if previous administrations actually did their jobs and enforced our immigration laws.
This here. Watch other countries response and use it as a baseline. If we perform worse then we can isolate leadership effects.
You had to pay them you pasty handed orange faced mf
Accurate. This is what I see everytime I open Reddit too thankfully this is different thank you OP
So it s either all or nothing in your book Only a Sith deals in absolutes.
The actual point was that purchasing more ventilators was not recommended for the specific reason that Furthermore severe staffing shortages are anticipated and purchasing additional ventilators beyond a threshold will not save additional lives because there will not be a sufficient number of trained staff to operate them the report also reads.
gt Darwinism in full effect all over this comment. And you have well meaning but statist bootlicker written all over yours. I don't stop supporting liberty for all just because a disease with a 98. 34 99. 34 survival rate is passing through. And even if the death rates were higher I still wouldn't stop believing what I do there are things more important than life. Liberty and freedoms... and those are why our nation exists today. If our founding fathers thought the way you did our nation wouldn't exist. They rebelled over too high of taxes and you're defending the literal infringement of our first amendment rights. I'm glad you'll be the first in line when a tyrannical government tells you that you need to turn in your guns for the good of the nation. Or to stop talking about certain topics. Or throws you in jail for having the wrong beliefs. I'm sure the millions and millions of people who have died to fight for and defend our Constitutional rights and personal liberties are really proud. gt You do realize that Corona is highly contagious right And that it can live on surfaces far longer than an average strain of influenza And no one has natural antibodies to it and it's deadly to more than just the elderly and young Yes I do. I understand everything about this. And it's totally and completely immaterial. You'd know this if you truly read and understood my comment. gt That pastor could have held service via streaming or asked his clergy to pray from home it was entirely selfish moronic and deadly for him to hold a service and I hope he rots in jail First they came for the socialists and I did not speak out Because I was not a socialist. Then they came for the trade unionists and I did not speak out Because I was not a trade unionist. Then they came for the Jews and I did not speak out Because I was not a Jew. Then they came for me and there was no one left to speak for me. The purpose of the first Amendment is allow people to worship how they will. Without government interference. Could they have gone digital Sure. But they... SHOULD NOT be REQUIRED to... because the government may not regulate religion
The important thing is that the government is able to save face.
Literal dictator.
Damn. Hope she recovers easy. Like her or not I don t wish this on anyone.
No what
I don't think he has to try...
Watch out because that is coming. These new powers that the government has granted themselves particularly local and state governments with authoritarian Democrat leadership are going to use these new powers in ways people aren't thinking of right now. The climate is going to be one example. they are going to declare emergencies over the climate and that drastic measures are needed to save lives. Watch them do something like no car Saturdays.
Oh no. That wackos have arrived. Like this never happened before trump. Fucking idiots
He calls himself a libertarian. And he supports things that are more libertarian than conservative like wanting government out of marriage instead of banning gay marriage
He's fucking 1984 ing us. Or I should say the idiots who still manage to think this guy is gods gift to America.
Well yes if everyone had one but everyone doesn't have one so people without them will be victims.
Anybody up for an old fashioned coup
Contact your congressional representatives your senators today. House house.gov Senate senate.gov
And now no country wants us.
Two trillion for now. Another few paycheck cycles and people will start looting if another stimulus is not introduced. Seeing the Congress is playing politics I don t think they will have a plan in place to get the economy going.
Well of course they did. Sundar Pichai defended the censored Chinese Project Firefly search engine by pointing out how helpful it would be in compiling useful medical data.
I'm a bot bleep bloop Someone has linked to this thread from another place on reddit r topmindsofreddit Top Mod chabanais spends a whole bunch of time and effort cropping and uploading the vitriol he and his fellow simpletons have received in their echo chamber for empathy haters. Sounds like a valuable psychologically healthy way to spend free time in a global pandemic. reddit.com amp nbsp If you follow any of the above links please respect the rules of reddit and don't vote in the other threads. Info r TotesMessenger Contact message compose to r TotesMessenger
What do you propose as an alternative Knowing the virulence of the disease and the significant resource limitations currently.
Every single infection is China s fault. Politicians all over the work are rightfully blaming China.
He literally included churches as part of essential services to stay open. On Easter Sunday we will ensure the number of new cases launch into space
Shit sandwich
Masks work Walls work Borders work
Dennison is either insincere or ignorant. The state doesn't have to return any particular ventillator to meet the needs of the upstate region. Thousands are in use with so many hundreds freed up every day. So yes the ventillator can be returned as soon as it's needed and without delay. Come on now. Let's not be silly about this lives are literally and directly at stake.
The Old Guard is literally right next door in Ft Myer so it's not like they travel to do this. Pretty sure there's no chance of infection walking through an empty cemetery.
gt hasn't had any oversight over his decisions since his father died He did have to accept oversight when his casinos were in trouble I think in the 90's His creditors insisted he sell his giant yacht and limit his personal spending. As I recall he was on something like a monthly allowance. Didn't help everyone but him got fucked anyway.
If you actually read on their website it says clear as day that in the coming weeks they're going to make a web portal so you can give you direct deposit info to them.
Excuse me Haven't you hear People are scared. That means rights cease to exist. Get the memo.
I thought I heard him say the equipment belongs to the federal government because we need it And in the next sentence he says us the the United States. Did I miss hear that or did not contradict himself in the same little tantrum
Well Thanks for the downvotes. Be safe.
There is no need to dig into alternate solutions just scale back what has been done now. The disease burden does not have extremely damaging potential in most places in the US I think that is where the issue lies. Most places in the US are spread out and not heavily dependent on public transport like subways. amp x200B Look at the cruise ship filled with older folks which is close quarters for the only actual place that we have tested everyone and where the corona virus has existed. It was just not that bad there.
Bernie 2020
You are getting downvoted because the people here are so blind to reality that they straight up believe anything trump tells them. We ve done a good job Retard supporters believe it. We are going to have a million deaths and his dumbass supporters still will blame the fake news or some shit. Pull trumps dick out of your mouths.
Wow
Ok and I thought last months news getting surreal. Someone restart the server
For one minute I thought I was reading news about the North Korean regime and not about the largest democracy on Earth.
It s more than I need. In fact I already spent the stimmie on a MacBook. It should be here next week.
Yeah this is the sad thing to me. We have literally COUNTLESS better potential leaders. Yet even Democrats are collectively making terrible choices. More and more these days I really feel complete despair for the future.
When you're a hammer everything looks like a nail.
Agree but what did this accomplish What good comes out of this How about using his hard earned platform for something everyone can get behind while many are struggling
Well his help is indeed tainted for letting Brady go.
Thomas Modly turning the US Navy into the Iraqi Navy with this bullshit
No if someone is here illegally from Europe they should be deported to.
Yes... You believe an underdeveloped fetus is the same as a human being and I'm the one who threw reality out the window. Sure buddy. On your bike. Off you go.
At every turn he makes the absolute worst possible decision for this country and our citizens. Every. Fucking. Time. If I didn't know better I'd say he acts more like an adversary to us than an elected official.
But it gives them an opening to attack him justifiably for firing the ICIG and draw attention clearly but not directly to how shitty he s been on covid. This may be a massive mistake by Donald. The one thing he had going for him is Dems weren t attacking him for fear of not being partisan in a crisis. This gives them legitimate cover to do so
Articles about Mitt Romney and the 47 referenced that very thing.
Your numbers from 6 years ago are probably completely off today. I started buying ACA exchange plans in 2014 and they doubled in cost every year until I finally got employer sponsored health insurance in 2018.
We waz Tiger Kangz
Alright I'm looking at these subs now and I did a quick ctrl f for hydroxy and I don't see anything about it on their front pages. Where did you see these subs turning around on hydroxychloroquine
I just don t see how you can be laying blame on one side of the aisle and not the other.
I am not arguing against flattening the curve as a practical measure. I'm arguing against the hysteria.
I agree 100 on your thoughts. I have 20 years in the Navy. Like all big businesses requests move slowly without some type of interference bringing the public or government officials into the request. The Captain knew what he was doing bypassing his boss who was in a stateroom across from his stateroom. They talk daily about what the ship needs. I think the Admiral was against forcing Big Navy to act quickly forcing the Captain for the crew's sake to go around the Chain of Command. Did you notice how fast the Navy reacted to helping the Carrier The man was well liked and his crew would do anything for him. He was a true leader for which the Navy is lacking.
He does not care what anyone thinks.
Maybe.
In this case you're seriously risking stripping others of their liberty by exercising yours. What did our boy Benny say about that
Wake up...Every media outlet is on China's payroll. Have you forgotten that the virus was labeled the China Virus when it first originated They control the Democrats with offshore bank account that cannot be traced. They own much of NY property and also Hollywood Studios are 80 percent or more China owned. Why do you think celebrities smear Trump publicly as if it's their turn. Democrats have been on their payroll for 40 years. In exchange for passing legislation and ecological regulations that cripples America's ability to manufacture and compete with China on a level playing field...they take cash for influence.They were also given Chinese Stock to ensure they looked out for their best interest in the future. This was Trump's first act as President to remove all of those useless Regulations and our economy took off. Democrats were told to get him removed at all cost or their checks will seize. They tried everything from sex scandals to Bullshit Impeachment proceedings....none were successful to remove a duly elected President. Since they did not succeed China used it last ditch effort to stop him from getting re elected. Unleash this China Virus and collapse his greatest accomplishment...the economy. They do not care if it cost lives across the globe. As long as it was secret until it had time to get to America....that s all they were worried about.
We had months of warning and still couldn't do better. When the virus goes back to China we'd owe them double.
There s option 3 where you allocate what you need and don t dramatically overshoot it. Let s declare martial law because hey we might need it.
I'm in Glendale right near the 134 and 5. Freeway traffic on them has been lower but still fairly constant throughout the day. I'm mainly talking about local traffic though.
Projecting pretty hard
Oh did i assault your filter bubble And what of the facts i listed above is a lie
I refuse to converse with anyone who honestly believes Biden is even remotely as bad as trump. Biden will be a fine president. Have a good night.
If you re not a doctor or an expert on pathology then my theory is you should shut the fuck up and start listening to them. That s what Trump is doing right he started listening to experts. No governor what s people to be out of work but they understand the impact will be much worse if they don t issue stay at home orders. So unless you can provide your medical degree please stop making stupid assumptions. Your ignorance is a danger to our society.
There's going to be lots of employment for forensic accountants after the Trump crime family is finally indicted.
Pro.ject tion
Multiple states including Alabama google.com 3famp and California sacbee.com finally got their requests for supplies from the National stockpile in the form of masks with dry rot and unusable ventilators.
Same.
I ve said it for a long time. What if we all stop working what happens. And now its actually happening lol
But this is only as bad as the flu.
Fucking Israel. Israel probably
Yes. But ignoring the pandemic is careless so use your brain people.
In a normal political situation I think you would be right but I think they are going to drop this little Durham report chock full of lies about Biden just to lower voter participation. He's gonna run the same play. Rile up his base which he has them locked in and then make the others so disgusted with the democratic candidate and politics in general that they stay home or vote third party.
The percentages for NY and NJ are correct. The percentage for Mississippi is 0. 00045. For Alabama it s 0. 0003. For Tennessee it s 0. 00067. Do the math yoyrself
That's an odd spelling of evil
Starting contacting you lawmakers and demanding this. It's the only reasonable way to vote if this isn't cleared up by then.
It s the voters own stupid fault. America shit its bed now we re lying in it.
Fox aganda it kills innocent Americans for profit. Enjoy your MyPillow everyone
Jesus that guy s for a punchable face.
2016 is feeling about right when a foreign government subverted the democratic elections.
It so tragic that 8 years of education then another 15 years of practical experience gets you to a point you become an expert in a field. Yet the label of libtard dismisses every grueling moment of knowledge education has garnered you so that Bob at the local hardware store can lay the truth down for us.
Y'all realize all those masks were sold under the table 3m told America they had none but they actually have tons and are selling them at twice the cost to other countries it is illegal to do this so Trump ordered them to be rerouted to the US because they are our owned products but 3M doesn't want to comply which is bullshit because they just want that extra money.
The hits just keep coming. I can't even with this guy.
This is beyond stupid this sub is a chore to read I already had problems with politics in America and the whole crowded rap presidential debat but it seems like you guys behave the same here... Being manichean and calling people antechrist isn't gonna help anyone or change the mind of people who follow Trump despite his obvious incompetence. Same with reworking the vote system would you talk about it if Hillary got elected the same way.. and what if Trump get re elected by an overwhelming majority The problem is way deeper than this and it's not just in America world democracy is getting more divided than it's ever been in post berlinwall communism era.
then its for you to fucking keep till expiring or selling it at high prices
He's still punishing people for doing their mandated duty during his impeachment or being related to people who did. Vindman and his brother. Sondland. Now this man. None of which did anything wrong.
I clicked on this thread to see an Orwell reference. Not disappointed
you realize it's only the far left in the US that actually supports universal healthcare right
Tell me where I can get a mask and I'll get one.
Pretty sure he was giving an update and said this shows promise. Drinking fish tank cleaner b c it has a similar looking name is not the President s fault that is natural selection.
What you said so yea. Btw can anyone explain to me why you like the annoying orange as a 14 year old white girl for president Don t mean to be offensive just wondering
Would you rather live in China if that meant no more chance of dying from a pandemi
Another distinguished staffer gone at the hands of a petty and vindictive President.
No that is a fortunate thing. The unfortunate thing is that some times the right thing to do is to fall on your sword and buck proper procedures.
Oh look everyone we got a tough guy
Sweet. I've lost 10 pounds living on my vodka liquid only diet during these times.
The last briefing not two years ago. I guess the shills are out of school.
The true colours of America is leaking through. Not a a fan any more. What a shit hole.
Lol. Ok.
Hiding with Dick Cheney back in 2002.
We've paid reparations for that move and admitted it was a travesty. Maybe not a good example for you to use.
what Are you actually saying people are going to go to drug dealers to get hydroxychloroquine
Everyone should listen to me because I know more than everyone and I know more about wearing masks in public than anyone. amp x200B DJT
He's about to cry Ps. Who put that idiot on the president's seat
It must be sad to be as hateful as you
It would be very hard to run those numbers and would result in numbers similar to how they've been predicting Wuhan Flu deaths where they start out with 2. 2 million and then drop down to 200k or whatever the new estimate is. They could find a miracle cure next week and or a vaccine next month and the adjusted inflating would never account for that sort of stuff. As of now we're doing good but we could be in a lot worse spot... imagine if delivery services were shut down over the pandemic Once you stop and realize how many things that are still working that are keeping your lives somewhat normal and sane and then imagine if they were shutdown that will be when things get scary. Oh ya Spanish flu was crazy and I've seen people compare them to the Wuhan flu but in modern times people just move around way more than they did in 1918. Airplanes trains cars etc. I hope it ends soon though... I'm getting tired of staying cooped up non stop. P
You must have been in a long time ago. The officer corps is a bunch of weak spined yes men afraid to step out of line lest they don t get that next promotion. They don t give a shit about their troops.
He wants to be able to examine every thought Trump has had during the crisis to criticize from the sidelines and with the benefit is hindsight. Schitt is not a leader but is just a clown desperate for attention.
Explain the travel bans in January then
How can you stop a global pandemic unless every person living in the country has access to healthcare When a person living in the US illegally contracts the virus they won t get the test performed and won t know that they are spreading the virus. It s a public health disaster to have a healthcare system that doesn t cover everyone in a pandemic. Our private healthcare system is being exposed right now.
This guy Michael Albert is the guy Pritzker usually has with him. fox32chicago.com He's kind of a legend in this state now. So I guess Pritzker just goes after particularly good interpreter's
I'm really not very tech savvy. Google Chrome You can find the site by typing Connect my Florida UI Connect I just kept trying At times I would be at the end of step 3 and BOOM back at the beginning and the privacy message. I could not begin to tell you how many times I put in my SS and PIN to log back in.
That was soothing to read
I just found it interesting. A lot of incarcerated felons are apparently pro Trump based off the things he's done in office. The Marshall Project is considered a nonpartisan journalism group primarily focused on prison activism as well so this is a good read. Trump should continue pushing stuff like this in my humble opinion.
Chy na
Driving has a 0. 011 death rate. Skydiving fatalities were 0. 006 in 2012 adventure.howstuffworks.com Coronavirus currently has a 2. 56 death rate. amp x200B Coronavirus currently has a signifigantly higher death rate and should be taken seriously. I am only using US numbers for these rates. amp x200B Also heart disease only has a 0. 19 fatality rate. So coronavirus is currently more lethal than heart disease.
I'm sure Trump will use his' Strategic Reserve to fix this.
Just noting it s not oc. Also to attract new folks to the sub. Though tbh there is a fairly solid chance that r libertarianmeme snagged it from r voluntaristmemes.
I'm real glad that my brother is unable to fill his prescription for an autoimmune disorder so the president can tweet about a drug that may or may not work.
He's achieved Donnie's dream of porking Ivanka Best I could come up with for an actual accomplishment.
You are the one that brought up Linda Sarsour being anti semetic. She is only called anti semetic because she supports BDS and doesn't support Isreal. And yeah I have a bone to pick with Israel not because I don't like Jews but because it is a racist country. Here aljazeera.com is an article about the Israeli prime minister saying According to the basic nationality law we passed Israel is the nation state of the Jewish people and only it Here aljazeera.com is another article about a law passed that stipulates that Israel is the historic homeland of the Jewish people and they have an exclusive right to national self determination in it
Well we do live in a depressing anxiety inducing society.
Just more of his How dare you question Dear Leader
They're looking for a miracle like their messiah prophesized.
I agree.. most of those airlines are going to be bankrupt soon anyhow. So mind as well save those funds for every day people to spend and re inject into the economy.
I was speaking more of the voters. Dem senators are just as bad as the GOP ones for the most part still. GOP cant stand anyone who speaks out from within. If one stands up for morals and standards they are A RINO' i wish the GOP was about small govt and fiscal responsibility.
lol more conspiracy theories there is no scientific evidence of this mythical voter suppression it doesnt exist. the idiot Democrats keep spilling out this nonsense conspiracy theories without any evidence
Please. The dipshits who have shaped domestic and foreign policy do not have a good track record at all. We should be so lucky to have Tucker Carlson shape immigration policy. We might see illegal aliens get the fuck out of our country. lol and Trump was a high profile businessman since the 80s. He didn't do reality tv until the 2000s.
I have to honestly ask knowing how Trimp is when it comes to being Miss Popularity on TV if he'd actually allow that with anyone except MAYBE Ivanka I have to ask is there a 3rd persona in the shadows This is an honest question. Well I meant locally not Putin
I agree businessmen especially failed businessmen should not be president. Thank you for your input fellow sovereign citizen
Just because budgets are created with itemized allocations doesn't mean that tax dollars are not fungible. When you fund Program A it necessarily means there will be fewer resources for Program B. Creating budgets is all about prioritizaiton. New York prioritized tax dollars for illegal aliens because muh wokeness. This is indisputable.
Totally agree. Fox News is biased to the right. CNN is biased to the left. I don t see what s wrong with identifying the politics of the news station or website you are getting your information from. I honestly prefer it. The daily wire is openly conservative and admit to having a conservative slant to their story selection. What s wrong with that At least you know where the writers and editors stand and don t try to lie and say they are unbiased. I personally like reading news from fox daily wire cnn wsj washington post etc. I figure if there is a bit of data that is consistent across all sites then that bit of data is more likely to be an actual fact. I can make my own opinions. I don t need CNN or Fox to tell me how to think about a piece of information.
If you're conflating the defense production act that is invoked under exceptional circumstances that threaten national security with a full fledged communist state...well good luck to you
Vote. Vote. Vote.
Yes he is exaggerating.he works form cnn
Bernie just needs to get elected then you'll be spot on
I m a senior aerospace and mechanical engineering student and if he gets re elected I m fucking done too. Fuck these ignorant buttfuckers let em have their incompetent cult but don t get me killed while doing it.
I just took the title from the article. Obviously not every chinese person is doing this but there are a lot of examples given in the article.
gt Should states dissolve their national guards and create a state militia amp x200B Why not
gt Trump at his last rally just said that the wage gains of the bottom 10 have been surpassing that of the top 10 for months. Do you know if this is actually true I would sure like it to be but I'm very skeptical.
Who the hell cares
I know people kinda hope Trump gets corona but seriously.. Bill Barr is the dangerous one here.
Or a woman. Trump doesn t like nasty women
I really like his Sunday Specials. It goes over tons of stuff...culture politics philosophy. He has had people like Yang on the program and I personally really enjoy listening to people I might disagree with sit down and have a good faith discussion. I wish more of us could just talk about our disagreements politely. I m no saint and I ve said mean things about people on the left online I m sure if you look at my history you would find something I ve said that I would never say to someone s face No one is perfect but I really try to be civil online. I m always polite and calm when discussing politics with someone in person but I m trying to be more civil online. I agree with a lot of the things Shapiro says because I think our philosophical beliefs align a lot however I disagree with him sometimes. I think skepticism is a good thing especially when you are reading or listening to someone you already agree with
Politics subreddit not news.
Slavery wasn't explicitly unconstitutional until the ratification of the 13th amendment. Bad example. It's important to remember that constitutional moral. And believe it or not but simply saying that stay at home orders given by the state. Federal is a different story are unconstitutional doesn't actually make it so. The 10th amendment and two centuries of legal precedent back this up. The courts will not intervene.
When Nixon left the Whitehouse his approval rating was around 25 proving you are correct.
Please make an exception for us
This bank has been having issues since 2015 it was on its way to failing long before the coronavirus came knocking.
snopes.com In reality your best argument is whether or not Trump should have restocked it. Neverless Obama has 3 years and didnt. He failed again.
And imprison its leaders. McConnell Trump Barr etc must spend the rest of their lives in orange jumpsuits.
Are you going to respond to the other guy who showed its not fake news
Would you be upset if this virus killed your parents
Trump understands medicine better than a doctor Holy shit haha
lol
Always want to hear opinions whether I agree or not. Let's talk. Though I have to be up at 5am so I may fall asleep.
That video is on January 21st about a week later Trump formed the Coronavirus Task Force January 29th and two days after that enacted the travel restrictions re China.
I can see increasing unemployment to 100 I see why businesses might need extra money due to extra costs from covid. I cannot see any reason what so ever to pay people gt 100 of what they made before nor do I see any point in the 1 200 stimulus checks. Keep in mind we now have decreased expenses on top of that since we can't go out. What do you see as the purpose behind this what problem is this solving I don't get it. Aren't we supposed to be shutting the economy down to limit the spread How do you shut the economy down and yet stimulate it at the same time It's like taking someone's car while offering them as much free gas as they want as a means of encouraging them to travel. It seems to me it's just throwing cash around to placate the public while leveraging that massive debt against ourselves in the future you get 15 hr for a few months now in exchange for 9 loaves of bread and social security cuts in the future. I don't see this ending well.
Trudeau is going for a dark tan look for his next blackface party.
You implied honor and service are virtuous though
